<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20020719114438.txt.gz
TIME:20020719114438
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - JULY 19, 2002 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS The following exhibit of ALLETE, Inc. is filed herewith in accordance with Item 601 of Regulation S-K: Exhibit Number ------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated July 19, 2002. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 19, 2002 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - market demand, including structural market changes; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - our ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 19, 2002
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. July 19, 2002 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------ James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 19, 2002 3
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit Number - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 ALLETE News Release dated July 19, 2002 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 19, 2002

Exhibit 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: July 19, 2002 Contact: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com NEWS Investor Tim Thorp Contact: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com ALLETE REPORTS SECOND-QUARTER EARNINGS -------------------------------------- Duluth, Minn. -- ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported earnings of 47 cents per share for the second quarter of 2002. Net income was $38.8 million on quarterly operating revenue of $376.7 million. Excluding exit charges related to the vehicle transport businesses, earnings were 50 cents per share for the quarter. In the second quarter of 2001, ALLETE reported $42.5 million of net income on operating revenue of $405.1 million, and earnings per share of 57 cents. Last year's results included the largest real estate transaction in company history. "We remain bullish on our core businesses," said David Gartzke, ALLETE Chairman, President, and CEO. "We remain committed to our strategy that looks for ways to increase the value of our company." Earnings from AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES increased by $8.7 million in the quarter compared with the second quarter of 2001. The 42 percent earnings increase came from mandated goodwill accounting changes, lower interest expense and increased auction efficiency. The receivables portfolio at Automotive Finance Corporation rose by 12 percent for the quarter compared with last year. ENERGY SERVICES earnings for the quarter were about the same as last year. While total kilowatt-hour sales were higher than in the second quarter of 2001, weak prices in the wholesale energy market contributed to flat earnings. For the second quarter, ALLETE recorded a loss of $5.7 million in INVESTMENTS AND CORPORATE CHARGES, compared with $9.2 million in income during the same period last year. During the second quarter of 2001, the company realized an $11.1 million gain on its largest real estate transaction ever. Difficult market conditions in the second quarter of 2002 contributed to less than acceptable returns from ALLETE's securities portfolio, which will be liquidated to eliminate future exposure to market uncertainties. Proceeds from this liquidation will be used to reduce the company's debt balance. WATER SALE UPDATE - ----------------- The company remains engaged in discussions relating to the proposed sale of ALLETE Water Services. The Florida Governmental Utility Authority has informed us it may not be taking any action regarding its potential purchase of Florida Water Services assets until September. Meanwhile, ALLETE continues to examine other opportunities for the sale of Florida Water. ALLETE has hired an investment banker to facilitate the sale of Heater Utilities and Georgia Water Services. That sale process is now in progress. The company expects to close both transactions in late 2002 or early 2003. (more)
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- EARNINGS GUIDANCE - ----------------- ALLETE is revising its earnings-per-share estimate for 2002 to be in the $2.00 to $2.10 range excluding the 5 cents of year-to-date exit charges as well as any gain from the sale of Water Services assets. This estimate reflects year-to-date performance, the planned liquidation of the securities portfolio, operating losses incurred prior to the exit from the vehicle transport business, and lower wholesale power prices for the year. The company continues to expect that Automotive Services will grow earnings by 30 percent in 2002 over 2001. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE's holdings include ADESA, the second largest wholesale vehicle auction network in North America; AFC, the leading provider of independent auto dealer inventory financing; Minnesota Power, a low-cost electric utility that serves some of the largest industrial customers in the United States; and Florida real estate investments. For more information about ALLETE, visit the company's Web site at www.allete.com. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. #### [LOGO] recycled paper ALLETE - 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 www.allete.com
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 4 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20020805140050.txt.gz
TIME:20020805140050
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - AUGUST 5, 2002 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE On August 5, 2002 ALLETE, Inc. filed completed and signed sworn statements under oath by its principal executive officer and principal financial officer pursuant to Section 21(a)(1) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. These sworn statements are filed as exhibits 99(a) and 99(b) to this Form 8-K. ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS Exhibit Number - ------- 99(a) - Statement Under Oath of Principal Executive Officer and Principal Financial Officer Regarding Facts and Circumstances Relating to Exchange Act Filings dated August 5, 2002 and signed by David G. Gartzke. 99(b) - Statement Under Oath of Principal Executive Officer and Principal Financial Officer Regarding Facts and Circumstances Relating to Exchange Act Filings dated August 5, 2002 and signed by James K. Vizanko. ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 5, 2002 1
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. August 5, 2002 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 5, 2002
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99(a) - Statement Under Oath of Principal Executive Officer and Principal Financial Officer Regarding Facts and Circumstances Relating to Exchange Act Filings dated August 5, 2002 and signed by David G. Gartzke. 99(b) - Statement Under Oath of Principal Executive Officer and Principal Financial Officer Regarding Facts and Circumstances Relating to Exchange Act Filings dated August 5, 2002 and signed by James K. Vizanko. ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 5, 2002

Exhibit 99(a) STATEMENT UNDER OATH OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER AND PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER REGARDING FACTS AND CIRCUMSTANCES RELATING TO EXCHANGE ACT FILINGS I, David G. Gartzke, state and attest that: (1) To the best of my knowledge, based upon a review of the covered reports of ALLETE, Inc., and, except as corrected or supplemented in a subsequent covered report: - no covered report contained an untrue statement of a material fact as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed); and - no covered report omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements in the covered report, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed). (2) I have reviewed the contents of this statement with ALLETE's audit committee. (3) In this statement under oath, each of the following, if filed on or before the date of this statement, is a "covered report": - Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001 of ALLETE; - all reports on Form 10-Q, all reports on Form 8-K and all definitive proxy materials of ALLETE filed with the Commission subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K identified above; and - any amendments to any of the foregoing. Subscribed and sworn to before me this 5th day of David G. Gartzke August 2002. - ------------------------ David G. Gartzke Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer Mary K. Johnson ------------------------------------ Notary Public Date: August 5, 2002 My Commission Expires: Jan. 31, 2005 ------------------- [Minnesota MARY K. JOHNSON State Seal] NOTARY PUBLIC - MINNESOTA My Commission Expires Jan. 31, 2005

Exhibit 99(b) STATEMENT UNDER OATH OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER AND PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER REGARDING FACTS AND CIRCUMSTANCES RELATING TO EXCHANGE ACT FILINGS I, James K. Vizanko, state and attest that: (1) To the best of my knowledge, based upon a review of the covered reports of ALLETE, Inc., and, except as corrected or supplemented in a subsequent covered report: - no covered report contained an untrue statement of a material fact as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed); and - no covered report omitted to state a material fact necessary to make the statements in the covered report, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading as of the end of the period covered by such report (or in the case of a report on Form 8-K or definitive proxy materials, as of the date on which it was filed). (2) I have reviewed the contents of this statement with ALLETE's audit committee. (3) In this statement under oath, each of the following, if filed on or before the date of this statement, is a "covered report": - Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2001 of ALLETE; - all reports on Form 10-Q, all reports on Form 8-K and all definitive proxy materials of ALLETE filed with the Commission subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K identified above; and - any amendments to any of the foregoing. Subscribed and sworn to before me this 5th day of James K. Vizanko August 2002. - --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer Mary K. Johnson ------------------------------------ Notary Public Date: August 5, 2002 My Commission Expires: Jan. 31, 2005 ---------------------------------- [Minnesota MARY K. JOHNSON State Seal] NOTARY PUBLIC - MINNESOTA My Commission Expires Jan. 31, 2005


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20020919171520.txt.gz
TIME:20020919171520
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - SEPTEMBER 19, 2002 ALLETE, Inc. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS. Reference is made to the 2001 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or the Company) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2001 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 11 - Sixth Paragraph Ref. Page 30 - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed February 28, 2002 - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 28, 2002 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2002 - Page 18 - Fifth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2002 - Page 17 - Sixth Paragraph and Page 22 - Third Paragraph On September 19, 2002 ALLETE announced that Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), a wholly owned water subsidiary, entered into an agreement to sell its assets to Florida Water Services Authority (FWSA), a governmental entity that was established by an interlocal agreement between the cities of Gulf Breeze and Milton, Florida. The purchase price is $471 million. Florida Water will receive $433 million at closing and expects to receive $38 million three years after the closing. In addition, Florida Water will receive $36 million of future customer hookup fees to be paid in three equal annual installments beginning in 2003. The purchase price, combined with the hookup fees, brings the total amount expected to be received in the transaction to $507 million. Aggregate net cash proceeds to ALLETE are expected to be $260 million for the entire transaction, $190 million of which are expected to be received in 2002. Terms of the purchase agreement call for a closing by December 15, 2002, subject to FWSA being able to issue bonds for the purchase price and other conditions. The sale of Florida Water assets is consistent with ALLETE's strategic objective to unlock shareholder value. The proceeds will further strengthen the Company's balance sheet and will allow for future investments in the Energy and Automotive Services segments. ALLETE plans to include a copy of the asset purchase agreement in an 8-K filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company will host a conference call with investors on Monday, September 23, 2002 at 9:00 a.m. Central time. Interested parties may listen to the conference by calling (913) 981-5572 or by listening to a rebroadcast on ALLETE's Web site located at www.allete.com. Ref. Page 30 - First Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2002 - Page 14 - First Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2002 - Page 17 - First Paragraph On September 19, 2002 ALLETE revised the Company's earnings per share estimate for 2002 to be in the range of $1.80 to $1.90, a change from the earlier estimate range of $2.00 to $2.10. As with the previous estimate, the updated estimate excludes 5 cents of year to date business exit charges as well as any gain from the sale of the Florida Water assets discussed above. This updated earnings estimate primarily reflects year to date weaker performance within ALLETE's Energy Services segment, due to continued lower-than-expected wholesale power prices. ALLETE continues to expect that earnings of its Automotive Services segment will grow by 30 percent in 2002 over 2001. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 19, 2002 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - market demand, including structural market changes; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - our ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 19, 2002
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. September 19, 2002 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 19, 2002 3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20020920154240.txt.gz
TIME:20020920154240
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - SEPTEMBER 19, 2002 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE. Reference is made to the 2001 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or the Company) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2001 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 11 - Sixth Paragraph Ref. Page 30 - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed February 28, 2002 - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 28, 2002 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2002 - Page 18 - Fifth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2002 - Page 17 - Sixth Paragraph and Page 22 - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 19, 2002 On September 19, 2002 ALLETE announced that Florida Water Services Corporation, a wholly owned water subsidiary, entered into an agreement to sell its assets to Florida Water Services Authority, a governmental entity that was established by an interlocal agreement between the cities of Gulf Breeze and Milton, Florida. In accordance with Item 601 of Regulation S-K ALLETE herewith files the related Asset Purchase Agreement by and between Florida Water Services Corporation and Florida Water Services Authority dated as of September 19, 2002. ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS Exhibit Number - ------ 2 - Asset Purchase Agreement by and between Florida Water Services Corporation and Florida Water Services Authority dated as of September 19, 2002. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 20, 2002 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - market demand, including structural market changes; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - our ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 20, 2002
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. September 20, 2002 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 20, 2002 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 2 - Asset Purchase Agreement by and between Florida Water Services Corporation and Florida Water Services Authority dated as of September 19, 2002. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 20, 2002

EXHIBIT 2 ASSET PURCHASE AGREEMENT by and between FLORIDA WATER SERVICES CORPORATION and FLORIDA WATER SERVICES AUTHORITY Dated as of September 19, 2002
ASSET PURCHASE AGREEMENT This Asset Purchase Agreement ("Agreement") is dated as of September 19, 2002, by and between Florida Water Services Authority, a public entity of the State of Florida ("Buyer"), and Florida Water Services Corporation, a Florida corporation ("Seller"). RECITALS WHEREAS, Seller owns potable water production, supply, treatment, and distribution systems, alternative water systems, wastewater collection, transmission, treatment and disposal systems, and reclaimed water facilities in various incorporated and unincorporated areas in Florida (the "System," as hereinafter defined); and WHEREAS, Buyer, pursuant to Chapter 163, Florida Statutes, and the Interlocal Agreement dated as of September 16, 2002, creating Buyer (the "Interlocal Agreement") and other applicable laws, has the power and authority to acquire and provide potable water, wastewater, and reclaimed water facilities and to provide service outside of the boundaries of its participating members; and WHEREAS, various governmental entities have threatened to condemn portions of System of the Seller, including portions of the water, wastewater and reclaimed water utility Facilities of the Seller, and in lieu of condemnation, Buyer desires to acquire all or substantially all of the assets which are used by Seller in providing services through the water, wastewater and reclaimed water Facilities throughout the State of Florida, and to avoid condemnation, Seller has consented to sell those assets to Buyer; and WHEREAS, Seller desires to sell, and Buyer desires to purchase, the Assets of Seller for the consideration and on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement; NOW THEREFORE, the parties, intending to be legally bound, agree as follows: 1. Definitions and Usage 1.1 Definitions For purposes of this Agreement, the following terms and variations thereof have the meanings specified or referred to in this Section 1.1: "Accounts Receivable"-- (a) all customer accounts receivable and other rights to payment from customers of Seller and the full benefit of all security for such accounts or rights to payment; (b) all other accounts or notes receivable of Seller and the full benefit 1
of all security for such accounts or notes; and (c) any claim, remedy or other right related to any of the foregoing. "Acquisition Bonds"-- means Bonds issued by the Buyer primarily for the purpose of paying the Purchase Price or installments thereof and anticipated to be in an aggregate amount sufficient to produce Acquisition Bond Net Proceeds in an amount equal to the Purchase Price. "Acquisition Bonds Net Proceeds' -- means the amount received from the sale of the Acquisition Bonds less all the costs of issuing the Bonds, establishing any required reserves, deducting $29 Million (for the purpose of funding Remedial Capital Projects although it is not required that it be so used), deducting $15,800,000 (for the purpose of funding future capital improvements to the System although it is not required to be so used), deducting an amount for the working capital needs of the Buyer and deducting the costs incurred by the Buyer in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. In the event that Bonds are issued at more than one time, the above mentioned $44,800,000 will be deducted from the initial Bond issue in order to determine the Acquisition Bond Net Proceeds. "Appurtenances"-- all privileges, rights, easements, hereditaments and appurtenances belonging to or for the benefit of the Land, including all easements appurtenant to and for the benefit of any Land (a "Dominant Parcel") for, and as the primary means of access between, the Dominant Parcel and a public way, or for any other use upon which lawful use of the Dominant Parcel for the purposes for which it is presently being used is dependent, and all rights existing in and to any streets, alleys, passages and other rights-of-way included thereon or adjacent thereto (before or after vacation thereof) and vaults beneath any such streets. "Assets" or "Assets to Be Sold"-- as defined in Section 2.1. "Assignment and Assumption Agreement"-- as defined in Section 2.7(a)(ii). "Assumed Liabilities"-- as defined in Section 2.4(a). "Best Efforts" -- the efforts that a prudent Person desirous of achieving a result would use in similar circumstances to achieve that result as expeditiously as possible, provided, however, that a Person required to use Best Efforts under this Agreement will not be thereby required to take actions that would result in a material adverse change in the benefits to such Person of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions or to dispose of or make any change to its business, expend any material funds or incur any other material burden. "Bill of Sale"-- as defined in Section 2.7(a)(i). 2
"Bonds" shall mean revenue bonds, the interest on which (i) accrues at fixed rates and (ii) is excluded from gross income of the holder thereof for federal income tax purposes, to be issued by the Buyer and payable solely from and secured solely by the Net Revenues of the System and, if consented to by Buyer, other assets of the Buyer. "Bond Insurer"--any nationally recognized financial institution or insurer of principal and interest on bonds of state and local governments whose bond purchase agreement, letter or line of credit, surety bond, insurance policy or guaranty would result in such bonds being rated in one of the highest two categories by Standard & Poor's or Moody's. "Breach"-- any breach of, or any inaccuracy in, any representation or warranty or any breach of, or a failure to perform or comply with, any covenant or obligation, in or of this Agreement. "Business Day"-- any day other than: (a) Saturday or Sunday; or (b) any other day on which banks in Florida are permitted or required to be closed. "Buyer"-- as defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Buyer Indemnified Persons"-- as defined in Section 11.2. "Capital Charges"- revenues, exclusive of Special Assessments, derived by the Buyer from impact fees, guaranteed revenues, service availability fees, or other such fees or charges, imposed upon landowners, builders or developers in connection with the Buyer improvement of property within the services areas of the System, to defray the costs of capital facilities. "Capital Improvement Plan Requirement" -- an annual amount of $25,000,000 for the purpose of providing extraordinary maintenance, rehabilitation, upgrades to equipment or facilities, increased plant capacity, and extensions and enlargements to the System, and excluding well and septic tank conversions. "Closing"-- as defined in Section 2.6. "Closing Date"-- the date on which the Closing actually takes place. "COBRA"-- as defined under Federal Employment Law. "Code"-- the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. "Confidential Information"-- as defined in Section 12.1. "Contemplated Transactions"-- all of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 3
"Cost of Operation and Maintenance"-- all current expenses, paid or accrued, for the operation, maintenance and repair of all Facilities of the System, as calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles for units of local government and on a consistent basis with the operation and maintenance and repair of the Facilities of the System under Seller's ownership, and shall include, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, insurance premiums, administrative expenses of the Buyer related solely to the System, labor, cost of materials, consumables and supplies used for current operation, but excluding any reserve for renewals or replacements, any extraordinary or emergency repairs, any replacements, any capital expenditures, any allowance for interest or depreciation or amortization, any other non-cash item, any profit, any franchise fees, any payments in lieu of taxes, and any voluntary payments to other governmental entities not required by law. "Customer Deposits"--any amounts deposited with or held by the Seller as customer deposits. "Damages"-- as defined in Section 11.2. "Due Diligence Expenses"-- a sum up to $200,000 or such greater amount as the Seller may approve in writing, to reimburse the costs incurred by the Buyer for its due diligence expenses in making the decision to acquire the System and issue the Acquisition Bonds for the Purchase Price. "Effective Time"-- 12:01 am. on the Closing Date. "Employee Plans"-- as defined in Section 3.13. "Employment Agreement"-- as defined in Section 2.7(a)(vi). "Encumbrance"-- any charge, claim, community or other marital property interest, condition, equitable interest, lien, option, pledge, security interest, mortgage, right of way, easement, encroachment, servitude, right of first option, right of first refusal or similar restriction, including any restriction on use, voting (in the case of any security or equity interest), transfer, receipt of income or exercise of any other attribute of ownership. "Environment"-- soil, land surface or subsurface strata, surface waters (including navigable waters and ocean waters), ground waters, drinking water supply, stream sediments, ambient air (including indoor air), plant and animal life and any other environmental medium or natural resource. "Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities"-- any cost, damages, expense, liability, obligation or other responsibility arising from or under any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law, including those consisting of or relating to: 4
(a) any environmental, health or safety matter or condition (including on-site or off-site contamination, occupational safety and health and regulation of any chemical substance or product); (b) any fine, penalty, judgment, award, settlement, legal or administrative proceeding, damages, loss, claim, demand or response, remedial or inspection cost or expense arising under any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law; (c) financial responsibility under any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law for cleanup costs or corrective action, including any cleanup, removal, containment or other remediation or response actions ("Cleanup") required by any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law (whether or not such Cleanup has been required or requested by any Governmental Body or any other Person) and for any natural resource damages; or (d) any other compliance, corrective or remedial measure required under any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law. The terms "removal," "remedial" and "response action" include the types of activities covered by the United States Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980 (CERCLA). "Environmental Law"-- any Legal Requirement that requires or relates to: (a) advising appropriate authorities, employees or the public of intended or actual Releases of pollutants or hazardous substances or materials, violations of discharge limits or other prohibitions and the commencement of activities, such as resource extraction or construction, that could have significant impact on the Environment; (b) preventing or reducing to acceptable levels the Release of pollutants or hazardous substances or materials into the Environment; (c) reducing the quantities, preventing the Release or minimizing the hazardous characteristics of wastes that are generated; (d) assuring that products are designed, formulated, packaged and used so that they do not present unreasonable risks to human health or the Environment when used or disposed of; (e) protecting resources, species or ecological amenities; 5
(f) reducing to acceptable levels the risks inherent in the transportation of hazardous substances, pollutants, oil or other potentially harmful substances; (g) cleaning up pollutants that have been Released, preventing the Threat of Release or paying the costs of such clean up or prevention; or (h) making responsible parties pay private parties, or groups of them, for damages done to their health or the Environment or permitting self-appointed representatives of the public interest to recover for injuries done to public assets. "ERISA"-- the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974. "Exchange Act"-- the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. "Excluded Assets"-- as defined in Section 2.2. "Facilities"-- the Land, leasehold, license, easement, right-of-way, prescriptive claim or other interest in real property currently owned or operated by Seller or used by the Seller in the operation of the System, including the Tangible Personal Property used or operated by Seller at the respective locations of the Land, and excluding the Excluded Assets. "GAAP"-- generally accepted accounting principles applicable to the Seller for financial reporting in the United States, applied on a basis consistent with the basis on which the balance sheets and the other financial statements referred to in Section 3.3 were prepared. "Governing Documents"-- the articles or certificate of incorporation and the bylaws of Sellers. "Governmental Authorization"-- any consent, license, registration or permit issued, granted, given or otherwise made available by or under the authority of any Governmental Body or pursuant to any Legal Requirement. "Governmental Body"-- any: (a) federal, state, local, municipal, or other government; (b) governmental authority of any nature (including any agency, branch, department, board, commission, court, tribunal or other entity exercising governmental powers ); or (c) body exercising any administrative, executive, judicial, legislative, police, regulatory or taxing authority or power. 6
"Gross Revenues" or "Revenues" shall mean all moneys, received or receivable by the Buyer, or accruing to it in the operation of the System, from rates, fees, rentals, or other charges for the services or Facilities of the System, excluding state and federal grants and grants in aid of construction, unless otherwise provided herein, all calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting practice applicable to a local government. "Gross Revenues" or "Revenues" shall also be deemed to include any amounts (exclusive of Capital Charges retained by Seller) received by the Buyer as Capital Charges for any facilities acquired from the Seller, but shall not include Special Assessments or Capital Charges for any facilities not purchased from the Seller. "Hazardous Activity"-- the distribution, generation, handling, importing, management, manufacturing, processing, production, refinement, Release, storage, transfer, transportation, treatment or use (including any withdrawal or other use of groundwater) of Hazardous Material in, on, under, about or from any of the Facilities or any part thereof into the Environment and any other act, business, operation or thing that increases the danger, or risk of danger, or poses an unreasonable risk of harm, to persons or property on or off the Facilities. "Hazardous Material"-- any substance, material or waste which is or will foreseeably be regulated by any Governmental Body, including any material, substance or waste which is defined as a "hazardous waste," "hazardous material," "hazardous substance," "extremely hazardous waste," "restricted hazardous waste," "contaminant," "toxic waste" or "toxic substance" under any provision of Environmental Law, and including petroleum, petroleum products, asbestos, presumed asbestos-containing material or asbestos-containing material, urea formaldehyde and polychlorinated biphenyls. "Improvements"-- all buildings, structures, fixtures and improvements located on the Land or included in the Assets, including those under construction. "Indemnified Person"-- as defined in Section 11.9. "Indemnifying Person"-- as defined in Section 11.9. "Intellectual Property Assets"-- as defined in Section 3.14. "Inventories"-- all inventories of Seller, wherever located, including without limitation, all pumps, pipes, valves, plumbing fixtures, chemicals, stored water, spare parts and all other materials and supplies to be used by Seller in the operation of its business. "IRS"-- the United States Internal Revenue Service and, to the extent relevant, the United States Department of the Treasury. 7
"Land"-- all parcels and tracts of land in which Seller has a fee ownership interest, except for the parcels and tracts of land set forth in Exhibit 2.2. "Lease"-- any Real Property Lease or any lease or rental agreement, license, right to use or installment and conditional sale agreement to which Seller is a party and any other Seller Contract pertaining to the leasing or use of any Tangible Personal Property. "Legal Requirement"-- any federal, state, local, municipal, or other constitution, law, ordinance, principle of common law, code, regulation, or statute. "Liability"-- with respect to any Person, any liability or obligation of such Person of any kind, character or description, whether known or unknown, absolute or contingent, accrued or unaccrued, disputed or undisputed, liquidated or unliquidated, secured or unsecured, joint or several, due or to become due, vested or unvested, executory, determined, determinable or otherwise, and whether or not the same is required to be accrued on the financial statements of such Person. "Material Consents"-- as defined in Section 7.3. "Maximum Annual Retainage" -- means the sum $12 Million annually. "Maximum Cumulative Retainage"-- the sum of $36 Million annually. "Net Revenues" shall mean Gross Revenues less the Cost of Operation and Maintenance. "Occupational Safety and Health Law"-- any Legal Requirement designed to provide safe and healthful working conditions and to reduce occupational safety and health hazards under the Occupational Safety and Health Act. "Order"-- any order, injunction, judgment, decree, ruling, assessment or arbitration award of any Governmental Body or arbitrator. "Ordinary Course of Business"-- an action taken by a Person will be deemed to have been taken in the Ordinary Course of Business only if that action is consistent in nature, scope and magnitude with the past practices of such Person and is taken in the ordinary course of the normal, day-to-day operations of such Person. "Permitted Encumbrances"-- as defined in Section 3.7. "Person"-- an individual, partnership, corporation, business trust, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated association, joint venture or other entity or a Governmental Body. 8
"Proceeding"-- any action, arbitration, audit, hearing, investigation, litigation or suit (whether civil, criminal, administrative, judicial or investigative, whether formal or informal, whether public or private) commenced, brought, conducted or heard by or before, or otherwise involving, any Governmental Body or arbitrator. "Purchase Price"-- as defined in Section 2.3. "Real Property"-- the Land and Improvements. "Real Property Lease"-- any ground lease or space lease. "Record"-- information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. "Related Person"-- (a) any Person that directly or indirectly controls, is directly or indirectly controlled by or is directly or indirectly under common control with such specified Person; (b) any Person that holds a Material Interest in such specified Person; (c) each Person that serves as a director, officer, partner, executor or trustee of such specified Person (or in a similar capacity); (d) any Person in which such specified Person holds a Material Interest; and (e) any Person with respect to which such specified Person serves as a general partner or a trustee (or in a similar capacity). For purposes of this definition, (a) "control" (including "controlling," "controlled by," and "under common control with") means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise, and shall be construed as such term is used in the rules promulgated under the Securities Act; (b) the "Family" of an individual includes (i) the individual, (ii) the individual's spouse, (iii) any other natural person who is related to the individual or the individual's spouse within the second degree and (iv) any other natural person who resides with such individual; and (c) "Material Interest" means direct or indirect beneficial ownership (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act) of voting securities or other voting interests representing at least ten percent (10%) of the outstanding voting power of a Person or equity securities or other equity interests representing at least ten percent (10%) of the outstanding equity securities or equity interests in a Person. 9
"Release"-- any release, spill, emission, leaking, pumping, pouring, dumping, emptying, injection, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migration on or into the Environment or into or out of any property. "Remedial Action"-- all actions, including any capital expenditures, required: (a) to clean up, remove, treat or in any other way address any Hazardous Material or other substance; (b) to prevent the Release or Threat of Release or to minimize the further Release of any Hazardous Material or other substance so it does not migrate or endanger or threaten to endanger public health or welfare or the Environment; (c) to perform pre-remedial studies and investigations or post-remedial monitoring and care; or (d) to bring all Facilities and the operations conducted thereon into compliance with Environmental Laws and environmental Governmental Authorizations. "Remedial Capital Projects"-- capital projects needed to serve existing customers as of the date of Closing that are necessary (i) to repair or replace Facilities that are defective, inoperative, or failing, (ii) to improve or repair the Facilities to the extent that the Facilities are not performing their intended functions in a commercially reasonable and efficient manner, (iii) to replace or improve the Facilities in order to cure any violations of any Governmental Authorizations; and (iv) to perform extraordinary maintenance or deferred maintenance that is necessary to enable the Facilities to perform their intended functions. Remedial Capital Projects shall not include any expansion related capital improvements, normal maintenance or renewal and replacement items normally incurred in the Ordinary Course of Business. Buyer shall have twelve (12) months from the date of Closing to investigate and determine the extent of Remedial Capital Projects existing as of the date of Closing, if any, which determination shall be consistent with prevailing utility industry maintenance practices. On or before the first anniversary of execution of this Agreement, Buyer shall notify Seller in writing of the specific projects and estimated cost for each Remedial Capital Project. Disputes, if any shall be resolved in accordance with Section 13.5. "Remedial Capital Projects Amount"-- an amount sufficient to enable the Buyer to fund all required Remedial Capital Projects for the System as it existed as of the date of the Closing, which amount shall be in excess of the aggregate amount of $29 Million funded for capital improvements as part of the Acquisition Bonds plus the Capital Improvement Plan Requirement for five years and the Renewal and Replacement Requirement for five years. "Renewal and Replacement Requirement"--an annual amount equal to $5,000,000 to be used for the purpose of paying the cost of renewals, upgrades, enhancements, or the replacement of capital assets of the System and extraordinary and emergency repairs thereto. 10
"Representative" -- with respect to a particular Person, any director, officer, manager, employee, agent, consultant, advisor, accountant, financial advisor, legal counsel or other representative of that Person. "Retained Liabilities"-- as defined in Section 2.4(b). "Seller"-- as defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Seller Contract"-- any contract, promise, or undertaking: (a) under which Seller has or may acquire any rights or benefits; (b) under which Seller has or may become subject to any obligation or liability; or (c) by which Seller or any of the assets owned or used by Seller is or may become bound or are encumbered. "Special Assessments" shall mean revenues derived by the Buyer from special assessments imposed upon benefited property in connection with post-Closing acquisition or construction of additions, extensions or improvements to the System. "Subsidiary" -- with respect to any Person (the "Owner"), any corporation or other Person of which securities or other interests having the power to elect a majority of that corporation's or other Person's board of directors or similar governing body, or otherwise having the power to direct the business and policies of that corporation or other Person (other than securities or other interests having such power only upon the happening of a contingency that has not occurred), are held by the Owner or one or more of its Subsidiaries. "System" -- shall mean the complete combined and consolidated water, sewer and reclaimed water utility systems of the Seller together with any and all assets, improvements, extensions and additions thereto hereafter constructed or acquired, but not including the Excluded Assets. "Tangible Personal Property"-- all machinery, equipment, tools, furniture, office equipment, computer hardware, supplies, materials, vehicles and other items of tangible personal property (other than Inventories) of every kind owned or leased by Seller (wherever located and whether or not carried on Seller's books), together with any express or implied warranty by the manufacturers or sellers or lessors of any item or component part thereof and all maintenance records and other documents relating thereto. "Tax"-- any income, gross receipts, license, payroll, employment, excise, severance, stamp, occupation, premium, property, environmental, windfall profit, customs, vehicle, airplane, boat, vessel or other title or registration, capital stock, franchise, employees' income withholding, foreign or domestic withholding, social security, unemployment, disability, real property, personal property, sales, use, transfer, value added, alternative, add-on minimum and other tax, fee, assessment, levy, tariff, charge or duty of any kind whatsoever and any interest, penalty, addition or additional 11
amount thereon imposed, assessed or collected by or under the authority of any Governmental Body or payable under any tax-sharing agreement or any other contract. "Tax Return"-- any return (including any information return), report, statement, schedule, notice, form, declaration, claim for refund or other document or information filed with or submitted to, or required to be filed with or submitted to, any Governmental Body in connection with the determination, assessment, collection or payment of any Tax or in connection with the administration, implementation or enforcement of or compliance with any Legal Requirement relating to any Tax. "Third Party"-- a Person that is not a party to this Agreement. "Third-Party Claim"-- any claim against any Indemnified Person by a Third Party, whether or not involving a Proceeding. "Threat of Release"-- a reasonable likelihood of a Release that may require action in order to prevent or mitigate damage to the Environment that may result from such Release. "Unbilled Customer Revenue" - revenue for services provided to customers that have not yet been billed as of the date of Closing, calculated on a basis consistent with Seller's current billing practices. 1.2 Usage (a) Interpretation. In this Agreement, unless a clear contrary intention appears: (i) the singular number includes the plural number and vice versa; (ii) reference to any Person includes such Person's successors and assigns but, if applicable, only if such successors and assigns are not prohibited by this Agreement, and reference to a Person in a particular capacity excludes such Person in any other capacity or individually; (iii) reference to any gender includes each other gender; (iv) reference to any agreement, document or instrument means such agreement, document or instrument as amended or modified and in effect from time to time in accordance with the terms thereof; (v) "hereunder," "hereof," "hereto," and words of similar import shall be deemed references to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular Article, Section or other provision hereof; 12
(vi) "including" (and with correlative meaning "include") means including without limiting the generality of any description preceding such term; (vii) with respect to the determination of any period of time, "from" means "from and including" and "to" means "to but excluding"; and (viii) references to documents, instruments or agreements shall be deemed to refer as well to all addenda, exhibits, schedules or amendments thereto. (b) Accounting Terms and Determinations. Unless otherwise specified herein, all accounting terms used herein shall be interpreted and all accounting determinations hereunder shall be made in accordance with GAAP, as the same applies to the Seller, and in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles applicable to units of local government, as the same applies to the Buyer. (c) Legal Representation of the Parties. This Agreement was negotiated by the parties with the benefit of legal representation, and any rule of construction or interpretation otherwise requiring this Agreement to be construed or interpreted against any party shall not apply to any construction or interpretation hereof. 2. Sale and Transfer of Assets; Closing 2.1 Assets To Be Sold Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, at the Closing, but effective as of the Effective Time, Seller shall sell, convey, assign, transfer and deliver to Buyer, and Buyer shall purchase and acquire from Seller, free and clear of any Encumbrances (except as to Appurtenances to the extent provided for elsewhere herein) other than Permitted Encumbrances, all of Seller's right, title and interest in and to all of Seller's property and assets, real, personal or mixed, tangible and intangible, of every kind and description, wherever located, including the following (but excluding the Excluded Assets): (a) all Real Property and all Appurtenances; (b) all Tangible Personal Property; (c) all Inventories; (d) all Accounts Receivable and Unbilled Customer Revenue; (e) all Seller Contracts and all outstanding offers or solicitations made by or to Seller to enter into any Contract; 13
(f) all Governmental Authorizations and all pending applications therefor or renewals thereof, in each case to the extent transferable to Buyer; (g) all data and Records related to the operations of Seller, including client and customer lists and Records, all personnel records (provided that Seller shall have reasonable access thereto) referral sources, research and development reports and Records, production reports and Records, service and warranty Records, equipment logs, operating guides and manuals, financial and accounting Records, creative materials, advertising materials, promotional materials, studies, reports, correspondence and other similar documents and Records and, subject to Legal Requirements; (h) all of the intangible rights and property of Seller, including Intellectual Property assets, the trade name, "Florida Water Services", going concern value, goodwill, telephone, telecopy and e-mail addresses and listings; (i) all claims of Seller against third parties relating to the Assets, whether choate or inchoate, known or unknown, contingent or non-contingent; and (j) all rights of Seller relating to deposits and prepaid expenses, claims for refunds and rights to offset in respect thereof and that are not excluded under Section 2.2, and not including Seller letters of credit for which the Seller is an applicant. All of the property and assets to be transferred to Buyer hereunder are herein referred to collectively as the "Assets" or "Assets to be Sold". 2.2 Excluded Assets Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 2.1 or elsewhere in this Agreement, the following assets of Seller (collectively, the "Excluded Assets") are not part of the sale and purchase contemplated hereunder, are excluded from the Assets and shall remain the property of Seller after the Closing: (a) all cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments; all payments (other than Customer Deposits) received by Seller prior to Closing; (b) Capital Charges received after the Closing by Buyer which shall be remitted to Seller in each one-year period following the date of the Closing, provided that (i) the total amount of Capital Charges retained by and belonging to Seller for any one such year shall not exceed the Maximum Annual Retainage (and at such time as the total amount of Capital Charges remitted to Seller for any such one year period equals the Maximum Annual Retainage, all further Capital Charges received by the System in such year shall be retained by and belong to the Buyer), and (ii) the aggregate amount retained by the Seller as Excluded Assets pursuant to this subsection 2.2(b) shall be the Maximum Cumulative Retainage and at such time as the total cumulative amount of Capital Charges remitted to Seller under this Section 2.2 equals the Maximum Cumulative 14
Retainage, no further Capital Charges shall be remitted to the Seller but all such Capital Charges received by the System thereafter be retained by and shall belong to the Buyer. The foregoing Capital Charges retained by Seller are to compensate Seller for the excess capacity existing in the System as of the Effective Date. The amount to be remitted to Seller hereunder by Buyer shall be paid to Seller once a year, commencing 13 months after the Effective Date, for all amount collected during the 12 month period then ended. Seller authorizes Buyer to collect the Capital Charges on behalf of Seller. (c) all minute books, stock Records and corporate seals; (d) any shares of capital stock of Seller held in treasury; (e) Seller's letters of credit outstanding at the date of Closing.; (f) all insurance policies and rights thereunder (except to the extent specified in Section 2.1(i) and (j)); (g) all of the contracts listed in Exhibit 2.2; (h) Records that Seller is required by law to retain in its possession; (i) all claims for refund of Taxes and other governmental charges of whatever nature; (j) all rights in connection with and assets of any Employee Plans; and (k) all rights of Seller under this Agreement, the Bill of Sale, the Assignment and Assumption Agreement; and (l) the property and assets expressly designated in Exhibit 2.2. 2.3 Consideration (A) INSTALLMENT PAYMENTS. The consideration for the Assets will be four hundred seventy-one million ($471,000,000), as may be adjusted as provided below in subsection 2.3(C) (the "Purchase Price"). The Purchase Price will be payable in Installments delivered by wire transfer from Buyer to Seller as follows: DATE PAYABLE INSTALLMENT AMOUNT DUE At the Closing Installment 1 $433,000,000 On the third anniversary date of the closing Installment 2 $38,000,000 (B) ANNUAL NET REVENUE DEFERRAL. Seller and Buyer have prepared a pro forma based upon the current Costs of Operation and Maintenance of the System and the 15
current schedule of rates, fees and charges for the services of the System (without any rate increases, but adjusted for indexing) a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit Z. Based on the pro forma, the parties anticipate that the Buyer will realize Net Revenues in each of the first four 12 month periods following the Closing ("Test Year(s)") sufficient to (i) fund the Renewal and Replacement Requirement, (ii) fund (iii) the Capital Improvement Plan Requirement pay 30 year level debt service on the Acquisition Bonds, and (iv) provide Buyer with net profits of $4.5 Million. The remaining bond proceeds for capital improvements funded in the Acquisition Bonds, plus interest earnings on such bond proceeds, may be allocated to fund short falls in the Capital Improvement Requirement in each of the Test Years in such amounts as may be necessary to meet such Test Year's Net Revenues test (the "Capital Funds Allocation"). Each year, Buyer and Seller will review the Net Revenues. In the event Buyer determines that Net Revenues, together with any revenue guarantee payments pursuant to subsection (E) below, are not sufficient to provide all of such amounts in clauses (i) through (iv) of the preceding sentence, the Buyer shall notify the Seller of such determination, and confer with the Buyer's underwriter and Seller to set forth in full its reasoning therefore. At the end of 36 months following the Closing, such portions of Installment 2 shall be deferred one year or such time as necessary so that the Installment will be equal to Net Revenues less the amounts set forth in (i) through (iv) in the preceding paragraph. Notwithstanding the above, the balance of any unpaid Purchase Price as a result of this subsection shall be paid to Seller within five (5) years of the date of Closing. (C) PURCHASE PRICE ADJUSTMENTS. Installment 2 of the Purchase Price may be reduced under the following circumstances: (i) the amount necessary to fund any indemnity amounts owed by Seller under Article 11 hereunder, and (ii) for all Remedial Capital Projects Amounts. Within 20 days of the execution of this Agreement, Seller will provide Buyer with its' current five year capital improvement program. Buyer shall notify Seller in writing of the Remedial Capital Projects Amount, if any. Seller shall identify the projects and estimated costs that comprise the Remedial Capital Projects Amount which are not included on Seller's five year capital improvement program. If Seller does not concur that a project is a Remedial Capital Project or part of the Capital Improvement Plan Requirement during the initial five year post Closing time period the matter shall be submitted to the dispute resolution process set forth in 13.5. 16
(D) DISPUTE RESOLUTION. Prior to implementing any reduction or offset, the Buyer shall provide written notice to Seller of any proposed reduction or offset. Seller shall have twenty (20) days to provide Buyer written notice of objection to any such reductions or offset. Buyer and Seller shall have sixty (60) days following written notice of objection from Buyer to amicably resolve Buyer's objections. To the extent any objections cannot be reconciled, either party may submit such objection to the Dispute Resolution Process. Buyer may at any time deposit any Reduction Amount with an escrow agent pending a final resolution under the Dispute Resolution Process, pursuant to an Escrow Agreement reasonably satisfactory to the parties and to the extent Buyer has done so Buyer shall not be deemed in default hereunder. (E) Seller shall provide a guarantee ("Guarantee") in the form to be agreed upon with 30 days after execution of this Agreement that Buyer will receive Gross Revenues constituting monthly water and sewer charges ("Monthly Fees") for the first twelve months after Closing of $95,318,000; for the second twelve months of $97,701,000; and for the third twelve months of $100,143,000. If the Buyer lowers any Monthly Fees during the forgoing time periods, the amount guaranteed will be reduced by the amount the Monthly Fees would have been if such reduction had not occurred. (F) The Buyer agrees to use all reasonable commercial efforts to issue the Acquisition Bonds. In the event the Buyer, after consultation with the Buyer's financial advisor(s), underwriter(s), legal advisors, and with Seller, in good faith, determines that some or all of such Acquisition Bonds cannot be sold on a date that permits the Closing to occur on or prior to December 15, 2002, in that the Acquisition Bonds Net Proceeds would be less than $433,000,000, then the Buyer shall immediately notify Seller in writing of such determination, with such notice setting forth in reasonable detail the bases upon which such determination was made, and the requirements, if reasonably ascertainable to Seller, for ultimate issuance of all of the Bonds or such portion thereof that would result in Acquisition Bond Net Proceeds received in an amount equal to or greater than $433,000,000 on or prior to December 15, 2002. Upon receipt of such notice Seller shall have the option of (1) at any time between the receipt of the notice and the issuance of the Bonds, closing the transaction, and increasing the future installments set forth above by the amount that the Acquisition Bonds Net Proceeds are less than $433,000,000 in an equitable manner as agreed to by both Buyer and Seller; (2) postponing the Closing until such time as Acquisition Bonds resulting in Acquisition Bonds Net Proceeds of not less than $433,000,000 can reasonably be issued in accordance with this Agreement; or (3) canceling this Agreement, and, if cancelled, thereupon the Buyer and Seller shall have no liabilities and no further obligations to each other under this Agreement, except that Seller shall pay to Buyer the Due Diligence Expenses. 17
For purposes of this Section 2.3(b), the Capital Charges remitted to and retained by Seller shall not include the portion thereof representing AFPI, to the extent of the following: PERIOD PERCENTAGE OF AFPI ------ ------------------ for Capital Charges received until 0% the first anniversary date of the Closing for Capital Charges received until 20% the second anniversary date of the Closing for Capital Charges received until 40% the third anniversary date of the Closing for Capital Charges received until 60% the fourth anniversary date of the Closing for Capital Charges received until 80% the fifth anniversary date of the Closing and thereafter 100% 2.4 Liabilities (a) Assumed Liabilities. On the Closing Date, but effective as of the Effective Time, the Buyer shall assume and agree to discharge only the following Liabilities of Seller (the "Assumed Liabilities"): (i) any account payable (other than an account payable to any Related Person of Seller) arising with respect to the System, that remains unpaid at and is not delinquent as of the Effective Time but only to extent it is included to determine the Final True Up as set forth in Section 2.7(c); (ii) any account payable arising with respect to the System, (other than a account payable to any Related Person of Seller ) incurred by Seller in the Ordinary Course of Business between the date of this Agreement and the Effective Time that remains unpaid at and is not delinquent as of the Effective Time but only to extent it is included to determine the Final True Up as set forth in Section 2.7(c); (iii) any Liability to Seller's customers (other than an account payable) incurred by Seller in the Ordinary Course of Business outstanding as of the Effective Time, including, but not limited to Customer Deposits, (other than any 18
Liability arising out of or relating to a Breach that occurred prior to the Effective Time); (iv) any Liability arising after the Effective Time under the Seller Contracts (other than any Liability arising under the contracts described on Exhibit 2.2 or arising out of or relating to a Breach that occurred prior to the Effective Time); any Liability of Seller arising after the Effective Time under any Seller Contract included in the Assets that is entered into by Seller after the date hereof in the Ordinary Course of Business or in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement (other than any Liability arising out of or relating to a Breach that occurred prior to the Effective Time), and (v) any Liability of Buyer under this Agreement or any other document executed in connection with the Contemplated Transactions, and (vi) any Liability of Buyer based upon Buyer's acts or omissions occurring after the Effective Time, and (vii) any Liability arising after Closing from operation of the System. (b) Retained Liabilities. The Retained Liabilities shall remain the sole responsibility of and shall be retained, paid, performed and discharged solely by Seller. "Retained Liabilities" shall mean all Liabilities other than Assumed Liability. 2.5 Allocation Seller shall prepare and deliver IRS Form 8594 to Buyer within forty-five (45) days after the Closing Date to be filed with the IRS. In any Proceeding related to the determination of any Tax, neither Buyer nor Seller shall contend or represent that such allocation is not a correct allocation. 2.6 Closing The purchase and sale provided for in this Agreement (the "Closing") will take place at the offices of Buyer's counsel commencing at 10:00 a.m. (local time) on or before December 15, 2002, unless Buyer and Seller otherwise agree. Subject to the provisions of Section 9, failure to consummate the purchase and sale provided for in this Agreement on the date and time and at the place determined pursuant to this Section 2.6 will not result in the termination of this Agreement and will not relieve any party of any obligation under this Agreement. In such a situation, the Closing will occur as soon as practicable, subject to Section 9. 19
2.7 Closing Obligations In addition to any other documents to be delivered under other provisions of this Agreement, at the Closing: (a) Seller shall deliver to Buyer, together with funds sufficient to pay all Taxes necessary for the transfer, filing or recording thereof: (i) a bill of sale for all of the Assets that are Tangible Personal Property in the form to be agreed upon by the parties prior to Closing (the "Bill of Sale") executed by Seller and the guaranty; (ii) an assignment of all of the Assets that are intangible personal property in the form to be agreed upon by the parties prior to Closing , which assignment shall also contain Buyer's undertaking and assumption of the Assumed Liabilities (the "Assignment and Assumption Agreement") executed by Seller; (iii) for each interest in Real Property identified on Exhibit 3.7(a) and (b), a recordable special warranty deed; for all easement interests, an assignment of easements without warranty; for each leasehold interest, an assignment of lease, or such other appropriate document or instrument of transfer, as the case may require, together with a general assignment by the Seller of any and all rights or interests Seller may otherwise have or hold (whether by license, permit, prescriptive right, or otherwise) in respect of its operation of the System, to occupy, use, traverse, spray, percolate through, burrow under, each in form and substance satisfactory to Buyer and its counsel and executed by Seller; (iv) assignments of all Intellectual Property Assets executed by Seller in form reasonably satisfactory to Buyer; (v) such other deeds, bills of sale, assignments, certificates of title, documents and other instruments of transfer and conveyance as may reasonably be requested by Buyer, each in form and substance agreed upon by the parties prior to Closing, executed by Seller; (vi) employment agreements in the form to be prepared by Buyer in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, executed by such members of Seller's senior management team as identified by Buyer in writing within ten business days after execution of this Agreement (the "Employment Agreements"); (vii) assignments of all construction work in progress in form reasonably acceptable to Buyer which have not yet been placed in service as of the date of the Closing (such capital improvements which have been placed in service being part of the Facilities which are otherwise conveyed by Seller hereunder); 20
(viii) a certificate executed by Seller as to the accuracy of its representations and warranties as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing in accordance with Section 7.1 and as to its compliance with and performance of their covenants and obligations to be performed or complied with at or before the Closing in accordance with Section 7.2; and (ix) a certificate of the Secretary of Seller certifying, as complete and accurate as of the Closing, attached copies of the Governing Documents of Seller, certifying and attaching all requisite resolutions or actions of Seller's board of directors and shareholders approving the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions and certifying to the incumbency and signatures of the officers of Seller executing this Agreement and any other document relating to the Contemplated Transactions. (b) Buyer shall deliver to Seller: (i) Installment 1 of Four Hundred Thirty-Three Million dollars ($433,000,000) plus or minus such other funds as set forth on a closing statement to be agreed upon between Buyer and Seller pursuant to the terms of this Agreement by wire transfer to a domestic account of a United States bank specified by the closing Seller in a writing delivered to Buyer at least three (3) business days prior to the Closing Date; (ii) the Assignment and Assumption Agreement executed by Buyer; (iii) the executed Employment Agreements ; (iv) a certificate executed by Buyer as to the accuracy of its representations and warranties as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing in accordance with Section 8.1 and as to its compliance with and performance of its covenants and obligations to be performed or complied with at or before the Closing in accordance with Section 8.2; and (v) a certificate of the Secretary of Buyer certifying, as complete and accurate as of the Closing, attached copies of the Governing Documents of Buyer and certifying and attaching all requisite resolutions or actions of Buyer's governing board approving the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions and certifying to the incumbency and signatures of the officers of Buyer executing this Agreement and any other document relating to the Contemplated Transactions. (c) As additional consideration for the transaction the determination of the following (the "Final True Up") will take place between 120 and 140 days after the Closing and, in the event that the parties cannot agree on the foregoing, then either party 21
may submit such dispute to the Dispute Resolution Process. To the extent that Eligible Accounts (as hereinafter defined) and Eligible Unbilled Revenues (as hereinafter defined) sold to the Seller hereunder as of the Effective Time minus accounts payable assumed by the Buyer hereunder as of the Effective Time ("Final Computed Amount") is in an amount greater than zero ($0) Dollars, then the Buyer shall immediately pay to the Seller the difference and to the extent that the Final Computed Amount is less than zero ($0) Dollars, then the Seller shall immediately pay to the Buyer the difference. The payment in the foregoing sentence shall be net of any payments made pursuant to the second sentence of this Section. "Eligible Accounts" means Accounts Receivable outstanding as of the Effective Time that are actually collected by the Buyer within 90 days after the Effective Time and "Eligible Unbilled Accounts" means Unbilled Accounts outstanding as of the Effective Time that are actually collected by the Buyer within 120 days after the Effective Time. (d) At the Closing, the Buyer shall have received (i) an opinion of counsel acceptable to the Buyer stating that neither the City of Gulf Breeze nor the City of Milton will be held liable, as a matter of law, for the liabilities of the Buyer and (ii) an opinion of counsel acceptable to the Buyer stating that upon the acquisition of the System by the Buyer, the rates, fees and charges for the services and facilities of the System are not subject to regulation by the Florida Public Service Commission or any local regulatory authority. 2.8 Consents (a) If there are any Material Consents that have not yet been obtained (or otherwise are not in full force and effect) as of the Closing, in the case of each Seller Contract as to which such Material Consents were not obtained (or otherwise are not in full force and effect) (the "Restricted Material Contracts"), Buyer may waive the closing conditions as to any such Material Consent and either: (i) elect to have Seller continue its efforts to obtain the Material Consents; or (ii) elect to have Seller retain that Restricted Material Contract and all Liabilities arising therefrom or relating thereto; or (iii) elect to have Seller require any other obligations under such contract to perform their obligations under such contract and remit to Seller the amounts due to such obligations, for payment by the Seller to such obligations. If Buyer elects to have Seller continue its efforts to obtain any Material Consents and the Closing occurs, notwithstanding Sections 2.1 and 2.4, neither this Agreement nor the Assignment and Assumption Agreement nor any other document related to the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions shall constitute a sale, assignment, 22
assumption, transfer, conveyance or delivery or an attempted sale, assignment, assumption, transfer, conveyance or delivery of the Restricted Material Contracts, and following the Closing, the parties shall use Best Efforts, and cooperate with each other, to obtain the Material Consent relating to each Restricted Material Contract as quickly as practicable. Pending the obtaining of such Material Consents relating to any Restricted Material Contract, the parties shall cooperate with each other in any reasonable and lawful arrangements designed to provide to Buyer the benefits of use of the Restricted Material Contract for its term (or any right or benefit arising thereunder, including the enforcement for the benefit of Buyer of any and all rights of Seller against a third party thereunder). Once a Material Consent for the sale, assignment, assumption, transfer, conveyance and delivery of a Restricted Material Contract is obtained, Seller shall promptly assign, transfer, convey and deliver such Restricted Material Contract to Buyer, and Buyer shall assume the obligations under such Restricted Material Contract assigned to Buyer from and after the date of assignment to Buyer pursuant to a special-purpose assignment and assumption agreement substantially similar in terms to those of the Assignment and Assumption Agreement (which special-purpose agreement the parties shall prepare, execute and deliver in good faith at the time of such transfer, all at no additional cost to Buyer). (b) If there are any Consents not listed on Exhibit 7.3 necessary for the assignment and transfer of any Seller Contracts to Buyer (the "Nonmaterial Consents") which have not yet been obtained (or otherwise are not in full force and effect) as of the Closing, Buyer shall elect at the Closing, in the case of each of the Seller Contracts as to which such Nonmaterial Consents were not obtained (or otherwise are not in full force and effect) (the "Restricted Nonmaterial Contracts"), whether to: (i) accept the assignment of such Restricted Nonmaterial Contract, in which case, as between Buyer and Seller, such Restricted Nonmaterial Contract shall, to the maximum extent practicable and notwithstanding the failure to obtain the applicable Nonmaterial Consent, be transferred at the Closing pursuant to the Assignment and Assumption Agreement as elsewhere provided under this Agreement; or (ii) reject the assignment of such Restricted Nonmaterial Contract, in which case, notwithstanding Sections 2.1 and 2.4, (A) neither this Agreement nor the Assignment and Assumption Agreement nor any other document related to the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions shall constitute a sale, assignment, assumption, conveyance or delivery or an attempted sale, assignment, assumption, transfer, conveyance or delivery of such Restricted Nonmaterial Contract, and (B) Seller shall retain such Restricted Nonmaterial Contract and all Liabilities arising therefrom or relating thereto. 23
3. Representations and Warranties of Seller Seller represents and warrants to Buyer as of the Exhibit Delivery Date (as hereinafter defined) as follows: 3.1 Organization And Good Standing (a) Seller is qualified to do business in the State of Florida. Seller is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Florida, with full corporate power and authority to conduct its business as it is now being conducted, to own or use the properties and assets that it purports to own or use, and to perform all its obligations under the Agreement. Complete and accurate copies of the Governing Documents of Seller, as currently in effect, will be provided to Buyer prior to Closing. . (b) Seller has no Subsidiary and, except as disclosed to Buyer in writing prior to Closing, does not own any shares of capital stock or other securities of any other Person. 3.2 Enforceability; Authority; No Conflict (a) This Agreement constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of Seller, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms and each of Seller's Closing Documents will constitute the legal, valid, and binding obligation of Seller, enforceable against Sellers. Seller has the absolute and unrestricted right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and to perform its obligations under this Agreement, and such action has been duly authorized by all necessary action by Seller's shareholders and board of directors. (b) Neither the execution and delivery of this Agreement nor the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions will, directly or indirectly (with or without notice or lapse of time): (i) Breach (A) any provision of any of the Governing Documents of Seller or (B) any resolution adopted by the board of directors or the shareholders of Seller; (ii) except as disclosed in Exhibit 7.3, Breach any provision of, or give any Person the right to declare a default or exercise any remedy under, or to accelerate the maturity or performance of, or payment under, or to cancel, terminate or modify, any Seller Contract; or (iii) result in the imposition or creation of any Encumbrance upon or with respect to any of the Assets. 24
(c) Except as provided under Section 367.071, Florida Statutes, and applicable equivalent County Regulatory provisions, Seller is not required to give any notice to or obtain any material consent from any Person in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions except as set forth in Exhibit 3.2(c). 3.3 Financial Statements Seller has delivered or made available to Buyer: (a) an audited balance sheet of Seller as at December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999 (including the notes thereto, the "Balance Sheet"), and the related audited statements of income, changes in shareholders' equity and cash flows for the fiscal year then ended, including in each case the notes thereto, together with the report thereon of Price Waterhouse Coopers, independent certified public accountants; and (b) an unaudited balance sheet of Seller as at July 31, 2002 (the "Interim Balance Sheet") and the related unaudited statement of income. Such financial statements fairly present the financial condition and the results of operations, changes in shareholders' equity and cash flows of Seller as of the respective dates of and for the periods referred to in such financial statements, all in accordance with GAAP. 3.4 Sufficiency of Assets The Assets (a) constitute all of the assets, tangible and intangible, of any nature whatsoever, necessary to operate Seller's business in the manner presently operated by Seller and (b) include all of the operating assets of Seller. 3.5 Description of Land Exhibit 3.5 contains a description of the Land. 3.6 Description of Leased Real Property Exhibit 3.6 contains a description of the Leased Real Property. 3.7 Title to Assets; Encumbrances (a) Seller owns good and marketable title to its respective estates in the Land, free and clear of any Encumbrances, other than: (i) liens for Taxes for the current tax year which are not yet due and payable; and (ii) those described in Exhibit 3.7 ("Real Estate Encumbrances"). To the extent in Seller's possession, true and complete copies of (A) all deeds, existing title insurance policies and surveys of or pertaining to the Real Property and (B) 25
all instruments, agreements and other documents evidencing, creating or constituting any Real Estate Encumbrances will be made available to Buyer promptly. Seller warrants to Buyer that, at the time of Closing, the Land shall be free and clear of all Real Estate Encumbrances other than those identified on Exhibit 3.7 as reasonably acceptable to Buyer ("Permitted Real Estate Encumbrances"). (b) Seller owns good and transferable title to all of the other Assets free and clear of any Encumbrances other than those described in Exhibit 3.7 ("Non-Real Estate Encumbrances"). Seller warrants to Buyer that, at the time of Closing, all other Assets shall be free and clear of all Non-Real Estate Encumbrances other than those identified on Exhibit 3.7 and which are reasonably acceptable to Buyer ("Permitted Non-Real Estate Encumbrances" and, together with the Permitted Real Estate Encumbrances "Permitted Encumbrances"). Seller makes no representations regarding title to or the sufficiency of Appurtenances to the Real Estate. 3.8 Taxes (a) Tax Returns Filed and Taxes Paid. Seller has filed or caused to be filed on a timely basis all Tax Returns and all reports with respect to Taxes that are or were required to be filed pursuant to applicable Legal Requirements. All Tax Returns and reports filed by Seller are true, correct and complete. Seller has paid, or made provision for the payment of all Taxes that have or may have become due for all periods covered by the Tax Returns or otherwise, or pursuant to any assessment received by Seller, except such Taxes, if any, as are listed in Part 3.14(a) and are being contested in good faith. No claim has been made or is expected to be made by any Governmental Body in a jurisdiction where Seller does not file Tax Returns that it is or may be subject to taxation by that jurisdiction. There are no Encumbrances on any of the Assets that arose in connection with any failure (or alleged failure) to pay any Tax, and Seller has no knowledge of any basis for assertion of any claims attributable to Taxes which, if adversely determined, would result in any such Encumbrance. (b) Buyer agrees to comply with the requirements of Section 196.295, Florida Statutes, Advalorem and Personal Property Taxes. (c) Specific Potential Tax Liabilities and Tax Situations. (i) Withholding. All Taxes that Seller is or was required by Legal Requirements to withhold, deduct or collect have been or will be duly withheld, deducted and collected and, to the extent required, have been paid to the proper Governmental Body or other Person. 26
3.9 Compliance With Legal Requirements; Governmental Authorizations (a) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.11, without representation that items on Exhibit 3.11 are Material: (i) To Seller's knowledge, Seller is in compliance with each Legal Requirement that is applicable to it or to the conduct or operation of its business or the ownership or use of any of its assets; (ii) No event has occurred or circumstance exists that (A) may constitute or result in a violation by Seller of, or a failure on the part of Seller to comply with, any Legal Requirement or (B) may give rise to any obligation on the part of Seller to undertake, or to bear all or any portion of the cost of, any remedial action of any nature; and (iii) Seller has not received any notice or other communication (whether oral or written) from any Governmental Body or any other Person regarding (A) any actual, alleged, possible or potential violation of, or failure to comply with, any Legal Requirement or (B) any actual, alleged, possible or potential obligation on the part of Seller to undertake, or to bear all or any portion of the cost of, any remedial action of any nature. (b) Exhibit 3.11(b) contains a complete and accurate list of each Governmental Authorizations that are held by Seller or that otherwise relates to Seller's business or the Assets. To Seller's knowledge, the Governmental Authorizations listed are valid and in full force and effect. (i) Seller is in material compliance with all of the Material terms and requirements of the Governmental Authorizations; (ii) No event has occurred or circumstance exists that may (A) constitute or result directly or indirectly in a material violation of or a material failure to comply with any material term or requirement of any Governmental Authorization or (B) result directly or indirectly in the revocation, withdrawal, suspension, cancellation or termination of, or any modification to, any material Governmental Authorization; (iii) Seller has not received any notice or other communication (whether oral or written) from any Governmental Body or any other Person regarding (A) any actual, alleged, possible or potential violation of or failure to comply with any term or requirement of any Governmental Authorization or (B) any actual, proposed, possible or potential revocation, withdrawal, suspension, cancellation, termination of or modification to any Governmental Authorization, OTHER THAN such violations, failures, revocations, withdrawals, suspensions, cancellations, 27
terminations or modifications as have either been resolved with such Governmental Body or Person, or are not material to the successful operation of the System or to the results of such operations; and (iv) To the best of Seller's knowledge, all applications required to have been filed for the renewal of the material Governmental Authorizations have been duly filed on a timely basis with the appropriate Governmental Bodies, and all other Material filings required to have been made with respect to such Governmental Authorizations have been duly made on a timely basis with the appropriate Governmental Bodies. The Governmental Authorizations collectively constitute the Governmental Authorizations necessary to permit Seller to lawfully conduct and operate its business in the manner in which it currently conducts and operates such business and to permit Seller to own and use its assets in the manner in which it currently owns and uses such assets. 3.10 Legal Proceedings; Orders (a) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.12, there is no pending or, to Seller's knowledge, threatened Proceeding: (i) by or against Seller or that otherwise relates to or may affect the business of, or any of the assets owned or used by, Seller; or (ii) that challenges, or that may have the effect of preventing, delaying, making illegal or otherwise interfering with, any of the Contemplated Transactions. To the knowledge of Seller, no event has occurred or circumstance exists that is reasonably likely to give rise to or serve as a basis for the commencement of any such Proceeding. Seller will promptly deliver or provided access to Buyer copies of all pleadings, correspondence and other documents relating to each Proceeding listed in Exhibit 3.12. There are no Proceedings listed or required to be listed in Exhibit 3.12 that could have a Material adverse effect on the business, operations, assets, condition or prospects of Seller or upon the Assets. (b) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.12; to the knowledge of Seller, no officer, director, agent or employee of Seller is subject to any Order that prohibits such officer, director, agent or employee from engaging in or continuing any conduct, activity or practice relating to the business of Seller. 28
(c) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.12: (i) To Seller's knowledge, Seller is in Material compliance with all of the terms and requirements of each Order to which it or any of the Assets is or has been subject; (ii) To Seller's knowledge, no event has occurred or circumstance exists that is reasonably likely to constitute or result in a violation of or failure to comply with any term or requirement of any Order to which Seller or any of the Assets is subject material to the operation of the System or a portion thereof; and (iii) Seller has not received any notice or other communication (whether oral or written) from any Governmental Body or any other Person regarding any actual, alleged, possible or potential violation of, or failure to comply with, any term or requirement of any Order to which Seller or any of the Assets is or has been subject, that has not already been resolved. 3.10(A) Absence of Certain Changes and Events. (a) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.10(A), since July 1, 2002, Seller has conducted its business only in the Ordinary Course of Business, there has not been any material adverse change in its business and in the operation of the System, and there has not been: (b) There has not been any damage to or destruction or loss of any Asset, whether or not covered by insurance that has not been replaced or which will not be replaced prior to the Effective Time; (c) There has not been (to the extent the same might be material to the results of operations of the System or a portion thereof) a sale (other than sales of Inventories in the Ordinary Course of Business), lease or other disposition of any Asset or property of Seller (including the Intellectual Property Assets); 3.11 Contracts; No Defaults (a) To the best of Seller's knowledge, Seller has delivered or made available to Buyer accurate and complete copies, of: (i) each Seller Contract that involves performance of services or delivery of goods or materials by Seller of an amount or value in excess of $10,000; (ii) each Seller Contract that involves performance of services or delivery of goods or materials to Seller of an amount or value in excess of $10,000; 29
(iii) each Seller Contract that was not entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business and that involves expenditures or receipts of Seller in excess of $10,000; (iv) each Seller Contract affecting the ownership of, leasing of, title to, use of or any leasehold or other interest in any real or personal property (except personal property leases and installment and conditional sales agreements having a value per item or aggregate payments of less than $10,000 and with a term of less than one year); (v) each Seller Contract with any labor union or other employee representative of a group of employees relating to wages, hours and other conditions of employment; each Seller Contract entered into other than in the Ordinary Course of Business that contains or provides for an express undertaking by Seller to be responsible for consequential damages; (vi) each Seller Contract for capital expenditures in excess of $10,000; (vii) each Seller Contract not denominated in U.S. dollars; (viii) each Seller Contract containing covenants that in any way purport to restrict Seller's business activity or limit the freedom of Seller to engage in any line of business or to compete with any Person; (ix) each power of attorney of Seller that is currently effective and outstanding; (x) each written warranty, guaranty, and/or similar undertaking withy respect to contractual performance extended by Seller other than in the Ordinary Course of Business; and (xi) each amendment, supplement and modification (whether oral or written) in respect of any of the foregoing. (b) Except as set forth in Exhibit 7.3: (i) each Contract which is to be assigned to or assumed by Buyer under this Agreement is in full force and effect and is valid and enforceable in accordance with its terms; (ii) each Contract which is being assigned to or assumed by Buyer is assignable by Seller to Buyer without the consent of any other Person; (c) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.13 or 3.12: 30
(i) Seller is in compliance with all applicable terms and requirements of each Seller Contract which is being assumed by Buyer; (ii) To Seller's knowledge, no event has occurred or circumstance exists that (with or without notice or lapse of time) may contravene, conflict with or result in a Breach of, or give Seller or other Person the right to declare a default or exercise any remedy under, or to accelerate the maturity or performance of, or payment under, or to cancel, terminate or modify, any Seller Contract that is being assigned to or assumed by Buyer; (iii) To Seller's knowledge, no event has occurred or circumstance exists under or by virtue of any Contract that (with or without notice or lapse of time) would cause the creation of any Encumbrance affecting any of the Assets; and (iv) Seller has not given to or received from any other Person any notice or other communication (whether oral or written) regarding any actual, alleged, possible or potential violation or Breach of, or default under, any Contract which is being assigned to or assumed by Buyer. (d) There are no renegotiations of, attempts to renegotiate or outstanding rights to renegotiate any material amounts paid or payable to Seller under current or completed Contracts with any Person having the contractual or statutory right to demand or require such renegotiation and no such Person has made written demand for such renegotiation. 3.12 Environmental Matters Except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.13: (e) Seller is in material compliance with and is not in material violation of or liable under, any Environmental Law. Seller has no basis to expect any actual or threatened order, notice or other communication from (i) any Governmental Body or private citizen acting in the public interest or (ii) the current or prior owner or operator of any Facilities, of any actual or potential violation or failure to Materially comply with any Environmental Law, or of any actual or threatened obligation to undertake or bear the cost of any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities with respect to any Facility or other property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller has or had an interest, or with respect to any property or Facility at or to which Hazardous Materials were generated, manufactured, refined, transferred, imported, used or processed by Seller. (f) There are no pending or, to the knowledge of Seller, threatened claims, Encumbrances, or other restrictions of any Material nature resulting from any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities or arising under or pursuant to any 31
Environmental Law with respect to or affecting any Facility or any other property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller has or had an interest. (g) Seller has no knowledge of or any basis to expect nor has received, any citation, directive, inquiry, notice, Order, summons, warning or other communication that relates to Hazardous Activity, Hazardous Materials, or any alleged, actual, or potential violation or failure to materially comply with any Environmental Law, or of any alleged, actual, or potential obligation to undertake or bear the cost of any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities with respect to any Facility or property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller has or had an interest, or with respect to any property or facility to which Hazardous Materials generated, manufactured, refined, transferred, imported, used or processed by (h) Seller has no Material Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities with respect to any Facility or, to the knowledge of Seller, with respect to any other property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller (or any predecessor) has or had an interest or at any property geologically or hydrologically adjoining any Facility or any such other property or asset. (i) There are no Hazardous Materials present on or in the Environment at any Facility or at any geologically or hydrologically adjoining property, that are not in material compliance with Environmental Laws, including any Hazardous Materials contained in barrels, aboveground or underground storage tanks, landfills, land deposits, dumps, equipment (whether movable or fixed) or other containers, either temporary or permanent, and deposited or located in land, water, sumps, or any other part of the Facility or such adjoining property, or incorporated into any structure therein or thereon. Seller has not permitted or conducted, or is aware of, any Hazardous Activity conducted with respect to any Facility or any other property or assets (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller has or had an interest except in full compliance with all applicable Environmental Laws. (j) There has been no material Release or, to the knowledge of Seller, Threat of Release, of any Hazardous Materials at or from any Facility or at any other location where any Hazardous Materials were generated, manufactured, refined, transferred, produced, imported, used, or processed from or by any Facility, or from any other property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller has or had an interest, or to the knowledge of Seller any geologically or hydrologically adjoining property. (k) Seller has delivered or made available to Buyer true and complete copies and results of any reports, studies, analyses, tests, or monitoring possessed or initiated by Seller pertaining to Hazardous Materials or Hazardous Activities in, on, or under the Facilities, or concerning compliance, by Seller with Environmental Laws including, but not limited to the environmental assessments listed in Exhibit 3.13 32
(l) Notwithstanding any provision contained herein to the contrary: (i) Seller shall not be responsible for any costs associated with contamination which has come to be located on or below the Property solely as the result of subsurface migration in an aquifer from a source or sources outside the Property, provided that (a) the Seller did not cause, contribute to, or exacerbate the release or threat of release of the contaminants through an act or omission; (b) the person that caused the release is not an agent or employee of the Seller, and was not in a direct or indirect contractual relationship with the Seller; and (c) there is no alternative basis for the Seller's liability for the contaminated aquifer, such as liability as a generator or transporter of hazardous substances under Section 107(a) (3) and (4) of the Federal Comprehensive Environmental Response Compensation and Liability Act (CERCLA) or liability as an owner by reason of the existence of a source of contamination on the Seller's property other than the contamination that migrated in an aquifer from a source outside the Property. (ii) Seller shall not be required to pay for the costs of rehabilitation of environmental contamination resulting from a discharge of petroleum products that is eligible for restoration funding from the Inland Protection Trust Fund pursuant to Chapter 376, Florida Statutes, in advance of commitment of restoration funding in accordance with the sites priority ranking pursuant to Section 376.3071(5)(a), Florida Statutes. In the event that Buyer determines that rehabilitation of petroleum contamination must occur earlier than the priority ranking established by the Florida Department of Environmental Protection, Buyer may request an assignment by Seller of all rights to reimbursement from the Inland Protection Trust Fund for such site and proceed with rehabilitation. Seller shall provide an assignment of all rights to reimbursement within ten (10) days of receipt of a request from a Buyer. 3.13 Employee Benefits (a) Exhibit 3.16(a) contains and lists the following in connection with the current employees of the System: (i) any collective bargaining agreement not otherwise referenced in this Agreement or any employment agreement not terminable on thirty (30) days notice, (ii) each defined benefit plan and defined contribution plan, stock option or ownership plan, executive compensation, bonus, incentive compensation or deferred compensation plan, (iii) vacation pay, medical, dental, disability or death benefit plan, and (iv) any other employee benefit plan, program, arrangement, agreement or policy, including without limitation each "employee benefit plan" within the meaning of Section 3(3) of ERISA, in each case which is maintained or contributed to or by Seller, (collectively the "Employee Plans"). Seller will promptly deliver to Buyer true, accurate and complete copies of the documents comprising each Employee plan (or, with respect to any Employee Plan which is unwritten, a detailed written description of eligibility, participation, benefits, funding arrangements, assets and any other matters which relate to the obligations of Seller. 33
(b) Except as shown on Exhibit 3.13(b), neither Seller nor any fiduciary of an Employee Plan has engaged in a transaction with respect to any Employee Plan that, assuming the taxable period of such transaction expired as of the date hereof, could subject Seller or Buyer to a Tax or penalty imposed by either Section 4975 of the Code or Section 502(1) of ERISA or a violation of Section 406 of ERISA. (c) Except as shown on Exhibit 3.13(c), with respect to any Employee Plan or any other such plan maintained by a corporation or trade or business controlled by, controlling or under common control with Seller within the meaning of Section 414 of the Code (collectively the "Controlled Group Plans"): (i) Full payment has been made of all amounts that are required under the terms of each Controlled Group Plan to be paid as contributions with respect to all periods prior to and including the last day of the most recent fiscal year of such Controlled group Plan ended on or before the date of this Agreement and all periods thereafter prior to the Closing Date, and no accumulated funding deficiency or liquidity shortfall (as those terms are defined in Section 412 of the Code) has been incurred with respect to any such Employee Plan, whether or not waived. (ii) No Controlled Group Plan, if subject to Title IV of ERISA, has been completely or partially terminated, nor has any event occurred nor does any circumstance exist that could result in the partial termination of any such Controlled Group Plan. (iii) The form of all Controlled Group Plans is in substantial compliance with the applicable terms of ERISA, the Code, and any other applicable laws, including the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, the Family Medical Leave Act of 1993 and the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, and such plans have been operated in compliance with such laws and the written Controlled Group Plan documents. (iv) Neither Seller nor any corporation or trade or business controlled by, controlling or under common control with Seller within the meaning of Section 414 of the Code contributes or is obligated to contribute to any multiemployer plan (as defined in Section 3(3 7) of ERISA) or has completely or partially withdrawn from (as defined in ERISA Sections 4203 or 4205) any multiemployer plan under any circumstances which would impose any Liability on Buyer. (d) Except as shown on Exhibit 3.13(d), Seller has, at all times, complied, and currently complies, in all material respects with the applicable continuation requirements for its welfare plans, including (i) Section 4980B of the Code (as well as its predecessor provision, Section 162(k) of the Code) and Section 601 through 608, inclusive, of ERISA (collectively "COBRA") and (ii) any applicable state statutes mandating health insurance continuation coverage for employees. 34
(e) Except for the continuation coverage requirements of COBRA, and except as shown on Exhibit 3.13(e) Seller has no obligations or potential liability for benefits to employees, former employees or their respective dependents following termination of employment or retirement under any of the Employee Plans that are welfare benefit plans as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA 3.14 Intellectual Property Assets (a) The term "Intellectual Property Assets" means all intellectual property owned or licensed (as licensor or licensee) by Seller in which Seller has a proprietary interest, including: (iii) Seller's name, all assumed fictional business names, trade names, registered and unregistered trademarks, service marks and applications (collectively, "Marks"); (iv) all patents, patent applications and inventions and discoveries that may be patentable (collectively, "Patents"); (v) all registered and unregistered copyrights in both published works and unpublished works (collectively, "Copyrights"); (vi) all rights in mask works; (vii) all know-how, trade secrets, confidential or proprietary information, customer lists, Software, technical information, data, process technology, plans, drawings and blue prints (collectively, "Trade Secrets"); and (viii) all rights in internet web sites and internet domain names presently used by Seller (collectively "Net Names"). (b) Exhibit 3.14 contains a complete and accurate list and summary description and Seller has delivered to Buyer accurate and complete copies, of all Intellectual Property Assets, except for any license implied by the sale of a product and perpetual, paid-up licenses for commonly available Software programs with a value of less than $500 under which Seller is the licensee except as otherwise indicted on the foregoing exhibit. Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.14, the Intellectual Property Assets are all those necessary for the operation of Seller's business as it is currently conducted. Seller is the owner or licensee of all right, title and interest in and to each of the Intellectual Property Assets, free and clear of all Encumbrances, and has the right to use and transfer without payment to a Third Party all of the Intellectual Property Assets, other than in respect of licenses listed in Exhibit 3.14. To Seller's knowledge, no Intellectual Property Asset is infringed, or to Seller's knowledge, has been challenged or threatened in any way and does not infringe the intellectual property rights of any Third Party. 35
3.15 Brokers Or Finders Neither Seller nor any of its Representatives have incurred any obligation or liability, contingent or otherwise, for brokerage or finders' fees or agents' commissions or other similar payments in connection with the sale of Seller's business or the Assets or the Contemplated Transactions. 3.16 Disclosure (m) No Material representation or warranty made by Seller in this Agreement contains any Material untrue statement or omits to state a Material fact necessary to make any of them, in light of the circumstances in which it was made, not misleading. 3.17 Employees Exhibit 3.23(a) contains a complete and accurate list of the following information for each employee and director of Seller, including each employee on leave of absence or layoff status: name; job title; date of hiring or engagement; date of commencement of employment or engagement; current compensation paid or payable and any change in compensation since July 1, 2002; sick and vacation leave that is accrued but unused; and service credited for purposes of vesting and eligibility to participate under any Employee Plan, or any other employee or director benefit plan, except as otherwise indicated on said exhibit. 3.18 Labor Disputes; Compliance (a) Except as shown on Exhibit 3.18, Seller has complied in all material respects with all Legal Requirements relating to employment practices, terms and conditions of employment, equal employment opportunity, nondiscrimination, immigration, wages, hours, benefits, collective bargaining and other requirements under state of federal law, the payment of social security and similar Taxes and occupational safety and health. Seller is not liable for the payment of any Taxes, fines, penalties, or other amounts, however designated, for failure to comply with any of the foregoing Legal Requirements. (b) Except as shown on Exhibit 3.18, (i) Seller has not been, and is not now, a party to any collective bargaining agreement or other labor contract; (ii) there has not been, there is not presently pending or existing, and to Seller's knowledge there is not threatened, any strike, slowdown, picketing, work stoppage or employee grievance process involving Seller; (iii) to Seller's knowledge no event has occurred or circumstance exists that could provide the basis for any work stoppage or other labor dispute; (iv) there is not pending or, to Seller's knowledge, threatened against or affecting Seller any Proceeding relating to the alleged violation of any Legal Requirement pertaining to labor relations or employment matters, including any charge or complaint 36
filed with the National Labor Relations Board or any comparable Governmental Body, and there is no organizational activity or other labor dispute against or affecting Seller or the Facilities; (v) no application or petition for an election of or for certification of a collective bargaining agent is pending; (vi) no grievance or arbitration Proceeding exists that might have an adverse effect upon Seller or the conduct of its business; (vii) there is no lockout of any employees by Seller, and no such action is contemplated by Seller; and (viii) to Seller's knowledge there has been no pending charge of discrimination filed against or threatened against Seller with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or similar Governmental Body or any pending employment discrimination, wrongful discharge, retaliation lawsuits or lawsuits alleging whistleblowing. 3.19 Capital Program. The Capital Improvement Plan Requirement, exclusive of the cost of any Remedial Capital Projects and any Remedial Capital Project Amounts, includes sufficient moneys to satisfy all obligations owned by the Seller under developer agreements assumed by the Buyer. 4. Representations and Warranties of Buyer Buyer represents and warrants to Seller as follows: 4.1 Organization and Good Standing Buyer is a governmental entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Florida, with full governmental power and authority to conduct its business as it is now conducted and to complete the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 4.2 Authority; No Conflict (a) This Agreement constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of Buyer, enforceable against Buyer in accordance with its terms. Upon the execution and delivery by Buyer of the agreements to be executed or delivered by Buyer at Closing (collectively, the "Buyer's Closing Documents"), each of the Buyer's Closing Documents will constitute the legal, valid and binding obligation of Buyer, enforceable against Buyer in accordance with its respective terms. Buyer has the absolute and unrestricted right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Buyer's Closing Documents and to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Buyer's Closing Documents, and such action has been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action. (b) Neither the execution and delivery of this Agreement by Buyer nor the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions by Buyer will give any Person the right to prevent, delay or otherwise interfere with any of the Contemplated Transactions pursuant to: 37
(i) any provision of Buyer's Governing Documents; (ii) any resolution adopted by the board of directors or the shareholders of Buyer; (iii) any Legal Requirement or Order to which Buyer may be subject; or (iv) any Contract to which Buyer is a party or by which Buyer may be bound. Buyer is not and will not be required to obtain any Consent from any Person in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions. 4.3 Certain Proceedings There is no pending Proceeding that has been commenced against Buyer and that challenges, or may have the effect of preventing, delaying, making illegal or otherwise interfering with, any of the Contemplated Transactions. To Buyer's knowledge, no such Proceeding has been threatened. 4.4 Brokers Or Finders Neither Buyer nor any of its Representatives have incurred any obligation or liability, contingent or otherwise, for brokerage or finders' fees or agents' commissions or other similar payment in connection with the Contemplated Transactions. 5. Covenants of Seller Prior to Closing 5.1 Access and Investigation Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, and upon reasonable advance notice received from Buyer and subject to any applicable confidentiality obligations, Seller shall (a) afford Buyer and its Representatives and prospective lenders, underwriters, and their Representatives (collectively, "Buyer Group") full and free access, during regular business hours, to Seller's personnel, properties (including subsurface testing), Contracts, Governmental Authorizations, books and Records and other documents and data, such rights of access to be exercised in a manner that does not unreasonably interfere with the operations of Seller; (b) furnish Buyer Group with copies of all such Contracts, Governmental Authorizations, books and Records and other existing documents and data as Buyer may reasonably request; (c) furnish Buyer Group with such additional financial, operating and other relevant data and information as Buyer may reasonably request; and (d) otherwise cooperate and assist, to the extent reasonably requested by Buyer, with Buyer's investigation of the properties, assets and financial condition related to Seller. In addition, Buyer shall have the right to have the Real 38
Property and Tangible Personal Property inspected by Buyer Group, at Buyer's sole cost and expense, for purposes of determining the physical condition and legal characteristics of the Real Property and Tangible Personal Property. In the event subsurface or other destructive testing is recommended by any of Buyer Group, Buyer shall be permitted to have the same performed with the prior consent of Seller, which shall not be unreasonably withheld. 5.2 Operation of the Business of Seller Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing, Seller shall: (a) conduct its business in the Ordinary Course of Business; (b) except as otherwise directed by Buyer in writing, and without making any commitment on Buyer's behalf, use its Best Efforts to preserve intact its current business organization, keep available the services of its officers, employees and agents and maintain its relations and good will with suppliers, customers, landlords, creditors, employees, agents and others having business relationships with it; (c) confer with Buyer prior to implementing operational decisions of a Material nature; (d) otherwise report periodically to Buyer concerning the status of its business, operations and finances; (e) make no Material changes in senior management personnel identified by Buyer in Section 2.7, without prior consultation with Buyer; (f) maintain the Assets in a state of repair and condition that complies with Legal Requirements and is consistent with the requirements and normal conduct of Seller's business; (g) keep in full force and effect, without amendment, all rights relating to Seller's business; (h) comply with all Legal Requirements and contractual obligations applicable to the operations of Seller's business; (i) cooperate with Buyer and assist Buyer in identifying the Governmental Authorizations required by Buyer to operate the business from and after the Closing Date and either transferring existing Governmental Authorizations of Seller to Buyer, where permissible, or obtaining new Governmental Authorizations for Buyer; (j) upon request from time to time, execute and deliver all documents, make all truthful oaths, testify in any Proceedings and do all other acts that may be reasonably 39
necessary to consummate the Contemplated Transactions, all without further consideration; and (k) maintain all books and Records of Seller relating to Seller's business in the Ordinary Course of Business. 5.3 Negative Covenant Except as otherwise expressly permitted herein, between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, Seller shall not without the prior written Consent of Buyer which shall not be unreasonably withheld and which shall be promptly acted upon by Buyer, (a) make any modification to any material Contract or Governmental Authorization; or (b) allow the levels of raw materials, supplies or other materials included in the Inventories to vary Materially from the levels customarily maintained. 5.4 Required Approvals As promptly as practicable after the date of this Agreement, Seller shall make all filings required by Legal Requirements to be made by it in order to consummate the Contemplated Transactions. Seller also shall cooperate with Buyer and its Representatives with respect to all filings that Buyer elects to make or, pursuant to Legal Requirements, shall be required to make in connection with the Contemplated Transactions. Seller also shall cooperate with Buyer and its Representatives in obtaining all Material Consents. 5.5 Notification Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing, Seller shall promptly notify Buyer in writing if any of them becomes aware of (a) any fact or condition that causes or constitutes a Breach of any of Seller's representations and warranties made as of the date of this Agreement or (b) the occurrence after the date of this Agreement of any fact or condition that would or be reasonably likely to (except as expressly contemplated by this Agreement) cause or constitute a Breach of any such representation or warranty had that representation or warranty been made as of the time of the occurrence of, or Seller's discovery of, such fact or condition. During the same period, Seller also shall promptly notify Buyer of the occurrence of any Breach of any covenant of Seller in this Article 5 or of the occurrence of any event that may make the satisfaction of the conditions in Article 7 impossible or unlikely. 5.6 No Negotiation Until such time as this Agreement shall be terminated pursuant to Section 9.1, Seller shall not directly or indirectly solicit, initiate, encourage or entertain any inquiries or proposals from, discuss or negotiate with, provide any nonpublic information to or consider the merits of any inquiries or proposals from any Person (other than Buyer) 40
relating to any business combination transaction involving Seller or the System (other than in the Ordinary Course of Business). 5.7 Best Efforts Seller shall use their Best Efforts to cause the conditions in the Agreement to be satisfied and on or before the Closing, Seller shall (a) amend its Governing Documents and take all other actions necessary to change its name to one sufficiently dissimilar to Seller's present name, in Buyer's judgment, to avoid confusion and (b) take all actions requested by the Buyer to either assume such name as an assumed name or to change its name to Seller's present name. 5.8 Payment Of Liabilities Seller shall pay or otherwise satisfy in the Ordinary Course of Business all of its Liabilities and obligations as they come due. 5.9 Current Evidence of Title (a) As soon as is reasonably possible, and in no event later than thirty (30) Business Days after the date of this Agreement, Seller shall furnish to Buyer, at Seller's expense, for each parcel listed in Exhibit 3.5: (i) from Commonwealth Land Title Insurance Company (the "Title Policy") (the "Title Insurer"): (1) a title commitment or title commitments issued by the Title Insurer to insure title to each parcel listed in Exhibit 3.5, , in the aggregate amount of that portion of the Purchase Price allocated to the Land , as specified in Part 2.5, covering such Land , naming Buyer as the proposed insured and having an effective date after the date of this Agreement, wherein the Title Insurer shall agree to issue an ALTA form owner's title insurance policy 1992 (ID-17-92) with Florida modifications (collectively the "Title Commitment"); and (2) copies of all recorded documents listed as Schedule B-1 matters to be terminated or satisfied in order to issue the policy described in the Title Commitment or as special Schedule B-2 exceptions thereunder (the "Recorded Documents"). (b) The Title Commitment shall include the Title Insurer's requirements for issuing its title policy, which requirements shall be met by Seller on or before the Closing Date (including those requirements that must be met by releasing or satisfying monetary 41
Encumbrances, but excluding Encumbrances that will remain after Closing and those requirements that are to be met solely by Buyer). (c) If any of the following shall occur (collectively, a "Title Objection"): (i) The Title Commitment or other evidence of title or search of the appropriate real estate records discloses that any party other than Seller has title to the insured estate covered by the Title Commitment; (ii) any title exception is disclosed in Schedule B to any Title Commitment that is not one of the Permitted Real Estate Encumbrances or one that Seller specifies when delivering the Title Commitment to Buyer as one that Seller will cause to be deleted from the Title Commitment concurrently with the Closing, including (A) any exceptions that pertain to Encumbrances securing any loans that do not constitute an Assumed Liability and (B) any exceptions that Buyer reasonably believes could materially and adversely affect Buyer's use and enjoyment of the Land described therein; or (iii) any Survey discloses any matter that Buyer reasonably believes could materially and adversely affect Buyer's use and enjoyment of the Land described therein; then Buyer shall notify Seller in writing ("Buyer's Notice") of such matters within [ten (10)] business days after receiving all of the Title Commitment, Survey and copies of Recorded Documents for the Facility covered thereby. (d) Seller shall use its Best Efforts to cure each Title Objection and take all steps required by the Title Insurer to eliminate each Title Objection as an exception to the Title Commitment. Any Title Objection that the Title Company is willing to insure over on terms acceptable to Seller and Buyer is herein referred to as an "Insured Exception." The Insured Exceptions, together with any title exception or matters disclosed by the Survey not objected to by Buyer in the manner aforesaid shall be deemed to be acceptable to Buyer. (e) Nothing herein waives Buyer's right to claim a breach of Section 3.9(a) or to claim a right to indemnification as provided in Section 11.2 if Buyer suffers Material Damages as a result of a misrepresentation with respect to the condition of title to the Land. (f) Seller shall use its best efforts to comply with the requirements of Schedule B Section 1 of the Title Commitment. At the Closing, Seller shall identify any Schedule B Section 1 requirements that cannot be satisfied as of the Closing. Seller and Buyer shall agree on a post-Closing process to satisfy these requirements (the "Post-Closing Schedule B Requirements"). Seller shall indemnify as to all Post-Closing Schedule B requirements 42
that are not satisfied in accordance with the agreed upon post-Closing process shall be identified by Seller in writing to Buyer. 6. Covenants of Buyer Prior to Closing 6.1 Required Approvals As promptly as practicable after the date of this Agreement, Buyer shall make, or cause to be made, all filings required by Legal Requirements to be made by it to consummate the Contemplated Transactions. Buyer also shall cooperate, and cause its Related Persons to cooperate, with Seller (a) with respect to all filings Seller shall be required by Legal Requirements to make and (b) in obtaining all Consents identified in Exhibit 7.3, provided, however, that Buyer shall not be required to dispose of or make any change to its business, expend any Material funds or incur any other Material burden in order to comply with this Section 6.1. 6.2 Best Efforts Buyer shall use its Best Efforts to cause the conditions in this Agreement to be satisfied. 7. Conditions Precedent to Buyer's Obligation to Close Buyer's obligation to purchase the Assets and to take the other actions required to be taken by Buyer at the Closing is subject to the satisfaction, at or prior to the Closing, of each of the following conditions (any of which may be waived by Buyer, in whole or in part): 7.1 Accuracy of Representations (a) All of Seller's representations and warranties in this Agreement (considered collectively), and each of these representations and warranties (considered individually), shall have been accurate as of the Exhibit Delivery Date, and shall be accurate in all material respects as of the time of the Closing as if then made. (b) Each of the representations and warranties in Sections 3.2(a) and 3.4, and each of the representations and warranties in this Agreement that contains an express materiality qualification, shall be accurate in all respects as of the time of the Closing as if then made. 7.2 Seller's Performance All of the covenants and obligations that Seller are required to perform or to comply with pursuant to this Agreement at or prior to the Closing (considered 43
collectively), and each of these covenants and obligations (considered individually), shall have been duly performed and complied with in all Material respects. 7.3 Consents Each of the Material Consents to be identified by Buyer and agreed to by Seller in Exhibit 7.3 prior to Closing (the "Material Consents") shall have been obtained and shall be in full force and effect which Exhibit shall be attached hereto on or before the time the Due Diligence set forth in Section 13.15 is completed. 7.4 Additional Documents Seller shall have caused the documents and instruments required by Section 2.7(a) and the following documents to be delivered (or made available ) to Buyer: (a) The articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto of Seller, duly certified as of a recent date by the Secretary of State; (b) A legal opinion reasonably satisfactory to Buyer; and (c) Such other documents as Buyer may reasonably request for the purpose of: (i) evidencing the accuracy of any of Seller's representations and warranties; (ii) evidencing the performance by Seller of, or the compliance by Seller with, any covenant or obligation required to be performed or complied with by Seller; (iii) evidencing the satisfaction of any condition referred to in this Article 7; (iv) otherwise facilitating the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions; or (v) evidence showing the release of all liens, security interests, and other encumbrances other than Permitted Encumbrances (but excluding any Permitted Encumbrances that encumber the Assets held by any entity which has provided or may provide financing to the Seller) 7.5 No Conflict Neither the consummation nor the performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions will, directly or indirectly, Materially contravene or conflict with or result in a Material violation of or cause Buyer or any Related Person of Buyer to suffer any Material adverse consequence under (a) any applicable Legal Requirement or Order or 44
(b) any valid Legal Requirement or Order that has been entered by any Governmental Body. 8. Conditions Precedent to Seller's Obligation to Close Seller's obligation to sell the Assets and to take the other actions required to be taken by Seller at the Closing is subject to the satisfaction, at or prior to the Closing, of each of the following conditions (any of which may be waived by Seller in whole or in part): 8.1 Accuracy of Representations All of Buyer's representations and warranties in this Agreement (considered collectively), and each of these representations and warranties (considered individually), shall have been accurate in all Material respects as of the date of this Agreement and shall be accurate in all Material respects as of the time of the Closing as if then made. 8.2 Buyer's Performance All of the covenants and obligations that Buyer is required to perform or to comply with pursuant to this Agreement at or prior to the Closing (considered collectively), and each of these covenants and obligations (considered individually), shall have been performed and complied with in all Material respects. 8.3 Additional Documents Buyer shall have caused a legal opinion satisfactory to Seller to be supplied and the documents and instruments required by Section 2.7(b) and the following documents to be delivered or made available to Seller: (a) such other documents as Seller may reasonably request for the purpose of: (i) evidencing the accuracy of any representation or warranty of Buyer, (ii) evidencing the performance by Buyer of, or the compliance by Buyer with, any covenant or obligation required to be performed or complied with by Buyer or (iii) evidencing the satisfaction of any condition referred to in this Article 8.4 No Injunction There shall not be in effect any Legal Requirement or any injunction or other Order that (a) prohibits the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions and (b) has 45
been adopted or issued, or has otherwise become effective, since the date of this Agreement. 9. Termination 9.1 Termination Events By notice given prior to or at the Closing, subject to Section 9.2, this Agreement may be terminated as follows: (a) by Buyer if a material Breach of any provision of this Agreement has been committed by Seller and such Breach has not been waived by Buyer; (b) by Seller if a material Breach of any provision of this Agreement has been committed by Buyer and such Breach has not been waived by Seller; (c) by Buyer if any condition in Article 7 has not been satisfied as of the date specified for Closing in the first sentence of Section 2.6 or if satisfaction of such a condition by such date is or becomes impossible (other than through the failure of Buyer to comply with its obligations under this Agreement), and Buyer has not waived such condition on or before such date; (d) by Seller if any condition in Article 8 has not been satisfied as of the date specified for Closing in the first sentence of Section 2.6 or if satisfaction of such a condition by such date is or becomes impossible (other than through the failure of Seller to comply with its obligations under this Agreement), and Seller has not waived such condition on or before such date; (e) by mutual consent of Buyer and Seller; (f) by Buyer if the Closing has not occurred on or before December 15, 2002 or such later date as the parties may agree upon, unless the Buyer is in material Breach of this Agreement; or (g) by Seller if the Closing has not occurred on or before December 15, 2002 or such later date as the parties may agree upon, unless the Seller is in material Breach of this Agreement. 9.2 Effect Of Termination Each party's right of termination under Section 9.1 is in addition to any other rights it may have under this Agreement or otherwise, and the exercise of such right of termination will not be an election of remedies. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 9.1, all obligations of the parties under this Agreement will terminate, except that the obligations of the parties in this Section 9.2 and Articles 12 and 13 (except for 46
those in Section 13.5) will survive, provided, however, that, if this Agreement is terminated because of a Breach of this Agreement by the non-terminating party or because one or more of the conditions to the terminating party's obligations under this Agreement is not satisfied as a result of the party's failure to comply with its obligations under this Agreement, the terminating party's right to pursue all legal remedies will survive such termination unimpaired. Furthermore, notwithstanding any such termination, the Seller shall immediately upon termination pay to the Buyer the Due Diligence Amount. Neither Buyer nor Seller shall be liable to the other in the event that after the execution of this Agreement there occurs (i) a change of law that prevents the Closing, (ii) any action by a third party that prevents the Closing or (iii) any order by a Governmental Agency or court that prevents the Closing. Both parties agree to diligently defend against a third party attempt to prevent a Closing. 10. Additional Covenants 10.1 Employees and Employee Benefits (a) Information on Active Employees. For the purpose of this Agreement, the term "Active Employees" shall mean all employees employed on the Closing Date by Seller for its business who are employed exclusively in Seller's business as currently conducted, including employees on temporary leave of absence, including family medical leave, military leave, temporary disability or sick leave, but excluding employees on long-term disability leave. (b) Employment of Active Employees by Buyer. (i) Buyer will make offers of employment to all employees who meet the standards set forth on Exhibit 10.1(b) which Buyer will supply to Seller which is accepted by Seller in the exercise of its reasonable judgment and Buyer may interview all Active Employees. Buyer will provide Seller with a list of Active Employees to whom Buyer has made an offer of employment that has been accepted to be effective on the Closing Date (the "Hired Active Employees"). Subject to Legal Requirements, Buyer will have reasonable access to the Facilities and personnel Records (including performance appraisals, disciplinary actions, grievances and medical Records) of Seller for the purpose of preparing for and conducting employment interviews with all Active Employees and will conduct the interviews as expeditiously as possible prior to the Closing Date. Access will be provided by Seller upon reasonable prior notice during normal business hours. Effective immediately before the Closing, Seller will terminate the employment of all Hired Active Employees. (ii) Neither Seller nor its Related Persons shall solicit the continued employment of any Active Employee (unless and until Buyer has informed Seller 47
in writing that the particular Active Employee will not receive any employment offer from Buyer) or the employment of any Hired Active Employee after the Closing. Buyer shall inform Seller promptly of the identities of those Active Employees to whom it will not make employment offers, and Seller shall assist Buyer in complying with the WARN Act as to those Active Employees. (iii) It is understood and agreed that (A) Buyer's expressed intention to extend offers of employment as set forth in this section shall not constitute any commitment, Contract or understanding (expressed or implied) of any obligation on the part of Buyer to a post-Closing employment relationship of any fixed term or duration or upon any terms or conditions other than those that Buyer may establish pursuant to individual offers of employment, and (B) employment offered by Buyer is "at will" and may be terminated by Buyer or by an employee at any time for any reason (subject to any written commitments to the contrary made by Buyer or an employee and Legal Requirements). Nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to prevent or restrict in any way the right of Buyer to terminate, reassign, promote or demote any of the Hired Active Employees after the Closing or to change adversely or favorably the title, powers, duties, responsibilities, functions, locations, salaries, other compensation or terms or conditions of employment of such employees. (c) Salaries and Benefits. (i) Seller shall be responsible for (A) the payment of all wages and other remuneration due to Active Employees with respect to their services as employees of Seller through the close of business on the Closing Date, including pro rata bonus payments and all vacation pay earned prior to the Closing Date; (B) the payment of any termination or severance payments and the provision of health plan continuation coverage in accordance with the requirements of COBRA and Sections 601 through 608 of ERISA; and (C) any and all payments to employees required under the WARN Act. (ii) Seller shall be liable for any claims made or incurred by Active Employees and their beneficiaries through the Closing Date under the Employee Plans. For purposes of the immediately preceding sentence, a claim will be deemed incurred, in the case of hospital, medical or dental benefits, when the services that are the subject of the charge are performed and, in the case of other benefits (such as disability or life insurance), when an event has occurred or when a condition has been diagnosed that entitles the employee to the benefit. (d) No Transfer of Assets. Neither Seller nor its Related Persons will any transfer of pension or other employee benefit plan assets to Buyer. (e) Terms of Employment. Buyer will set its own initial terms and conditions of employment for the Hired Active Employees and others it may hire, including work 48
rules, benefits and salary and wage structure, all as permitted by law, provide such terms and conditions shall be in the aggregate substantially similar in value to the terms and conditions of such Hired Active Employees under the Seller's employ as disclosed to Buyer herein. Buyer is not obligated to assume any collective bargaining agreements under this Agreement. Seller shall be solely liable for any severance payment required to be made to its employees due to the Contemplated Transactions. Any bargaining obligations of Buyer with any union with respect to bargaining unit employees subsequent to the Closing, whether such obligations arise before or after the Closing, shall be the sole responsibility of Buyer. (f) General Employee Provisions. (i) Seller and Buyer shall give any notices -required by Legal Requirements and take whatever other actions with respect to the plans, programs and policies described in this Section 10.1 as may be necessary to carry out the arrangements described in this Section 10.1. (ii) Seller and Buyer shall provide each other with such plan documents and summary plan descriptions, employee data or other information as may be reasonably required to carry out the arrangements described in this Section 10.1. (iii) If any of the arrangements described in this Section 10.1 are determined by the IRS or other Governmental Body to be prohibited by law, Seller and Buyer shall modify such arrangements to as closely as possible reflect their expressed intent and retain the allocation of economic benefits and burdens to the parties contemplated herein in a manner that is not prohibited by law. (iv) Seller shall provide Buyer with completed 1-9 forms and attachments with respect to all Hired Active Employees, except for such employees as Seller certifies in writing to Buyer are exempt from such requirement. (v) Buyer shall not have any responsibility, liability or obligation, whether to Active Employees, former employees, their beneficiaries or to any other Person, with respect to any employee benefit plans, practices, programs or arrangements (including the establishment, operation or termination thereof and the notification and provision of COBRA coverage extension) maintained by Seller. (vi) Seller will require certain assistance from certain Hired Active Employees to process post-Closing obligations of Seller, including, but not limited to, filings with the Florida Public Service Commission and other regulatory agencies and federal wage and tax filings (collectively the "Post-Closing Obligations"), and Buyer agrees to provide the services of such necessary employees to assist Seller with its Post-Closing Obligations. Such assistance shall not unreasonably interfere with the necessary employees' regular duties for Buyer. 49
As consideration to Buyer for assistance with Seller's Post-Closing Obligations, Seller shall pay Buyer the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), which sum shall be credited to Buyer at the Closing. 10.2 Payment of all Taxes Resulting From Sale of Assets by Seller Seller shall pay in a timely manner all Taxes resulting from or payable in connection with the sale of the Assets pursuant to this Agreement, regardless of the Person on whom such Taxes are imposed by Legal Requirements. 10.3 Payment of Other Retained Liabilities In addition to payment of Taxes pursuant to Section 10.2, Seller shall pay, or make adequate provision for the payment, in full all of the Retained Liabilities and other Liabilities of Seller under this Agreement. If any such Liabilities are not so paid or provided for, or if Buyer reasonably determines that failure to make any payments will impair Buyer's use or enjoyment of the Assets or conduct of the business previously conducted by Seller with the Assets, Buyer may, upon ten (10) days notice, at any time after the Closing Date, elect to make all such payments directly (but shall have no obligation to do so) and set off and deduct the full amount of all such payments from the first maturing installments of the unpaid principal balance of the Note pursuant to Section 11.8. Buyer shall receive full credit under the Note and this Agreement for all payments so made. 10.4 Removing Excluded Assets Within sixty (60) days after the Closing Date, Seller shall remove all Excluded Assets (other than the Capital Charges provided for in Section 2.2 hereof) from all Facilities and other Land to be occupied by Buyer. Such removal shall be done in such manner as to avoid any damage to the Facilities and other properties to be occupied by Buyer and any disruption of the business operations to be conducted by Buyer after the Closing. Any damage to the Assets or to the Facilities resulting from such removal shall be paid by Seller. Should Seller fail to remove the Excluded Assets as required by this Section, Buyer shall have the right, but not the obligation, (a) to remove the Excluded Assets at Seller's sole cost and expense; (b) to store the Excluded Assets and to charge Seller all storage costs associated therewith; (c) to treat the Excluded Assets as unclaimed and to proceed to dispose of the same under the laws governing unclaimed property; or (d) to exercise any other right or remedy conferred by this Agreement or otherwise available at law or in equity. Seller shall promptly reimburse Buyer for all costs and expenses incurred by Buyer in connection with any Excluded Assets not removed by Seller on or before the Closing Date. 50
10.5 Reports and Returns Seller shall promptly after the Closing prepare and file all reports and returns required by Legal Requirements relating to the business of Seller as conducted using the Assets, to and including the Effective Time. 10.6 Assistance in Proceedings Seller will cooperate with Buyer and its counsel in the contest or defense of, and make available its personnel and provide any testimony and access to its books and Records in connection with, any Proceeding involving or relating to (a) any Contemplated Transaction or (b) any action, activity, circumstance, condition, conduct, event, fact, failure to act, incident, occurrence, plan, practice, situation, status or transaction on or before the Closing Date involving Seller or its business or either Shareholder. 10.7 Retention of and Access to Records After the Closing Date, Buyer shall retain for a period consistent with Buyer's record-retention policies and practices those Records of Seller delivered to Buyer. Buyer also shall provide Seller and their Representatives reasonable access thereto, during normal business hours to enable them to prepare financial statements or tax returns or deal with tax audits. After the Closing Date, Seller shall provide Buyer and its Representatives reasonable access to Records that are Excluded Assets, during normal business hours for any reasonable business purpose specified by Buyer in such notice. 10.8 Further Assurances Subject to the proviso in Section 6.1, the parties shall cooperate reasonably with each other and with their respective Representatives in connection with any steps required to be taken as part of their respective obligations under this Agreement, and shall (a) furnish upon request to each other such further information; (b) execute and deliver to each other such other documents; and (c) do such other acts and things, all as the other party may reasonably request for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions. 11. Indemnification; Remedies 11.1 Survival All representations, warranties, covenants and obligations in this Agreement, the certificates delivered pursuant to Section 2.7 and any other certificate or document delivered pursuant to this Agreement shall survive the Closing and the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions, subject to Section 11.7. The right to indemnification, reimbursement or other remedy based upon such representations, 51
warranties, covenants and obligations shall not be affected by any investigation (including any environmental investigation or assessment) conducted with respect to, or any Knowledge acquired at any time, whether before or after the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the Closing Date, with respect to the accuracy or inaccuracy of or compliance with any such representation, warranty, covenant or obligation. The waiver of any condition based upon the accuracy of any representation or warranty, or on the performance of or compliance with any covenant or obligation, will not affect the right to indemnification, reimbursement or other remedy based upon such representations, warranties, covenants and obligations. For purposes of this Article 11, whenever the phrases "to Seller's knowledge", "to the best of Seller's knowledge", "to the knowledge of Seller", or any similar phrase, or whenever the words "material", "materially" are used in this Agreement (other than in this Article 11), such words and phrases shall be disregarded for purposes of this Article 11 and indemnification hereunder as if such words or phrases were stricken from this Agreement. 11.2 Indemnification and Reimbursement by Seller Seller will indemnify and hold harmless Buyer, and its Representatives, shareholders, subsidiaries and Related Persons (collectively, the "Buyer Indemnified Persons"), and will reimburse the Buyer Indemnified Persons for any loss, liability, claim, damage, expense (including costs of investigation and defense and reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses) or diminution of value, whether or not involving a Third-Party Claim (collectively, "Damages") (but not including any Damages covered by the offsets for the Remedial Capital Project Amount), arising from or in connection with: (a) any Breach of any representation or warranty made by Seller in (i) this Agreement (without giving effect to any supplement thereto), (ii) the certificates delivered pursuant to Section 2.7 (for this purpose, each such certificate will be deemed to have stated that Seller's representations and warranties in this Agreement fulfill the requirements of Section 7.1 as of the Closing Date as if made on the Closing Date without giving effect to any supplement thereto, unless the certificate expressly states that the matters disclosed in a supplement have caused a condition specified in Section 7.1 not to be satisfied), (v) any transfer instrument or (vi) any other certificate, document, writing or instrument delivered by Seller pursuant to this Agreement; (b) any Breach of any covenant or obligation of Seller in this Agreement or in any other certificate, document, writing or instrument delivered by Seller pursuant to this Agreement; (c) any Liability arising out of the ownership or operation of the Assets prior to the Effective Time other than the Assumed Liabilities; (d) any brokerage or finder's fees or commissions or similar payments 52
based upon any agreement or understanding made, or alleged to have been made, by any Person with Seller (or any Person acting on its behalf) in connection with any of the Contemplated Transactions; (e) any liability under the WARN Act or any similar state or local Legal Requirement that may result from an "Employment Loss", as defined by 29 U.S.C. sect. 2101(a)(6), caused by any action of Seller prior to the Closing or by Buyer's decision not to hire previous employees of Seller; (f) any Employee Plan established or maintained by Seller; or (g) any Retained Liabilities. Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, the Buyer will not have the right to sue the Seller for Damages which result form a defect in the title to the Real Property obtained by the Buyer pursuant to this Agreement for which there is applicable title insurance pursuant to Section 5.9 hereof and on which a claim may be made by the Buyer for the relevant Damages unless (a) the Buyer has filed a claim under the relevant title insurance policy and the claim has not been allowed within 90 days of the date the claim was filed or (b) the Buyer has filed a claim under the relevant title insurance policy, the claim was allowed within 90 days after the filing of the claim but the processing or defending (or the taking of other relevant action in accordance with the claim by the Title Insurer) is not proceeding in a satisfactory manner as determined by the Buyer in the exercise of its reasonable judgment. 11.3 Indemnification and Reimbursement by Seller--Environmental Matters In addition to the other indemnification provisions in this Article 11, Seller will indemnify and hold harmless Buyer and the other Buyer indemnified Persons, and will reimburse Buyer and the other Buyer Indemnified Persons, for any Damages (including costs of cleanup, containment or other remediation) arising from or in connection with: (a) any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities arising out of or relating to: (i) the ownership or operation by any Person at any time on or prior to the Closing Date of any of the Facilities, assets or the business of Seller, or (ii) any Hazardous Materials or other contaminants that were present on the Facilities or Assets at any time on or prior to the Closing Date; or (b) any bodily injury (including illness, disability and death, regardless of when any such bodily injury occurred, was incurred or manifested itself), personal injury, property damage (including trespass, nuisance, wrongful eviction and deprivation of the use of real property) or other damage of or to any Person or any Assets in any way arising from or allegedly arising from any Hazardous Activity conducted by any Person 53
with respect to the business of Seller or the Assets prior to the Closing Date or from any Hazardous Material that was (i) present on or before the Closing Date on or at the Facilities (or present on any other property, if such Hazardous Material emanated or allegedly emanated from any Facility and was present on any Facility, on or prior to the Closing Date) or (ii) Released or allegedly Released by any Person on or at any Facilities or Assets at any time on or prior to the Closing Date. Buyer, with Seller's consent and approval which shall not be unreasonably withheld will be entitled to control any Remedial Action, any Proceeding relating to an Environmental Claim and, except as provided in the following sentence, any other Proceeding with respect to which indemnity may be sought under this Section 11.3. The procedure described in Section 11.9 will apply to any claim solely for monetary damages relating to a matter covered by this Section 11.3. No claim for environmental indemnification or reimbursement may be asserted unless the underlying environmental condition is (i) specifically identified in Exhibit 3.13 or (ii) the party asserting the claim establishes that the conditions, release, disposal or actions giving rise to the liability or claim were present at or prior to Closing and that the party asserting the claim did not materially cause or contribute to such conditions after Closing. 11.4 Indemnification and Reimbursement by Buyer Buyer will indemnify and hold harmless Seller, and will reimburse Seller, for any Damages arising from or in connection with: (a) any Breach of any representation or warranty made by Buyer in this Agreement or in any certificate, document, writing or instrument delivered by Buyer pursuant to this Agreement; (b) any Breach of any covenant or obligation of Buyer in this Agreement or in any other certificate, document, writing or instrument delivered by Buyer pursuant to this Agreement; (c) any claim by any Person for brokerage or finder's fees or commissions or similar payments based upon any agreement or understanding alleged to have been made by such Person with Buyer (or any Person acting on Buyer's behalf) in connection with any of the Contemplated Transactions; or (d) any Assumed Liabilities. 54
11.5 Limitations on Amount--Seller Seller shall have no liability (for indemnification or otherwise) with respect to claims under Section 11.2(a) until the total of all Damages with respect to such matters exceeds $500,000 and then only for the amount by which such Damages exceed $500,000. However, this Section 11.5 will not apply to claims under (the following, each an "Exempted Breach") Section 11.2(b) through (h) or to matters arising in respect of Sections 3.7, 3.13, or 3.15 to any Breach of any of Seller's representations and warranties of which the Seller had Knowledge at any time prior to the date on which such representation and warranty is made or any Breach by Seller of any covenant or obligation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Seller shall not be liable for Minor Claims (as hereinafter defined) until such Minor Claims aggregate more than $500,000 in which case, Seller shall be liable for all Minor Claims to the extent that in the aggregate they exceed $500,000 provided that Damages in aggregate exceed $500,000. "Minor Claim" means Damages resulting from a Breach hereof covered by Section 11.2(a) (other than an Exempted Breach) that do not exceed $20,000.00. 11.6 Limitations on Amount--Buyer Buyer will have no liability (for indemnification or otherwise) with respect to claims under Section 11.4(a) until the total of all Damages with respect to such matters exceeds $500,000 and then only for the amount by which such Damages exceed $500,000. However, this Section 11.6 will not apply to claims under Section 11.4(b) through (e) or matters arising in respect of Section 4.4 or to any Breach of any of Buyer's representations and warranties of which Buyer had Knowledge at any time prior to the date on which such representation and warranty is made or any Breach by Buyer of any covenant or obligation, and Buyer will be liable for all Damages with respect to such Breaches. 11.7 Time Limitations (a) If the Closing occurs, Seller will have liability (for indemnification or otherwise) with respect to any Breach of (i) a covenant or obligation to be performed or complied with prior to the Closing Date (other than those in Sections 2.1 and 2.4(b) and Articles 10 and 12, as to which a claim may be made at any time, or (ii) a representation or warranty (other than one contained in Section 3.12 or 3.13 hereof) only if on or before three years after the Closing Date, Buyer notifies Seller of a claim specifying the factual basis of the claim in reasonable detail to the extent then known by Buyer. If the Closing occurs, Seller will have liability (for indemnification or otherwise) with respect to any Breach of the representations and warranties contained in Section 3.12 or 3.13 hereof only if on or before five years after the Closing Date, the Buyer notifies Seller of a claim specifying the factual basis of the claim in reasonable detail to the extent then known by Buyer. 55
(b) If the Closing occurs, Buyer will have liability (for indemnification or otherwise) with respect to any Breach of (i) a covenant or obligation to be performed or complied with prior to the Closing Date (other than those in Article 12, as to which a claim may be made at any time) or (ii) a representation or warranty (other than that set forth in Section 4.4, as to which a claim may be made at any time), only if on or before three years after the Closing Date, Seller notifies Buyer of a claim specifying the factual basis of the claim in reasonable detail to the extent then known by Seller. 11.8 Right Of Setoff Upon notice to Seller specifying in reasonable detail the basis therefor, Buyer may set off any amount to which it may be entitled under this Article 11 against amounts otherwise payable to Seller, subject to Seller's right to object under the Dispute Resolution Process. The exercise of such right of setoff by Buyer in good faith, whether or not ultimately determined to be justified, will not constitute an event of default. Neither the exercise of nor the failure to exercise such right of setoff or to give a notice of a claim under the Escrow Agreement will constitute an election of remedies or limit Buyer in any manner in the enforcement of any other remedies that may be available to it. 11.9 Third-Party Claims (a) Promptly after receipt by a Person entitled to indemnity under Section 11.2, 11.3 (to the extent provided in the last sentence of Section 11.3) or 11.4 (an "Indemnified Person") of notice of the assertion of a Third-Party Claim against it, such Indemnified Person shall give notice to the Person obligated to indemnify under such Section (an "Indemnifying Person") of the assertion of such Third-Party Claim, provided that the failure to notify the Indemnifying Person will not relieve the Indemnifying Person of any liability that it may have to any Indemnified Person, except to the extent that the Indemnifying Person demonstrates that the defense of such Third-Party Claim is prejudiced by the Indemnified Person's failure to give such notice. (b) If an Indemnified Person gives notice to the Indemnifying Person pursuant to Section 11.9(a) of the assertion of a Third-Party Claim, the Indemnifying Person shall be entitled to participate in the defense of such Third-Party Claim and, to the extent that it wishes (unless (i) the Indemnifying Person is also a Person against whom the Third-Party Claim is made and the Indemnified Person determines in good faith that joint representation would be inappropriate or (ii) the Indemnifying Person fails to provide reasonable assurance to the Indemnified Person of its financial capacity to defend such Third-Party Claim and provide indemnification with respect to such Third-Party Claim), to assume the defense of such Third-Party Claim with counsel satisfactory to the Indemnified Person. After notice from the Indemnifying Person to the Indemnified Person of its election to assume the defense of such Third-Party Claim, the Indemnifying Person shall not, so long as it diligently conducts such defense, be liable to the 56
Indemnified Person under this Article 11 for any fees of other counsel or any other expenses with respect to the defense of such Third-Party Claim, in each case subsequently incurred by the Indemnified Person in connection with the defense of such Third-Party Claim, other than reasonable costs of investigation. If the Indemnifying Person assumes the defense of a Third-Party Claim, (i) such assumption will conclusively establish for purposes of this Agreement that the claims made in that Third-Party Claim are within the scope of and subject to indemnification, and (ii) no compromise or settlement of such Third-Party Claims may be effected by the Indemnifying Person without the Indemnified Person's Consent unless (A) there is no finding or admission of any violation of Legal Requirement or any violation of the rights of any Person; (B) the sole relief provided is monetary damages that are paid in full by the Indemnifying Person; and (C) the Indemnified Person shall have no liability with respect to any compromise or settlement of such Third-Party Claims effected without its Consent. If notice is given to an Indemnifying Person of the assertion of any Third-Party Claim and the Indemnifying Person does not, within ten (10) days after the Indemnified Person's notice is given, give notice to the Indemnified Person of its election to assume the defense of such Third-Party Claim, the Indemnifying Person will be bound by any determination made in such Third-Party Claim or any compromise or settlement effected by the Indemnified Person. (c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if an Indemnified Person determines in good faith that there is a reasonable probability that a Third-Party Claim may adversely affect it or its Related Persons other than as a result of monetary damages for which it would be entitled to indemnification under this Agreement, the Indemnified Person may, by notice to the Indemnifying Person, assume the exclusive right to defend, compromise or settle such Third-Party Claim, but the Indemnifying Person will not be bound by any determination of any Third-Party Claim so defended for the purposes of this Agreement or any compromise or settlement effected without its Consent (which may not be unreasonably withheld). (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 13.4, Seller and each Shareholder hereby consent to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of any court in which a Proceeding in respect of a Third-Party Claim is brought against any Buyer Indemnified Person for purposes of any claim that a Buyer Indemnified Person may have under this Agreement with respect to such Proceeding or the matters alleged therein and agree that process may be served on Seller and Shareholders with respect to such a claim anywhere in the world. (e) With respect to any Third-Party Claim subject to indemnification under this Article 11: (i) both the Indemnified Person and the Indemnifying Person, as the case may be, shall keep the other Person fully informed of the status of such Third-Party Claim and any related Proceedings at all stages thereof where such Person is not represented by its own counsel, and (ii) the parties agree (each at its own expense) to render to each other such assistance as they may reasonably require of each other and to 57
cooperate in good faith with each other in order to ensure the proper and adequate defense of any Third-Party Claim. (f) With respect to any Third-Party Claim subject to indemnification under this Article 11, the parties agree to cooperate in such a manner as to preserve in full (to the extent possible) the confidentiality of all Confidential Information and the attorney-client and work-product privileges. In connection therewith, each party agrees that: (i) it will use its Best Efforts, in respect of any Third-Party Claim in which it has assumed or participated in the defense, to avoid production of Confidential Information (consistent with applicable law and rules of procedure), and (ii) all communications between any party hereto and counsel responsible for or participating in the defense of any Third-Party Claim shall, to the extent possible, be made so as to preserve any applicable attorney-client or work-product privilege. 11.10 Other Claims A claim for indemnification for any matter not involving a Third-Party Claim may be asserted by notice to the party from whom indemnification is sought and shall be paid promptly after such notice, subject to filing an objection under the Dispute Resolution Process. 11.11 Buyer Benefit Upon any termination of this Agreement that would entitle the Buyer to recover the benefit of its bargain with the Seller, the Buyer and Seller agree that the value of the benefit of the bargain is speculative, is not readily subject to determination objectively and agree that the value of the benefit of the bargain to the Buyer is $5 Million, plus an amount equal to all transaction costs which the Buyer would have paid if the Closing and issuance of the Acquisition Bonds had taken place. 12. Confidentiality 12.1 Definition of Confidential Information (a) As used in this Article 12, the term "Confidential Information" includes any and all of the following information of Seller or Buyer that has been or may hereafter be disclosed in any form, whether in writing, orally, electronically or otherwise, or otherwise made available by observation, inspection or otherwise by either party (Buyer on the one hand or Seller, on the other hand) or its Representatives (collectively, a "Disclosing Party") to the other party or its Representatives (collectively, a "Receiving Party"): (i) all information that is a trade secret under applicable trade secret or other law; 58
(ii) all information concerning product specifications, data, know-how, formulae, compositions, processes, designs, sketches, photographs, graphs, drawings, samples, inventions and ideas, past, current and planned research and development, current and planned manufacturing or distribution methods and processes, customer lists, current and anticipated customer requirements, price lists, market studies, business plans, computer hardware, Software and computer software and database technologies, systems, structures and architectures; (iii) all information concerning the business and affairs of the Disclosing Party (which includes historical and current financial statements, financial projections and budgets, tax returns and accountants' materials, historical, current and projected sales, capital spending budgets and plans, business plans, strategic plans, marketing and advertising plans, publications, client and customer lists and files, contracts, the names and backgrounds of key personnel and personnel training techniques and materials, however documented), and all information obtained from review of the Disclosing Party's documents or property or discussions with the Disclosing Party regardless of the form of the communication; and (iv) all notes, analyses, compilations, studies, summaries and other material prepared by the Receiving Party to the extent containing or based, in whole or in part, upon any information included in the foregoing. (b) Any trade secrets of a Disclosing Party shall also be entitled to all of the protections and benefits under applicable trade secret law and any other applicable law. If any information that a Disclosing Party deems to be a trade secret is found by a court of competent jurisdiction not to be a trade secret for purposes of this Article 12, such information shall still be considered Confidential Information of that Disclosing Party for purposes of this Article 12 to the extent included within the definition. In the case of trade secrets, each of Buyer and Seller hereby waives any requirement that the other party submit proof of the economic value of any trade secret or post a bond or other security. 12.2 Restricted Use of Confidential Information (a) Each Receiving Party acknowledges the confidential and proprietary nature of the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party and agrees that such Confidential Information (i) shall be kept confidential by the Receiving Party; (ii) shall not be used for any reason or purpose other than to evaluate and consummate the Contemplated Transactions; and (iii) without limiting the foregoing, shall not be disclosed by the Receiving Party to any Person, except in each case as otherwise expressly permitted by the terms of this Agreement or with the prior written consent of an authorized representative of Seller with respect to Confidential Information of Seller (each, a "Seller Contact") or an authorized representative of Buyer with respect to Confidential Information of Buyer (each, a "Buyer Contact"). Each of Buyer and Seller 59
shall disclose the Confidential Information of the other party only to its Representatives who require such material for the purpose of evaluating the Contemplated Transactions and are informed by Buyer or Seller as the case may be, of the obligations of this Article 12 with respect to such information. Each of Buyer and Seller shall (iv) enforce the terms of this Article 12 as to its respective Representatives; (v) take such action to the extent necessary to cause its Representatives to comply with the terms and conditions of this Article 12; and (vi) be responsible and liable for any breach of the provisions of this Article 12 by it or its Representatives. (b) Unless and until this Agreement is terminated, Seller shall maintain as confidential any Confidential Information (including for this purpose any information of Seller of the type referred to in Sections 12.1(a)(i), (ii) and (iii), whether or not disclosed to Buyer) of the Seller relating to any of the Assets or the Assumed Liabilities. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, Seller may use any Confidential Information of Seller before the Closing in the Ordinary Course of Business in connection with the transactions permitted by Section 5.2. (c) From and after the Closing, the provisions of Section 12.2(a) above shall not apply to or restrict in any manner Buyer's use of any Confidential Information of the Seller relating to any of the Assets or the Assumed Liabilities. 12.3 Exceptions Sections 12.2(a) and (b) do not apply to that part of the Confidential Information of a Disclosing Party that a Receiving Party demonstrates (a) was, is or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of a breach of this Article 12 or the Confidentiality Agreement by the Receiving Party or its Representatives; (b) was or is developed by the Receiving Party independently of and without reference to any Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party; or (c) was, is or becomes available to the Receiving Party on a nonconfidential basis from a Third Party not bound by a confidentiality agreement or any legal, fiduciary or other obligation restricting disclosure. Seller shall not disclose any Confidential Information of Seller relating to any of the Assets or the Assumed Liabilities in reliance on the exceptions in clauses (b) or (c) above. 12.4 Legal Proceedings If a Receiving Party becomes compelled in any Proceeding or is requested by a Governmental Body having regulatory jurisdiction over the Contemplated Transactions to make any disclosure that is prohibited or otherwise constrained by this Article 12, that Receiving Party shall provide the Disclosing Party with prompt notice of such compulsion or request so that it may seek an appropriate protective order or other appropriate remedy or waive compliance with the provisions of this Article 12. In the absence of a protective order or other remedy, the Receiving Party may disclose that 60
portion (and only that portion) of the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party that, based upon advice of the Receiving Party's counsel, the Receiving Party is legally compelled to disclose or that has been requested by such Governmental Body, provided, however, that the Receiving Party shall use reasonable efforts to obtain reliable assurance that confidential treatment will be accorded by any Person to whom any Confidential Information is so disclosed. The provisions of this Section 12.4 do not apply to any Proceedings between the parties to this Agreement. 12.5 Return or Destruction of Confidential Information If this Agreement is terminated, each Receiving Party shall (a) destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party prepared or generated by the Receiving Party without retaining a copy of any such material; (b) promptly deliver to the Disclosing Party all other Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party, together with all copies thereof, in the possession, custody or control of the Receiving Party or, alternatively, with the written consent of a Seller Contact or a Buyer Contact (whichever represents the Disclosing Party) destroy all such Confidential Information; and (c) certify all such destruction in writing to the Disclosing Party, provided, however, that the Receiving Party may retain a list that contains general descriptions of the information it has returned or destroyed to facilitate the resolution of any controversies after the Disclosing Party's Confidential Information is returned. 12.6 Attorney-Client Privilege The Disclosing Party is not waiving, and will not be deemed to have waived or diminished, any of its attorney work product protections, attorney-client privileges or similar protections and privileges as a result of disclosing its Confidential Information (including Confidential Information related to pending or threatened litigation) to the Receiving Party, regardless of whether the Disclosing Party has asserted, or is or may be entitled to assert, such privileges and protections. The parties (a) share a common legal and commercial interest in all of the Disclosing Party's Confidential Information that is subject to such privileges and protections; (b) are or may become joint defendants in Proceedings to which the Disclosing Party's Confidential Information covered by such protections and privileges relates; (c) intend that such privileges and protections remain intact should either party become subject to any actual or threatened Proceeding to which the Disclosing Party's Confidential Information covered by such protections and privileges relates; and (d) intend that after the Closing the Receiving Party shall have the right to assert such protections and privileges. No Receiving Party shall admit, claim or contend, in Proceedings involving either party or otherwise, that any Disclosing Party waived any of its attorney work-product protections, attorney-client privileges or similar protections and privileges with respect to any information, documents or other material not disclosed to a Receiving Party due to the Disclosing Party disclosing its Confidential Information (including Confidential Information related to pending or threatened litigation) to the Receiving Party. 61
13. General Provisions 13.1 Expenses Except as otherwise provided in this Agreement, each party to this Agreement will bear its respective fees and expenses incurred in connection with the preparation, negotiation, execution and performance of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions, including all fees and expense of its Representatives. Seller will pay all amounts payable to the Title Insurer in respect of the Title Commitments, copies of exceptions and the Title Policy, including premiums (including premiums for endorsements) and search fees. If this Agreement is terminated, the obligation of each party to pay its own fees and expenses will be subject to any rights of such party arising from a Breach of this Agreement by another party. 13.2 Public Announcements Any public announcement, press release or similar publicity with respect to this Agreement or the Contemplated Transactions will be issued, if at all, at such time and in such manner as Seller determines. Except with the prior consent of Seller or as permitted by this Agreement, Buyer nor any of its Representatives shall disclose to any Person (a) the fact that any Confidential Information of Seller has been disclosed to Buyer or its Representatives, that Buyer or its Representatives have inspected any portion of the Confidential Information of Seller, that any Confidential Information of Buyer has been disclosed to Seller or their Representatives or that Seller or its Representatives have inspected any portion of the Confidential Information of Buyer or (b) any information about the Contemplated Transactions, including the status of such discussions or negotiations, the execution of any documents (including this Agreement) or any of the terms of the Contemplated Transactions or the related documents (including this Agreement). Seller and Buyer will consult with each other concerning the means by which Seller's employees, customers, suppliers and others having dealings with Seller will be informed of the Contemplated Transactions, and Buyer will have the right to be present for any such communication. 13.3 Notices All notices, Consents, waivers and other communications required or permitted by this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed given to a party when (a) delivered to the appropriate address by hand or by nationally recognized overnight courier service (costs prepaid); (b) sent by facsimile or e-mail with confirmation of transmission by the transmitting equipment; or (c) received or rejected by the addressee, if sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, in each case to the following addresses, facsimile numbers or e-mail addresses and marked to the attention of the person (by name or title) designated below (or to such other address, facsimile number, e-mail address or person as a party may designate by notice to the other parties): 62
Seller (before the Closing): 1000 Color Place Apopka, FL 32703 Attention: Donnie Crandall, CEO Fax: (407) 598-4219 with a mandatory copy to: Florida Water Services Corporation 1000 Color Place Apopka, FL 32703 Attention: Carlyn Kowalsky, General Counsel Fax: (407) 598-4241 E-mail: carlynk@florida-water.com Greenberg Traurig, P.A. 777 South Flagler Drive, Suite 300 East West Palm Beach, Florida 33401 Attention: Phillip C. Gildan Fax: (561) 838-8867 E-mail: gildanp@gtlaw.com Seller (after the Closing): Philip R. Halverson VP/General Counsel 30 West Superior Street Duluth, MN 55802 Fax: (218) 723-3960 E-mail: phalverson@allete.com Buyer: -------------------------------- Attention: Fax: E-mail: with a mandatory copy to: -------------------------------- Attention: Fax: E-mail: 63
13.4 Jurisdiction; Service of Process Any Proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any Contemplated Transaction may be brought in the courts of the State of Florida, County of Escambia, or, if it has or can acquire jurisdiction, in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Florida, and each of the parties irrevocably submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of each such court in any such Proceeding, waives any objection it may now or hereafter have to venue or to convenience of forum, agrees that all claims in respect of the Proceeding shall be heard and determined only in any such court and agrees not to bring any Proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any Contemplated Transaction in any other court. The parties agree that either or both of them may file a copy of this paragraph with any court as written evidence of the knowing, voluntary and bargained agreement between the parties irrevocably to waive any objections to venue or to convenience of forum. Process in any Proceeding referred to in the first sentence of this section may be served on any party anywhere in the world. 13.5 Enforcement of Agreement (a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement, any dispute among the parties which arises from the Agreement shall be resolved by binding arbitration conducted in accordance with this Section 13.5. (the "Dispute Resolution Process") Either party may initiate the Dispute Resolution Process by providing written notice to the other party. (b) After transmittal and receipt of a written notice specifying the area or areas of disagreement or dispute, the parties agree to meet at reasonable times and places, as mutually agreed upon, to discuss the issues. (c) If discussions between the parties fail to resolve the dispute within fifteen (15) business days of the receipt by each party of the notice described in subsection (a) of this Section 13.5, a binding arbitration may then be initiated by either party by written notification to the other party of the existence of a dispute. Any and all issues related to the matter addressed by the written notice provided in subsection (a) of Section 13.5 or any response by the other party shall be raised and resolved in a single proceeding. (d) The arbitrators shall be appointed and act as follows: (1) Each party shall appoint a person as arbitrator within ten (10) business days of the date one of the parties has notified the other of the existence of a dispute; (2) Each appointment shall be signified in writing to the counter party and the arbitrators so appointed, within ten (10) days of their acceptance of appointment, shall appoint a third arbitrator, who shall chair the panel. If the arbitrators appointed by the parties are unable to agree upon a third arbitrator, the same shall be appointed by the American Arbitration Association from its qualified panel of arbitrators. Each party shall have the right to veto up to two 64
appointments proposed by the American Arbitration Association. If either party fails to appoint an arbitrator within ten (10) business days from the date one of the parties has notified the other of the existence of a dispute, then an arbitrator shall be appointed by the American Arbitration Association from its qualified panel of arbitrators as the appointment of the party failing to timely appoint and the two so appointed shall appoint a third arbitrator to chair the panel. The party on whose behalf an arbitrator is appointed shall have the right to veto up to two of the arbitrators appointed by the American Arbitration Association; (3) Nothing in this Section 6.04 shall preclude the parties from mutually agreeing to a single arbitrator to resolve the dispute; (4) No arbitrator shall have a business or other pecuniary relationship with either party, except for payment of arbitrator's fees and expenses without the written consent of both parties. (e) Arbitrators shall be sworn to perform their duties with impartiality and fidelity. In rendering any decision, the arbitrator shall proceed to consider the Agreement, the dispute identified in the notice and any response and the actions taken and the documentation thereof, conduct, and relative position, knowledge, and the ability of the parties in relation to the dispute. (f) The arbitration hearing shall convene not earlier than sixty (60) days and not later than ninety (90) days of the acceptance of appointment of all of the arbitrators chosen by the parties unless the parties mutually agree to an earlier date. The arbitrators shall render a decision within ten (10) business days of the date on which the arbitration hearing concludes, and such decisions shall be in writing and in duplicate, one counterpart thereof to be delivered simultaneously to each of the parties. The decision shall contain findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall be final and binding upon the parties. (g) The parties shall be entitled to discovery pursuant to the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure. All discovery requests by a party shall be enforced by the arbitrators. The arbitration hearing shall not proceed until all outstanding discovery requests have been fulfilled. (h) The fees, charges and expenses of the arbitrators, any experts engaged by the arbitrators, the respective counsel engaged by the parties, and any witnesses called by the parties shall be paid as follows: the arbitrators shall order each party to pay their own fees, charges and expenses and assess the fees, charges and expenses of the arbitrators equally between the parties. (i) The provisions of the Florida Arbitration Code, Chapter 682, Florida Statutes, and the Florida Evidence Code, Chapter 90, Florida Statutes, except to the extent inconsistent with the provisions of this Agreement, shall specifically be deemed to apply to any arbitration proceeding conducted hereunder. Unless the venue is mutually agreed upon otherwise by the parties, the venue for any arbitration commenced pursuant to this Section shall be in Pensacola, Florida. 65
13.6 Waiver; Remedies Cumulative The rights and remedies of the parties to this Agreement are cumulative and not alternative. Neither any failure nor any delay by any party in exercising any right, power or privilege under this Agreement or any of the documents referred to in this Agreement will operate as a waiver of such right, power or privilege, and no single or partial exercise of any such right, power or privilege will preclude any other or further exercise of such right, power or privilege or the exercise of any other right, power or privilege. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, (a) no claim or right arising out of this Agreement or any of the documents referred to in this Agreement can be discharged by one party, in whole or in part, by a waiver or renunciation of the claim or right unless in writing signed by the other party; (b) no waiver that may be given by a party will be applicable except in the specific instance for which it is given; and (c) no notice to or demand on one party will be deemed to be a waiver of any obligation of that party or of the right of the party giving such notice or demand to take further action without notice or demand as provided in this Agreement or the documents referred to in this Agreement. 13.7 Entire Agreement and Modification This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements, whether written or oral, between the parties with respect to its subject matter (including any letter of intent and any confidentiality agreement between Buyer and Seller) and constitutes (along with the Disclosure Letter, Exhibits and other documents delivered pursuant to this Agreement) a complete and exclusive statement of the terms of the agreement between the parties with respect to its subject matter. This Agreement may not be amended, supplemented, or otherwise modified except by a written agreement executed by the party to be charged with the amendment. 13.8 Assignments, Successors and no Third-Party Rights No party may assign any of its rights or delegate any of its obligations under this Agreement without the prior written consent of the other parties, except that Buyer may collaterally assign its rights hereunder to any financial institution providing financing in connection with the Contemplated Transactions. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement will apply to, be binding in all respects upon and inure to the benefit of the successors and permitted assigns of the parties. Nothing expressed or referred to in this Agreement will be construed to give any Person other than the parties to this Agreement any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or with respect to this Agreement or any provision of this Agreement, except such rights as shall inure to a successor or permitted assignee pursuant to this Section 13.8. 66
13.9 Severability If any provision of this Agreement is held invalid or unenforceable by any court of competent jurisdiction, the other provisions of this Agreement will remain in full force and effect. Any provision of this Agreement held invalid or unenforceable only in part or degree will remain in full force and effect to the extent not held invalid or unenforceable. 13.10 Construction The headings of Articles and Sections in this Agreement are provided for convenience only and will not affect its construction or interpretation. All references to "Articles," and "Sections" refer to the corresponding Articles and Sections of this Agreement. 13.11 Time of Essence With regard to all dates and time periods set forth or referred to in this Agreement, time is of the essence. 13.12 Governing Law This Agreement will be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of Florida without regard to conflicts-of-laws principles that would require the application of any other law. 13.13 Execution of Agreement This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which will be deemed to be an original copy of this Agreement and all of which, when taken together, will be deemed to constitute one and the same agreement. The exchange of copies of this Agreement and of signature pages by facsimile transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this Agreement as to the parties and may be used in lieu of the original Agreement for all purposes. Signatures of the parties transmitted by facsimile shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes. 13.14 Due Diligence. This Agreement is being executed without all of its schedules and Exhibits being attached. As to the foregoing which are documents, the parties hereto agree to negotiate in good faith to finalize the form thereof on or before the Due Diligence Date (as hereinafter defined). As to the Schedules and other exhibits, all non-attached schedules and exhibits are to be prepared by the Seller. During the course of preparing such schedules and exhibits, the Seller will give to the Buyer drafts thereof as developed and supply to Buyer such information, and permit the Buyer to conduct such due diligence, in connection therewith as Buyer shall reasonably request. In addition, Seller 67
acknowledges that Buyer has not conducted the due diligence that Buyer desires to conduct prior to consummating the transactions contemplated hereby. Consequently, at such time as Seller completes the schedules and exhibits it is required to complete to be attached hereto, it shall deliver to Buyer a complete set thereof with a written notice stating that the schedules and exhibits so delivered are the final schedules and exhibits hereto that it is required to complete and deliver. The date of the foregoing, the "Exhibit Delivery Date". If the Exhibit Delivery Date has not occurred on or prior to thirty days after the date hereof or, if they are so delivered prior thereto but the Buyer in the exercise of its reasonable discretion is not satisfied with the substance thereof, the Buyer shall have the right to terminate this Agreement except that the Seller shall immediately pay to the Buyer the Due Diligence Expenses. The Buyer agrees that it will in good faith seek to accomplish its due diligence on or before six (6) weeks after the Exhibit Delivery Date. When it has completed its due diligence, it shall notify the Seller. If the Buyer is not satisfied in its reasonable discretion with the results of its due diligence, then the Buyer may terminate this Agreement except that the Seller shall immediately pay to the Buyer the Due Diligence Expenses. If the Buyer has not completed its due diligence within the aforesaid time, then the Seller may terminate this Agreement or if the expenses of the Buyer in conducting its due diligence are reasonably projected by Buyer at any time to exceed $150,000 and the Seller refuses to approve the reasonable projected amount over $150,000 as Due Diligence Expenses as defined herein and subject to reimbursement by the Seller, then the Buyer may terminate this Agreement, and, in each case, the Seller shall pay to the Buyer the Due Diligence Expense. 13.15 RADON GAS. (a) RADON IS NATURALLY OCCURRING RADIOACTIVE GAS THAT, WHEN IT HAS ACCUMULATED IN A BUILDING IN SUFFICIENT QUANTITIES, MAY PRESENT HEALTH RISKS TO PERSONS WHO ARE EXPOSED TO IT OVER TIME. LEVELS OF RADON THAT EXCEED FEDERAL AND STATE GUIDELINES HAVE BEEN FOUND IN BUILDINGS IN FLORIDA. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING RADON TESTING MAY BE OBTAINED FROM THE COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH UNIT. 13.16 Limited Liability. Neither the State of Florida nor any political subdivision or municipality thereof, nor the Buyer, shall be obligated (1) to exercise its ad valorem taxing power or any other taxing power in any form on any real or personal property to pay any liability arising out of, or in any connection whatsoever with, this Agreement, or to pay the principal of the Acquistion Bonds, the interest thereon or other costs incident thereto or (2) to pay the same from any other funds, except from the Net Revenues realized by the Buyer from its ownership or operation of the System, junior and subordinate to the payment of any Bonds or other indebtedness payable from such source. It is further agreed between the 68
Buyer and the Seller that this Agreement and any obligations arising in connection therewith, whether for payment of the Purchase Price, or for any claim of liability, remedy for breach, or otherwise, shall not constitute a lien on the System or any other property of the Authority, or any municipality, but shall constitute a lien only on the Pledged Revenues, in the manner provided in this Agreement. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein or in any other instrument or document executed by or on behalf of the Buyer in connection herewith, no stipulation, covenant, agreement or obligation contained herein or therein shall be deemed or construed to be a stipulation, covenant, agreement, or obligation of any present or future member, officer, employee or agent of the Buyer, or of any incorporator, member, director, trustee, officer, employee or agent of any successor to the Buyer, in any such person's individual capacity, and no such person, in his individual capacity, shall be liable personally for any breach or non-observance of or for any failure to perform, fulfill or comply with any such stipulations, covenants, agreements or obligations, nor shall any recourse be had for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any of the Bonds or for any claim based thereon or on any such stipulation, covenant, agreement, or obligation, against any such person, in his individual capacity, either directly or through the Buyer or any successor to the Buyer, under any rule of law or equity, statute or constitution or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, and all such liability of any such person, in his individual capacity, is hereby expressly waived and released. All references to the Buyer in this paragraph shall be deemed to include the Buyer, the City of Gulf Breeze, the City of Milton, their respective Mayors, Council Members, officers, employees, and agents. The Buyer shall not be obligated to pay any liability, claim or obligation arising from or in connection with this Agreement or the transactions contemplated thereby, or any bonds or the interest thereon, from any funds of the Buyer derived from any source other than the Pledged Revenues, junior and subordinate the payment of the bonds secured by such Pledged Revenues. The Seller hereby agrees to indemnify and defend the Buyer and hold the Buyer harmless against any and all claims, losses liabilities or damages in any way growing out of or resulting from challenges to this Agreement or objections to the Authority to complete the contemplated transactions to the prior to closing, including, without limitation, all costs and expenses of the Buyer, including reasonable attorney's fees, incurred in the performance of any activities of the Buyer in connection with the foregoing. All references to the Buyer in this paragraph shall be deemed to include the Buyer, the City of Gulf Breeze, the City of Milton, their respective Mayors, Council Members, officers, employees, and agents. Nothing herein shall be deemed to authorize, create or impose upon the City of Gulf Breeze or the City of Milton any obligation, duty, liability or responsibility for the taking of or refraining from any action, or for the payment of any sums for any reason whatsoever. The Seller hereby acknowledges that the City of Gulf Breeze and the City of 69
Milton shall have no liability whatsoever on account of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby, including, without limitation, any claims or liabilities arising on account of any breach, misrepresentation or other action or failure to act on the part of the Buyer. The Seller hereby covenants and agrees that it will never seek remedy or recourse against, or seek to impose any liability upon, the City of Gulf Breeze or City of Milton, for any liability or claim arising in connection with or relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated thereby, whether against the Buyer, the Cities of Gulf Breeze or Milton directly, or otherwise, under any rule of law or equity, statute or constitution or by the enforcement of any provision of this Agreement, or by way of assessment or penalty or otherwise; and all such liability of any such entities is hereby expressly waived and released. If, prior to closing, the Seller shall determine that, because of its indemnity obligations of clause (ii) of the preceding paragraph is no longer economically feasible to pursue to the Closing or the transaction contemplated hereby, Seller may elect to give written notice to the Buyer that it no longer wishes to complete the Closing transaction. Upon receipt of such notice, Buyer may elect to proceed with the Closing without such indemnity under said clause (ii) (in which case the Seller shall be excused from any further indemnity obligation under said clause (ii)), or to terminate its obligations hereunder (in which case the Seller shall be liable for Liquidated Damages). The provisions of this Section shall survive the termination of this Agreement. 13.17 Obligations Subordinate. All obligations of the Buyer hereunder or arising in connection therewith (the "Utility Acquisition Liabilities" or "UA Liabilities") shall be limited and special obligations of the Buyer, payable solely from the Net Revenues, junior and subordinate to the outstanding Bonds of the Authority. The UA Liabilities shall not be or constitute a general indebtedness, liability, general or moral obligation, or a pledge of the faith, credit or taxing power of the Buyer, the State of Florida, or any political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation. Neither the State of Florida nor any political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, nor the Buyer shall be obligated (1) to levy ad valorem taxes on any property to pay the UA Liabilities or other costs incident thereto or (2) to pay the same from any other funds of the Buyer, except from the Net Revenues, junior and subordinate to the outstanding Bonds of the Authority. It is further agreed between the Buyer and the Seller that the UA Liabilities shall not constitute a lien upon the System or facilities, or any part thereof, or on any other property of the Buyer, but shall constitute a lien only on the Net Revenues, junior and subordinate to the outstanding Bonds of the Authority. 70
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above. Buyer: Florida Water Services Authority ---------------------------------------- By: /s/ J. Lance Reece ------------------------------------ Its: Chairman ------------------------------------ Seller: Florida Water Services Corporation ---------------------------------------- By: /s/ Donnie R. Crandell ------------------------------------ Its: President ------------------------------------ 71


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20021018111635.txt.gz
TIME:20021018111635
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - OCTOBER 18, 2002 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS The following exhibit of ALLETE, Inc. is filed herewith in accordance with Item 601 of Regulation S-K: Exhibit Number - ------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated October 18, 2002. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 18, 2002 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - market demand, including structural market changes; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - our ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 18, 2002
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. October 18, 2002 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------ James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 18, 2002 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated October 18, 2002. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 18, 2002

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: October 18, 2002 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com NEWS INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com ALLETE REPORTS SOLID THIRD QUARTER ---------------------------------- Duluth, Minn. - ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported earnings of 55 cents per share for the third quarter of 2002, compared with 47 cents over the comparable period a year ago, an increase of 17 percent. Net income was $45.1 million, up 19 percent from the third quarter of 2001. Operating revenue was $390 million in the quarter compared with $383.1 million a year ago. Year-to-date, earnings are $1.46 per share, compared with $1.50 for the first nine months of 2001. Excluding exit charges related to the vehicle transport business and Electric Odyssey, year-to-date earnings per share are $1.51 this year. "We reported earnings comparable to last year despite difficult market conditions for both the energy and automotive businesses," said Dave Gartzke, ALLETE Chairman, President and CEO. "We are confident that the company is well-positioned to contend with current market conditions and will show stronger earnings performance once the economic environment improves." While total kilowatt-hour sales increased 24 percent, earnings at ENERGY SERVICES for the quarter were down three percent compared to a year ago due to weak wholesale power prices. Revenue and earnings from our core retail electric business remain strong. INVESTMENTS AND CORPORATE CHARGES in the third quarter were flat compared with the comparable period in 2001. Earnings at AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES increased by $3.5 million for the quarter compared with the third quarter of 2001. At ADESA, growth was due to mandated goodwill accounting changes, lower interest expense and increased auction efficiency. Total receivables at Automotive Finance Corporation have increased by eight percent over 2001 to $535 million, and its strong credit quality helped AFC post another strong quarter. Year-to-date, net income for Automotive Services is 33 percent over the same period last year. "In the first few weeks of October we were surprised to see conversion rates fall to 50 percent at our U.S. auctions," Gartzke said. "New car manufacturers have extended zero-percent financing into the 2003 model year, causing a further reduction in wholesale used car prices. This has slowed the sale of vehicles at our auctions." The conversion rate represents the number of vehicles sold compared with the number of vehicles offered at auction. (MORE)
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- "We expect the sellers of used cars will ultimately accept the lower prices at auction and begin selling again," Gartzke said. "But timing is uncertain. Based on current market conditions we believe Automotive Services will not achieve its stated earnings growth goal of 30 percent this year. We now expect ALLETE's earnings per share to be at the low end of the range with respect to our estimate for 2002 of $1.80 to $1.90." ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE's holdings include ADESA, the second largest wholesale automobile auction network in North America; AFC, the leading provider of independent auto dealer inventory financing; Minnesota Power, a low-cost electric utility that serves some of the largest industrial customers in the United States; and significant real estate holdings in Florida. For more information about ALLETE, visit the company's Web site at www.allete.com. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET, DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802 WWW.ALLETE.COM
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 4 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20021209201549.txt.gz
TIME:20021209201549
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - DECEMBER 9, 2002 ALLETE, Inc. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE. Reference is made to the 2001 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or the Company) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2001 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 11. - Sixth Paragraph Ref. Page 30. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed February 28, 2002 - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 28, 2002 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2002 - Page 18. - Fifth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2002 - Page 17. - Sixth Paragraph and Page 22. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 19, 2002 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 20, 2002 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2002 - Page 22. - Fourth Paragraph On December 9, 2002 ALLETE announced that its wholly owned subsidiary, Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), has agreed to delay the closing of the sale of substantially all of its assets to the Florida Water Services Authority (FWSA), a governmental authority formed under the laws of the state of Florida. The agreement with the FWSA provided for closing by December 15, 2002. The delay resulted when the FWSA requested additional time to put financing in place and complete other preparations for the transaction. Florida Water expects to close the transaction in early 2003. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 9, 2002 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - our ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 9, 2002
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. December 9, 2002 James K. Vizanko -------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 9, 2002 3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20021220125005.txt.gz
TIME:20021220125005
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - DECEMBER 20, 2002 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE. Reference is made to the 2001 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or the Company) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2001 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 11. - Sixth Paragraph Ref. Page 30. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed February 28, 2002 - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 28, 2002 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2002 - Page 18. - Fifth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2002 - Page 17. - Sixth Paragraph and Page 22. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 19, 2002 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 20, 2002 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2002 - Page 22. - Fourth Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated December 9, 2002 and filed December 10, 2002 On December 20, 2002 ALLETE announced that Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), a wholly owned subsidiary, has signed an amended asset purchase agreement adjusting the sales price for the sale of substantially all of its assets to the Florida Water Services Authority (FWSA), a governmental authority formed under the laws of the state of Florida. The sales price has been adjusted to $456.5 million primarily because of higher interest rates on bonds to be issued by the FWSA to finance the transaction. Florida Water anticipates receiving approximately $420 million at closing and an additional $36.5 million three years after closing once certain contingencies have been satisfied. In addition, Florida Water expects to receive up to $36 million of future customer hookup fees to be paid over the next six years. The revised purchase price, combined with the additional payments, brings the total amount expected to be received in the transaction to $492.5 million. Cash proceeds to ALLETE after taxes and repayment of existing debt are expected to be approximately $180 million in 2003, and $250 million for the entire transaction. The gain on the transaction is estimated at $100 million after taxes and related costs. While the majority of the cash will be received at closing, most of the gain is expected to be recognized as income over a six-year period beginning in 2004 as required by accounting rules. Terms of the revised agreement call for a closing by February 14, 2003, subject to the FWSA being able to issue bonds for the purchase price and other conditions. ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. Exhibit Number - ------- 2 - Amendment and Restatement of Asset Purchase Agreement by and between Florida Water Services Corporation and Florida Water Services Authority dated as of December 20, 2002. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 20, 2002 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - our ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 20, 2002
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. December 20, 2002 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 20, 2002 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 2 - Amendment and Restatement of Asset Purchase Agreement by and between Florida Water Services Corporation and Florida Water Services Authority dated as of December 20, 2002. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 20, 2002

AMENDMENT AND RESTATEMENT OF ASSET PURCHASE AGREEMENT by and between FLORIDA WATER SERVICES CORPORATION and FLORIDA WATER SERVICES AUTHORITY Dated as of December 20, 2002
AMENDMENT AND RESTATEMENT OF ASSET PURCHASE AGREEMENT This Amendment and Restatement of Asset Purchase Agreement is dated as of December 20, 2002, by and between Florida Water Services Authority, a public entity of the State of Florida ("Buyer"), and Florida Water Services Corporation, a Florida corporation ("Seller"). RECITALS WHEREAS, Seller and Buyer did enter into a certain Asset Purchase Agreement dated as of September 19, 2002 (the "Original Agreement") and wish to amend and restate it in its entirety (other than the Preambles thereto) (the Original Agreement as amended and restated hereby, the "Agreement"); WHEREAS, Seller owns potable water production, supply, treatment, and distribution systems, alternative water systems, wastewater collection, transmission, treatment and disposal systems, and reclaimed water facilities in various incorporated and unincorporated areas in Florida (the "System," as hereinafter defined); and WHEREAS, Buyer, pursuant to Chapter 163, Florida Statutes, and the Interlocal Agreement dated as of September 16, 2002, creating Buyer (the "Interlocal Agreement") and other applicable laws, has the power and authority to acquire and provide potable water, wastewater, and reclaimed water facilities and to provide service outside of the boundaries of its participating members; and WHEREAS, various governmental entities have threatened to condemn portions of System of the Seller, including portions of the water, wastewater and reclaimed water utility Facilities of the Seller, and in lieu of condemnation, Buyer desires to acquire all or substantially all of the assets which are used by Seller in providing services through the water, wastewater and reclaimed water Facilities throughout the State of Florida, and to avoid condemnation, Seller has consented to sell those assets to Buyer; and WHEREAS, Seller desires to sell, and Buyer desires to purchase, the Assets (as herein defined) of Seller for the consideration and on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement; NOW THEREFORE, the parties, intending to be legally bound, do hereby amend and restate the Original Agreement so that it shall read in its entirety as follows: 1. Definitions and Usage 1.1 Definitions 1
For purposes of this Asset Purchase Agreement as amended and restated (the "Agreement"), the following terms and variations thereof have the meanings specified or referred to in this Section 1.1: "Accounts Receivable"-- (a) all customer accounts receivable and other rights to payment from customers of Seller and the full benefit of all security for such accounts or rights to payment; (b) all other accounts or notes receivable of Seller and the full benefit of all security for such accounts or notes; and (c) any claim, remedy or other right related to any of the foregoing. "Acquisition Bonds"-- means Bonds issued by the Buyer primarily for the purpose of paying the Purchase Price or installments thereof and anticipated to be in an aggregate amount sufficient to produce Acquisition Bond Net Proceeds in an amount equal to the Purchase Price. "Acquisition Bonds Net Proceeds' -- means the amount received from the sale of Acquisition Bonds pursuant to subsection 2.3(E), less the costs of issuing the Bonds, less the amount required to fund the debt service reserve, and less $51,000,000 for the purpose of funding capital and renewal and replacement reserves (although it is not required to be so used). Installment 1 of the Purchase Price as set forth in subsection 2.3(A) will be automatically adjusted to equal the Acquisition Bonds Net Proceeds. "AFPI" means allowance for funds prudently invested as such term is used by the Florida Public Service Commission. "Appurtenances"-- all privileges, rights, easements, hereditaments and appurtenances belonging to or for the benefit of the Land, including all easements appurtenant to and for the benefit of any Land (a "Dominant Parcel") for, and as the primary means of access between, the Dominant Parcel and a public way, or for any other use upon which lawful use of the Dominant Parcel for the purposes for which it is presently being used is dependent, and all rights existing in and to any streets, alleys, passages and other rights-of-way included thereon or adjacent thereto (before or after vacation thereof) and vaults beneath any such streets. "Assets" or "Assets to Be Sold"-- as defined in Section 2.1. "Assignment and Assumption Agreement"-- as defined in Section 2.7(a)(ii). "Assumed Liabilities"-- as defined in Section 2.4(a). "Beck Reserve" - means the sum of $17,800,000 which the Buyer will be funding as a capital reserve in accordance with the Beck Schedule to provide funding for currently unidentified capital projects for the small utility systems as identified in the R.W. Beck Report dated as of December 20, 2002, as all systems not including the 14 2
largest systems as identified on Table 1 "14 Largest Systems" (the Small Systems") which capital projects may be identified by the Buyer from the date of Closing until September 30, 2007. Buyer shall notify Seller in writing of each Small System Project identified by Buyer and estimated cost for each such Small System Project. Disputes, if any, as to necessity, reasonableness and cost shall be resolved in accordance with Section 13.5. The Beck Reserve shall be invested by Buyer and interest earned on the Beck Reserve shall be credited to the Beck Reserve. "Beck Schedule" - means the following maximum amounts per fiscal year for capital improvement to the Small Systems as contemplated by the R.W. Beck Report dated as of December 20, 2002: $3,162,000 for year ended 9/30/03 plus any additional money actually spent during that time period, $3,527,000 for year ended 9/30/04 plus any additional money actually spent during that time period, $3,555,000 for year ended 9/30/05 plus any additional money actually spent during that time period, $2,758,000 for year ended 9/30/06 plus any additional money actually spent during that time period, and $4,797,000 for fiscal year ended 9/30/07 plus any additional money actually spent during that time period. "Best Efforts"-- the efforts that a prudent Person desirous of achieving a result would use in similar circumstances to achieve that result as expeditiously as possible, provided, however, that a Person required to use Best Efforts under this Agreement will not be thereby required to take actions that would result in a material adverse change in the benefits to such Person of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions or to dispose of or make any change to its business, expend any material funds or incur any other material burden. "Bill of Sale"-- as defined in Section 2.7(a)(i). "Bonds" shall mean revenue bonds, the interest on which (i) accrues at fixed rates and (ii) is excluded from gross income of the holder thereof for federal income tax purposes, to be issued by the Buyer and payable solely from and secured solely by the Net Revenues of the System and, if consented to by Buyer, other assets of the Buyer. "Breach"-- any breach of, or any inaccuracy in, any representation or warranty or any breach of, or a failure to perform or comply with, any covenant or obligation, in or of this Agreement. "Business Day"-- any day other than: (a) Saturday or Sunday; or (b) any other day on which banks in Florida are permitted or required to be closed. "Buyer"-- as defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Buyer Indemnified Persons"-- as defined in Section 11.2. 3
"Capital Charges"- revenues, exclusive of Special Assessments, derived by the Buyer from impact fees, guaranteed revenues, service availability fees, or other such fees or charges, imposed upon landowners, builders or developers in connection with the Buyer improvement of property within the services areas of the System, to defray the costs of capital facilities. "Capital Improvement Plan"---as defined in Section 2.3(c). "Capital Improvement Plan Requirement" -- an annual amount of $25,000,000 for the purpose of providing extraordinary maintenance, rehabilitation, upgrades to equipment or facilities, increased plant capacity, and extensions and enlargements to the System, and excluding well and septic tank conversions. "Closing"-- as defined in Section 2.6. "Closing Bonds" - as defined in Section 2.3(E). "Closing Date"-- the date on which the Closing actually takes place. "COBRA"-- as defined under Federal Employment Law. "Code"-- the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. "Confidential Information"-- as defined in Section 12.1. "Contemplated Transactions"-- all of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. "Cost of Operation and Maintenance"-- all current expenses, paid or accrued, for the operation, maintenance and repair of all Facilities of the System, as calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles for units of local government and on a consistent basis with the operation and maintenance and repair of the Facilities of the System under Seller's ownership, and shall include, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, insurance premiums, administrative expenses of the Buyer related solely to the System, labor, cost of materials, consumables and supplies used for current operation, but excluding any reserve for renewals or replacements, any extraordinary or emergency repairs, any replacements, any capital expenditures, any allowance for interest or depreciation or amortization, any other non-cash item, any profit, any franchise fees, any payments in lieu of taxes, and any voluntary payments to other governmental entities not required by law. "Customer Deposits"--any amounts deposited with or held by the Seller as customer deposits. "Damages"-- as defined in Section 11.2. 4
"Debt Service" - as defined in Section 2.3(E). "Debt Service Base Amount" - as defined in Section 2.3(E) "Due Diligence Expenses"-- in addition to such sums already funded by Seller, a sum up to $200,000 or such greater amount as the Seller may in the future approve in writing, to reimburse the costs incurred by the Buyer for its due diligence expenses in making the decision to acquire the System and issue the Acquisition Bonds for the Purchase Price. "Effective Time"-- 12:01 am. on the Closing Date. "Employee Plans"-- as defined in Section 3.13. "Employment Agreement"-- as defined in Section 2.7(a)(vi). "Encumbrance"-- any charge, claim, community or other marital property interest, condition, equitable interest, lien, option, pledge, security interest, mortgage, right of way, easement, encroachment, servitude, right of first option, right of first refusal or similar restriction, including any restriction on use, voting (in the case of any security or equity interest), transfer, receipt of income or exercise of any other attribute of ownership. "Environment"-- soil, land surface or subsurface strata, surface waters (including navigable waters and ocean waters), ground waters, drinking water supply, stream sediments, ambient air (including indoor air), plant and animal life and any other environmental medium or natural resource. "Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities"-- any cost, damages, expense, liability, obligation or other responsibility arising from or under any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law, including those consisting of or relating to: (a) any environmental, health or safety matter or condition (including on-site or off-site contamination, occupational safety and health and regulation of any chemical substance or product); (b) any fine, penalty, judgment, award, settlement, legal or administrative proceeding, damages, loss, claim, demand or response, remedial or inspection cost or expense arising under any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law; (c) financial responsibility under any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law for cleanup costs or corrective action, including any cleanup, removal, containment or other remediation or response actions ("Cleanup") required by any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety 5
and Health Law (whether or not such Cleanup has been required or requested by any Governmental Body or any other Person) and for any natural resource damages; or (d) any other compliance, corrective or remedial measure required under any Environmental Law or Occupational Safety and Health Law. The terms "removal," "remedial" and "response action" include the types of activities covered by the United States Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980 (CERCLA). "Environmental Law"-- any Legal Requirement that requires or relates to: (a) advising appropriate authorities, employees or the public of intended or actual Releases of pollutants or hazardous substances or materials, violations of discharge limits or other prohibitions and the commencement of activities, such as resource extraction or construction, that could have significant impact on the Environment; (b) preventing or reducing to acceptable levels the Release of pollutants or hazardous substances or materials into the Environment; (c) reducing the quantities, preventing the Release or minimizing the hazardous characteristics of wastes that are generated; (d) assuring that products are designed, formulated, packaged and used so that they do not present unreasonable risks to human health or the Environment when used or disposed of; (e) protecting resources, species or ecological amenities; (f) reducing to acceptable levels the risks inherent in the transportation of hazardous substances, pollutants, oil or other potentially harmful substances; (g) cleaning up pollutants that have been Released, preventing the Threat of Release or paying the costs of such clean up or prevention; or (h) making responsible parties pay private parties, or groups of them, for damages done to their health or the Environment or permitting self-appointed representatives of the public interest to recover for injuries done to public assets. "ERISA"-- the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974. "Exchange Act"-- the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. "Excluded Assets"-- as defined in Section 2.2. 6
"Facilities"-- the Land, leasehold, license, easement, right-of-way, prescriptive claim or other interest in real property currently owned or operated by Seller or used by the Seller in the operation of the System, including the Tangible Personal Property used or operated by Seller at the respective locations of the Land, and excluding the Excluded Assets. "Future Transfer Adjustment Process" - in the event that Buyer elects to transfer any part or parts of the System from time to time after Closing, to the extent that such transfer or transfers reduce the Buyer's collection of Gross Revenues and the Capital Charges collected by the Buyer ("Transfer Impact"), the provisions of this Agreement related to Seller's revenue guarantee amount of Gross Revenues and the applicable Maximum Annual Retainage threshold amount which must be met before payment of Capital Charges to Seller shall be adjusted by Buyer and Seller to reflect the Transfer Impact. In the event Buyer and Seller cannot agree on the Transfer Impact, disagreements shall be submitted to the dispute resolution process in Section 13.5. "GAAP"-- generally accepted accounting principles applicable to the Seller for financial reporting in the United States, applied on a basis consistent with the basis on which the balance sheets and the other financial statements referred to in Section 3.3 were prepared. "Governing Documents"-- the articles or certificate of incorporation and the bylaws of Sellers. "Governmental Authorization"-- any consent, license, registration or permit issued, granted, given or otherwise made available by or under the authority of any Governmental Body or pursuant to any Legal Requirement. "Governmental Body"-- any: (a) federal, state, local, municipal, or other government; (b) governmental authority of any nature (including any agency, branch, department, board, commission, court, tribunal or other entity exercising governmental powers ); or (c) body exercising any administrative, executive, judicial, legislative, police, regulatory or taxing authority or power. "Gross Revenues" or "Revenues" shall mean all moneys, received or receivable by the Buyer, or accruing to it in the operation of the System, from rates, fees, rentals, or other charges for the services or Facilities of the System, excluding state and federal grants and grants in aid of construction, unless otherwise provided herein, all calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting practice applicable to a local government. "Gross Revenues" or "Revenues" shall also be deemed to include any 7
amounts (exclusive of Capital Charges retained by Seller) received by the Buyer as Capital Charges for any facilities acquired from the Seller, but shall not include Special Assessments or Capital Charges for any facilities not purchased from the Seller. "Guarantee" -- as defined in Section 2.3(E). "Hazardous Activity" -- the distribution, generation, handling, importing, management, manufacturing, processing, production, refinement, Release, storage, transfer, transportation, treatment or use (including any withdrawal or other use of groundwater) of Hazardous Material in, on, under, about or from any of the Facilities or any part thereof into the Environment and any other act, business, operation or thing that increases the danger, or risk of danger, or poses an unreasonable risk of harm, to persons or property on or off the Facilities. "Hazardous Material"-- any substance, material or waste which is or will foreseeably be regulated by any Governmental Body, including any material, substance or waste which is defined as a "hazardous waste," "hazardous material," "hazardous substance," "extremely hazardous waste," "restricted hazardous waste," "contaminant," "toxic waste" or "toxic substance" under any provision of Environmental Law, and including petroleum, petroleum products, asbestos, presumed asbestos-containing material or asbestos-containing material, urea formaldehyde and polychlorinated biphenyls. "Improvements"-- all buildings, structures, fixtures and improvements located on the Land or included in the Assets, including those under construction. "Indemnified Person"-- as defined in Section 11.9. "Indemnifying Person"-- as defined in Section 11.9. "Insurance Policy" - as defined in Section 2.3(F). "Intellectual Property Assets"-- as defined in Section 3.14. "Interest Rate Adjustment" - as defined in Section 2.3(E). "Inventories"-- all inventories of Seller, wherever located, including without limitation, all pumps, pipes, valves, plumbing fixtures, chemicals, stored water, spare parts and all other materials and supplies to be used by Seller in the operation of its business. "IRS"-- the United States Internal Revenue Service and, to the extent relevant, the United States Department of the Treasury. 8
"Land"-- all parcels and tracts of land in which Seller has a fee ownership interest, except for the parcels and tracts of land set forth in Exhibit 2.2. "Lease"-- any Real Property Lease or any lease or rental agreement, license, right to use or installment and conditional sale agreement to which Seller is a party and any other Seller Contract pertaining to the leasing or use of any Tangible Personal Property. "Legal Requirement"-- any federal, state, local, municipal, or other constitution, law, ordinance, principle of common law, code, regulation, or statute. "Liability"-- with respect to any Person, any liability or obligation of such Person of any kind, character or description, whether known or unknown, absolute or contingent, accrued or unaccrued, disputed or undisputed, liquidated or unliquidated, secured or unsecured, joint or several, due or to become due, vested or unvested, executory, determined, determinable or otherwise, and whether or not the same is required to be accrued on the financial statements of such Person. "Material Consents"-- as defined in Section 7.3. "Maximum Annual Retainage" -- means, for each period in which Seller is entitled to receipt of any portion of the Capital Charges pursuant to Section 2.2(b) hereof, the sums set forth as follows, as adjusted pursuant to the Future Transfer Adjustment Process, and subject to the set-offs permitted under Section 2.2(b) hereof in each fiscal year in the maximum amount set forth in the Beck Schedule for such fiscal year: PERIOD APPLICABLE MAXIMUM ANNUAL RETAINAGE ------------------------- - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- PERIOD 1: ALL CAPITAL CHARGES COLLECTED BY BUYER IN EXCESS OF DATE OF CLOSING $11,250,000, NOT TO EXCEED $5,000,000, AND NOT TO EXCEED THROUGH 9/30/03 MAXIMUM CUMULATIVE RETAINAGE - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- PERIOD 2: ALL CAPITAL CHARGES COLLECTED BY BUYER IN EXCESS OF 10/01/03 THROUGH $10,000,000, NOT TO EXCEED $5,000,000 AND NOT TO EXCEED 9/30/04 MAXIMUM CUMULATIVE RETAINAGE - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- PERIOD 3: ALL CAPITAL CHARGES COLLECTED BY BUYER IN EXCESS OF 10/01/04 THROUGH $10,000,000, NOT TO EXCEED $5,000,000 AND NOT TO EXCEED 9/30/05 MAXIMUM CUMULATIVE RETAINAGE - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- PERIOD 4: ALL CAPITAL CHARGES COLLECTED BY BUYER IN EXCESS OF EACH FISCAL YEAR OF $8,500,000 PER FISCAL YEAR, NOT TO EXCEED $8,500,000 AND BUYER STARTING NOT TO EXCEED MAXIMUM CUMULATIVE RETAINAGE 10/01/05, UNTIL - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 9
- -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- SELLER HAS RECEIVED THE MAXIMUM CUMULATIVE RETAINAGE - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- "Maximum Cumulative Retainage"-- the aggregate sum of $36 Million, as adjusted by Section 2.2(b), below. "Monthly Fees" -- as defined in Section 2.3(D). "Net Revenues" shall mean Gross Revenues less the Cost of Operation and Maintenance. "Occupational Safety and Health Law"-- any Legal Requirement designed to provide safe and healthful working conditions and to reduce occupational safety and health hazards under the Occupational Safety and Health Act. "One Year Call Bonds" -- as defined in Section 2.3(E). "Order"-- any order, injunction, judgment, decree, ruling, assessment or arbitration award of any Governmental Body or arbitrator. "Ordinary Course of Business"-- an action taken by a Person will be deemed to have been taken in the Ordinary Course of Business only if that action is consistent in nature, scope and magnitude with the past practices of such Person and is taken in the ordinary course of the normal, day-to-day operations of such Person. "Permitted Encumbrances"-- as defined in Section 3.7. "Person"-- an individual, partnership, corporation, business trust, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated association, joint venture or other entity or a Governmental Body. "Proceeding"-- any action, arbitration, audit, hearing, investigation, litigation or suit (whether civil, criminal, administrative, judicial or investigative, whether formal or informal, whether public or private) commenced, brought, conducted or heard by or before, or otherwise involving, any Governmental Body or arbitrator. "Purchase Price"-- as defined in Section 2.3. "Real Property"-- the Land and Improvements. "Real Property Lease"-- any ground lease or space lease. 10
"Record"-- information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. "Related Person"-- (a) any Person that directly or indirectly controls, is directly or indirectly controlled by or is directly or indirectly under common control with such specified Person; (b) any Person that holds a Material Interest in such specified Person; (c) each Person that serves as a director, officer, partner, executor or trustee of such specified Person (or in a similar capacity); (d) any Person in which such specified Person holds a Material Interest; and (e) any Person with respect to which such specified Person serves as a general partner or a trustee (or in a similar capacity). For purposes of this definition, (a) "control" (including "controlling," "controlled by," and "under common control with") means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a Person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise, and shall be construed as such term is used in the rules promulgated under the Securities Act; (b) the "Family" of an individual includes (i) the individual, (ii) the individual's spouse, (iii) any other natural person who is related to the individual or the individual's spouse within the second degree and (iv) any other natural person who resides with such individual; and (c) "Material Interest" means direct or indirect beneficial ownership (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act) of voting securities or other voting interests representing at least ten percent (10%) of the outstanding voting power of a Person or equity securities or other equity interests representing at least ten percent (10%) of the outstanding equity securities or equity interests in a Person. "Release"-- any release, spill, emission, leaking, pumping, pouring, dumping, emptying, injection, deposit, disposal, discharge, dispersal, leaching or migration on or into the Environment or into or out of any property. "Remedial Action"-- all actions, including any capital expenditures, required: (a) to clean up, remove, treat or in any other way address any Hazardous Material or other substance; (b) to prevent the Release or Threat of Release or to minimize the further Release of any Hazardous Material or other substance so it does not migrate or endanger or threaten to endanger public health or welfare or the Environment; (c) to perform pre-remedial studies and investigations or post-remedial monitoring and care; or (d) to bring all Facilities and the operations conducted thereon into compliance with Environmental Laws and environmental Governmental Authorizations. 11
"Remedial Capital Projects"-- capital projects needed to serve existing customers as of the date of Closing that are necessary (i) to repair or replace Facilities that are defective, inoperative, or failing, (ii) to improve or repair the Facilities to the extent that the Facilities are not performing their intended functions in a commercially reasonable and efficient manner, (iii) to replace or improve the Facilities in order to cure any violations of any Governmental Authorizations; and (iv) to perform extraordinary maintenance or deferred maintenance that is necessary to enable the Facilities to perform their intended functions. Remedial Capital Projects shall not include any expansion related capital improvements, normal maintenance, renewal and replacement items normally incurred in the Ordinary Course of Business, or any Beck Reserve project. Buyer shall have twelve (12) months from the date of Closing to investigate and determine the extent of Remedial Capital Projects existing as of the date of Closing, if any, which determination shall be consistent with prevailing utility industry maintenance practices. On or before the first anniversary of execution of this Agreement, Buyer shall notify Seller in writing of the specific projects and estimated cost for each Remedial Capital Project. Disputes, if any shall be resolved in accordance with Section 13.5. "Remedial Capital Projects Amount"-- an amount sufficient to enable the Buyer to fund all required Remedial Capital Projects for the System as it existed as of the date of the Closing, which amount shall be in excess of the aggregate amount of $29 Million funded for capital improvements as part of the Acquisition Bonds plus the Capital Improvement Plan Requirement for five years and the Renewal and Replacement Requirement for five years. "Renewal and Replacement Requirement" -- an annual amount equal to $5,000,000 to be used for the purpose of paying the cost of renewals, upgrades, enhancements, or the replacement of capital assets of the System and extraordinary and emergency repairs thereto. "Representative"-- with respect to a particular Person, any director, officer, manager, employee, agent, consultant, advisor, accountant, financial advisor, legal counsel or other representative of that Person. "Retained Liabilities"-- as defined in Section 2.4(b). "Seller"-- as defined in the first paragraph of this Agreement. "Seller Contract"-- any contract, promise, or undertaking: (a) under which Seller has or may acquire any rights or benefits; (b) under which Seller has or may become subject to any obligation or liability; or (c) by which Seller or any of the assets owned or used by Seller is or may become bound or are encumbered. "Small Systems" - is defined in the Beck Reserve definition above. 12
"Special Assessments" -- shall mean revenues derived by the Buyer from special assessments imposed upon benefited property in connection with post-Closing acquisition or construction of additions, extensions or improvements to the System. "Subsidiary"-- with respect to any Person (the "Owner"), any corporation or other Person of which securities or other interests having the power to elect a majority of that corporation's or other Person's board of directors or similar governing body, or otherwise having the power to direct the business and policies of that corporation or other Person (other than securities or other interests having such power only upon the happening of a contingency that has not occurred), are held by the Owner or one or more of its Subsidiaries. "System" -- shall mean the complete combined and consolidated water, sewer and reclaimed water utility systems of the Seller together with any and all assets, improvements, extensions and additions thereto hereafter constructed or acquired, but not including the Excluded Assets. "Tangible Personal Property"-- all machinery, equipment, tools, furniture, office equipment, computer hardware, supplies, materials, vehicles and other items of tangible personal property (other than Inventories) of every kind owned or leased by Seller (wherever located and whether or not carried on Seller's books), together with any express or implied warranty by the manufacturers or sellers or lessors of any item or component part thereof and all maintenance records and other documents relating thereto. "Tax" -- any income, gross receipts, license, payroll, employment, excise, severance, stamp, occupation, premium, property, environmental, windfall profit, customs, vehicle, airplane, boat, vessel or other title or registration, capital stock, franchise, employees' income withholding, foreign or domestic withholding, social security, unemployment, disability, real property, personal property, sales, use, transfer, value added, alternative, add-on minimum and other tax, fee, assessment, levy, tariff, charge or duty of any kind whatsoever and any interest, penalty, addition or additional amount thereon imposed, assessed or collected by or under the authority of any Governmental Body or payable under any tax-sharing agreement or any other contract. "Tax Return"-- any return (including any information return), report, statement, schedule, notice, form, declaration, claim for refund or other document or information filed with or submitted to, or required to be filed with or submitted to, any Governmental Body in connection with the determination, assessment, collection or payment of any Tax or in connection with the administration, implementation or enforcement of or compliance with any Legal Requirement relating to any Tax. "Ten Year Call Bonds" -- as defined in Section 2.3(E). "Third Party"-- a Person that is not a party to this Agreement. 13
"Third-Party Claim"-- any claim against any Indemnified Person by a Third Party, whether or not involving a Proceeding. "Threat of Release"-- a reasonable likelihood of a Release that may require action in order to prevent or mitigate damage to the Environment that may result from such Release. "Unbilled Customer Revenue" -- revenue for services provided to customers prior to the Effective Time that have not yet been billed as of the date of Closing, calculated on a basis consistent with Seller's current billing practices. 1.2 Usage (a) Interpretation. In this Agreement, unless a clear contrary intention appears: (i) the singular number includes the plural number and vice versa; (ii) reference to any Person includes such Person's successors and assigns but, if applicable, only if such successors and assigns are not prohibited by this Agreement, and reference to a Person in a particular capacity excludes such Person in any other capacity or individually; (iii) reference to any gender includes each other gender; (iv) reference to any agreement, document or instrument means such agreement, document or instrument as amended or modified and in effect from time to time in accordance with the terms thereof; (v) "hereunder," "hereof," "hereto," and words of similar import shall be deemed references to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular Article, Section or other provision hereof; (vi) "including" (and with correlative meaning "include") means including without limiting the generality of any description preceding such term; (vii) with respect to the determination of any period of time, "from" means "from and including" and "to" means "to but excluding"; and (viii) references to documents, instruments or agreements shall be deemed to refer as well to all addenda, exhibits, schedules or amendments thereto 14
(ix) the phrase "the date hereof", the "date of this Agreement" or similar phrases means December 21, 2002. (b) Accounting Terms and Determinations. Unless otherwise specified herein, all accounting terms used herein shall be interpreted and all accounting determinations hereunder shall be made in accordance with GAAP, as the same applies to the Seller, and in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles applicable to units of local government, as the same applies to the Buyer. (c) Legal Representation of the Parties. This Agreement was negotiated by the parties with the benefit of legal representation, and any rule of construction or interpretation otherwise requiring this Agreement to be construed or interpreted against any party shall not apply to any construction or interpretation hereof. 2. Sale and Transfer of Assets; Closing 2.1 Assets To Be Sold Upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement, at the Closing, but effective as of the Effective Time, Seller shall sell, convey, assign, transfer and deliver to Buyer, and Buyer shall purchase and acquire from Seller, free and clear of any Encumbrances (except as to Appurtenances to the extent provided for elsewhere herein) other than Permitted Encumbrances, all of Seller's right, title and interest in and to all of Seller's property and assets, real, personal or mixed, tangible and intangible, of every kind and description, wherever located, including the following (but excluding the Excluded Assets): (a) all Real Property and all Appurtenances; (b) all Tangible Personal Property; (c) all Inventories; (d) all Accounts Receivable and Unbilled Customer Revenue; (e) all Seller Contracts (other than those constituting Excluded Assets) and all outstanding offers or solicitations made by or to Seller to enter into any Seller Contract; (f) all Governmental Authorizations and all pending applications therefor or renewals thereof, in each case to the extent transferable to Buyer; (g) all data and Records related to the operations of Seller, including client and customer lists and Records, all personnel records (provided that Seller shall have reasonable access thereto) referral sources, research and development reports and 15
Records, production reports and Records, service and warranty Records, equipment logs, operating guides and manuals, financial and accounting Records, creative materials, advertising materials, promotional materials, studies, reports, correspondence and other similar documents and Records, subject to Legal Requirements; (h) all of the intangible rights and property of Seller, including Intellectual Property assets, the trade name, "Florida Water Services", going concern value, goodwill, telephone, telecopy and e-mail addresses and listings; (i) all claims of Seller against third parties relating to the Assets, whether choate or inchoate, known or unknown, contingent or non-contingent; and (j) all rights of Seller relating to deposits and prepaid expenses, claims for refunds and rights to offset in respect thereof and that are not excluded under Section 2.2, and not including Seller letters of credit for which the Seller is an applicant. All of the property and assets to be transferred to Buyer hereunder are herein referred to collectively as the "Assets" or "Assets to be Sold". 2.2 Excluded Assets Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in Section 2.1 or elsewhere in this Agreement, the following assets of Seller (collectively, the "Excluded Assets") are not part of the sale and purchase contemplated hereunder, are excluded from the Assets and shall remain the property of Seller after the Closing: (a) all cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments; all payments (other than Customer Deposits) received by Seller prior to Closing (other than as set forth in Section 2.1(k) above); (b) Capital Charges received after the Closing by Buyer which shall be remitted to Seller in each one-year period following the date of the Closing, provided that (i) the total amount of Capital Charges retained by and belonging to Seller for any one such year shall not exceed the Maximum Annual Retainage (and at such time as the total amount of Capital Charges remitted to Seller for any such one year period equals the Maximum Annual Retainage, all further Capital Charges received by the System in such year shall be retained by and belong to the Buyer), and (ii) the aggregate amount retained by the Seller as Excluded Assets pursuant to this subsection 2.2(b) shall be the Maximum Cumulative Retainage and at such time as the total cumulative amount of Capital Charges remitted to Seller under this Section 2.2(b) equals the Maximum Cumulative Retainage, no further Capital Charges shall be remitted to the Seller but all such Capital Charges received by the System thereafter be retained by and shall belong to the Buyer. The foregoing Capital Charges retained by Seller are to compensate Seller for the excess capacity existing in the System as of the Effective Date. The amount to be remitted to 16
Seller hereunder by Buyer shall be paid to Seller once a year, commencing 13 months after the Effective Date, for all amount collected during the 12 month period then ended. Seller authorizes Buyer to collect the Capital Charges on behalf of Seller. Seller agrees that as to all amounts which the Buyer is required to remit to the Seller under this Section 2.2(b), the Buyer may withhold therefrom such amount as the Buyer would have the right to setoff against indebtedness owed to Buyer by Seller, it being the intention that for the purposes solely of this sentence that the Capital Charges to be remitted to the Seller by Buyer under this Section 2.2(b) be treated as if it were indebtedness owing the Seller by the Buyer. Seller further agrees that Buyer may setoff against amounts which the Buyer is required to remit to the Seller under this section, such portions of the Beck Reserve that Buyer has expended or encumbered for identified projects prior to September 30, 2007. Buyer's set off right is subject to the provisions of Section 11.8. Buyer agrees that any of the Beck Reserve monies not expended or encumbered for identified projects prior to September 30, 2007, shall be applied by Buyer to pay any Capital Charges not yet received by Seller up to the Maximum Cumulative Retainage (notwithstanding the schedule of payments as set forth in the definition of Maximum Annual Retainage), and any outstanding balance due to Seller for Purchase Price Installment 2. The Capital Charges remitted to and retained by Seller shall include the portion thereof representing AFPI, to the extent of the following: PERIOD PERCENTAGE OF AFPI ------ ------------------ for Capital Charges received until 100% 9/30/03 for Capital Charges received until 80% 9/30/04 for Capital Charges received until 60% 9/30/05 for Capital Charges received until 40% 9/30/06 for Capital Charges received until 20% 9/30/07 and thereafter 0% (c) all minute books, stock Records and corporate seals; (d) any shares of capital stock of Seller held in treasury; (e) Seller's letters of credit outstanding at the date of Closing.; 17
(f) all insurance policies and rights thereunder (except to the extent specified in Section 2.1(i) and (j)); (g) all of the contracts listed in Exhibit 2.2; (h) Records that Seller is required by law to retain in its possession; (i) all claims for refund of Taxes and other governmental charges of whatever nature; (j) all rights in connection with and assets of any Employee Plans; and (k) all rights of Seller under this Agreement, the Bill of Sale, the Assignment and Assumption Agreement; and (l) the property and assets expressly designated in Exhibit 2.2. 2.3 Consideration (A) INSTALLMENT PAYMENTS. The consideration for the Assets will be four hundred fifty-six million five hundred thousand ($456,500,000 , as may be adjusted as provided below in subsection 2.3(B) (the "Purchase Price")"), and as further may be adjusted as provided in the definition of "Acquisition Bonds Net Proceeds". Subject to the provisions of subsection 2.3(E), subsection 2.3(F) and the definition of "Acquisition Bonds Net Proceeds, the Purchase Price will be payable in Installments delivered by wire transfer from Buyer to Seller as follows: DATE PAYABLE INSTALLMENT AMOUNT DUE At the Closing Installment 1 $420,000,000 On the third anniversary date of the closing Installment 2 $36,500,000 (B) PURCHASE PRICE ADJUSTMENTS. Installment 2 of the Purchase Price may be reduced under the following circumstances: (i) the amount necessary to fund any indemnity amounts owed by Seller under Article 11 hereunder, and (ii) for all Remedial Capital Projects Amounts. Seller has provided Buyer with its' current five year capital improvement program (the "Capital Improvement Plan") which totals $176,667,000 Buyer shall identify the projects and estimated costs that comprise the Remedial Capital Projects Amount which are not included on Seller's five year capital improvement program. If Seller does not 18
concur that a project is a Remedial Capital Project or part of the Capital Improvement Plan Requirement during the initial five year post Closing time period the matter shall be submitted to the dispute resolution process set forth in 13.5. (C) DISPUTE RESOLUTION. Prior to implementing any reduction or offset or withholding any moneys from the Capital Charges otherwise to be remitted to Seller hereunder, the Buyer shall provide written notice to Seller of any proposed reduction or offset. Seller shall have twenty (20) days to provide Buyer written notice of objection to any such reductions or offset (and if Seller fails to so object, it will be deemed to have agreed with such reduction or offset). Buyer and Seller shall have sixty (60) days following written notice of objection from Seller to amicably resolve Seller's objections. To the extent any objections cannot be reconciled, either party may submit such objection to the Dispute Resolution Process. Buyer may at any time deposit any reduction amount with an escrow agent pending a final resolution under the Dispute Resolution Process, pursuant to an escrow agreement reasonably satisfactory to the parties and to the extent Buyer has done so Buyer shall not be deemed in default hereunder. (D) GUARANTEE. Seller shall provide at the Closing a guarantee ("Guarantee") in a form reasonably acceptable to the Buyer and the Seller that will provide that Buyer will receive Gross Revenues constituting monthly water and sewer charges ("Monthly Fees") for the first twelve months after Closing of $95,318,000; for the second twelve months of $97,701,000; and for the third twelve months of $100,143,000. If the Buyer lowers any Monthly Fees during the forgoing time periods, the amount guaranteed will be reduced by the amount the Monthly Fees would have been if such reduction had not occurred. The Guarantee Monthly Fees shall be adjusted in accordance with the Future Transfer Adjustment Process. (E) BOND ISSUANCE. The Buyer agrees to use all reasonable commercial efforts to issue on or before the Closing, the maximum amount of Acquisition Bonds that can be issued at the Closing ("Closing Bonds") which have the following characteristics: (1) serial and term maturities between 2003 and 2032; (2) one year call on $75,000,000 of the issue ("One Year Call Bonds"); (3) ten year call on the balance of the issue ("Ten Year Call Bonds"); (4) investment grade, and (5) level debt service of $36,461,000 per year (the "Base Debt Service Amount") plus the Interest Rate Adjustment (the combined Base Debt Service and the Interest Rate Adjustment referred to as "Debt Service"). Seller shall assume responsibility for structuring the Acquisition Bonds to achieve the purpose of meeting the criteria in the sentence above. Seller shall pay to Buyer at Closing the sum that represents the first year difference in interest rate based upon the issuance of the One Year Call Bonds versus the issuance of the Ten Year Call Bonds (the "Interest Rate Adjustment"). In the event the Buyer, after consultation with the Buyer's financial advisor(s), underwriter(s), legal advisors, and with Seller, in good faith, determines that such Closing Bonds cannot be sold on a date that permits the Closing to occur on or prior to February 14, 2003, then the Buyer shall immediately notify Seller in writing of such 19
determination, with such notice setting forth in reasonable detail the bases upon which such determination was made, and the requirements, if reasonably ascertainable to Buyer, for ultimate issuance of the Closing Bonds. Upon receipt of such notice Seller shall have the option of (1) postponing the Closing until such time as Closing Bonds can reasonably be issued in accordance with this Agreement; or (2) canceling this Agreement, and, if cancelled, thereupon the Buyer and Seller shall have no liabilities and no further obligations to each other under this Agreement, except that Seller shall pay to Buyer the Due Diligence Expenses. (F) CONDITION PRECEDENT TO PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE INSTALLMENT 2. The following shall be a condition precedent to Buyer's obligation to pay Seller Purchase Price Installment 2: release of the Bond Debt Service Reserve (with any partial releases of the Bond Debt Service Reserve to be applied to payment of Purchase Price Installment 2) or substitution of the Bond Debt Service Reserve with a bond insurance product, including, but not limited to, letters of credit, bank guarantees, and surety policies, that will allow the release of the Bond Debt Service Reserve, provided that such product substitution does not result in a reduction to the ratings of the Closing Bonds below the ratings level at Closing (the "Insurance Policy"). Seller has the option, without expiration, to (1) provide the Insurance Policy to the Buyer and/or (2) require the Buyer to issue refunding bonds, provided the combined debt service on the Refunding Bonds and any un-refunded portion of the Acquisition Bonds remains at or below the level of the Debt Service for each subsequent year. Seller retains the right and responsibility of structuring the refunding transaction. Buyer will cooperate with Seller in exercising and implementing its option as set forth above. 2.4 Liabilities (a) Assumed Liabilities. On the Closing Date, but effective as of the Effective Time, the Buyer shall assume and agree to discharge only the following Liabilities of Seller (the "Assumed Liabilities"): (i) any account payable (other than an account payable to any Related Person of Seller) arising with respect to the System, that remains unpaid at and is not delinquent as of the Effective Time but only to extent it is included to determine the Final True Up as set forth in Section 2.7(c); (ii) any account payable arising with respect to the System, (other than a account payable to any Related Person of Seller ) incurred by Seller in the Ordinary Course of Business between September 19, 2002 and the Effective Time that remains unpaid at and is not delinquent as of the Effective Time but only to extent it is included to determine the Final True Up as set forth in Section 2.7(c); (iii) any Liability to Seller's customers (other than an account payable) incurred by Seller in the Ordinary Course of Business outstanding as of the 20
Effective Time, including, but not limited to Customer Deposits (but only to the extent that an amount of cash equal thereto is sold to Buyer hereunder and transferred (whether by transference in cash or by credit against the Purchase Price) to the Buyer at the Closing) (other than any Liability arising out of or relating to a breach that occurred prior to the Effective Time); (iv) any Liability arising after the Effective Time under the Seller Contracts (other than any Liability arising under the contracts described on Exhibit 2.2 or arising out of or relating to a breach that occurred prior to the Effective Time); any Liability of Seller arising after the Effective Time under any Seller Contract included in the Assets that is entered into by Seller after the date hereof in the Ordinary Course of Business or in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement (other than any Liability arising out of or relating to a breach that occurred prior to the Effective Time), and (v) any Liability of Buyer under this Agreement or any other document executed in connection with the Contemplated Transactions, (vi) any Liability of Buyer based upon Buyer's acts or omissions occurring after the Effective Time provided, however, that such Liability does not arise as a result of Seller's Breach hereunder or is a Liability for which the Seller has an obligation to indemnify the Buyer in accordance herewith, (vii) any Liability arising after Closing from operation of the System after the Closing, provided, however, that such Liability does not result as a result of Seller's Breach hereunder or is a Liability for which the Seller has an obligation to indemnify the Buyer in accordance herewith. Notwithstanding the foregoing, even if included in the foregoing, the following shall not constitute Liabilities assumed by the Buyer and, therefor, not be included in the term "Assumed Liabilities": (i) a Liability set forth on Exhibit .2.2 hereof, (ii) any Liability arising out of or relating to any employee grievance whether or not the affected employees are hired by Buyer based on actual or alleged acts or omissions of the Seller prior to the Effective Time, (iii) any Liability of Seller arising out of or resulting from any Proceeding pending as of the Effective Time, (iv) any Liability of Seller arising out of any Proceeding commenced after the Effective Time and arising our of or relating to any occurrence or event happening prior to the Effective Time to the extent that the such Proceeding relates to Seller's actions or inactions prior thereto, (v) any Liability for Seller's performance of its obligations hereunder, and (vi) any Liability of Seller based upon Seller's acts or omissions occurring after the Effective Time) (b) Retained Liabilities. The Retained Liabilities shall remain the sole responsibility of and shall be retained, paid, performed and discharged solely by Seller. "Retained Liabilities" shall mean all Liabilities other than Assumed Liabilities. 21
2.5 Allocation Seller shall prepare and deliver IRS Form 8594 to Buyer within forty- five (45) days after the Closing Date to be filed with the IRS. In any Proceeding related to the determination of any Tax, neither Buyer nor Seller shall contend or represent that such allocation is not a correct allocation. 2.6 Closing The purchase and sale provided for in this Agreement (the "Closing") will take place at the offices of Buyer's counsel commencing at 10:00 a.m. (local time) on or before February 14, 2003, unless Buyer and Seller otherwise agree. Subject to the provisions of Section 9, failure to consummate the purchase and sale provided for in this Agreement on the date and time and at the place determined pursuant to this Section 2.6 will not result in the termination of this Agreement and will not relieve any party of any obligation under this Agreement. In such a situation, the Closing will occur as soon as practicable, subject to Section 9. 2.7 Closing Obligations In addition to any other documents to be delivered under other provisions of this Agreement, at the Closing: (a) Seller shall deliver to Buyer, together with funds sufficient to pay all Taxes necessary for the transfer, filing or recording thereof: (i) a bill of sale for all of the Assets that are Tangible Personal Property in the form to be agreed upon by the parties prior to Closing (the "Bill of Sale") executed by Seller and the guaranty; (ii) an assignment of all of the Assets that are intangible personal property in the form to be agreed upon by the parties prior to Closing , which assignment shall also contain Buyer's undertaking and assumption of the Assumed Liabilities (the "Assignment and Assumption Agreement") executed by Seller; (iii) for each interest in Real Property identified on Exhibit 3.7(a) and (b), a recordable special warranty deed; for all easement interests, an assignment of easements without warranty; for each leasehold interest, an assignment of lease, or such other appropriate document or instrument of transfer, as the case may require, together with a general assignment by the Seller of any and all rights or interests Seller may otherwise have or hold (whether by license, permit, prescriptive right, or otherwise) in respect of its operation of the System, to occupy, use, traverse, spray, percolate through, burrow under, each in form and substance satisfactory to Buyer and its counsel and executed by Seller; 22
(iv) assignments of all Intellectual Property Assets executed by Seller in form reasonably satisfactory to Buyer; (v) such other deeds, bills of sale, assignments, certificates of title, documents and other instruments of transfer and conveyance as may reasonably be requested by Buyer, each in form and substance agreed upon by the parties prior to Closing, executed by Seller; (vi) employment agreements in the form to be prepared by Buyer in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, executed by such members of Seller's senior management team as identified by Buyer in writing within ten business days after execution of this Agreement (the "Employment Agreements"); (vii) assignments of all construction work in progress in form reasonably acceptable to Buyer which have not yet been placed in service as of the date of the Closing (such capital improvements which have been placed in service being part of the Facilities which are otherwise conveyed by Seller hereunder); (viii) a certificate executed by Seller as to the accuracy of its representations and warranties as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing in accordance with Section 7.1 and as to its compliance with and performance of their covenants and obligations to be performed or complied with at or before the Closing in accordance with Section 7.2; (ix) a certificate of the Secretary of Seller certifying, as complete and accurate as of the Closing, attached copies of the Governing Documents of Seller, certifying and attaching all requisite resolutions or actions of Seller's board of directors and shareholders approving the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions and certifying to the incumbency and signatures of the officers of Seller executing this Agreement and any other document relating to the Contemplated Transactions; and (x) the sum of $200,000.00 which will be delivered to Buyer in accordance with Buyer's wire transfer instructions. Buyer agrees to hold this sum in trust for the sole purpose of using such amount only to satisfy the obligations that the Seller owes to the Buyer to pay for the items set forth in Section 10.9 hereof. Buyer may remove portions of such amount from the foregoing trust at such time as Buyer incurs expenses under said section for which the Seller is liable. In the event that said amount is not utilized as set forth above within the time frames set forth within such section, then the Buyer shall return to Seller the amount thereof as is not so used. (b) Buyer shall deliver to Seller: 23
(i) Installment 1 of the Purchase Price plus or minus such other funds as set forth on a closing statement to be agreed upon between Buyer and Seller pursuant to the terms of this Agreement by wire transfer to a domestic account of a United States bank specified by the Seller in a writing delivered to Buyer on or before the Closing Date; (ii) the Assignment and Assumption Agreement executed by Buyer; (iii) the executed Employment Agreements ; (iv) a certificate executed by Buyer as to the accuracy of its representations and warranties as of the date of this Agreement and as of the Closing in accordance with Section 8.1 and as to its compliance with and performance of its covenants and obligations to be performed or complied with at or before the Closing in accordance with Section 8.2; and (v) a certificate of the Secretary of Buyer certifying, as complete and accurate as of the Closing, attached copies of the Governing Documents of Buyer and certifying and attaching all requisite resolutions or actions of Buyer's governing board approving the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions and certifying to the incumbency and signatures of the officers of Buyer executing this Agreement and any other document relating to the Contemplated Transactions. (c) As additional consideration for the transaction the determination of the following (the "Final True Up") will take place between 120 and 140 days after the Closing and, in the event that the parties cannot agree on the foregoing, then either party may submit such dispute to the Dispute Resolution Process. To the extent that Eligible Accounts (as hereinafter defined) and Eligible Unbilled Revenues (as hereinafter defined) sold to the Buyer hereunder as of the Effective Time minus accounts payable assumed by the Buyer hereunder as of the Effective Time ("Final Computed Amount") is in an amount greater than zero ($0) Dollars, then the Buyer shall immediately pay to the Seller the difference and to the extent that the Final Computed Amount is less than zero ($0) Dollars, then the Seller shall immediately pay to the Buyer the difference. "Eligible Accounts" means Accounts Receivable outstanding as of the Effective Time that are actually collected by the Buyer within 90 days after the Effective Time and "Eligible Unbilled Revenues" means Unbilled Customer Revenue outstanding as of the Effective Time that are actually collected by the Buyer within 120 days after the Effective Time. (d) At the Closing, the Buyer shall have received (i) an opinion of counsel acceptable to the Buyer stating that neither the City of Gulf Breeze nor the City of Milton will be held liable, as a matter of law, for the liabilities of the Buyer and (ii) an opinion of counsel acceptable to the Buyer stating that upon the acquisition of the System by the Buyer, the rates, fees and charges for the services and facilities of the System are not 24
subject to regulation by the Florida Public Service Commission or any local regulatory authority. 2.8 Consents (a) If there are any Material Consents that have not yet been obtained (or otherwise are not in full force and effect) as of the Closing, in the case of each Seller Contract as to which such Material Consents were not obtained (or otherwise are not in full force and effect) (the "Restricted Material Contracts"), Buyer may waive the closing conditions as to any such Material Consent and either: (i) elect to have Seller continue its efforts to obtain the Material Consents; or (ii) elect to have Seller retain that Restricted Material Contract and all Liabilities arising therefrom or relating thereto; or (iii) elect to have Seller require any other obligations under such contract to perform their obligations under such contract and remit to Seller the amounts due to such obligations, for payment by the Seller to such obligations. If Buyer elects to have Seller continue its efforts to obtain any Material Consents and the Closing occurs, notwithstanding Sections 2.1 and 2.4, neither this Agreement nor the Assignment and Assumption Agreement nor any other document related to the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions shall constitute a sale, assignment, assumption, transfer, conveyance or delivery or an attempted sale, assignment, assumption, transfer, conveyance or delivery of the Restricted Material Contracts, and following the Closing, the parties shall use Best Efforts, and cooperate with each other, to obtain the Material Consent relating to each Restricted Material Contract as quickly as practicable. Pending the obtaining of such Material Consents relating to any Restricted Material Contract, the parties shall cooperate with each other in any reasonable and lawful arrangements designed to provide to Buyer the benefits of use of the Restricted Material Contract for its term (or any right or benefit arising thereunder, including the enforcement for the benefit of Buyer of any and all rights of Seller against a third party thereunder). Once a Material Consent for the sale, assignment, assumption, transfer, conveyance and delivery of a Restricted Material Contract is obtained, Seller shall promptly assign, transfer, convey and deliver such Restricted Material Contract to Buyer, and Buyer shall assume the obligations under such Restricted Material Contract assigned to Buyer from and after the date of assignment to Buyer pursuant to a special-purpose assignment and assumption agreement substantially similar in terms to those of the Assignment and Assumption Agreement (which special-purpose agreement the parties shall prepare, execute and deliver in good faith at the time of such transfer, all at no additional cost to Buyer). 25
(b) If there are any Consents not listed on Exhibit 7.3 necessary for the assignment and transfer of any Seller Contracts to Buyer (the "Nonmaterial Consents") which have not yet been obtained (or otherwise are not in full force and effect) as of the Closing, Buyer shall elect at the Closing, in the case of each of the Seller Contracts as to which such Nonmaterial Consents were not obtained (or otherwise are not in full force and effect) (the "Restricted Nonmaterial Contracts"), whether to: (i) accept the assignment of such Restricted Nonmaterial Contract, in which case, as between Buyer and Seller, such Restricted Nonmaterial Contract shall, to the maximum extent practicable and notwithstanding the failure to obtain the applicable Nonmaterial Consent, be transferred at the Closing pursuant to the Assignment and Assumption Agreement as elsewhere provided under this Agreement; or (ii) reject the assignment of such Restricted Nonmaterial Contract, in which case, notwithstanding Sections 2.1 and 2.4, (A) neither this Agreement nor the Assignment and Assumption Agreement nor any other document related to the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions shall constitute a sale, assignment, assumption, conveyance or delivery or an attempted sale, assignment, assumption, transfer, conveyance or delivery of such Restricted Nonmaterial Contract, and (B) Seller shall retain such Restricted Nonmaterial Contract and all Liabilities arising therefrom or relating thereto. 3. Representations and Warranties of Seller Seller represents and warrants to Buyer as of date of this Agreement as follows: 3.1 Organization And Good Standing (a) Seller is qualified to do business in the State of Florida. Seller is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Florida, with full corporate power and authority to conduct its business as it is now being conducted, to own or use the properties and assets that it purports to own or use, and to perform all its obligations under the Agreement. Complete and accurate copies of the Governing Documents of Seller, as currently in effect, will be provided to Buyer prior to Closing. . (b) Seller has no Subsidiary and, except as disclosed to Buyer in writing prior to Closing, does not own any shares of capital stock or other securities of any other Person. 3.2 Enforceability; Authority; No Conflict (a) This Agreement constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of Seller, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms and each of Seller's Closing 26
Documents will constitute the legal, valid, and binding obligation of Seller, enforceable against Sellers. Seller has the absolute and unrestricted right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and, except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.2(c), to perform its obligations under this Agreement, and such action has been duly authorized by all necessary action by Seller's shareholders and board of directors. (b) Neither the execution and delivery of this Agreement nor the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions will, directly or indirectly (with or without notice or lapse of time): (i) Breach (A) any provision of any of the Governing Documents of Seller or (B) any resolution adopted by the board of directors or the shareholders of Seller; (ii) except as disclosed in Exhibit 7.3, breach any provision of, or give any Person the right to declare a default or exercise any remedy under, or to accelerate the maturity or performance of, or payment under, or to cancel, terminate or modify, any Seller Contract; or (iii) except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.2(c), result in the imposition or creation of any Encumbrance upon or with respect to any of the Assets. (c) Except as provided under Section 367.071, Florida Statutes, and applicable equivalent county regulatory provisions, Seller is not required to give any notice to or obtain any material consent from any Person in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions, except as set forth in Exhibit 3.2(c), and all of obligations, representations and warranties of the parties hereto under this Agreement are qualified and limited by such requirements as may be imposed pursuant to said Section 367.071, Florida Statutes, and equivalent county regulatory provisions, if applicable. 3.3 Financial Statements Seller has delivered or made available to Buyer: (a) an audited balance sheet of Seller as at December 31, 2001, 2000 and 1999 (including the notes thereto, the "Balance Sheet"), and the related audited statements of income, changes in shareholders' equity and cash flows for the fiscal year then ended, including in each case the notes thereto, together with the report thereon of Price Waterhouse Coopers, independent certified public accountants; and (b) an unaudited balance sheet of Seller as at July 31, 2002 (the "Interim Balance Sheet") and the related unaudited statement of income. Such financial statements fairly present the financial condition and the results of operations, changes in shareholders' equity and cash flows of Seller as of the respective dates of and for the periods referred to in such financial statements, all in accordance with GAAP. 27
3.4 Sufficiency of Assets The Assets (a) constitute all of the assets, tangible and intangible, of any nature whatsoever, necessary to operate Seller's business in the manner operated by the Seller as of September 19, 2002 and as presently operated by Seller and (b) include all of the operating assets of Seller and the Real Property, all Appurtenances, all real estate privileges, rights, easements, hereditaments, and other appurtenances being transferred to the Buyer at the Closing constitute all or the foregoing. 3.5 Description of Land Exhibit 3.5 contains a description of the Land. 3.6 Description of Leased Real Property Exhibit 3.6 contains a description of the Leased Real Property. 3.7 Title to Assets; Encumbrances (a) Seller owns good and marketable title to its respective estates in the Land, free and clear of any Encumbrances, other than: (i) liens for Taxes for the current tax year which are not yet due and payable; and (ii) those described in that certain Title Commitment delivered to Buyer ("Real Estate Encumbrances"). To the extent in Seller's possession, true and complete copies of (A) all deeds, existing title insurance policies and surveys of or pertaining to the Real Property and (B) all instruments, agreements and other documents evidencing, creating or constituting any Real Estate Encumbrances have been made available to Buyer. Seller warrants to Buyer that, at the time of Closing, the Land shall be free and clear of all Real Estate Encumbrances identified on Schedule B-2 to the Title Commitment. (Real Estate Encumbrances other than those identified on Exhibit 3.7(A), the "Permitted Real Estate Encumbrances") Seller owns good and transferable title to all of the other Assets free and clear of any Encumbrances other than those described in Exhibit 3.7(B) ("Non-Real Estate Encumbrances"). Seller warrants to Buyer that, at the time of Closing, all Assets other than the Real Property shall be free and clear of Non-Real Estate Encumbrances other than those marked on Exhibit 3.7 with three asterisks to the left of such item (those so marked, the "Permitted Non-Real Estate Encumbrances" and, together with the Permitted Real Estate Encumbrances "Permitted Encumbrances"). Seller makes no representations in this Section 3.7 regarding title to or the sufficiency of Appurtenances to the Real Property. 28
3.8 Taxes (a) Tax Returns Filed and Taxes Paid. Seller has filed or caused to be filed on a timely basis all Tax Returns and all reports with respect to Taxes that are or were required to be filed pursuant to applicable Legal Requirements. All Tax Returns and reports filed by Seller are true, correct and complete. Seller has paid, or made provision for the payment of all Taxes that have or may have become due for all periods covered by the Tax Returns or otherwise, or pursuant to any assessment received by Seller, except such Taxes, if any, as are listed in Part 3.14(a) and are being contested in good faith. No claim has been made or is expected to be made by any Governmental Body in a jurisdiction where Seller does not file Tax Returns that it is or may be subject to taxation by that jurisdiction. There are no Encumbrances on any of the Assets that arose in connection with any failure (or alleged failure) to pay any Tax, and Seller has no knowledge of any basis for assertion of any claims attributable to Taxes which, if adversely determined, would result in any such Encumbrance. (b) Buyer agrees to comply with the requirements of Section 196.295, Florida Statutes, Ad Valorem and Personal Property Taxes. (c) Specific Potential Tax Liabilities and Tax Situations. (i) Withholding. All Taxes that Seller is or was required by Legal Requirements to withhold, deduct or collect have been or will be duly withheld, deducted and collected and, to the extent required, have been paid to the proper Governmental Body or other Person. 3.9 Compliance With Legal Requirements; Governmental Authorizations (a) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.11, without representation that items on Exhibit 3.11 are material: (i) To Seller's knowledge, Seller is in compliance with each Legal Requirement that is applicable to it or to the conduct or operation of its business or the ownership or use of any of its assets; (ii) No event has occurred or circumstance exists that (A) may constitute or result in a violation by Seller of, or a failure on the part of Seller to comply with, any Legal Requirement or (B) may give rise to any obligation on the part of Seller to undertake, or to bear all or any portion of the cost of, any remedial action of any nature; and (iii) Seller has not received any notice or other communication (whether oral or written) from any Governmental Body or any other Person regarding (A) any actual, alleged, possible or potential violation of, or failure to comply with, any Legal Requirement or (B) any actual, alleged, possible or potential obligation 29
on the part of Seller to undertake, or to bear all or any portion of the cost of, any remedial action of any nature. (b) Exhibit 3.11(b) contains a complete and accurate list of each Governmental Authorizations that are held by Seller or that otherwise relates to Seller's business or the Assets. To Seller's knowledge, the Governmental Authorizations listed are valid and in full force and effect. Except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.11(b): (i) Seller is in material compliance with all of the material terms and requirements of the Governmental Authorizations; (ii) No event has occurred or circumstance exists that may (A) constitute or result directly or indirectly in a material violation of or a material failure to comply with any material term or requirement of any Governmental Authorization or (B) result directly or indirectly in the revocation, withdrawal, suspension, cancellation or termination of, or any modification to, any material Governmental Authorization; (iii) Seller has not received any notice or other communication (whether oral or written) from any Governmental Body or any other Person regarding (A) any actual, alleged, possible or potential violation of or failure to comply with any term or requirement of any Governmental Authorization or (B) any actual, proposed, possible or potential revocation, withdrawal, suspension, cancellation, termination of or modification to any Governmental Authorization, other than such violations, failures, revocations, withdrawals, suspensions, cancellations, terminations or modifications as have either been resolved with such Governmental Body or Person, or are not material to the successful operation of the System or to the results of such operations; and (iv) To the best of Seller's knowledge, all applications required to have been filed for the renewal of the material Governmental Authorizations have been duly filed on a timely basis with the appropriate Governmental Bodies, and all other material filings required to have been made with respect to such Governmental Authorizations have been duly made on a timely basis with the appropriate Governmental Bodies. The Governmental Authorizations collectively constitute the Governmental Authorizations necessary to permit Seller to lawfully conduct and operate its business in the manner in which it currently conducts and operates such business and to permit Seller to own and use its assets in the manner in which it currently owns and uses such assets. 3.10 Legal Proceedings; Orders 30
(a) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.12, there is no pending or, to Seller's knowledge, threatened Proceeding: (i) by or against Seller or that otherwise relates to or may affect the business of, or any of the assets owned or used by, Seller; or (ii) that challenges, or that may have the effect of preventing, delaying, making illegal or otherwise interfering with, any of the Contemplated Transactions. To the knowledge of Seller, no event has occurred or circumstance exists that is reasonably likely to give rise to or serve as a basis for the commencement of any such Proceeding. Seller will promptly deliver or provided access to Buyer copies of all pleadings, correspondence and other documents relating to each Proceeding listed in Exhibit 3.12. There are no Proceedings listed or required to be listed in Exhibit 3.12 that could have a material adverse effect on the business, operations, assets, condition or prospects of Seller or upon the Assets. (b) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.12; to the knowledge of Seller, no officer, director, agent or employee of Seller is subject to any Order that prohibits such officer, director, agent or employee from engaging in or continuing any conduct, activity or practice relating to the business of Seller. (c) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.12: (i) To Seller's knowledge, Seller is in material compliance with all of the terms and requirements of each Order to which it or any of the Assets is or has been subject; (ii) To Seller's knowledge, no event has occurred or circumstance exists that is reasonably likely to constitute or result in a violation of or failure to comply with any term or requirement of any Order to which Seller or any of the Assets is subject material to the operation of the System or a portion thereof; and (iii) Seller has not received any notice or other communication (whether oral or written) from any Governmental Body or any other Person regarding any actual, alleged, possible or potential violation of, or failure to comply with, any term or requirement of any Order to which Seller or any of the Assets is or has been subject, that has not already been resolved. 3.10(A) Absence of Certain Changes and Events. (a) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.10(A), since July 1, 2002, Seller has conducted its business only in the Ordinary Course of Business, there has not been any 31
material adverse change in its business and in the operation of the System, and there has not been: (i) Any damage to or destruction or loss of any Asset, whether or not covered by insurance that has not been replaced or which will not be replaced prior to the Effective Time; or (ii) (to the extent the same might be material to the results of operations of the System or a portion thereof) a sale (other than sales of Inventories in the Ordinary Course of Business), lease or other disposition of any Asset or property of Seller (including the Intellectual Property Assets); 3.11 Contracts; No Defaults (a) To the best of Seller's knowledge, Seller has delivered or made available to Buyer accurate and complete copies, of: (i) each Seller Contract that involves performance of services or delivery of goods or materials by Seller of an amount or value in excess of $10,000; (ii) each Seller Contract that involves performance of services or delivery of goods or materials to Seller of an amount or value in excess of $10,000; (iii) each Seller Contract that was not entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business and that involves expenditures or receipts of Seller in excess of $10,000; (iv) each Seller Contract affecting the ownership of, leasing of, title to, use of or any leasehold or other interest in any real or personal property (except personal property leases and installment and conditional sales agreements having a value per item or aggregate payments of less than $10,000 and with a term of less than one year); (v) each Seller Contract with any labor union or other employee representative of a group of employees relating to wages, hours and other conditions of employment; each Seller Contract entered into other than in the Ordinary Course of Business that contains or provides for an express undertaking by Seller to be responsible for consequential damages; (vi) each Seller Contract for capital expenditures in excess of $10,000; (vii) each Seller Contract not denominated in U.S. dollars; 32
(viii) each Seller Contract containing covenants that in any way purport to restrict Seller's business activity or limit the freedom of Seller to engage in any line of business or to compete with any Person; (ix) each power of attorney of Seller that is currently effective and outstanding; (x) each written warranty, guaranty, and/or similar undertaking with respect to contractual performance extended by Seller other than in the Ordinary Course of Business; and (xi) each amendment, supplement and modification (whether oral or written) in respect of any of the foregoing. (b) Except as set forth in Exhibit 7.3: (i) each Contract which is to be assigned to or assumed by Buyer under this Agreement is in full force and effect and is valid and enforceable in accordance with its terms; (ii) each Contract which is being assigned to or assumed by Buyer is assignable by Seller to Buyer without the consent of any other Person; (c) Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.13 or 3.12: (i) Seller is in compliance with all applicable terms and requirements of each Seller Contract which is being assumed by Buyer; (ii) To Seller's knowledge, no event has occurred or circumstance exists that (with or without notice or lapse of time) may contravene, conflict with or result in a Breach of, or give Seller or other Person the right to declare a default or exercise any remedy under, or to accelerate the maturity or performance of, or payment under, or to cancel, terminate or modify, any Seller Contract that is being assigned to or assumed by Buyer; (iii) To Seller's knowledge, no event has occurred or circumstance exists under or by virtue of any Contract that (with or without notice or lapse of time) would cause the creation of any Encumbrance affecting any of the Assets; and (iv) Seller has not given to or received from any other Person any notice or other communication (whether oral or written) regarding any actual, alleged, possible or potential violation or Breach of, or default under, any Contract which is being assigned to or assumed by Buyer. 33
(d) There are no renegotiations of, attempts to renegotiate or outstanding rights to renegotiate any material amounts paid or payable to Seller under current or completed Contracts with any Person having the contractual or statutory right to demand or require such renegotiation and no such Person has made written demand for such renegotiation. 3.12 Environmental Matters (a) Except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.13(a), Seller is in material compliance with and is not in material violation of or liable under, any Environmental Law. Seller has no basis to expect any actual or threatened order, notice or other communication from (i) any Governmental Body or private citizen acting in the public interest or (ii) the current or prior owner or operator of any Facilities, of any actual or potential violation or failure to materially comply with any Environmental Law, or of any actual or threatened obligation to undertake or bear the cost of any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities with respect to any Facility or other property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller has or had an interest, or with respect to any property or Facility at or to which Hazardous Materials were generated, manufactured, refined, transferred, imported, used or processed by Seller. (b) Except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.13(b), there are no pending or, to the knowledge of Seller, threatened claims, Encumbrances, or other restrictions of any material nature resulting from any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities or arising under or pursuant to any Environmental Law with respect to or affecting any Facility or any other property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller has or had an interest. (c) Except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.13(c), Seller has no knowledge of or any basis to expect nor has received, any citation, directive, inquiry, notice, Order, summons, warning or other communication that relates to Hazardous Activity, Hazardous Materials, or any alleged, actual, or potential violation or failure to materially comply with any Environmental Law, or of any alleged, actual, or potential obligation to undertake or bear the cost of any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities with respect to any Facility or property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller has or had an interest, or with respect to any property or facility to which Hazardous Materials generated, manufactured, refined, transferred, imported, used or processed by Seller have been transported, treated, stored, handled, transferred, disposed, recycled or received. (d) Except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.13(d), Seller has no material Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities with respect to any Facility or, to the knowledge of Seller, with respect to any other property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller (or any predecessor) has or had an interest or at any property geologically or hydrologically adjoining any Facility or any such other property or asset. 34
(e) Except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.13(e), there are no Hazardous Materials present on or in the Environment at any Facility or at any geologically or hydrologically adjoining property, that are not in material compliance with Environmental Laws, including any Hazardous Materials contained in barrels, aboveground or underground storage tanks, landfills, land deposits, dumps, equipment (whether movable or fixed) or other containers, either temporary or permanent, and deposited or located in land, water, sumps, or any other part of the Facility or such adjoining property, or incorporated into any structure therein or thereon. Seller has not permitted or conducted, or is aware of, any Hazardous Activity conducted with respect to any Facility or any other property or assets (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller has or had an interest except in full compliance with all applicable Environmental Laws. (f) Except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.13(f), there has been no Release or, to the knowledge of Seller, Threat of Release, of any Hazardous Materials at or from any Facility or at any other location where any Hazardous Materials were generated, manufactured, refined, transferred, produced, imported, used, or processed from or by any Facility, or from any other property or asset (whether real, personal or mixed) in which Seller has or had an interest, or to the knowledge of Seller any geologically or hydrologically adjoining property violation of any Environmental Law. (g) Except as disclosed in Exhibit 3.13(g), Seller has delivered or made available to Buyer true and complete copies and results of any reports, studies, analyses, tests, or monitoring possessed or initiated by Seller pertaining to Hazardous Materials or Hazardous Activities in, on, or under the Facilities, or concerning compliance, by Seller with Environmental Laws including, but not limited to the environmental assessments listed in Exhibit 3.13 (h) Notwithstanding any provision contained herein to the contrary: (i) Seller shall not be responsible for any costs associated with contamination which has come to be located on or below the Real Property solely as the result of subsurface migration from a contaminated aquifer from a source or sources outside the Real Property, provided that (a) the Seller did not cause, contribute to, or exacerbate the Release or threat of Release of the contaminants through an act or omission; (b) the person that caused the Release is not an agent or employee of the Seller, and was not in a direct or indirect contractual relationship with the Seller; and (c) there is no alternative basis for the Seller's liability for the contaminated aquifer, such as liability as a generator or transporter of hazardous substances under Section 107(a) (3) and (4) of the Federal Comprehensive Environmental Response Compensation and Liability Act (CERCLA) or liability as an owner by reason of the existence of a source of contamination on the Seller's property other than the contamination that migrated in an aquifer from a source outside the Real Property. 35
(ii) Seller shall not be required to pay for the costs of rehabilitation of environmental contamination resulting from a discharge of petroleum products that is eligible for restoration funding from the Inland Protection Trust Fund pursuant to Chapter 376, Florida Statutes, in advance of commitment of restoration funding in accordance with the sites priority ranking pursuant to Section 376.3071(5)(a), Florida Statutes. In the event that Buyer determines that rehabilitation of petroleum contamination must occur earlier than the priority ranking established by the Florida Department of Environmental Protection, Buyer may request an assignment by Seller of all rights to reimbursement from the Inland Protection Trust Fund for such site and proceed with rehabilitation. Seller shall provide an assignment of all rights to reimbursement within ten (10) days of receipt of a request from a Buyer. 3.13 Employee Benefits (a) Exhibit 3.131(a) contains and lists the following in connection with the current employees of the System: (i) any collective bargaining agreement not otherwise referenced in this Agreement or any employment agreement not terminable on thirty (30) days notice, (ii) each defined benefit plan and defined contribution plan, stock option or ownership plan, executive compensation, bonus, incentive compensation or deferred compensation plan, (iii) vacation pay, medical, dental, disability or death benefit plan, and (iv) any other employee benefit plan, program, arrangement, agreement or policy, including without limitation each "employee benefit plan" within the meaning of Section 3(3) of ERISA, in each case which is maintained or contributed to or by Seller, (collectively the "Employee Plans"). Seller will promptly deliver to Buyer true, accurate and complete copies of the documents comprising each Employee plan or, with respect to any Employee Plan which is unwritten, a detailed written description of eligibility, participation, benefits, funding arrangements, assets and any other matters which relate to the obligations of Seller. (b) Except as shown on Exhibit 3.131(b), to the best of the Seller's knowledge and belief, neither Seller nor any fiduciary of an Employee Plan has engaged in a transaction with respect to any Employee Plan that, assuming the taxable period of such transaction expired as of the date hereof, could subject Seller or Buyer to a Tax or penalty imposed by either Section 4975 of the Code or Section 502(1) of ERISA or a violation of Section 406 of ERISA. (c) Except as shown on Exhibit 3.131(c), the Seller has not incurred nor will incur with respect to any "employee benefit plan" as defined in Section 3(3) of ERISA any actual or contingent material liability, including, but not limited to, liability under Sections 601 through 608 of ERISA and Section 4980B of the Code, any withdrawal liability from any multiemployer pension plan, any termination or withdrawal liability under Section 4062, 4063 or 4064 of ERISA, any "accumulated funding deficiency" as such term is defined in Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code (whether or not waived), any requirement to make any contributions to any multiemployer plan, 36
solely as a result of Seller being a member of a "controlled group" of corporations, or treated as a single employer with any other corporation, trade or business (whether or not incorporated) within the meaning of Section 414(b), 414(c) or 414(m) of the Code arising from or incurred with respect to any period prior to the Closing date. (d) Except as shown on Exhibit 3.131(d), Seller has, at all times, complied, and currently complies, in all material respects with the applicable continuation requirements for its welfare plans, including (i) Section 4980B of the Code (as well as its predecessor provision, Section 162(k) of the Code) and Section 601 through 608, inclusive, of ERISA (collectively "COBRA") and (ii) any applicable state statutes mandating health insurance continuation coverage for employees. (e) Except for the continuation coverage requirements of COBRA, and except as shown on Exhibit 3.131(e), Seller has no obligations or potential liability for benefits to employees, former employees or their respective dependents following termination of employment or retirement under any of the Employee Plans that are welfare benefit plans as defined in Section 3(1) of ERISA. (f) Seller's 401(k) plan, entitled Florida Water Services Corporation Contributory Profit Sharing Plan ("Seller's 401(k) Plan") is intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code and the trust maintained pursuant thereto is intended to be exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(a) of the Code and Seller is not aware of any Seller's 401(k) Plan provision or operation that would result in the disqualification of Seller's 401(k) Plan. 3.14 Intellectual Property Assets (a) The term "Intellectual Property Assets" means all intellectual property owned or licensed (as licensor or licensee) by Seller in which Seller has a proprietary interest, including: (iii) Seller's name, all assumed fictional business names, trade names, registered and unregistered trademarks, service marks and applications (collectively, "Marks"); (iv) all patents, patent applications and inventions and discoveries that may be patentable (collectively, "Patents"); (v) all registered and unregistered copyrights in both published works and unpublished works (collectively, "Copyrights"); (vi) all rights in mask works; (vii) all know-how, trade secrets, confidential or proprietary information, customer lists, Software, technical information, data, process technology, plans, drawings and blue prints (collectively, "Trade Secrets"); and 37
(viii) all rights in internet web sites and internet domain names presently used by Seller (collectively "Net Names"). (b) Exhibit 3.14 contains a complete and accurate list and summary description and Seller has delivered to Buyer accurate and complete copies, of all Intellectual Property Assets, except for any license implied by the sale of a product and perpetual, paid-up licenses for commonly available Software programs with a value of less than $500 under which Seller is the licensee except as otherwise indicted on the foregoing exhibit. Except as set forth in Exhibit 3.14, the Intellectual Property Assets are all those necessary for the operation of Seller's business as it is currently conducted. Seller is the owner or licensee of all right, title and interest in and to each of the Intellectual Property Assets, free and clear of all Encumbrances, and has the right to use and transfer without payment to a Third Party all of the Intellectual Property Assets, other than in respect of licenses listed in Exhibit 3.14. To Seller's knowledge, no Intellectual Property Asset is infringed, or to Seller's knowledge, has been challenged or threatened in any way and does not infringe the intellectual property rights of any Third Party. 3.15 Brokers Or Finders Neither Seller nor any of its Representatives have incurred any obligation or liability, contingent or otherwise, for brokerage or finders' fees or agents' commissions or other similar payments in connection with the sale of Seller's business or the Assets or the Contemplated Transactions. 3.16 Disclosure (e) No material representation or warranty made by Seller in this Agreement contains any material untrue statement or omits to state a material fact necessary to make any of them, in light of the circumstances in which it was made, not misleading. 3.17 Employees Exhibit 3.17(a) contains a complete and accurate list of the following information for each employee of Seller, including each employee on leave of absence or layoff status: name; job title; date of hiring or engagement; date of commencement of employment or engagement; current compensation paid or payable and any change in compensation since July 1, 2002; sick and vacation leave that is accrued but unused; and service credited for purposes of vesting and eligibility to participate under any Employee Plan, or any other employee plan, except as otherwise indicated on said exhibit. 3.18 Labor Disputes; Compliance (a) Except as shown on Exhibit 3.18, Seller has complied in all material 38
respects with all Legal Requirements relating to employment practices, terms and conditions of employment, equal employment opportunity, nondiscrimination, immigration, wages, hours, benefits, collective bargaining and other requirements under state of federal law, the payment of social security and similar Taxes and occupational safety and health. Seller is not liable for the payment of any Taxes, fines, penalties, or other amounts, however designated, for failure to comply with any of the foregoing Legal Requirements. (b) Except as shown on Exhibit 3.18, (i) Seller has not been, and is not now, a party to any collective bargaining agreement or other labor contract; (ii) there has not been, there is not presently pending or existing, and to Seller's knowledge there is not threatened, any strike, slowdown, picketing, work stoppage or employee grievance process involving Seller; (iii) to Seller's knowledge no event has occurred or circumstance exists that could provide the basis for any work stoppage or other labor dispute; (iv) there is not pending or, to Seller's knowledge, threatened against or affecting Seller any Proceeding relating to the alleged violation of any Legal Requirement pertaining to labor relations or employment matters, including any charge or complaint filed with the National Labor Relations Board or any comparable Governmental Body, and there is no organizational activity or other labor dispute against or affecting Seller or the Facilities; (v) no application or petition for an election of or for certification of a collective bargaining agent is pending; (vi) no grievance or arbitration Proceeding exists that might have an adverse effect upon Seller or the conduct of its business; (vii) there is no lockout of any employees by Seller, and no such action is contemplated by Seller; and (viii) to Seller's knowledge there has been no pending charge of discrimination filed against or threatened against Seller with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission or similar Governmental Body or any pending employment discrimination, wrongful discharge, retaliation lawsuits or lawsuits alleging whistle blowing. 3.19 Capital Program. The Capital Improvement Plan Requirement includes sufficient moneys to satisfy all obligations owed by the Seller under developer agreements assumed by the Buyer. 3.20 Real Property Additional Representation and Warranty. That the Real Property is not subject to any Encumbrance (including Permitted Encumbrances) and no Survey Matter (as hereinafter defined) exists which (a) materially adversely affects the operation of the System or a portion thereof as operated on September 19, 2002 and the date hereof, as it will be operated on the date of Closing or (b) materially adversely affects the use of the improvements on such Real Property as used on September 19, 2002, on the date hereof and as it will be used on the date of Closing. "Survey Matter" means any item shown on a survey obtained pursuant to Section 10.9 hereof. "Increased Cost" means costs that the Buyer incurs in constructing improvements on, above, or under the Real Property which it would not have incurred if the Encumbrances or Survey Matter did not exist. 39
To the best of Seller's knowledge, (a)no part of any material improvement on the Real Property encroaches on any real property not included in the Real Property, and there are no buildings, structures, fixtures or other Improvements primarily situated on adjoining property which materially encroach on any part of the Real Property, and (b) the Real Property on which there is a material plant or other facility abuts on and has direct vehicular access to a public road or has access to a public road via an appurtenant easement benefiting such Land, and is supplied with public or quasi-public utilities and other services appropriate for the operation of the Facilities located thereon. 3.21 Tie In and Deposits. Schedule 3.21 is a true and accurate statement of the matters set forth therein, and, in addition, is a true and accurate statement (a) of all credits that the Seller is obligated to give to persons (as described in Section 10.10 hereof) against Tie In Charges (as hereinafter defined) and (b) all Tie In Charges that are subject to an agreement pursuant to which the Seller has agreed to provide a Tie In at either no charge or for a fixed charge ("Fixed Charge Tie In's"). 4. Representations and Warranties of Buyer Buyer represents and warrants to Seller as follows: 4.1 Organization and Good Standing Buyer is a governmental entity duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the State of Florida, with full governmental power and authority to conduct its business as it is now conducted and to complete the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 4.2 Authority; No Conflict (a) This Agreement constitutes the legal, valid and binding obligation of Buyer, enforceable against Buyer in accordance with its terms. Upon the execution and delivery by Buyer of the agreements to be executed or delivered by Buyer at Closing (collectively, the "Buyer's Closing Documents"), each of the Buyer's Closing Documents will constitute the legal, valid and binding obligation of Buyer, enforceable against Buyer in accordance with its respective terms. Buyer has the absolute and unrestricted right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement and the Buyer's Closing Documents and to perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Buyer's Closing Documents, and such action has been duly authorized by all necessary corporate action. (b) Neither the execution and delivery of this Agreement by Buyer nor the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions by Buyer will give any Person the right to prevent, delay or otherwise interfere with any of the Contemplated Transactions pursuant to: (i) any provision of Buyer's Governing Documents; 40
(ii) any resolution adopted by the board of directors or the shareholders of Buyer; (iii) any Legal Requirement or Order to which Buyer may be subject; or (iv) any Contract to which Buyer is a party or by which Buyer may be bound. Buyer is not and will not be required to obtain any Consent from any Person in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions. 4.3 Certain Proceedings Except as shown on Exhibit 4.3 hereto, there is no pending Proceeding that has been commenced against Buyer and that challenges, or may have the effect of preventing, delaying, making illegal or otherwise interfering with, any of the Contemplated Transactions. To Buyer's knowledge, except as set forth on Exhibit 4.3, no such Proceeding has been threatened. 4.4 Brokers Or Finders Neither Buyer nor any of its Representatives have incurred any obligation or liability, contingent or otherwise, for brokerage or finders' fees or agents' commissions or other similar payment in connection with the Contemplated Transactions. 4.5 Original Representations and Warranties. The representations and warranties of the Buyer contained in the Original Agreement were true and accurate when made and Seller is in compliance with its duties and obligations set forth in the Original Agreement as of the date hereof. 5. Covenants of Seller Prior to Closing 5.1 Access and Investigation Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, and upon reasonable advance notice received from Buyer and subject to any applicable confidentiality obligations, Seller shall (a) afford Buyer and its Representatives and prospective lenders, underwriters, and their Representatives (collectively, "Buyer Group") full and free access, during regular business hours, to Seller's personnel, properties (including subsurface testing), contracts, Governmental Authorizations, books and Records and other documents and data, such rights of access to be exercised in a manner that does not unreasonably interfere with the operations of Seller; (b) furnish Buyer Group with copies of all such contracts, Governmental Authorizations, books and Records and other existing documents and data as Buyer may reasonably request; (c) furnish Buyer Group with such 41
additional financial, operating and other relevant data and information as Buyer may reasonably request; and (d) otherwise cooperate and assist, to the extent reasonably requested by Buyer, with Buyer's investigation of the properties, assets and financial condition related to Seller. In addition, Buyer shall have the right to have the Real Property and Tangible Personal Property inspected by Buyer Group, at Buyer's sole cost and expense, for purposes of determining the physical condition and legal characteristics of the Real Property and Tangible Personal Property. In the event subsurface or other destructive testing is recommended by any of Buyer Group, Buyer shall be permitted to have the same performed with the prior consent of Seller, which shall not be unreasonably withheld. 5.2 Operation of the Business of Seller Between September 19, 2002 and the Closing, Seller: (a) shall conduct and shall have conducted its business in the Ordinary Course of Business; (b) except as otherwise directed by Buyer in writing, and without making any commitment on Buyer's behalf, shall use and shall have used its Best Efforts to preserve intact its current business organization, keep available the services of its officers, employees and agents and maintain its relations and good will with suppliers, customers, landlords, creditors, employees, agents and others having business relationships with it; (c) shall have conferred and shall confer with Buyer prior to implementing operational decisions of a material nature; (d) otherwise shall have reported and shall report periodically to Buyer concerning the status of its business, operations and finances; (e) shall not make and not make any material changes in senior management personnel identified by Buyer in Section 2.7, without prior consultation with Buyer; (f) shall have maintained and shall maintain the Assets in a state of repair and condition that complies with Legal Requirements and is consistent with the requirements and normal conduct of Seller's business; (g) shall have kept and shall keep in full force and effect, without amendment, all rights relating to Seller's business; (h) shall have complied and shall comply with all Legal Requirements and contractual obligations applicable to the operations of Seller's business; (i) shall have cooperated and shall cooperate with Buyer and shall have assisted and shall assist Buyer in identifying the Governmental Authorizations required 42
by Buyer to operate the business from and after the Closing Date and either transferring existing Governmental Authorizations of Seller to Buyer, where permissible, or obtaining new Governmental Authorizations for Buyer; (j) upon request from time to time, shall have executed and delivered and shall execute and deliver all documents, shall have made and shall make all truthful oaths, testify in any Proceedings and do all other acts that may be reasonably necessary to consummate the Contemplated Transactions, all without further consideration; and (k) shall have maintained and shall maintain all books and Records of Seller relating to Seller's business in the Ordinary Course of Business. 5.3 Negative Covenant Except as otherwise expressly permitted herein, between the date of this Agreement and the Closing Date, Seller shall not without the prior written consent of Buyer which shall not be unreasonably withheld and which shall be promptly acted upon by Buyer, (a) make any modification to any material Seller Contract or Governmental Authorization; or (b) allow the levels of raw materials, supplies or other materials included in the Inventories to vary materially from the levels customarily maintained. 5.4 Required Approvals Seller has made and shall continue to make the reasonably required filings necessary to be made by it in order to consummate the Contemplated Transactions. Seller also shall cooperate with Buyer and its Representatives with respect to all filings that Buyer elects to make or, pursuant to Legal Requirements, shall be required to make in connection with the Contemplated Transactions. Seller also shall cooperate with Buyer and its Representatives in obtaining all Material Consents. 5.5 Notification Between the date of this Agreement and the Closing, Seller shall promptly notify Buyer in writing if any of them becomes aware of (a) any fact or condition that causes or constitutes a Breach of any of Seller's representations and warranties herein as of the date of this Agreement or (b) the occurrence after the date of this Agreement of any fact or condition that would or be reasonably likely to (except as expressly contemplated by this Agreement) cause or constitute a Breach of any such representation or warranty had that representation or warranty been made as of the time of the occurrence of, or Seller's discovery of, such fact or condition. During the same period, Seller also shall promptly notify Buyer of the occurrence of any Breach of any covenant of Seller in this Article 5 or of the occurrence of any event that may make the satisfaction of the conditions in Article 7 impossible or unlikely. 5.6 No Negotiation 43
Until such time as this Agreement shall be terminated pursuant to Section 9.1, Seller shall not directly or indirectly solicit, initiate, encourage or entertain any inquiries or proposals from, discuss or negotiate with, provide any nonpublic information to or consider the merits of any inquiries or proposals from any Person (other than Buyer) relating to any business combination transaction involving Seller or the System (other than in the Ordinary Course of Business). 5.7 Best Efforts Seller shall use their Best Efforts to cause the conditions in the Agreement to be satisfied and on or before the Closing. Seller shall further as soon as practical after the Closing (a) amend its Governing Documents and take all other actions necessary to change its name to one sufficiently dissimilar to Seller's present name, in Buyer's judgment, to avoid confusion and (b) take all actions requested by the Buyer so that Buyer can either assume such name as an assumed name or to change its name to Seller's present name. 5.8 Payment Of Liabilities Seller shall pay or otherwise satisfy in the Ordinary Course of Business all of its Liabilities and obligations as they come due. 5.9 Current Evidence of Title (a) Seller has furnished to Buyer, at Seller's expense, (i) from Commonwealth Land Title Insurance Company (the "Title Policy") (the "Title Insurer"): (1) a title commitment or title commitments issued by the Title Insurer to insure title to each parcel listed therein (which Seller warrants is all real property that Seller owns or owned as of September 19, 2002 in fee simple other than such real property that is an Excluded Asset), in the aggregate amount of $466,500,000, subject to adjustment as provided in Section 2.3(B), naming Buyer as the proposed insured and having the effective dates as set forth therein, wherein the Title Insurer has agreed to issue an ALTA form owner's title insurance policy 1992 (10-17-92) with Florida modifications (collectively the "Title Commitment"); and (2) copies of all recorded documents listed as Schedule B-1 matters to be terminated or satisfied in order to issue the policy described in the Title Commitment or as special Schedule B-2 exceptions thereunder (the "Recorded Documents"). (b) The Title Commitment includes the Title Insurer's requirements for issuing its title policy, which requirements shall be met by Seller on or before the Closing Date 44
(including those requirements that must be met by releasing or satisfying monetary Encumbrances, but excluding Encumbrances that will remain after Closing as agreed to by the Buyer and those requirements that are to be met solely by Buyer). (c) If any of the following shall occur (collectively, a "Title Objection"): (i) The Title Commitment or other evidence of title or search of the appropriate real estate records discloses that any party other than Seller has title to the insured estate covered by the Title Commitment; (ii) any title exception is disclosed in Schedule B to any Title Commitment that is not one of the Permitted Real Estate Encumbrances or one that Seller specifies when delivering the Title Commitment to Buyer as one that Seller will cause to be deleted from the Title Commitment concurrently with the Closing, including (A) any exceptions that pertain to Encumbrances securing any loans and (B) any exceptions that Buyer reasonably believes could materially and adversely affect Buyer's use and enjoyment of the Land described therein; or (iii) any survey discloses any matter that Buyer reasonably believes could materially and adversely affect Buyer's use and enjoyment of the Land described therein; then Buyer shall notify Seller in writing ("Buyer's Notice") of such matters by December 31, 2002. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the surveys referenced in (iii) of the previous sentence will be obtained after the Closing pursuant to Section 10.9 and the Buyer shall, upon obtaining such survey and for a reasonable time thereafter, have the right to object to any matter to which it could have objected to under said part (iii) by delivering a written notice to the Seller and such matter shall be a Title Objection as set forth above. (d) Seller shall use its Best Efforts to cure each Title Objection and take all steps required by the Title Insurer to eliminate each Title Objection as an exception to the Title Commitment. In the event that the Title Objection arises after the Closing, then the Seller shall use its Best Efforts to cure such Title Objection and take all steps required by the Title Insurer to amend the title policy previously issued as required herein to eliminate such Title Objection. Any Title Objection that the Title Company is willing to insure over on terms acceptable to Seller and Buyer is herein referred to as an "Insured Exception." The Insured Exceptions, together with any title exception or matters disclosed by the Survey not objected to by Buyer in the manner aforesaid shall be deemed to be acceptable to Buyer. (e) Nothing herein waives Buyer's right to claim a breach of Section 3.9(a) or to claim a right to indemnification as provided in Section 11.2 if Buyer suffers material Damages as a result of a misrepresentation with respect to the condition of title to the Land. 45
(f) Seller shall use its best efforts to comply with the requirements of Schedule B Section 1 of the Title Commitment. At the Closing, Seller shall identify any Schedule B Section 1 requirements that cannot be satisfied as of the Closing. Seller and Buyer shall agree on a post-Closing process to satisfy these requirements (the "Post-Closing Schedule B Requirements"). Seller shall indemnify the Buyer as to all Post-Closing Schedule B requirements that are not satisfied in accordance with the agreed upon post-Closing process. 6. Covenants of Buyer Prior to Closing 6.1 Required Approvals As promptly as practicable after the date of this Agreement, Buyer shall make, or cause to be made, all filings required by Legal Requirements to be made by it to consummate the Contemplated Transactions. Buyer also shall cooperate, and cause its Related Persons to cooperate, with Seller (a) with respect to all filings Seller shall be required by Legal Requirements to make and (b) in obtaining all Consents identified in Exhibit 7.3, provided, however, that Buyer shall not be required to dispose of or make any change to its business, expend any material funds or incur any other material burden in order to comply with this Section 6.1. 6.2 Best Efforts Buyer shall use its Best Efforts to cause the conditions in this Agreement to be satisfied. 7. Conditions Precedent to Buyer's Obligation to Close Buyer's obligation to purchase the Assets and to take the other actions required to be taken by Buyer at the Closing is subject to the satisfaction, at or prior to the Closing, of each of the following conditions (any of which may be waived by Buyer, in whole or in part): 7.1 Accuracy of Representations (a) All of Seller's representations and warranties in this Agreement (considered collectively), and each of these representations and warranties (considered individually), shall have been accurate as of the Exhibit Delivery Date, and shall be accurate in all material respects as of the time of the Closing as if then made. (b) Each of the representations and warranties in Sections 3.2(a) and 3.4, and each of the representations and warranties in this Agreement that contains an express materiality qualification, shall be accurate in all respects as of the time of the Closing as if then made. 46
7.2 Seller's Performance All of the covenants and obligations that Seller are required to perform or to comply with pursuant to this Agreement at or prior to the Closing (considered collectively), and each of these covenants and obligations (considered individually), shall have been duly performed and complied with in all material respects. 7.3 Consents Each of the Material Consents to be identified by Buyer and agreed to by Seller in Exhibit 7.3 prior to Closing (the "Material Consents") shall have been obtained and shall be in full force and effect. 7.4 Additional Documents Seller shall have caused the documents and instruments required by Section 2.7(a) and the following documents to be delivered (or made available ) to Buyer: (a) The articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto of Seller, duly certified as of a recent date by the Secretary of State; (b) A legal opinion reasonably satisfactory to Buyer; and (c) Such other documents as Buyer may reasonably request for the purpose of: (i) evidencing the accuracy of any of Seller's representations and warranties; (ii) evidencing the performance by Seller of, or the compliance by Seller with, any covenant or obligation required to be performed or complied with by Seller; (iii) evidencing the satisfaction of any condition referred to in this Article 7; (iv) otherwise facilitating the consummation or performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions; or (v) evidence showing the release of all liens, security interests, and other encumbrances other than Permitted Encumbrances (but excluding any Permitted Encumbrances that encumber the Assets held by any entity which has provided or may provide financing to the Seller) 7.5 No Conflict 47
Neither the consummation nor the performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions will, directly or indirectly, materially contravene or conflict with or result in a material violation of or cause Buyer or any Related Person of Buyer to suffer any material adverse consequence under (a) any applicable Legal Requirement or Order or (b) any valid Legal Requirement or Order that has been entered by any Governmental Body. 7.6 Line of Credit. Seller shall have caused ALLETE, Inc., to execute and deliver to the Buyer an agreement in the form and substance of Exhibit 7.6 hereto. 8. Conditions Precedent to Seller's Obligation to Close Seller's obligation to sell the Assets and to take the other actions required to be taken by Seller at the Closing is subject to the satisfaction, at or prior to the Closing, of each of the following conditions (any of which may be waived by Seller in whole or in part): 8.1 Accuracy of Representations All of Buyer's representations and warranties in this Agreement (considered collectively), and each of these representations and warranties (considered individually), shall have been accurate in all material respects as of the date of this Agreement and shall be accurate in all material respects as of the time of the Closing as if then made. 8.2 Buyer's Performance All of the covenants and obligations that Buyer is required to perform or to comply with pursuant to this Agreement at or prior to the Closing (considered collectively), and each of these covenants and obligations (considered individually), shall have been performed and complied with in all material respects. 8.3 Additional Documents Buyer shall have caused a legal opinion satisfactory to Seller to be supplied and the documents and instruments required by Section 2.7(b) and the following documents to be delivered or made available to Seller: (a) such other documents as Seller may reasonably request for the purpose of: (i) evidencing the accuracy of any representation or warranty of Buyer, (ii) evidencing the performance by Buyer of, or the compliance by Buyer with, any covenant or obligation required to be performed or complied with by Buyer or (iii) evidencing the satisfaction of any condition referred to in this Article 48
8.4 No Injunction There shall not be in effect any Legal Requirement or any injunction or other Order that (a) prohibits the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions and (b) has been adopted or issued, or has otherwise become effective, since the date of this Agreement. 9. Termination 9.1 Termination Events By notice given prior to or at the Closing, subject to Section 9.2, this Agreement may be terminated as follows: (a) by Buyer if a material Breach of any provision of this Agreement has been committed by Seller and such Breach has not been waived by Buyer; (b) by Seller if a material Breach of any provision of this Agreement has been committed by Buyer and such Breach has not been waived by Seller; (c) by Buyer if any condition in Article 7 has not been satisfied as of the date specified for Closing in the first sentence of Section 2.6 or if satisfaction of such a condition by such date is or becomes impossible (other than through the failure of Buyer to comply with its obligations under this Agreement), and Buyer has not waived such condition on or before such date; (d) by Seller if any condition in Article 8 has not been satisfied as of the date specified for Closing in the first sentence of Section 2.6 or if satisfaction of such a condition by such date is or becomes impossible (other than through the failure of Seller to comply with its obligations under this Agreement), and Seller has not waived such condition on or before such date; (e) by mutual consent of Buyer and Seller; (f) by Buyer if the Closing has not occurred on or before February 14, 2003 or such later date as the parties may agree upon, unless the Buyer is in material Breach of this Agreement; or (g) by Seller if the Closing has not occurred on or before February 14, 2003 or such later date as the parties may agree upon, unless the Seller is in material Breach of this Agreement. (h) by Seller if the amount of Purchase Price Installment 1 is less than $400,000,000 as of the date of pricing of the Closing Bonds. 49
9.2 Effect Of Termination Each party's right of termination under Section 9.1 is in addition to any other rights it may have under this Agreement or otherwise, and the exercise of such right of termination will not be an election of remedies. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 9.1, all obligations of the parties under this Agreement will terminate, except that the obligations of the parties in this Section 9.2 and Articles 12 and 13 (except for those in Section 13.5) will survive, provided, however, that, if this Agreement is terminated because of a Breach of this Agreement by the non-terminating party or because one or more of the conditions to the terminating party's obligations under this Agreement is not satisfied as a result of the party's failure to comply with its obligations under this Agreement, the terminating party's right to pursue all legal remedies will survive such termination unimpaired. Furthermore, notwithstanding any such termination, the Seller shall immediately upon termination pay to the Buyer the Due Diligence Amount. Neither Buyer nor Seller shall be liable to the other in the event that after the execution of this Agreement there occurs (i) a change of law that prevents the Closing, (ii) any action by a third party that prevents the Closing or (iii) any order by a Governmental Agency or court that prevents the Closing. Both parties agree to diligently defend against a third party attempt to prevent a Closing. 10. Additional Covenants 10.1 Employees and Employee Benefits (a) Information on Active Employees. For the purpose of this Agreement, the term "Active Employees" shall mean all individuals employed by Seller on the Closing Date by , including employees on temporary leave of absence, including family medical leave, military leave, temporary disability or sick leave, but excluding employees on long-term disability leave. (b) Employment of Active Employees by Buyer. (i) Buyer will make offers of employment to all employees are legally eligible for employment in the United States . Buyer will provide Seller with a list of Active Employees to whom Buyer has made an offer of employment that has been accepted to be effective on the Closing Date (the "Hired Active Employees"). Subject to Legal Requirements, Buyer will have reasonable access to the Facilities and personnel Records (including performance appraisals, disciplinary actions, grievances and medical Records) of Seller for the purpose of preparing for and conducting employment interviews with all Active Employees and will conduct the interviews as expeditiously as possible prior to the Closing Date. Access will be provided by Seller upon reasonable prior notice during normal business hours. Effective immediately before the Closing, Seller will 50
terminate the employment of all Hired Active Employees. (ii) Neither Seller nor its Related Persons shall solicit the continued employment of any Active Employee (unless and until Buyer has informed Seller in writing that the particular Active Employee will not receive any employment offer from Buyer) or the employment of any Hired Active Employee after the Closing who are still employed by Buyer. Buyer shall inform Seller promptly of the identities of those Active Employees to whom it will not make employment offers, and Seller shall comply with the WARN Act as to those Active Employees. Buyer consents to the Seller giving WARN Act notice, if it elects to do so, as provided under law. (iii) It is understood and agreed that (A) Buyer's expressed intention to extend offers of employment as set forth in this section shall not constitute any commitment, Contract or understanding (expressed or implied) of any obligation on the part of Buyer to a post-Closing employment relationship of any fixed term or duration or upon any terms or conditions other than those set forth herein that Buyer may establish pursuant to individual offers of employment, and (B) employment offered by Buyer will be "at will" and may be terminated by Buyer or by an employee at any time for any reason (subject to any written commitments to the contrary made by Buyer or an employee and Legal Requirements). Nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to prevent or restrict in any way the right of Buyer to terminate, reassign, promote or demote any of the Hired Active Employees after the Closing or to change adversely or favorably the title, powers, duties, responsibilities, functions, locations, salaries, other compensation or terms or conditions of employment of such employees. (c) Salaries and Benefits. (i) Seller shall be responsible for (A) the payment of all wages and other remuneration due to Active Employees with respect to their services as employees of Seller through the close of business on the Closing Date, ; (B) the payment of any termination or severance payments and the provision of health plan continuation coverage in accordance with the requirements of COBRA and Sections 601 through 608 of ERISA, or may be required by Seller by law or contract; and (C) any and all payments to employees required under the WARN Act as a result of the contemplated transactions Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, and solely for the purpose of ensuring the payment of wages to Active Employees only on the actual date of Closing, the Seller shall be responsible for the payment of wages with respect to Active Employees for any workshift beginning prior to 12:00 a.m. on the date of Closing and which workshifts end after 12:01 a.m. on the date of Closing. (ii) Seller shall be liable for any claims made or incurred by Active Employees and their beneficiaries through the Closing Date under the Employee 51
Plans. For purposes of the immediately preceding sentence, a claim will be deemed incurred, in the case of hospital, medical or dental benefits, when the services that are the subject of the charge are performed and, in the case of other benefits (such as disability or life insurance), when an event has occurred or when a condition has been diagnosed that entitles the employee to the benefit. (d) Terms of Employment. Buyer will set its own initial terms and conditions of employment for the Hired Active Employees and others it may hire, including work rules, benefits and salary and wage structure, all as permitted by law, provided such terms and conditions shall be in the aggregate substantially similar in value to the terms and conditions of such Hired Active Employees under the Seller's employ as disclosed to Buyer herein. Buyer is not obligated to assume any collective bargaining agreements under this Agreement. Seller shall be solely liable for any severance payment required to be made to its employees due to the Contemplated Transactions. Any bargaining obligations of Buyer with any union with respect to bargaining unit employees subsequent to the Closing, whether such obligations arise before or after the Closing, shall be the sole responsibility of Buyer. (f) General Employee Provisions. (i) Seller and Buyer shall give any notices required by Legal Requirements and take whatever other actions with respect to the plans, programs and policies described in this Section 10.1 as may be necessary to carry out the arrangements described in this Section 10.1. (ii) Seller and Buyer shall provide each other with such plan documents and summary plan descriptions, employee data or other information as may be reasonably required to carry out the arrangements described in this Section 10.1. (iii) If any of the arrangements described in this Section 10.1 are determined by the IRS or other Governmental Body to be prohibited by law, Seller and Buyer shall modify such arrangements to as closely as possible reflect their expressed intent and retain the allocation of economic benefits and burdens to the parties contemplated herein in a manner that is not prohibited by law. (iv) Seller shall provide Buyer with completed 1-9 forms and attachments with respect to all Hired Active Employees, except for such employees as Seller certifies in writing to Buyer are exempt from such requirement. (v) Buyer shall not have any responsibility, liability or obligation, whether to Active Employees, former employees, their beneficiaries or to any other Person, with respect to any employee benefit plans, practices, programs or arrangements (including the establishment, operation or termination thereof and the notification and provision of COBRA coverage extension) maintained by 52
Seller. (vi) Seller will require certain assistance from certain Hired Active Employees to process post-Closing obligations of Seller, including, but not limited to, filings with the Florida Public Service Commission and other regulatory agencies and federal wage and tax filings (collectively the "Post-Closing Obligations"), and Buyer agrees to provide the services of such necessary employees to assist Seller with its Post-Closing Obligations. Such assistance shall not unreasonably interfere with the necessary employees' regular duties for Buyer. As consideration to Buyer for assistance with Seller's Post-Closing Obligations, Seller shall pay Buyer the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), which sum shall be credited to Buyer at the Closing. 10.2 Payment of all Taxes Resulting From Sale of Assets by Seller Seller shall pay in a timely manner all Taxes resulting from or payable in connection with the sale of the Assets pursuant to this Agreement, regardless of the Person on whom such Taxes are imposed by Legal Requirements. 10.3 Payment of Other Retained Liabilities In addition to payment of Taxes pursuant to Section 10.2, Seller shall pay, or make adequate provision for the payment, in full all of the Retained Liabilities and other Liabilities of Seller under this Agreement. If any such Liabilities are not so paid or provided for, or if Buyer reasonably determines that failure to make any payments will impair Buyer's use or enjoyment of the Assets or conduct of the business previously conducted by Seller with the Assets, Buyer may, upon ten (10) days notice, at any time after the Closing Date, elect to make all such payments directly (but shall have no obligation to do so) and set off and deduct the full amount of all such payments from the maturing payments due from Buyer to Seller or as provided for from the Capital Charges owing to Seller. 10.4 Removing Excluded Assets Within sixty (60) days after the Closing Date, Seller shall remove all Excluded Assets (other than the Capital Charges provided for in Section 2.2 hereof) from all Facilities and other Land to be occupied by Buyer. Such removal shall be done in such manner as to avoid any damage to the Facilities and other properties to be occupied by Buyer and any disruption of the business operations to be conducted by Buyer after the Closing. Any damage to the Assets or to the Facilities resulting from such removal shall be paid by Seller. Should Seller fail to remove the Excluded Assets as required by this Section, Buyer shall have the right, but not the obligation, (a) to remove the Excluded Assets at Seller's sole cost and expense; (b) to store the Excluded Assets and to charge Seller all storage costs associated therewith; (c) to treat the Excluded Assets as unclaimed 53
and to proceed to dispose of the same under the laws governing unclaimed property; or (d) to exercise any other right or remedy conferred by this Agreement or otherwise available at law or in equity. Seller shall promptly reimburse Buyer for all costs and expenses incurred by Buyer in connection with any Excluded Assets not removed by Seller on or before the Closing Date. 10.5 Reports and Returns Seller shall promptly after the Closing prepare and file all reports and returns required by Legal Requirements relating to the business of Seller as conducted using the Assets, to and including the Effective Time. 10.6 Assistance in Proceedings Seller will cooperate with Buyer and its counsel in the contest or defense of, and make available its personnel and provide any testimony and access to its books and Records in connection with, any Proceeding involving or relating to (a) any Contemplated Transaction or (b) any action, activity, circumstance, condition, conduct, event, fact, failure to act, incident, occurrence, plan, practice, situation, status or transaction on or before the Closing Date involving Seller or its business. 10.7 Retention of and Access to Records After the Closing Date, Buyer shall retain for a period consistent with Buyer's record-retention policies and practices those Records of Seller delivered to Buyer. Buyer also shall provide Seller and their Representatives reasonable access thereto, during normal business hours to enable them to prepare financial statements or tax returns or deal with tax audits. After the Closing Date, Seller shall provide Buyer and its Representatives reasonable access to Records that are Excluded Assets, during normal business hours for any reasonable business purpose specified by Buyer in such notice. 10.8 Further Assurances Subject to the proviso in Section 6.1, the parties shall cooperate reasonably with each other and with their respective Representatives in connection with any steps required to be taken as part of their respective obligations under this Agreement, and shall (a) furnish upon request to each other such further information; (b) execute and deliver to each other such other documents; and (c) do such other acts and things, all as the other party may reasonably request for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions. 10.9 Environmental and Real Estate Matters. The Buyer shall have the right at Seller's expense, but not the obligation, to do Phase 1 environmental site assessments and studies and regulatory compliance audits on the Real Property and other assets of the Seller (whether or not located on the Real Property) (collectively, "Environmental 54
Property") as Buyer may determine. The foregoing pursuant to this Section shall be accomplished within nine (9) months after the Closing. For 90 days after the Buyer has received all the foregoing it desires to obtain pursuant to the first sentence of this Section, the Buyer shall have the right at Seller's expense, but not the obligation, to do such further environmental studies and assessments (including soil and surface water and ground water testing) and regulatory compliance audits on the Environmental Property based on the recommendations contained in such Phase 1's or in subsequent reports issued by the environmental consultant(s) on the Environmental Property which reports were obtained pursuant to this Section. The foregoing 90 day period set forth in the previous sentence shall be extended to a time period within which the environmental assessments, studies and audits can reasonably be completed if such environmental studies cannot be completed within such time period because of extraordinary circumstances (such as a Phase 2 assessment recommending a Phase 3 assessment being done, test results not being promptly available, test results only being obtainable if higher than normal fees are paid, or testing being of such a nature that such testing takes more time than testing usually takes as a general matter). The Buyer shall have the right at Seller's expense, but not the obligation, to do such surveys on the Real Property as Buyer reasonably determines have situated on it valuable improvements or has on it improvements that are significant to the operation of the System and excluding the following property: (1) lift station property with an assessed value less than $150,000, and (2) unimproved parcels in excess of a 1/4 acre. Buyer will not cause any surveys to be paid for by the Seller if the individual cost of such survey is in excess of $10,000, unless either (1) the buyer has reasonable cause to believe the survey will show a material encroachment or excroachment or (2) such property does in fact bear a material encroachment or excroachment. Prior to undertaking any such surveys, Buyer shall notify Seller in writing and Seller shall have the right to object in writing to Buyer's determination if Seller concludes that Buyer's determination was not reasonable, for ten (10) days after receipt thereof (and if Seller fails to so object, Seller will be deemed to have agreed to Buyer's determination). If Seller and Buyer cannot resolve such dispute, then whether such determination is reasonable shall be determined in accordance with the dispute resolution provisions hereof. Buyer's right to do surveys under this paragraph shall expire three (3) years after the Closing. All such environmental studies and assessments and regulatory compliance audits and surveys done pursuant to this Section shall be at the sole cost and expense of the Seller and Seller agrees to reimburse Buyer for the costs and expenses incurred by Buyer under this Section. As provided above, Seller will deposit with Buyer $200,000.00 to be held by Buyer for the purposes of reimbursing the Buyer for costs and expenses incurred pursuant to this Section. Buyer agrees to first utilize such money before requesting Seller to directly reimburse it for such costs and expenses. 55
10.10 Fixed Tie-In's and Tie-In Deposits. Seller has supplied to Buyer documents pursuant to this Agreement relating to obligations that the Seller has to provide a Fixed Charge Tie In (as defined in Section 3.21) (the "Tie In Documents") and the amount which the Buyer would receive under a Fixed Charge Tie In may be less than the Buyer would, but for this section charge, for such Individual Tie-In (as defined in Section 3.21). Although Buyer is not under this Agreement assuming such obligations, Buyer does hereby agree to provide utility service to persons who would otherwise have received service from Seller under the Tie In Documents, and to further provide Individual Tie In's at the Fixed Charge Tie In to the Person entitled to receive such Fixed Charge Tie In from the Seller, provided that the representations and warranties of the Seller set forth in Section 3.21 are true and accurate. Furthermore, Seller has supplied to Buyer documents pursuant to this Agreement relating to deposits ("Vendee Deposit") made by land contract vendees ("Deposit Vendee") pursuant to land contracts for which deposits the Seller has agreed to give the relevant Deposit Vendee a credit equal to such deposits made by such Deposit Vendee against Tie In Charges which such Deposit Vendee would have to pay at the time it obtains water and/or sewage service from the System. After Closing, some of such Deposit Vendees will continue to make such deposits and Seller agrees to promptly after Closing take such action to cause all such future deposits to be paid to the Buyer and shall supply the Buyer with evidence that it has done so. Although Buyer is not under this Agreement assuming such obligations, Buyer does hereby agree that it will provide utility service to such Deposit Vendees and shall give the relevant Deposit Vendee a credit against Tie In Charges at the time it supplies such Deposit Vendee an Individual Tie In, which credit will be in an amount equal to that which the Seller is, at the Effective Time obligated to give the relevant Deposit Vendee plus the amount of deposits that the Buyer receives after the Effective Time from such Deposit Vendee pursuant to this paragraph, provided that the representation and warranty set forth in Section 3.21 hereof is true and accurate. 10.11 CUSTOMER DEPOSITS. At Closing, Seller shall transfer to the Buyer by electronic fund transfer all funds in customer deposit accounts ("Customer Deposits"), including any interest earned, accrued or due thereon through the Closing Date. Upon receipt of the Customer Deposits, Buyer will assume responsibility for maintaining accurate books and records of the funds and for repaying the Deposits in accordance with the standards and procedures adopted by the Buyer. 10.12 REGULATORY TRANSFER CONTINGENCY. The sale and transfer of the Assets pursuant to this Agreement is contingent upon approval by the Florida Public Service Commission and the other applicable County 56
Regulatory Agencies. Pursuant to Section 163.01(7)(g), Florida Statutes, Section 367.071(4)(a), Florida Statutes, and prior legal precedent, such approvals may be obtained after Closing and must be granted as a matter of right. 11. Indemnification; Remedies 11.1 Survival All representations, warranties, covenants and obligations in this Agreement, the certificates delivered pursuant to Section 2.7 and any other certificate or document delivered pursuant to this Agreement shall survive the Closing and the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions, subject to Section 11.7. The right to indemnification, reimbursement or other remedy based upon such representations, warranties, covenants and obligations shall not be affected by any investigation (including any environmental investigation or assessment) conducted with respect to, or any knowledge acquired at any time, whether before or after the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the Closing Date, with respect to the accuracy or inaccuracy of or compliance with any such representation, warranty, covenant or obligation. The waiver of any condition based upon the accuracy of any representation or warranty, or on the performance of or compliance with any covenant or obligation, will not affect the right to indemnification, reimbursement or other remedy based upon such representations, warranties, covenants and obligations. For purposes of this Article 11, whenever the phrases "to Seller's knowledge", "to the best of Seller's knowledge", "to the knowledge of Seller", or any similar phrase, or whenever the words "material" or "materially" are used in this Agreement (other than in this Article 11), such words and phrases shall be disregarded for purposes of this Article 11 and indemnification hereunder as if such words or phrases were stricken from this Agreement. 11.2 Indemnification and Reimbursement by Seller Seller will indemnify and hold harmless Buyer, and its Representatives, shareholders, subsidiaries and Related Persons (collectively, the "Buyer Indemnified Persons"), and will reimburse the Buyer Indemnified Persons for any loss, liability, claim, damage, expense (including costs of investigation and defense and reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses) or diminution of value, whether or not involving a Third-Party Claim (collectively, "Damages") (but not including any Damages recovered by the offsets for the Remedial Capital Project Amount), arising from or in connection with: (a) any Breach of any representation or warranty made by Seller in (i) this Agreement (without giving effect to any supplement thereto), (ii) the certificates delivered pursuant to Section 2.7 (for this purpose, each such certificate will be deemed to have stated that Seller's representations and warranties in this Agreement fulfill the 57
requirements of Section 7.1 as of the Closing Date as if made on the Closing Date without giving effect to any supplement thereto, unless the certificate expressly states that the matters disclosed in a supplement have caused a condition specified in Section 7.1 not to be satisfied), (v) any transfer instrument or (vi) any other certificate, document, writing or instrument delivered by Seller pursuant to this Agreement; (b) any Breach of any covenant or obligation of Seller in this Agreement or in any other certificate, document, writing or instrument delivered by Seller pursuant to this Agreement; (c) (1) Any Liability arising out of the ownership or operation of the Assets prior to the Effective Time other than the Assumed Liabilities, including, but not limited to, any litigation existing on the date of Closing or subsequently filed against the Buyer challenging the transaction, and (2) litigation expenses for eminent domain actions filed against the Buyer subject to reimbursement of those expenses to the Seller by the condemning authority. (d) any brokerage or finder's fees or commissions or similar payments based upon any agreement or understanding made, or alleged to have been made, by any Person with Seller (or any Person acting on its behalf) in connection with any of the Contemplated Transactions; (e) any liability under the WARN Act or any similar state or local Legal Requirement that may result from an "Employment Loss", as defined by 29 U.S.C. sect. 2101(a)(6), caused by any action of Seller prior to the Closing or by Buyer's decision not to hire previous employees of Seller; (f) any Employee Plan established or maintained by Seller; or (g) any Retained Liabilities. Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, the Buyer will not have the right to sue the Seller for Damages which result form a defect in the title to the Real Property obtained by the Buyer pursuant to this Agreement for which there is applicable title insurance pursuant to Section 5.9 hereof and on which a claim may be made by the Buyer for the relevant Damages unless (a) the Buyer has filed a claim under the relevant title insurance policy and the claim has not been allowed within 90 days of the date the claim was filed or (b) the Buyer has filed a claim under the relevant title insurance policy, the claim was allowed within 90 days after the filing of the claim but the processing or defending (or the taking of other relevant action in accordance with the claim by the Title Insurer) is not proceeding in a satisfactory manner as determined by the Buyer in the exercise of its reasonable judgment. 11.3 Indemnification and Reimbursement by Seller - Environmental and Real 58
Estate Matter In addition to the other indemnification provisions in this Article 11, Seller will indemnify and hold harmless Buyer and the other Buyer indemnified Persons, and will reimburse Buyer and the other Buyer Indemnified Persons, for any Damages (including costs of cleanup, containment or other remediation) arising from or in connection with: (a) any Environmental, Health and Safety Liabilities arising out of or relating to: (i) the ownership or operation by any Person at any time on or prior to the Closing Date of any of the Facilities, assets or the business of Seller, or (ii) any Hazardous Materials or other contaminants that were present on the Facilities or Assets at any time on or prior to the Closing Date; or (b) any bodily injury (including illness, disability and death, regardless of when any such bodily injury occurred, was incurred or manifested itself), personal injury, property damage (including trespass, nuisance, wrongful eviction and deprivation of the use of real property) or other damage of or to any Person or any Assets in any way arising from or allegedly arising from any Hazardous Activity conducted by any Person with respect to the business of Seller or the Assets prior to the Closing Date or from any Hazardous Material that was (i) present on or before the Closing Date on or at the Facilities (or present on any other property, if such Hazardous Material emanated or allegedly emanated from any Facility and was present on any Facility, on or prior to the Closing Date) or (ii) Released or allegedly Released by any Person on or at any Facilities or Assets at any time on or prior to the Closing Date. (c) any assertion of, or the existence of, any right by any Person to obtain the ownership of, or right to negotiate to obtain the ownership of, any of the Assets other than any such right granted by or purported to have been granted by the Buyer, including without limitation rights of first refusal or rights to have Seller negotiate with such Person prior to sale of any of the Assets to another Person (and including therein without limitation any of the foregoing which have been asserted by Volusia County and which may be asserted by Altamonte Springs). Buyer, with Seller's consent and approval which shall not be unreasonably withheld, will be entitled to control any Remedial Action, any Proceeding relating to an Environmental Claim and, except as provided in the following sentence, any other Proceeding with respect to which indemnity may be sought under this Section 11.3. The procedure described in Section 11.9 will apply to any claim solely for monetary damages relating to a matter covered by this Section 11.3. No claim for environmental indemnification or reimbursement may be asserted unless (i) the underlying environmental condition is specifically identified in Exhibit 3.13 or (ii) the party asserting the claim establishes that the conditions, Release, disposal or 59
actions giving rise to the liability or claim were present at or prior to Closing and that the party asserting the claim did not materially cause or contribute to such conditions after Closing. For purposes of this section 11.3, all environmental conditions and compliance issues arising out of, related to, or caused by any facts or circumstances as described in the environmental reports listed in Exhibit 3.13 or obtained pursuant to Section 3.12hereof are deemed to have been specifically identified in Exhibit 3.13. 11.4 Indemnification and Reimbursement by Buyer Buyer will indemnify and hold harmless Seller, and will reimburse Seller, for any Damages arising from or in connection with: (a) any Breach of any representation or warranty made by Buyer in this Agreement or in any certificate, document, writing or instrument delivered by Buyer pursuant to this Agreement; (b) any Breach of any covenant or obligation of Buyer in this Agreement or in any other certificate, document, writing or instrument delivered by Buyer pursuant to this Agreement; (c) any claim by any Person for brokerage or finder's fees or commissions or similar payments based upon any agreement or understanding alleged to have been made by such Person with Buyer (or any Person acting on Buyer's behalf) in connection with any of the Contemplated Transactions; or (d) any Assumed Liabilities. 11.5 Limitations on Amount--Seller Seller shall have no liability (for indemnification or otherwise) with respect to claims under Section 11.2(a) until the total of all Damages with respect to such matters exceeds $500,000 and then only for the amount by which such Damages exceed $500,000. However, this Section 11.5 will not apply to claims under (the following, each an "Exempted Breach") Section 11.2(b) through (g) or to matters arising in respect of Sections 3.7, 3.13, or 3.15, to any Breach of any of Seller's representations and warranties of which the Seller had knowledge at any time prior to the date on which such representation and warranty is made or any Breach by Seller of any covenant or obligation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Seller shall not be liable for Minor Claims (as hereinafter defined) until such Minor Claims aggregate more than $500,000 in which case, Seller shall be liable for all Minor Claims to the extent that in the aggregate they exceed $500,000 provided that Damages in aggregate exceed $500,000. "Minor Claim" means Damages resulting from a Breach hereof covered by Section 11.2(a) (other than an Exempted Breach) that do not exceed $20,000.00. 60
11.6 Limitations on Amount--Buyer Buyer will have no liability (for indemnification or otherwise) with respect to claims under Section 11.4(a) until the total of all Damages with respect to such matters exceeds $500,000 and then only for the amount by which such Damages exceed $500,000. However, this Section 11.6 will not apply to claims under Section 11.4(b) through (d) or matters arising in respect of Section 4.4 or to any Breach of any of Buyer's representations and warranties of which Buyer had knowledge at any time prior to the date on which such representation and warranty is made or any Breach by Buyer of any covenant or obligation, and Buyer will be liable for all Damages with respect to such Breaches. 11.7 Time Limitations (a) If the Closing occurs, Seller will have liability (for indemnification or otherwise) with respect to any Breach of (i) a covenant or obligation to be performed or complied with prior to the Closing Date (other than those in Sections 2.1 and 2.4(b) and Articles 10 and 12, as to which a claim may be made at any time), or (ii) a representation or warranty (other than one contained in Section 3.12 or 3.13 hereof) only if on or before three years after the Closing Date, Buyer notifies Seller of a claim specifying the factual basis of the claim in reasonable detail to the extent then known by Buyer. If the Closing occurs, Seller will have liability (for indemnification or otherwise) with respect to any Breach of the representations and warranties contained in Section 3.12 or 3.13 hereof only if on or before five years after the Closing Date, the Buyer notifies Seller of a claim specifying the factual basis of the claim in reasonable detail to the extent then known by Buyer. (b) If the Closing occurs, Buyer will have liability (for indemnification or otherwise) with respect to any Breach of (i) a covenant or obligation to be performed or complied with prior to the Closing Date (other than those in Article 12, as to which a claim may be made at any time) or (ii) a representation or warranty (other than that set forth in Section 4.4, as to which a claim may be made at any time), only if on or before three years after the Closing Date, Seller notifies Buyer of a claim specifying the factual basis of the claim in reasonable detail to the extent then known by Seller. 11.8 Right Of Setoff Upon notice to Seller specifying in reasonable detail the basis therefor, Buyer may set off any amount to which it may be entitled under this Article 11 against amounts otherwise payable to Seller, subject to Seller's right to object under the Dispute Resolution Process. The exercise of such right of setoff by Buyer in good faith, whether or not ultimately determined to be justified, will not constitute an event of default. 61
Neither the exercise of nor the failure to exercise such right of setoff will constitute an election of remedies or limit Buyer in any manner in the enforcement of any other remedies that may be available to it. 11.9 Third-Party Claims (a) Promptly after receipt by a Person entitled to indemnity under Section 11.2, 11.3 (to the extent provided in the last sentence of Section 11.3) or 11.4 (an "Indemnified Person") of notice of the assertion of a Third-Party Claim against it, such Indemnified Person shall give notice to the Person obligated to indemnify under such Section (an "Indemnifying Person") of the assertion of such Third-Party Claim, provided that the failure to notify the Indemnifying Person will not relieve the Indemnifying Person of any liability that it may have to any Indemnified Person, except to the extent that the Indemnifying Person demonstrates that the defense of such Third-Party Claim is prejudiced by the Indemnified Person's failure to give such notice. (b) If an Indemnified Person gives notice to the Indemnifying Person pursuant to Section 11.9(a) of the assertion of a Third-Party Claim, the Indemnifying Person shall be entitled to participate in the defense of such Third-Party Claim and, to the extent that it wishes (unless (i) the Indemnifying Person is also a Person against whom the Third-Party Claim is made and the Indemnified Person determines in good faith that joint representation would be inappropriate or (ii) the Indemnifying Person fails to provide reasonable assurance to the Indemnified Person of its financial capacity to defend such Third-Party Claim and provide indemnification with respect to such Third-Party Claim), to assume the defense of such Third-Party Claim with counsel satisfactory to the Indemnified Person. After notice from the Indemnifying Person to the Indemnified Person of its election to assume the defense of such Third-Party Claim, the Indemnifying Person shall not, so long as it diligently conducts such defense, be liable to the Indemnified Person under this Article 11 for any fees of other counsel or any other expenses with respect to the defense of such Third-Party Claim, in each case subsequently incurred by the Indemnified Person in connection with the defense of such Third-Party Claim, other than reasonable costs of investigation. If the Indemnifying Person assumes the defense of a Third-Party Claim, (i) such assumption will conclusively establish for purposes of this Agreement that the claims made in that Third-Party Claim are within the scope of and subject to indemnification, and (ii) no compromise or settlement of such Third-Party Claims may be effected by the Indemnifying Person without the Indemnified Person's Consent unless (A) there is no finding or admission of any violation of Legal Requirement or any violation of the rights of any Person; (B) the sole relief provided is monetary damages that are paid in full by the Indemnifying Person; and (C) the Indemnified Person shall have no liability with respect to any compromise or settlement of such Third-Party Claims effected without its Consent. If notice is given to an Indemnifying Person of the assertion of any Third-Party Claim and the Indemnifying Person does not, within ten (10) days after the Indemnified Person's notice is given, give 62
notice to the Indemnified Person of its election to assume the defense of such Third-Party Claim, the Indemnifying Person will be bound by any determination made in such Third-Party Claim or any compromise or settlement effected by the Indemnified Person. (c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if an Indemnified Person determines in good faith that there is a reasonable probability that a Third-Party Claim may adversely affect it or its Related Persons other than as a result of monetary damages for which it would be entitled to indemnification under this Agreement, the Indemnified Person may, by notice to the Indemnifying Person, assume the exclusive right to defend, compromise or settle such Third-Party Claim, but the Indemnifying Person will not be bound by any determination of any Third-Party Claim so defended for the purposes of this Agreement or any compromise or settlement effected without its Consent (which may not be unreasonably withheld). (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 13.4, Seller hereby consents to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of any court in which a Proceeding in respect of a Third-Party Claim is brought against any Buyer Indemnified Person for purposes of any claim that a Buyer Indemnified Person may have under this Agreement with respect to such Proceeding or the matters alleged therein and agree that process may be served on Seller and Shareholders with respect to such a claim anywhere in the world. (e) With respect to any Third-Party Claim subject to indemnification under this Article 11: (i) both the Indemnified Person and the Indemnifying Person, as the case may be, shall keep the other Person fully informed of the status of such Third-Party Claim and any related Proceedings at all stages thereof where such Person is not represented by its own counsel, and (ii) the parties agree (each at its own expense) to render to each other such assistance as they may reasonably require of each other and to cooperate in good faith with each other in order to ensure the proper and adequate defense of any Third-Party Claim. (f) With respect to any Third-Party Claim subject to indemnification under this Article 11, the parties agree to cooperate in such a manner as to preserve in full (to the extent possible) the confidentiality of all Confidential Information and the attorney-client and work-product privileges. In connection therewith, each party agrees that: (i) it will use its Best Efforts, in respect of any Third-Party Claim in which it has assumed or participated in the defense, to avoid production of Confidential Information (consistent with applicable law and rules of procedure), and (ii) all communications between any party hereto and counsel responsible for or participating in the defense of any Third-Party Claim shall, to the extent possible, be made so as to preserve any applicable attorney-client or work-product privilege. 11.10 Other Claims 63
A claim for indemnification for any matter not involving a Third-Party Claim may be asserted by notice to the party from whom indemnification is sought and shall be paid promptly after such notice, subject to filing an objection under the Dispute Resolution Process. 11.11 Buyer Benefit Upon any termination of this Agreement that would entitle the Buyer to recover the benefit of its bargain with the Seller, the Buyer and Seller agree that the value of the benefit of the bargain is speculative, is not readily subject to determination objectively and agree that the value of the benefit of the bargain to the Buyer is $5 Million, plus an amount equal to all transaction costs which the Buyer would have paid if the Closing and issuance of the Acquisition Bonds had taken place. 12. Confidentiality 12.1 Definition of Confidential Information (a) As used in this Article 12, the term "Confidential Information" includes any and all of the following information of Seller or Buyer that has been or may hereafter be disclosed in any form, whether in writing, orally, electronically or otherwise, or otherwise made available by observation, inspection or otherwise by either party (Buyer on the one hand or Seller, on the other hand) or its Representatives (collectively, a "Disclosing Party") to the other party or its Representatives (collectively, a "Receiving Party"): (i) all information that is a trade secret under applicable trade secret or other law; (ii) all information concerning product specifications, data, know-how, formulae, compositions, processes, designs, sketches, photographs, graphs, drawings, samples, inventions and ideas, past, current and planned research and development, current and planned manufacturing or distribution methods and processes, customer lists, current and anticipated customer requirements, price lists, market studies, business plans, computer hardware, Software and computer software and database technologies, systems, structures and architectures; (iii) all information concerning the business and affairs of the Disclosing Party (which includes historical and current financial statements, financial projections and budgets, tax returns and accountants' materials, historical, current and projected sales, capital spending budgets and plans, business plans, strategic plans, marketing and advertising plans, publications, client and customer lists and files, contracts, the names and backgrounds of key personnel and personnel training techniques and materials, however documented), and all information 64
obtained from review of the Disclosing Party's documents or property or discussions with the Disclosing Party regardless of the form of the communication; and (iv) all notes, analyses, compilations, studies, summaries and other material prepared by the Receiving Party to the extent containing or based, in whole or in part, upon any information included in the foregoing. (b) Any trade secrets of a Disclosing Party shall also be entitled to all of the protections and benefits under applicable trade secret law and any other applicable law. If any information that a Disclosing Party deems to be a trade secret is found by a court of competent jurisdiction not to be a trade secret for purposes of this Article 12, such information shall still be considered Confidential Information of that Disclosing Party for purposes of this Article 12 to the extent included within the definition. In the case of trade secrets, each of Buyer and Seller hereby waives any requirement that the other party submit proof of the economic value of any trade secret or post a bond or other security. 12.2 Restricted Use of Confidential Information (a) Each Receiving Party acknowledges the confidential and proprietary nature of the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party and agrees that such Confidential Information (i) shall be kept confidential by the Receiving Party; (ii) shall not be used for any reason or purpose other than to evaluate and consummate the Contemplated Transactions; and (iii) without limiting the foregoing, shall not be disclosed by the Receiving Party to any Person, except in each case as otherwise expressly permitted by the terms of this Agreement or with the prior written consent of an authorized representative of Seller with respect to Confidential Information of Seller (each, a "Seller Contact") or an authorized representative of Buyer with respect to Confidential Information of Buyer (each, a "Buyer Contact"). Each of Buyer and Seller shall disclose the Confidential Information of the other party only to its Representatives who require such material for the purpose of evaluating the Contemplated Transactions and are informed by Buyer or Seller as the case may be, of the obligations of this Article 12 with respect to such information. Each of Buyer and Seller shall (iv) enforce the terms of this Article 12 as to its respective Representatives; (v) take such action to the extent necessary to cause its Representatives to comply with the terms and conditions of this Article 12; and (vi) be responsible and liable for any breach of the provisions of this Article 12 by it or its Representatives. (b) Unless and until this Agreement is terminated, Seller shall maintain as confidential any Confidential Information (including for this purpose any information of Seller of the type referred to in Sections 12.1(a)(i), (ii) and (iii), whether or not disclosed to Buyer) of the Seller relating to any of the Assets or the Assumed Liabilities. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, Seller may use any Confidential Information of 65
Seller before the Closing in the Ordinary Course of Business in connection with the transactions permitted by Section 5.2. (c) From and after the Closing, the provisions of Section 12.2(a) above shall not apply to or restrict in any manner Buyer's use of any Confidential Information of the Seller relating to any of the Assets or the Assumed Liabilities. 12.3 Exceptions Sections 12.2(a) and (b) do not apply to that part of the Confidential Information of a Disclosing Party that a Receiving Party demonstrates (a) was, is or becomes generally available to the public other than as a result of a breach of this Article 12 or the Confidentiality Agreement by the Receiving Party or its Representatives; (b) was or is developed by the Receiving Party independently of and without reference to any Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party; or (c) was, is or becomes available to the Receiving Party on a nonconfidential basis from a Third Party not bound by a confidentiality agreement or any legal, fiduciary or other obligation restricting disclosure. Seller shall not disclose any Confidential Information of Seller relating to any of the Assets or the Assumed Liabilities in reliance on the exceptions in clauses (b) or (c) above. 12.4 Legal Proceedings If a Receiving Party becomes compelled in any Proceeding or is requested by a Governmental Body having regulatory jurisdiction over the Contemplated Transactions to make any disclosure that is prohibited or otherwise constrained by this Article 12, that Receiving Party shall provide the Disclosing Party with prompt notice of such compulsion or request so that it may seek an appropriate protective order or other appropriate remedy or waive compliance with the provisions of this Article 12. In the absence of a protective order or other remedy, the Receiving Party may disclose that portion (and only that portion) of the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party that, based upon advice of the Receiving Party's counsel, the Receiving Party is legally compelled to disclose or that has been requested by such Governmental Body, provided, however, that the Receiving Party shall use reasonable efforts to obtain reliable assurance that confidential treatment will be accorded by any Person to whom any Confidential Information is so disclosed. The provisions of this Section 12.4 do not apply to any Proceedings between the parties to this Agreement. 12.5 Return or Destruction of Confidential Information If this Agreement is terminated, each Receiving Party shall (a) destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party prepared or generated by the Receiving Party without retaining a copy of any such material; (b) promptly deliver to the Disclosing Party all other Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party, together with 66
all copies thereof, in the possession, custody or control of the Receiving Party or, alternatively, with the written consent of a Seller Contact or a Buyer Contact (whichever represents the Disclosing Party) destroy all such Confidential Information; and (c) certify all such destruction in writing to the Disclosing Party, provided, however, that the Receiving Party may retain a list that contains general descriptions of the information it has returned or destroyed to facilitate the resolution of any controversies after the Disclosing Party's Confidential Information is returned. 12.6 Attorney-Client Privilege The Disclosing Party is not waiving, and will not be deemed to have waived or diminished, any of its attorney work product protections, attorney-client privileges or similar protections and privileges as a result of disclosing its Confidential Information (including Confidential Information related to pending or threatened litigation) to the Receiving Party, regardless of whether the Disclosing Party has asserted, or is or may be entitled to assert, such privileges and protections. The parties (a) share a common legal and commercial interest in all of the Disclosing Party's Confidential Information that is subject to such privileges and protections; (b) are or may become joint defendants in Proceedings to which the Disclosing Party's Confidential Information covered by such protections and privileges relates; (c) intend that such privileges and protections remain intact should either party become subject to any actual or threatened Proceeding to which the Disclosing Party's Confidential Information covered by such protections and privileges relates; and (d) intend that after the Closing the Receiving Party shall have the right to assert such protections and privileges. No Receiving Party shall admit, claim or contend, in Proceedings involving either party or otherwise, that any Disclosing Party waived any of its attorney work-product protections, attorney-client privileges or similar protections and privileges with respect to any information, documents or other material not disclosed to a Receiving Party due to the Disclosing Party disclosing its Confidential Information (including Confidential Information related to pending or threatened litigation) to the Receiving Party. 13. General Provisions 13.1 Expenses Except as otherwise provided in this Agreement, each party to this Agreement will bear its respective fees and expenses incurred in connection with the preparation, negotiation, execution and performance of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions, including all fees and expense of its Representatives. Seller will pay all amounts payable to the Title Insurer in respect of the Title Commitments, copies of exceptions and the Title Policy, including premiums (including premiums for endorsements) and search fees. If this Agreement is terminated, the obligation of each party to pay its own fees and expenses will be subject to any rights of such party arising from a Breach of this Agreement by another party. 67
13.2 Public Announcements Any public announcement, press release or similar publicity with respect to this Agreement or the Contemplated Transactions will be issued, if at all, at such time and in such manner as Seller determines. Except with the prior consent of Seller or as permitted by this Agreement, Buyer nor any of its Representatives shall disclose to any Person (a) the fact that any Confidential Information of Seller has been disclosed to Buyer or its Representatives, that Buyer or its Representatives have inspected any portion of the Confidential Information of Seller, that any Confidential Information of Buyer has been disclosed to Seller or their Representatives or that Seller or its Representatives have inspected any portion of the Confidential Information of Buyer or (b) any information about the Contemplated Transactions, including the status of such discussions or negotiations, the execution of any documents (including this Agreement) or any of the terms of the Contemplated Transactions or the related documents (including this Agreement). Seller and Buyer will consult with each other concerning the means by which Seller's employees, customers, suppliers and others having dealings with Seller will be informed of the Contemplated Transactions, and Buyer will have the right to be present for any such communication. 13.3 Notices All notices, Consents, waivers and other communications required or permitted by this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed given to a party when (a) delivered to the appropriate address by hand or by nationally recognized overnight courier service (costs prepaid); (b) sent by facsimile or e-mail with confirmation of transmission by the transmitting equipment; or (c) received or rejected by the addressee, if sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, in each case to the following addresses, facsimile numbers or e-mail addresses and marked to the attention of the person (by name or title) designated below (or to such other address, facsimile number, e-mail address or person as a party may designate by notice to the other parties): Seller (before the Closing): 1000 Color Place Apopka, FL 32703 Attention: Donnie Crandall, CEO Fax: (407) 598-4219 with a mandatory copy to: Florida Water Services Corporation 1000 Color Place Apopka, FL 32703 Attention: Carlyn Kowalsky, General Counsel Fax: (407) 598-4241 E-mail: carlynk@florida-water.com 68
Greenberg Traurig, P.A. 777 South Flagler Drive, Suite 300 East West Palm Beach, Florida 33401 Attention: Phillip C. Gildan Fax: (561) 838-8867 E-mail: gildanp@gtlaw.com Seller (after the Closing): Philip R. Halverson VP/General Counsel 30 West Superior Street Duluth, MN 55802 Fax: (218) 723-3960 E-mail: phalverson@allete.com Buyer: J. Lance Reese, Chairman Florida Water Services Authority E-mail: cacagms@aol.com with a mandatory copy to: Miller, Canfield, Paddock and Stone, PLC Attention: Richard I. Lott Fax: (850) 469-1088 E-mail: rilott@prodigy.net 13.4 Agreements as to Attorneys. After full disclosure of potential conflicts of interest, Seller and Buyer agree that, in the event Buyer employs after the Closing as its attorney (whether as inside or outside counsel) or a law firm to act as its attorney or attorneys and any of the foregoing was employed by Seller prior to the Closing ("Common Attorneys"), Seller and Buyer do hereby waive any conflict of interest that might exist as a result of the foregoing and does also waive any requirement that such Common Attorneys maintain in confidence information which, but for this section, such Common Attorneys would have to maintain in confidence as a result of their employment as attorneys by the Seller, provided, however, the foregoing waiver is only as to Buyer and it does not apply to information which such Common Attorneys may have relating to this Agreement and the documents to be executed and delivered at the Closing (including the negotiating thereof) and the consummation of the Contemplated Transactions. Furthermore, the foregoing waiver of conflict of interest does not apply to the Common Attorney representing the Buyer in connection with a dispute under this Agreement or a document to be executed and delivered at the Closing. Common Attorneys will include without limitation, if employed as attorneys for Buyer after Closing, Carlyn Kowalsky, Lewis, Longman, & Walker, P.A Mason and McGee, P.A., Brigham Moore, P.A., Farr, Farr & Emerich, P.A., Lowndes, Drosdick, Doster, Kantor & Reed, P.A., Rutledge, Ecenia, Purnell & Hoffman, P.A., and Greenberg Traurig. For purposes of this section, a 69
person acting as an attorney within a law firm that constitutes a Common Attorney is considered to be a Common Attorney in his individual capacity. The Seller agrees that the Buyer may employ the same lobbying services currently being utilized by the Seller. Seller shall pay to Buyer at Closing the sum of $200,000 which Buyer shall utilize for lobbying expenses. 13.5 Jurisdiction; Service of Process Any Proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any Contemplated Transaction may be brought in the courts of the State of Florida, County of Santa Rosa, or, if it has or can acquire jurisdiction, in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Florida, and each of the parties irrevocably submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of each such court in any such Proceeding, waives any objection it may now or hereafter have to venue or to convenience of forum, agrees that all claims in respect of the Proceeding shall be heard and determined only in any such court and agrees not to bring any Proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any Contemplated Transaction in any other court. The parties agree that either or both of them may file a copy of this paragraph with any court as written evidence of the knowing, voluntary and bargained agreement between the parties irrevocably to waive any objections to venue or to convenience of forum. Process in any Proceeding referred to in the first sentence of this section may be served on any party anywhere in the world. 13.6 Enforcement of Agreement (a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement, any dispute among the parties which arises from the Agreement shall be resolved by binding arbitration conducted in accordance with this Section 13.5. (the "Dispute Resolution Process") Either party may initiate the Dispute Resolution Process by providing written notice to the other party. (b) After transmittal and receipt of a written notice specifying the area or areas of disagreement or dispute, the parties agree to meet at reasonable times and places, as mutually agreed upon, to discuss the issues. (c) If discussions between the parties fail to resolve the dispute within fifteen (15) business days of the receipt by each party of the notice described in subsection (a) of this Section 13.5, a binding arbitration may then be initiated by either party by written notification to the other party of the existence of a dispute. Any and all issues related to the matter addressed by the written notice provided in subsection (a) of Section 13.5 or any response by the other party shall be raised and resolved in a single proceeding. (d) The arbitrators shall be appointed and act as follows: (1) Each party shall appoint a person as arbitrator within ten (10) business days of the date one of the 70
parties has notified the other of the existence of a dispute; (2) Each appointment shall be signified in writing to the counter party and the arbitrators so appointed, within ten (10) days of their acceptance of appointment, shall appoint a third arbitrator, who shall chair the panel. If the arbitrators appointed by the parties are unable to agree upon a third arbitrator, the same shall be appointed by the American Arbitration Association from its qualified panel of arbitrators. Each party shall have the right to veto up to two appointments proposed by the American Arbitration Association. If either party fails to appoint an arbitrator within ten (10) business days from the date one of the parties has notified the other of the existence of a dispute, then an arbitrator shall be appointed by the American Arbitration Association from its qualified panel of arbitrators as the appointment of the party failing to timely appoint and the two so appointed shall appoint a third arbitrator to chair the panel. The party on whose behalf an arbitrator is appointed shall have the right to veto up to two of the arbitrators appointed by the American Arbitration Association; (3) Nothing in this Section 13.6 shall preclude the parties from mutually agreeing to a single arbitrator to resolve the dispute; (4) No arbitrator shall have a business or other pecuniary relationship with either party, except for payment of arbitrator's fees and expenses without the written consent of both parties. (e) Arbitrators shall be sworn to perform their duties with impartiality and fidelity. In rendering any decision, the arbitrator shall proceed to consider the Agreement, the dispute identified in the notice and any response and the actions taken and the documentation thereof, conduct, and relative position, knowledge, and the ability of the parties in relation to the dispute. (f) The arbitration hearing shall convene not earlier than sixty (60) days and not later than ninety (90) days of the acceptance of appointment of all of the arbitrators chosen by the parties unless the parties mutually agree to an earlier date. The arbitrators shall render a decision within ten (10) business days of the date on which the arbitration hearing concludes, and such decisions shall be in writing and in duplicate, one counterpart thereof to be delivered simultaneously to each of the parties. The decision shall contain findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall be final and binding upon the parties. (g) The parties shall be entitled to discovery pursuant to the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure. All discovery requests by a party shall be enforced by the arbitrators. The arbitration hearing shall not proceed until all outstanding discovery requests have been fulfilled. (h) The fees, charges and expenses of the arbitrators, any experts engaged by the arbitrators, the respective counsel engaged by the parties, and any witnesses called by the parties shall be paid as follows: the arbitrators shall order each party to pay their own fees, charges and expenses and assess the fees, charges and expenses of the arbitrators equally between the parties. 71
(i) The provisions of the Florida Arbitration Code, Chapter 682, Florida Statutes, and the Florida Evidence Code, Chapter 90, Florida Statutes, except to the extent inconsistent with the provisions of this Agreement, shall specifically be deemed to apply to any arbitration proceeding conducted hereunder. Unless the venue is mutually agreed upon otherwise by the parties, the venue for any arbitration commenced pursuant to this Section shall be in Pensacola, Florida. 13.7 Waiver; Remedies Cumulative The rights and remedies of the parties to this Agreement are cumulative and not alternative. Neither any failure nor any delay by any party in exercising any right, power or privilege under this Agreement or any of the documents referred to in this Agreement will operate as a waiver of such right, power or privilege, and no single or partial exercise of any such right, power or privilege will preclude any other or further exercise of such right, power or privilege or the exercise of any other right, power or privilege. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, (a) no claim or right arising out of this Agreement or any of the documents referred to in this Agreement can be discharged by one party, in whole or in part, by a waiver or renunciation of the claim or right unless in writing signed by the other party; (b) no waiver that may be given by a party will be applicable except in the specific instance for which it is given; and (c) no notice to or demand on one party will be deemed to be a waiver of any obligation of that party or of the right of the party giving such notice or demand to take further action without notice or demand as provided in this Agreement or the documents referred to in this Agreement. 13.8 Entire Agreement and Modification This Agreement supersedes all prior agreements, whether written or oral, between the parties with respect to its subject matter (including any letter of intent and any confidentiality agreement between Buyer and Seller) and constitutes (along with the Disclosure Letter, Exhibits and other documents delivered pursuant to this Agreement) a complete and exclusive statement of the terms of the agreement between the parties with respect to its subject matter. This Agreement may not be amended, supplemented, or otherwise modified except by a written agreement executed by the party to be charged with the amendment. 13.9 Assignments, Successors and no Third-Party Rights No party may assign any of its rights or delegate any of its obligations under this Agreement without the prior written consent of the other parties, except that Buyer may collaterally assign its rights hereunder to any financial institution providing financing in connection with the Contemplated Transactions. Subject to the preceding sentence, this Agreement will apply to, be binding in all respects upon and inure to the benefit of the successors and permitted assigns of the parties. Nothing expressed or referred to in this Agreement will be construed to give any Person other than the parties to this Agreement 72
any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or with respect to this Agreement or any provision of this Agreement, except such rights as shall inure to a successor or permitted assignee pursuant to this Section 13.8. 13.10 Severability If any provision of this Agreement is held invalid or unenforceable by any court of competent jurisdiction, the other provisions of this Agreement will remain in full force and effect. Any provision of this Agreement held invalid or unenforceable only in part or degree will remain in full force and effect to the extent not held invalid or unenforceable. 13.11 Construction The headings of Articles and Sections in this Agreement are provided for convenience only and will not affect its construction or interpretation. All references to "Articles," and "Sections" refer to the corresponding Articles and Sections of this Agreement. 13.12 Time of Essence With regard to all dates and time periods set forth or referred to in this Agreement, time is of the essence. 13.13 Governing Law This Agreement will be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of Florida without regard to conflicts-of-laws principles that would require the application of any other law. 13.14 Execution of Agreement This Agreement may be executed in one or more counterparts, each of which will be deemed to be an original copy of this Agreement and all of which, when taken together, will be deemed to constitute one and the same agreement. The exchange of copies of this Agreement and of signature pages by facsimile transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this Agreement as to the parties and may be used in lieu of the original Agreement for all purposes. Signatures of the parties transmitted by facsimile shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes. 13.14 Intentionally not used. 13.15 RADON GAS. (a) RADON IS NATURALLY OCCURRING RADIOACTIVE GAS THAT, WHEN IT HAS ACCUMULATED IN A BUILDING IN SUFFICIENT 73
QUANTITIES, MAY PRESENT HEALTH RISKS TO PERSONS WHO ARE EXPOSED TO IT OVER TIME. LEVELS OF RADON THAT EXCEED FEDERAL AND STATE GUIDELINES HAVE BEEN FOUND IN BUILDINGS IN FLORIDA. ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REGARDING RADON TESTING MAY BE OBTAINED FROM THE COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH UNIT. 13.16 Limited Liability. Neither the State of Florida nor any political subdivision or municipality thereof, nor the Buyer, shall be obligated (1) to exercise its ad valorem taxing power or any other taxing power in any form on any real or personal property to pay any liability arising out of, or in any connection whatsoever with, this Agreement, or to pay the principal of the Acquisition Bonds, the interest thereon or other costs incident thereto or (2) to pay the same from any other funds, except from the Net Revenues realized by the Buyer from its ownership or operation of the System or from the Acquisition Bonds Net Proceeds, junior and subordinate to the payment of any Bonds or other indebtedness payable from such source. It is further agreed between the Buyer and the Seller that this Agreement and any obligations arising in connection therewith, whether for payment of the Purchase Price, or for any claim of liability, remedy for breach, or otherwise, shall not constitute a lien on the System or any other property of the Authority, or any municipality. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein or in any other instrument or document executed by or on behalf of the Buyer in connection herewith, no stipulation, covenant, agreement or obligation contained herein or therein shall be deemed or construed to be a stipulation, covenant, agreement, or obligation of any present or future member, officer, employee or agent of the Buyer, or of any incorporator, member, director, trustee, officer, employee or agent of any successor to the Buyer, in any such person's individual capacity, and no such person, in his individual capacity, shall be liable personally for any breach or non-observance of or for any failure to perform, fulfill or comply with any such stipulations, covenants, agreements or obligations, nor shall any recourse be had for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any of the Bonds or the Purchase Price or for any claim based hereon or thereon or on any such stipulation, covenant, agreement, or obligation, against any such person, in his individual capacity, either directly or through the Buyer or any successor to the Buyer, under any rule of law or equity, statute or constitution or by the enforcement of any assessment or penalty or otherwise, and all such liability of any such person, in his individual capacity, is hereby expressly waived and released. All references to the Buyer in this paragraph shall be deemed to include the Buyer, the City of Gulf Breeze, the City of Milton, their respective Mayors, Council Members, officers, employees, and agents. The Buyer shall not be obligated to pay any liability, claim or obligation arising from or in connection with this Agreement or the transactions contemplated thereby, or 74
the Purchase Price from any funds of the Buyer derived from any source other than the Pledged Revenues, (as it shall be defined in the Indenture pursuant to which the Bonds are issued) which right of payment from the Buyer to the Seller shall be junior and subordinate to the payment of the Bonds secured by such Pledged Revenues. The Seller hereby agrees to indemnify and defend the Buyer and hold the Buyer harmless against any and all claims, losses liabilities or damages in any way growing out of or resulting from challenges to this Agreement or objections to the Buyer completing the Contemplated Transactions prior to closing, including, without limitation, all costs and expenses of the Buyer, including reasonable attorney's fees, incurred in the performance of any activities of the Buyer in connection with the foregoing. All references to the Buyer in this paragraph shall be deemed to include the Buyer, the City of Gulf Breeze, the City of Milton, their respective Mayors, Council Members, officers, employees, and agents. Nothing herein shall be deemed to authorize, create or impose upon the City of Gulf Breeze or the City of Milton any obligation, duty, liability or responsibility for the taking of or refraining from any action, or for the payment of any sums for any reason whatsoever. The Seller hereby acknowledges that the City of Gulf Breeze and the City of Milton shall have no liability whatsoever on account of this Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby, including, without limitation, any claims or liabilities arising on account of any breach, misrepresentation or other action or failure to act on the part of the Buyer. The Seller hereby covenants and agrees that it will never seek remedy or recourse against, or seek to impose any liability upon, the City of Gulf Breeze or City of Milton, for any liability or claim arising in connection with or relating to this Agreement or the transactions contemplated thereby, whether against the Buyer, the Cities of Gulf Breeze or Milton directly, or otherwise, under any rule of law or equity, statute or constitution or by the enforcement of any provision of this Agreement, or by way of assessment or penalty or otherwise; and all such liability, if any, of the City of Milton and the City of Gulf Breeze is hereby expressly waived and released. If, prior to closing, the Seller shall determine that, because of its indemnity obligations contained in the penultimate paragraph hereto, it is no longer economically feasible to proceed to the Closing or to pursue the transaction contemplated hereby, Seller may elect to give written notice to the Buyer that it no longer wishes to complete the Contemplated Transaction. Upon receipt of such notice, Buyer may elect to proceed with the Closing without such indemnity under the penultimate paragraph (in which case the Seller shall be excused from any further indemnity obligation under said indemnity but not from obligations accrued therefrom prior thereto), or to terminate its obligations hereunder (in which case the Seller shall remain liable for and pay the Due Diligence Expense). The provisions of this Section shall survive the termination of this Agreement. 75
13.17 Obligations Subordinate. All obligations of the Buyer hereunder or arising in connection therewith (the "Utility Acquisition Liabilities" or "UA Liabilities") shall be limited and special obligations of the Buyer, payable solely from the Net Revenues, junior and subordinate to the outstanding Bonds of the Authority. The UA Liabilities shall not be or constitute a general indebtedness, liability, general or moral obligation, or a pledge of the faith, credit or taxing power of the Buyer, the State of Florida, or any political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation. Neither the State of Florida nor any political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, nor the Buyer shall be obligated (1) to levy ad valorem taxes on any property to pay the UA Liabilities or other costs incident thereto or (2) to pay the same from any other funds of the Buyer, except from the Net Revenues, junior and subordinate to the outstanding Bonds of the Buyer. It is further agreed between the Buyer and the Seller that the UA Liabilities shall not constitute a lien upon the System or facilities, or any part thereof, or on any other property of the Buyer. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above. Buyer: Florida Water Services Authority ----------------------------------------- By: /s/ J. Lance Reese ------------------------------------- Its: Chairman ------------------------------------- Seller: Florida Water Services Corporation ----------------------------------------- By: /s/ Donnie R. Crandell ------------------------------------- Its: President ------------------------------------- 76


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20021230162443.txt.gz
TIME:20021230162443
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - DECEMBER 30, 2002 ALLETE, Inc. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE. Reference is made to the 2001 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or the Company) for background information on the following update. Ref. Page 15. - Fifth Full Paragraph On December 30, 2002 Minnesota Power, an operating division of ALLETE, announced that plans to build a natural gas-fired electric generating facility in Superior, Wisconsin, have been delayed indefinitely due to lack of growth in the region and the unsettled nature of both the economy and wholesale power markets. As a result, ALLETE's fourth quarter 2002 earnings will include an approximate $5 million one-time non-cash charge. Construction of the $70 million to $80 million, 160-megawatt facility was originally announced in June 1999. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 30, 2002 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 30, 2002
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. December 30, 2002 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 30, 2002 3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20030124115341.txt.gz
TIME:20030124115341
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - JANUARY 24, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. The following exhibit of ALLETE, Inc. is filed herewith in accordance with Item 601 of Regulation S-K: Exhibit Number - ------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated January 24, 2003 announcing 2002 earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 24, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 24, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. January 24, 2003 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 24, 2003 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated January 24, 2003 announcing 2002 earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 24, 2003

Exhibit 99 [GRAPHIC OMITTED] For Release: January 24, 2003 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE REPORTS 2002 EARNINGS, 2003 EXPECTATIONS ----------------------------------------------- (Duluth, Minn.)-ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported 2002 earnings of $1.68 per share, compared with earnings of $1.81 in 2001. Excluding one-time events, earnings were $1.80 per share in 2002 and $1.87 in 2001. Net income was $137.2 million in 2002 on revenue of $1.507 billion, compared with $138.7 million net income on revenue of $1.526 billion in 2001. "We navigated through a challenging year while accomplishing several important goals," said Dave Gartzke, ALLETE's chairman, president and CEO. "We simplified our company by exiting non-strategic businesses. This strengthened our balance sheet and allowed us to focus on our two core businesses. We continued our efforts to communicate this new focus to investors." One-time events in 2002 include final exit charges related to the automotive transport and Electric Odyssey retail businesses, as well as a charge related to the indefinite delay of an electric generation project in Superior, Wis. In 2001, ALLETE recognized a portion of the exit charge from the automotive transport business. AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES grew net income by 24% in 2002 despite relatively flat auction vehicle sales. At ADESA, growth was due to mandated goodwill accounting changes, lower interest expense and increased auction efficiency. Automotive Finance Corporation financed 42,000 more vehicles - an increase of 5%. At ENERGY SERVICES, total kilowatt-hour sales were up 11% for the year in part due to sales from nonregulated generation that began in 2002. Low wholesale prices, however, resulted in net income declining by 8%, excluding the Superior generation project. INVESTMENTS AND CORPORATE CHARGES declined by $19.5 million from 2001, mainly due to the liquidation of the company's securities portfolio during the year and the largest real estate sale in the company's history which improved earnings in 2001. Net income from DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS increased by $9.8 million in 2002, largely from the suspension of depreciation expense at the company's Water Services businesses. The pending sale of Florida Water Services for $492.5 million is expected to close in mid-February. (MORE)
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- "The proceeds from the sale will give us the ability to reduce debt, which will further strengthen our balance sheet and keep us financially well-positioned," Gartzke said. "Our two core businesses remain strong and are poised for earnings growth in their respective markets as economic conditions improve." Gartzke expects earnings at Automotive Services to grow by about 15% in 2003. Earnings at Energy Services are expected to decrease slightly from 2002 levels. "If wholesale power prices improve, so too will our profitability at Energy Services," he added. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE's holdings include ADESA, the second largest wholesale vehicle auction network in North America; AFC, the leading provider of independent auto dealer financing; Minnesota Power, a low-cost electric utility that serves some of the largest industrial customers in the United States; and significant real estate holdings in Florida. For more information about ALLETE, visit the company's Web site at www.allete.com. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [GRAPHIC OMITTED] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET, DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802 WWW.ALLETE.COM
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 4 - ----------------------------------------------------------------------


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20030307190216.txt.gz
TIME:20030307190216
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - MARCH 7, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. The following exhibit of ALLETE, Inc. is filed herewith in accordance with Item 601 of Regulation S-K: Exhibit Number - ------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated March 7, 2003 updating the sale of Florida Water Services Corporation. ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. March 7, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated March 7, 2003 updating the sale of Florida Water Services Corporation. ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003

Exhibit 99 [GRAPHIC OMITTED] For Release: March 7, 2003 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS FLORIDA WATER SERVICES SALE UPDATE; ALLETE RE-AFFIRMS STRATEGIC REVIEW ---------------------------------------------------------------------- (DULUTH, Minn.)-ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE:ALE) announced that a Florida court ruling, issued today, will delay the sale of assets of its water services business, Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water) to the Florida Water Services Authority (FWSA). Florida Water is discussing with the FWSA means for continuing to work together, while it considers possible transactions with other buyers. "ALLETE will consider a broader range of strategic options with respect to our water services businesses," said Dave Gartzke, ALLETE Chairman, President and CEO. "Florida Water Services continues to be a valuable business, and our objective is to maximize its value for the benefit of our shareholders." Gartzke added that the court decision does not stop the strategic evaluation the company is currently undertaking. In conjunction with its investment advisors, the company is undertaking a comprehensive analysis to evaluate the benefits and risks of separating its energy and automotive businesses into independent companies. The company will seek to complete its analysis as soon as practicable and will inform shareholders of its conclusion. If the decision is made to proceed with a separation, public notice will be made at the appropriate time through a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission or a press release and will include the steps it intends to follow and time frame for implementing those steps. "Whatever the result of the analysis, we remain committed to the fundamentals of operating performance and cash flow discipline for our businesses," Gartzke said. A shareholder proposal was submitted for consideration at ALLETE's 2003 Annual Meeting of Shareholders asking shareholders to recommend that the separation of the energy and automotive businesses be implemented. Because the company is in the midst of a comprehensive review of this matter, the proponents led by Lafer Equity Investors, L.P., and its affiliates have agreed to withdraw such proposal. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE's holdings include ADESA, the second largest wholesale vehicle auction network in North America; AFC, the leading provider of independent auto dealer financing; Minnesota Power, a low-cost electric utility that serves some of the largest industrial customers in the United States; and significant real estate holdings in Florida. For more information about ALLETE, visit the company's Web site at www.allete.com. The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission. #### [GRAPHIC OMITTED] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET, DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802 WWW.ALLETE.COM


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20030314161650.txt.gz
TIME:20030314161650
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - MARCH 10, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE. Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following updates. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 On March 10, 2003 Florida Water Services Corporation, a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, announced that it has terminated its agreement to sell its water and wastewater facilities to the Florida Water Services Authority. As a result, ALLETE's first quarter 2003 earnings will include an estimated $7 million after-tax write-off of costs incurred in connection with this agreement. ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 14, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 14, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. March 14, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 14, 2003 3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20030425092520.txt.gz
TIME:20030425092520
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - APRIL 25, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (a) Financial Statements - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 99 - ALLETE, Inc. News Release dated April 25, 2003 announcing 2003 first quarter earnings. ITEM 9. REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE (ITEM 12. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION) On April 25, 2003 ALLETE, Inc. issued a press release announcing first quarter 2003 earnings which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99 and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. The information is being furnished pursuant to Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition and is being presented under Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure in accordance with interim guidance issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission in Release Nos. 33-8216 and 34-47583. This information, including Exhibit 99 attached hereto, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 25, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 25, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. April 25, 2003 James K. Vizanko ---------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 25, 2003 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE, Inc. News Release dated April 25, 2003 announcing 2003 first quarter earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 25, 2003

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: April 25, 2003 Contact: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com Investor Tim Thorp Contact: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE REPORTS SOLID FIRST-QUARTER EARNINGS DULUTH, Minn.-ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported first quarter 2003 earnings of 54 cents per share, compared with 44 cents per share reported for the first quarter a year ago. Net income was $44.3 million on revenue of $422.9 million compared with $35.2 million of net income on $368.3 million of revenue in the first quarter of 2002. "We are satisfied with the overall financial results for the quarter and are on track to meet our total year expectations," said Dave Gartzke, ALLETE Chairman, President and CEO. Increased wholesale power sales and prices resulted in ENERGY SERVICES net income of $12.2 million compared with $9.1 million in the first quarter of 2002. AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES revenue climbed 12 percent and net income increased 7 percent in spite of difficult market conditions that resulted in flat sales volume at ADESA auctions compared to last year. In addition to net income from Water Services, this quarter's earnings from DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS included a $9.8 million after-tax gain on the condemnation sale of a utility system at Amelia Island, Florida. This more than offset $7.4 million of after-tax expenses associated with efforts to sell the Water Services businesses. In 2002, Discontinued Operations included exit charges of $2.3 million. The company also announced that representatives of its subsidiary, Florida Water Services Corporation, met on April 16, 2003 with leaders of local governments that have expressed an interest in purchasing the assets of Florida Water that serve their residents. The governmental entities at the meeting discussed acquiring directly from Florida Water approximately two-thirds of Florida Water's asset base. If it proceeds with this course of action, Florida Water would seek to sell the remaining one-third of its assets to other interested local governments, and the water systems not sold in this process would be sold to a private buyer. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE's holdings include ADESA, the second largest wholesale vehicle auction network in North America; AFC, the leading provider of independent auto dealer financing; Minnesota Power, a low-cost electric utility that serves some of the largest industrial customers in the United States; and significant real estate holdings in Florida. For more information about ALLETE, visit the company's Web site at www.allete.com. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [RECYCLE LOGO] recycled paper ALLETE - 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 www.allete.com
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20030528112843.txt.gz
TIME:20030528112843
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - MAY 28, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE. Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Ref. Page 47. - Item 10. Directors and Executive Officers of the Registrant On May 28, 2003 ALLETE announced the election of Dennis O. Green and Deborah L. Weinstein to its board of directors, effective June 1, 2003. Green, 62, is a Certified Public Accountant and former chief auditor at Citicorp and its principal subsidiary Citibank, N.A., where he was responsible for worldwide audit functions. Prior to his employment with Citicorp, Green was a finance executive with Ford Motor Company for 11 years, holding several positions including general auditor. Green also served in the Executive Office of the President, Office of Management and Budget during President Carter's administration. He is a graduate of Wayne State University and resides in Beaufort, South Carolina. Weinstein, 43, is co-founder and partner at LaBarge Weinstein, one of Canada's premier business law firms based in Ottawa, Ontario. She was a partner at Blake, Cassels & Graydon, one of Canada's largest law firms, from 1991 until 1997 and was managing partner at that firm's Ottawa office. Weinstein's work focuses on securities, mergers and acquisitions, and business law. She is personal legal advisor and trustee for Jean Chretien, Prime Minister of Canada. Weinstein is a graduate of Osgoode Hall Law School, Toronto, Ontario. ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 28, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 28, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. May 28, 2003 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------ James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 28, 2003 3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20030724142641.txt.gz
TIME:20030724142641
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - JULY 24, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE (ITEM 12. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION) Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following updates. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. On July 24, 2003 ALLETE issued a press release announcing second quarter 2003 earnings which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99 and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. The information is being filed pursuant to Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition and is being presented under Item 5. Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure in accordance with interim guidance issued by the Securities and Exchange Commission in Release Nos. 33-8216 and 34-47583. This information, including Exhibit 99 attached hereto, shall be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Act of 1934, and shall be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 21. - Third Paragraph On July 24, 2003 Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, signed a purchase agreement to sell seven of its Florida water and wastewater systems to governmental entities in Florida for $296 million payable at closing. The transaction will result in an after-tax gain of $55 million. The water and wastewater systems in this purchase agreement represent approximately two-thirds of Florida Water's assets and include those systems serving the counties of Osceola, Hernando, Citrus, Lee, and Charlotte, and the communities of Marco Island and Palm Coast. The cash proceeds after transaction costs, retirement of Florida Water debt and payment of income taxes are estimated at $158 million, and will be used to retire debt at ALLETE. The sale is expected to close by the end of 2003 pending satisfaction of certain contingencies and regulatory approvals in Florida. Florida Water will continue to seek buyers for its remaining water systems. If interested governmental entities cannot be found, the remaining systems are expected to be sold to a private buyer. ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, PRO FORMA FINANCIAL INFORMATION AND EXHIBITS. (a) Financial Statements - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated July 24, 2003 announcing 2003 second quarter earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 24, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate recent acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 24, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. July 24, 2003 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 24, 2003 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated July 24, 2003 announcing 2003 second quarter earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 24, 2003

[ALLETE LOGO] EXHIBIT 99 For Release: July 24, 2003 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE REPORTS SECOND-QUARTER NET INCOME GROWTH OF 14 PERCENT ------------------------------------------------------------- DULUTH, Minn.-- ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported second quarter 2003 earnings of 53 cents per share, compared with 47 cents per share in the second quarter of 2002. Net income rose 14 percent to $44.4 million on revenue of $409.9 million compared with $38.8 million of net income on $375.9 million of revenue in the second quarter of 2002. "We are pleased with the overall financial results for the quarter," said Dave Gartzke, ALLETE Chairman, President and CEO. "We remain confident that our total year performance expectations will be achieved." Net income at AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES was $34.1 million in the second quarter of 2003, an increase of 14 percent over the same time period last year. This was due to increased vehicle sales and improved conversion rates at ADESA's U.S. auctions, and lower interest expense. Conversion rates are the percentage of vehicles sold from those that were run through the auction lanes. Year-to-date earnings at Automotive Services were up 11 percent over the same period last year. ENERGY SERVICES net income was $6.8 million in the quarter compared with $9.7 million for the second quarter of 2002. The decrease was mainly due to the required recognition in 2002 of a $2.8 million mark-to-market accounting gain on the Kendall County power purchase agreement. Certain mark-to-market accounting rules were rescinded late in 2002, and this $2.8 million gain was reversed in the fourth quarter. Excluding this accounting entry, results in the second quarter of 2003 were similar to the same time period of 2002. Strong real estate sales at ALLETE Properties contributed to the $2.2 million increase in net income from INVESTMENTS AND CORPORATE CHARGES. Results from DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS were higher than in 2002 when ALLETE recorded exit charges relating to its vehicle transport businesses. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE's holdings include ADESA, the second largest wholesale vehicle auction network in North America; AFC, the leading provider of independent auto dealer financing; Minnesota Power, a low-cost electric utility that serves some of the largest industrial customers in the United States; and significant real estate holdings in Florida. For more information about ALLETE, visit the company's Web site at www.allete.com. - -------------- THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 www.allete.com
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20030820162417.txt.gz
TIME:20030820162417
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - AUGUST 18, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following updates. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 21. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 On August 18, 2003 ALLETE announced that its wholly owned subsidiary, Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), agreed to sell its water and wastewater system serving Deltona, Florida, to the city of Deltona for $59.5 million. Florida Water expects to realize an after-tax gain of approximately $20 million and to close on the sale by the end of the year pending satisfaction of certain contingencies and regulatory approvals in Florida. Deltona is one of Florida Water's larger systems serving 35,000 customers. Deltona joined seven other Florida communities who have announced plans to purchase water and wastewater systems from Florida Water. Combined the eight systems represent about 70 percent of Florida Water's assets and serve 187,000 customers. The total amount of the sale of the eight systems, including Deltona, is $356 million and represents an after-tax gain to Florida Water of about $75 million. The cash proceeds after transaction costs, retirement of Florida Water debt and payment of income taxes are estimated at $185 million, and will be used to retire debt at ALLETE. Florida Water continues to seek buyers for its remaining water and wastewater facilities. Systems for which governmental buyers are not found are expected to be sold to a private buyer. ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 20, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 20, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. August 20, 2003 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 20, 2003 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20030827165042.txt.gz
TIME:20030827165042
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - AUGUST 25, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following updates. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 21. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 20, 2003 On August 25, 2003 Florida Water Services Corporation, a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, entered into a First Amended and Restated Utility System Asset Acquisition Agreement to sell its Florida water and wastewater systems serving the counties of Osceola, Hernando, Citrus, Lee and Charlotte, and the communities of Marco Island, Palm Coast and Deltona. In accordance with Item 601 of Regulation S-K, ALLETE herewith files this agreement. ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS. (a) Financial Statements - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 2 - First Amended and Restated Utility System Asset Acquisition Agreement (without Appendices), entered into on August 25, 2003 by and among Hernando County, the City of Marco Island, the City of Palm Coast, Osceola County, Florida Governmental Utility Authority, the City of Deltona and Florida Water Services Corporation. ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 27, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 27, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. August 27, 2003 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 27, 2003 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 2 - First Amended and Restated Utility System Asset Acquisition Agreement (without Appendices), entered into on August 25, 2003, by and among Hernando County, the City of Marco Island, the City of Palm Coast, Osceola County, Florida Governmental Utility Authority, the City of Deltona and Florida Water Services Corporation. ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 27, 2003

Exhibit 2 ================================================================================ FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED UTILITY SYSTEM ASSET ACQUISITION AGREEMENT By and Among HERNANDO COUNTY, THE CITY OF MARCO ISLAND, THE CITY OF PALM COAST, OSCEOLA COUNTY, FLORIDA GOVERNMENTAL UTILITY AUTHORITY, THE CITY OF DELTONA and FLORIDA WATER SERVICES CORPORATION ================================================================================
TABLE OF CONTENTS ARTICLE I DEFINITIONS AND CONSTRUCTION SECTION 1.01. DEFINITIONS.....................................................3 SECTION 1.02. CONSTRUCTION AND INTERPRETATION................................10 SECTION 1.03. INCORPORATION..................................................10 SECTION 1.04. SECTION HEADINGS...............................................10 SECTION 1.05. APPENDICES.....................................................10 ARTICLE II PURCHASE AND SALE OF ASSETS SECTION 2.01. PURCHASE AND SALE COVENANT.....................................11 SECTION 2.02. PURCHASED ASSETS...............................................11 SECTION 2.03. EXCLUDED ASSETS................................................13 SECTION 2.04. PURCHASE PRICE.................................................13 SECTION 2.05. THIS SECTION INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK..........................13 SECTION 2.06. ASSUMED LIABILITIES............................................13 SECTION 2.07. VOLUSIA COUNTY CONTINGENCY.....................................15 SECTION 2.08. LEASED VEHICLES................................................16 SECTION 2.09. AS IS PURCHASE.................................................16 ARTICLE III DUE DILIGENCE ISSUES SECTION 3.01. PROVISION OF INFORMATION BY FLORIDA WATER......................17 SECTION 3.02. FINANCIAL DUE DILIGENCE........................................17 SECTION 3.03. ENGINEERING AND ENVIRONMENTAL DUE DILIGENCE....................17 SECTION 3.04. LEGAL DUE DILIGENCE............................................18 SECTION 3.05. DUE DILIGENCE DETERMINATIONS...................................18 SECTION 3.06. CURRENT EVIDENCE OF TITLE......................................18 SECTION 3.07. ENVIRONMENTAL PROVISIONS.......................................21 ARTICLE IV OTHER PRECLOSING MATTERS SECTION 4.01. ISSUANCE OF BONDS..............................................22 SECTION 4.02. TRANSITION SERVICES............................................23 SECTION 4.03. PRE-CLOSING APPROVALS..........................................23 SECTION 4.04. DISMISSAL OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS.................................26 i
ARTICLE V CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO THE BUYERS' OBLIGATION TO CLOSE SECTION 5.01. FLORIDA WATER'S PERFORMANCE....................................28 SECTION 5.02. ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTS...........................................28 SECTION 5.03. NO CONFLICT....................................................28 ARTICLE VI CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO FLORIDA WATER'S OBLIGATION TO CLOSE SECTION 6.01. THE BUYERS' PERFORMANCE........................................29 SECTION 6.02. ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTS...........................................29 SECTION 6.03. NO INJUNCTION..................................................29 ARTICLE VII COVENANTS OF FLORIDA WATER PRIOR TO CLOSING SECTION 7.01. ACCESS AND INVESTIGATION.......................................30 SECTION 7.02. OPERATION OF THE BUSINESS OF FLORIDA WATER.....................31 SECTION 7.03. NEGATIVE COVENANT..............................................32 SECTION 7.04. REQUIRED APPROVALS.............................................32 SECTION 7.05. NOTIFICATION...................................................32 SECTION 7.06. PAYMENT OF LIABILITIES.........................................33 ARTICLE VIII COVENANTS OF THE BUYERS SECTION 8.01. REQUIRED APPROVALS..............................................33 SECTION 8.02. CERTAIN REGULATORY PROCEEDINGS..................................33 SECTION 8.03. LEGAL OPINIONS..................................................33 SECTION 8.04. HERNANDO OBLIGATIONS............................................34 SECTION 8.05. FLORIDA WATER EMPLOYEES.........................................34 ARTICLE IX CLOSING PROCEDURES AND ADJUSTMENTS SECTION 9.01. CLOSING DATE AND PLACE.........................................36 SECTION 9.02. DOCUMENTS AFTER THE CLOSING....................................37 SECTION 9.03. RECORDING FEES AND DOCUMENTARY TAXES...........................38 SECTION 9.04. ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE; UNBILLED REVENUES; CUSTOMER DEPOSITS; ACCOUNTS PAYABLE............................38 SECTION 9.05. CONNECTION CHARGES.............................................40 SECTION 9.06. COSTS AND PROFESSIONAL FEES....................................41 SECTION 9.07. RISK OF LOSS...................................................41 SECTION 9.08. PROCEEDS OF SALE; CLOSING PROCEDURE............................41 SECTION 9.09. TRANSFER OF PERMITS............................................44 ii
SECTION 9.10. REGULATORY MATTERS.............................................44 SECTION 9.11. REGULATORY TRANSFER FILINGS....................................44 SECTION 9.12. ASSUMPTION BY THE BUYERS OF RESPONSIBILITY FOR SERVICE.........45 SECTION 9.13. PURCHASE PRICE ALLOCATION......................................45 ARTICLE X GENERAL PROVISIONS SECTION 10.01. RADON.........................................................45 SECTION 10.02. TIME IS OF THE ESSENCE........................................45 SECTION 10.03. ENFORCEMENT OF AGREEMENT......................................46 SECTION 10.04. APPLICABLE LAW; JURISDICTION AND VENUE........................46 SECTION 10.05. NOTICE........................................................46 SECTION 10.06. ASSIGNMENT AND JOINDER........................................48 SECTION 10.07. AMENDMENTS AND WAIVERS........................................49 SECTION 10.08. ENTIRE AGREEMENT..............................................50 SECTION 10.09. TERMINATION EVENTS............................................50 SECTION 10.10. EFFECT OF TERMINATION.........................................51 SECTION 10.11. BUYERS' REPRESENTATIVE........................................52 SECTION 10.12. SURVIVAL......................................................52 SECTION 10.13. JOINT AND SEVERAL LIABILITY...................................52 SECTION 10.14. COUNTERPARTS..................................................53 APPENDICES Appendix A Florida Water Service Areas Appendix B Easements Appendix C Excluded Assets Appendix D Fee Parcels Appendix E Florida Water Contracts with Affiliates Appendix F Stranded Contracts Appendix G Form of Florida Water and Buyers' Legal Opinions Appendix H Governmental Authorizations Appendix I Proceedings iii
FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED UTILITY SYSTEM ASSET ACQUISITION AGREEMENT THIS FIRST AMENDED AND RESTATED UTILITY SYSTEM ASSET ACQUISITION AGREEMENT (THE "AGREEMENT") is made and entered into as of the 25th day of August, 2003, by and among, Hernando County, a political subdivision of the State of Florida ("Hernando"); the City of Marco Island, Florida, a municipal corporation organized under the laws of the State of Florida ("Marco Island"); the City of Palm Coast, a municipal corporation organized under the laws of the State of Florida ("Palm Coast"); Osceola County ("Osceola"); and the Florida Governmental Utility Authority (the "GUA"), a legal entity and public body created by Interlocal Agreement pursuant to section 163.01(7)(g), Florida Statutes; the City of Deltona, Florida, a municipal corporation organized under the laws of the State of Florida ("Deltona") (Hernando, Marco Island, Palm Coast, Osceola, GUA, and Deltona collectively referred to as the "Buyers") and Florida Water Services Corporation ("Florida Water"), a Florida corporation. W I T N E S S E T H: WHEREAS, Florida Water owns utility assets which consist generally of potable water supply, treatment, storage, and distribution systems and wastewater collection, transmission, treatment, disposal and reuse systems which provide services to the service areas identified on APPENDIX A to this Agreement; and WHEREAS, Florida Water had no intention of selling its utility assets, but received the threat of condemnation or was served with lawsuits initiating condemnation actions against certain of its utility assets by various local governments throughout Florida with eminent domain
power, which threats and lawsuits Florida Water determined were inadvisable to resist and would result in unreasonable and extensive time and expense to defend; and WHEREAS, in lieu of condemnation, Florida Water has agreed to negotiate an amicable resolution of the condemnation threats and lawsuits with respect to certain of its utility systems by entering into this Agreement; and WHEREAS, Buyers each agree that the Purchase Price set forth in this Agreement is intended to fulfill the requirement under Article X, Section 6, Eminent Domain, of the Florida Constitution to pay full compensation to Florida Water for the Facilities being acquired by the Buyers under the terms of this Agreement in lieu of the Buyers and members of GUA filing formal eminent domain proceedings, and accordingly each Buyer agrees (1) that Florida Water is entitled to retain all of the Purchase Price and all of the gain to Florida Water arising out of or resulting from the sale of the Purchased Assets, customers and customer revenue streams without sharing, allocation or refund of such gain to any third party , including but not limited to, the past, present or future customers of the Florida Water Facilities being transferred to Buyers under this Agreement and the past, present or future customers of the Florida Water Facilities retained by Florida Water (collectively "Florida Water Customers"), (2) with the principle that the Florida Water Customers have no claims to the Purchase Price and that no party, other than Florida Water, has any rights with respect to the Purchase Price and (3) that the Buyers would have to pay a higher Purchase Price if provisions related to Gain On Sale (defined herein)were not included in this Agreement; and WHEREAS, Florida Water is entering into this Agreement expressly and solely in reliance upon the Buyers' agreement and representations set forth in the preceding WHEREAS 2
clause, absent which, Florida Water would not have agreed to the amount of the Purchase Price set forth in this Agreement; and WHEREAS, Hernando desires to acquire the Facilities located in the service area identified on APPENDIX A-1 (the "Hernando System"); Marco Island desires to acquire the Facilities located in the service area identified on APPENDIX A-2 (the "Marco Island System"); Palm Coast desires to acquire the Facilities located in the service area identified on APPENDIX A-3 (the "Palm Coast System"; Osceola desires to acquire the Facilities located in the service area identified on APPENDIX A-4 (the "Osceola System"); the GUA desires to acquire the Facilities located in the service areas identified on APPENDIX A-5 (the "GUA Systems"); and Deltona desires to acquire the Facilities located in the service areas identified on APPENDIX A-6 (the "Deltona System"); and Florida Water has consented to sell those Facilities to the Buyers in lieu of condemnation of such assets. NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing recitals and the benefits to be derived from mutual promises, covenants, representations and agreements contained herein, and other good and valuable consideration the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the parties to this Agreement do undertake, promise and agree for themselves, their permitted successors and assigns as follows: ARTICLE I DEFINITIONS AND CONSTRUCTION SECTION 1.01. DEFINITIONS. As used in this Agreement, the following terms shall have the meanings as defined herein unless the context requires otherwise: "AFFILIATE" means (a) any Person that directly or indirectly controls, is directly or indirectly controlled by or is directly or indirectly under common control with Florida Water; or 3
(b) any Person that holds a material interest in, or serves as a director, officer, partner, executor or trustee of Florida Water. "AGREEMENT" means this Utility System Asset Acquisition Agreement, including any amendments, supplements and appendices hereto executed and delivered in accordance with the terms hereof. "APPURTENANCES" means all privileges, rights, easements, hereditaments, and appurtenances owned by Florida Water for the benefit of the Fee Parcels, including all easements appurtenant to and for the benefit of any Fee Parcel (a "Dominant Parcel") for, and as the primary means of access between, the Dominant Parcel and a public way, or for any other use upon which lawful use of the Dominant Parcel for the purposes for which it is presently being used is dependent, and all rights existing in and to any streets, alleys, passages and other rights-of-way included thereon or adjacent thereto (before or after vacation thereof) and vaults beneath any such streets. "ASSUMED LIABILITIES" means those obligations assumed by Buyers or Buyers' Contractors at Closing and upon taking ownership of the Purchased Assets as set forth in Section 2.06 of this Agreement. "BEST EFFORTS" means the efforts that a prudent Person desirous of achieving a result would use in similar circumstances to achieve that result as expeditiously as possible, provided, however, that a Person required to use Best Efforts under this Agreement will not be thereby required to take actions that would result in a material adverse change in the benefits to such Person of this Agreement and the Contemplated Transactions or to dispose of or make any change to its business, expend any material funds or incur any other material burden. "BONDS" has the meaning set forth in Section 4.01 of this Agreement. 4
"BUSINESS DAY" means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or a day on which banking institutions in the State of Florida are authorized or obligated by law to close. "CLOSING" or "CLOSING DATE" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.01 of this Agreement. Where the context requires, Closing and Closing Date shall include Early Closing Date(s). "CONNECTION CHARGES" means the funds collected from new customers of the Utility System at or prior to initial connection as authorized by the Florida Water Tariffs to defray the cost of making utility services available. Connection Charges include capacity, main extension, allowance for funds prudently invested, guaranteed revenues or other charges paid for the availability of utility services. "CONTEMPLATED TRANSACTIONS" means all of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. "EASEMENTS" means the easements listed on APPENDIX B-1 for the Hernando System; APPENDIX B-2 for the Marco Island System; APPENDIX B-3 for the Palm Coast System; APPENDIX B-4 for the Osceola System; APPENDIX B-5 for the GUA Systems; and APPENDIX B-6 for the Deltona System. "EFFECTIVE TIME" means 12:01 am. on the Closing Date. "ENCUMBRANCE" means any charge, claim, condition, equitable interest, lien, option, pledge, security interest, mortgage, right of way, easement, encroachment, servitude, right of first option, right of first refusal or similar restriction, including any restriction on use, voting (in the case of any security or equity interest), transfer, receipt of income or exercise of any other attribute of ownership. 5
"EXCLUDED ASSETS" means those Florida Water assets, properties and rights, both tangible and intangible, real and personal, which are not sold, conveyed or transferred to Buyers pursuant to this Agreement, including, but not limited to the Florida Water headquarters in Apopka, Florida and all billing systems, customer service systems, engineering systems, operations and maintenance systems, computer and other information systems located at the Apopka headquarters. The Excluded Assets shall also include the proceeds from any condemnation action filed against Florida Water prior to Closing. The Excluded Assets are listed on APPENDIX C. "FACILITIES" means (1) the Fee Parcels, (2) the Easements and Appurtenances, and (3) the Personal Property, but excluding the Excluded Assets. "FISCAL YEAR" means a fiscal year which begins on October 1 and ends on September 30. "FEE PARCELS" means those parcels of real property more particularly described in APPENDIX D-1 for the Hernando System; APPENDIX D-2 for the Marco Island System; APPENDIX D-3 for the Palm Coast System; APPENDIX D-4 for the Osceola System; APPENDIX D-5 for the GUA Systems; and APPENDIX D-6 for the Deltona System. "FLORIDA WATER CONTRACT" means any contract, promise, or undertaking with respect to the Utility System that is capable of being segregated to each or any of the Buyers: (a) under which Florida Water has or may acquire any rights or benefits; (b) under which Florida Water has or may become subject to any obligation or liability; or (c) by which Florida Water or any of the assets owned or used by Florida Water is or may become bound or are encumbered. "FLORIDA WATER TARIFFS" means all water and wastewater tariffs filed by Florida Water and approved by the Florida Public Service Commission or by a county regulatory authority and in effect on the Closing Date. 6
"GAIN ON SALE" means the sharing, allocation or refund of Florida Water's economic gain on any utility system transfer. "GOVERNING DOCUMENTS" means the articles or certificate of incorporation and the bylaws of Florida Water. "GOVERNMENTAL AUTHORIZATION" means any consent, license, certificate of authorization, registration or permit issued, granted, given or otherwise made available by or under the authority of any Governmental Body or pursuant to any Legal Requirement. "GOVERNMENTAL BODY" means any: (a) federal, state, local, municipal, or other government; (b) governmental authority of any nature (including any agency, branch, department, board, commission, court, tribunal or other entity exercising governmental powers ); or (c) body exercising any administrative, executive, judicial, quasi- judicial, legislative, police, regulatory or taxing authority or power. "GUA SYSTEM" means the systems included in the Utility Systems as shown on APPENDIX A-5 to include the Lee County System, Citrus County System and Charlotte County System. This term may be used to refer to these systems individually or collectively in this Agreement. "KNOWLEDGE" means (1) as to Florida Water, the actual knowledge of Florida Water's directors and officers, without the requirement of diligent inquiry and subsequent investigation, or (2) as to Buyers, the actual knowledge of Buyers' individual governing board members, administrative heads and contractors, engineers and advisors, without the requirement of diligent inquiry and subsequent investigation. 7
"LEGAL REQUIREMENT" means any federal, state, local, municipal, or other constitution, law, ordinance, principle of common law, code, regulation, or statute. "ORDER" means any order, injunction, judgment, decree, ruling, assessment or arbitration award of any Governmental Body or arbitrator. "ORDINARY COURSE OF BUSINESS" means an action taken by a Person will be deemed to have been taken in the Ordinary Course of Business only if that action is consistent in nature, scope and magnitude with the past practices of such Person and is taken in the ordinary course of the normal, day-to-day operations of such Person. "PERMITTED REAL ESTATE ENCUMBRANCES" has its meaning defined in Section 3.06 in this Agreement. "PERSON" means an individual, a statutorily authorized customer(s) representative, partnership, corporation, business trust, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated association, joint venture or other entity or a Governmental Body. "PERSONAL PROPERTY" means the personal property assets that are both (1) owned and used by Florida Water in the operation of the Utility System, and (2) located within the service areas identified in APPENDIX A. "PROCEEDING" means any action, arbitration, audit, hearing, investigation, litigation or suit (whether civil, criminal, administrative, judicial or investigative, whether formal or informal, whether public or private) commenced, brought, conducted or heard by or before, or otherwise involving, any Governmental Body or arbitrator. "PSC" means the Florida Public Service Commission. 8
"PURCHASED ASSETS" means the asset being acquired by Buyers as defined in Section 2.02 below. "PURCHASE PRICE" means the payment to be made at Closing by Buyers to Florida Water for the Purchased Assets. "REAL PROPERTY" means the Fee Parcels. "SIGNATURE DATE" means July 24, 2003. "THIRD PARTY" means a Person that is not a party to this Agreement. "TITLE COMMITMENT" means one or more title insurance commitments with respect to the Fee Parcels in the aggregate amount not to exceed the Purchase Price, as provided herein, issued by Florida Water's attorney committing the Title Company to issue and deliver the Title Policies to Buyers upon compliance with the requirements stated in Schedule B, Section 1 thereof, subject to the terms and conditions contained therein. "TITLE COMPANY" means Commonwealth Land Title Insurance Company, a Pennsylvania corporation. "TITLE POLICY" or "TITLE POLICIES" means one or more ALTA owner's policies of title insurance (10/17/92) (with Florida modifications) as provided in this Agreement, issued by the Title Company in accordance with the Title Commitment and which meets the requirements of Section 3.06 of this Agreement. "TRANSACTION COSTS" means the costs, fees and expenses incurred by the Buyers in connection with this transaction. "TRANSFER DOCUMENTS" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.08 of this Agreement. "UTILITY SYSTEM" means the Facilities located in the service areas identified on APPENDIX A, other than Excluded Assets. 9
SECTION 1.02. CONSTRUCTION AND INTERPRETATION. (A) Words that indicate a singular number shall include the plural in each case and vice versa, and words that import a person shall include legal entities, firms and corporations. (B) The terms "herein," "hereunder," "hereby," "hereof," and any similar terms, shall refer to this Agreement; the term "heretofore" shall mean before the Signature Date; and the term "hereafter" shall mean on or after the Signature Date. (C) Words that reference only one gender shall include all genders. (D) This Agreement shall be construed as resulting from joint negotiation and authorship. No part of this Agreement shall be construed as the product of any one of the parties hereto. SECTION 1.03. INCORPORATION. Each party represents that the recitals set forth in this Agreement are true and correct as they pertain to each party and are incorporated herein and made a part of this Agreement. The Appendices hereto and each of the documents referred to therein are incorporated and made a part hereof in their entirety. SECTION 1.04. SECTION HEADINGS. Any headings preceding the texts of the several Articles, Sections or Appendices in this Agreement and any table of contents or marginal notes appended to copies hereof, shall be solely for the convenience of reference and shall neither constitute a part of this Agreement nor affect its meaning, construction or effect. SECTION 1.05 APPENDICES. Florida Water shall provide copies of Appendices to Buyers within twenty (20) days after the Signature Date. Within fifteen (15) days of Buyers' receipt of the Exhibits, Buyers shall each provide Florida Water with written notice of objection to an Exhibit, or part thereof. In the event of a timely objection by a Buyer, the parties shall have five (5) days to resolve the objection of that Buyer or, the Buyer giving 10
timely notice may elect to terminate its participation in the Agreement, and the Agreement shall terminate as to that Buyer, or at the option of Florida Water, Florida Water may terminate the Agreement in its entirety. Upon a termination per the above, Florida Water and the affected Buyer(s) shall have no liability and no further obligation to each other under this Agreement. In the event that no timely objection is received, the Appendices delivered to Buyers shall be deemed to have been accepted by the parties as the Appendices to this Agreement. ARTICLE II PURCHASE AND SALE OF ASSETS SECTION 2.01. PURCHASE AND SALE COVENANT. At Closing, each of the Buyers shall purchase from Florida Water and Florida Water shall sell and convey to each of the Buyers the part of the Utility System being acquired by such Buyer upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement. SECTION 2.02. PURCHASED ASSETS. The Purchased Assets consist of any ownership interest which Florida Water has on the Signature Date or hereafter acquires until the Closing Date in the Utility Systems subject to the Closing, but do not include the Excluded Assets. Purchased Assets include, but are not limited to, any of the following that are part of the Utility System subject to the Closing: (1) All water and wastewater treatment plants, including reuse and reclaimed water wells, water supplies, wells, collection, transmission, and distribution system piping, pumping, and effluent and disposal facilities of every kind and description whatsoever including without limitation, all trade fixtures, leasehold improvements, licenses, lift stations, pumps, generators, controls, tanks, distribution, collection or transmission pipes or facilities, valves, meters, service connections, and all other physical facilities, appurtenances and property 11
installations used in the operation of the Utility System, together with an assignment of all existing and assignable options to purchase real property and third party warranties that relate to completed or in progress construction, all as described in the Appendices hereto. (2) The Fee Parcels. (3) The Easements, together with any other easement rights possessed by Florida Water at Closing, whether identified prior to or after Closing. (4) The Governmental Authorizations. (5) The equipment, parts, tools, chemicals, office buildings, computer hardware and associated SCADA software located at the Fee Parcels (to the extent transferable without cost), office fixtures and other personal property owned by Florida Water and used exclusively in connection with the operation of the Utility System. (6) Customer deposits and interest earned thereon received by Florida Water up to and including the Closing Date. (7) Utility service fees due and payable on and subsequent to the Closing Date pursuant to lot installment sales contracts payable by third parties for the benefit of Florida Water. Florida Water will provide Buyers copies of current customer records, as-built surveys and water and wastewater plans, plats, engineering and other drawings, designs, blueprints, plans and specifications, maintenance and operating manuals, engineering reports, calculations, studies, non-corporate accounting, and non-corporate business records, in each case, controlled by or in the possession of Florida Water that relate exclusively to the description and operation of the Utility System. 12
SECTION 2.03. EXCLUDED ASSETS. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, Purchased Assets do not include the Excluded Assets. SECTION 2.04. PURCHASE PRICE. The Purchase Price for the Purchased Assets comprises the aggregate of the following individual purchase prices for each identified utility system: 1. Palm Coast System $82,772,934 2. Marco Island System $85,313,143 3. Osceola System $38,070,835 4. Hernando System $35,574,025 5. GUA Systems a. Citrus System $16,058,337 b. Lee System $34,503,538 c. Charlotte System $3,753,122 6. Deltona System $59,478,752 ----------- The Purchase Price shall be due and payable by the respective Buyers to Florida Water in immediately available funds at Closing by wire transfer pursuant to wire instructions to be provided by Florida Water at or prior to Closing. SECTION 2.05. THIS SECTION INTENTIONALLY LEFT BLANK. SECTION 2.06. ASSUMED LIABILITIES. (A) On the Closing Date, but effective as of the Effective Time, each of the Buyers shall assume and agree to discharge only the following liabilities of Florida Water related to such part of the Utility System being acquired by such Buyer (the "Assumed Liabilities"): 13
(1) any liability to Florida Water's customers (other than (a) accounts payable and (b) any liability arising out of or relating to a breach of contract that occurred prior to the Effective Time) incurred by Florida Water in the Ordinary Course of Business; (2) any liability arising after the Effective Time under the Florida Water Contracts (other than any liability arising out of or relating to a breach that occurred prior to the Effective Time); any liability of Florida Water arising after the Effective Time under any Florida Water Contract that is entered into by Florida Water after the Signature Date in the Ordinary Course of Business (or, as to any Florida Water Affiliate, subject to Buyer approval, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld,) or in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement (other than any liability (excluding the liabilities referenced in Section 8.04 hereof) arising out of or relating to a breach that occurred prior to the Effective Time). Florida Water represents that, to the best of its Knowledge, APPENDIX "E" is an accurate and complete listing of material Florida Water Contracts with its Affiliates; (3) any liability of Buyers under this Agreement or any other document executed in connection with the Contemplated Transactions; (4) any liability of Buyers based upon Buyers' acts or omissions occurring after the Effective Time; and (5) any liability arising from or related to the operation of the Utility System after the Closing (other than any liability arising out of or relating to a breach of this Agreement that occurred prior to the Effective Time), whether entered into prior to the Closing Date by Florida Water or after the Closing Date by Buyers. Notwithstanding the foregoing, even if included in the foregoing, the following shall not constitute Liabilities assumed by Buyers and, therefore, not be included in the term 14
"Assumed Liabilities": (1) any liability arising out of or relating to any employee grievance whether or not the affected employees are hired by Buyers based on actual or alleged acts or omissions of Florida Water prior to the Effective Time, (2) any liability of Florida Water arising out of or resulting from any Proceeding pending as of the Effective Time that is not required to be dismissed under Section 4.04, (3) any liability of Florida Water arising out of any Proceeding commenced after the Effective Time and arising out of or relating to any occurrence or event happening prior to the Effective Time to the extent that the such Proceeding relates to Florida Water's actions or inactions prior thereto, (4) any liability for Florida Water's performance of its obligations hereunder, (5) any liability of Florida Water based upon Florida Water's acts or omissions occurring after the Effective Time, and (6) (i) liabilities under system-wide contracts the obligations of which cannot be allocated to the separated Utility Systems (Stranded Contracts) sold hereunder as set forth in APPENDIX F, (ii) any refundable advances between Florida Water and Florida Water Affiliates; and (iii) any refundable advances with third parties which accelerate and are due upon a sale of any Utility System. (B) By assuming any agreement or liability hereunder, the Buyers do not waive rights of sovereign immunity, the right to exercise its police powers in the operation of each Utility System, the right to adjust rates and charges, including Connection Charges, in such amounts as may from time to time be established by the Buyers, and the Buyers' obligations to apply ordinances, policies and practices in a non-discriminatory manner for each Utility System. SECTION 2.07. VOLUSIA COUNTY CONTINGENCY. In the event Volusia County breaches the so-called "stand-down" Agreement dated August 18, 2003 between Volusia County and Florida Water ("Stand-Down Agreement"), Florida Water may elect to terminate this Agreement with regard to the Deltona System only. In 15
that event, Deltona and Florida Water shall have no liabilities and no further obligations to each other under this Agreement. SECTION 2.08. LEASED VEHICLES. The Buyers acknowledge that certain rolling stock utilized by Florida Water in the operation of the Utility System are leased from entities that will not consent to assignment of such leases to the Buyers, and that such rolling stock is therefore not included in the Purchased Assets. Accordingly, the Buyers shall have thirty (30) days after the Signature Date to identify which, if any, of such leased vehicles the Buyers requests be acquired by Florida Water from the leasing entities and transferred to the Buyers at Closing. For each such leased vehicle so identified by the Buyers, Florida Water will provide Buyers with a buy-out cost from the leasing entities for approval by the Buyers. For each leased vehicle buy-out approved by the Buyers, such leased vehicle shall be acquired by Florida Water at Closing and transferred to the Buyers. The Buyers shall reimburse Florida Water at Closing for the acquisition cost of each leased vehicle approved by the Buyers. SECTION 2.09. AS IS PURCHASE Except as expressly provided herein, the purchase of assets under this Agreement is "AS IS" and there are no representations, covenants, warranties or retention and assumption of liabilities other than those specifically set forth in this Agreement, including but not limited to, any representations, covenants, warranties or retention and assumption of liabilities in respect to environment matters. 16
ARTICLE III DUE DILIGENCE ISSUES SECTION 3.01. PROVISION OF INFORMATION BY FLORIDA WATER. (A) Florida Water has provided or will provide to the Buyers within thirty (30) days of the Signature Date (1) an inventory updated through at least March 1, 2003, of equipment, parts, computer equipment and other personal property used by Florida Water in connection with the operation of the Utility System to be conveyed to the Buyers; and (2) copies of current tariffs applicable to the Utility System setting forth the most current schedule of rates, fees and charges that Florida Water is authorized to impose by appropriate regulatory authorities. (B) Florida Water shall cooperate with the Buyers in providing updated information and access to the Utility System to Buyers' Contractors, engineers and advisors as necessary to complete financial, engineering, environmental and legal due diligence. (C) Florida Water shall make any existing plats, surveys, plans or specifications for the Utility System in Florida Water's possession available to the Buyers, or its representatives, for inspection during normal business hours upon reasonable notice. (D) Florida Water shall cooperate with the Buyers' Contractors, engineers and advisors in providing information requested which is reasonably necessary to issue and sell the Bonds, including any information required by applicable securities laws. SECTION 3.02. FINANCIAL DUE DILIGENCE. The Buyers are relying upon their own financial due diligence investigation in entering into this Agreement. SECTION 3.03. ENGINEERING AND ENVIRONMENTAL DUE DILIGENCE. Buyers are relying upon their own engineering and environmental compliance due diligence investigation in entering into this Agreement. 17
SECTION 3.04. LEGAL DUE DILIGENCE. Buyers are relying upon their own legal due diligence investigation in entering into this Agreement. SECTION 3.05. DUE DILIGENCE DETERMINATIONS. (A) Based upon the results of the due diligence investigations conducted pursuant to Sections 3.02, 3.03, and 3.04 of this Agreement, the Buyers have waived any defects that were revealed or should have been revealed through the due diligence investigations. (B) Except as otherwise specified herein, no payment shall be due from Florida Water and no reductions in the Purchase Price will be made for deficiencies of the Purchased Assets. Except as otherwise specified herein, Florida Water shall have no obligations or liabilities to the Buyers with respect to the condition of the Purchased Assets after Closing. SECTION 3.06. CURRENT EVIDENCE OF TITLE. (A) Florida Water will furnish to each Buyer within forty-five (45) days after the Signature Date, at Florida Water's expense, from Commonwealth Land Title Insurance Company (the "Title Insurer"): (1) a title commitment or title commitments issued by the Title Insurer to insure title to each parcel listed therein in the aggregate amount of the Purchase Price naming Buyers as the proposed insureds and having the effective dates as set forth therein, wherein the Title Insurer will have agreed to issue an ALTA form owner's title insurance policy 1992 (10-17-92) with Florida modifications (collectively the "Title Commitment"); and (2) copies of all recorded documents listed as special Schedule B-2 exceptions thereunder (the "Recorded Documents"). (B) The Title Commitment shall include the Title Insurer's requirements for issuing its title policy, which requirements shall be met by Florida Water as provided in Section 3.06(E) 18
on or before the Closing Date (including those requirements that must be met by releasing or satisfying monetary Encumbrances, but excluding Encumbrances that will remain after Closing as agreed to by the Buyers and those requirements that are to be met solely by the Buyers). (C) If any of the following shall occur (collectively, a "Title Objection"): (1) The Title Commitment or other evidence of title or search of the appropriate real estate records discloses that any party other than Florida Water has title to the insured estate covered by the Title Commitment; (2) any title exception is disclosed in Schedule B to any Title Commitment that is not one of the Permitted Real Estate Encumbrances; or (3) any current survey discloses any matter that Buyers reasonably believe could materially and adversely affect Buyers' material use and enjoyment of the Fee Parcels described therein; then Buyers shall notify Florida Water in writing ("Buyers' Notice") of such matters within thirty (30) days prior to the Closing Date. (D) Florida Water shall use its Best Efforts to cure each Title Objection and take all steps required by the Title Insurer to eliminate each Title Objection as an exception to the Title Commitment. Any Title Objection that the Title Company is willing to insure over on terms acceptable to Florida Water and the Buyers is herein referred to as an "Insured Exception." The Insured Exceptions, together with any title exception or matters disclosed by any survey and not objected to by the Buyers in the manner aforesaid shall be deemed to be acceptable to Buyers. (E) Florida Water shall use its Best Efforts to comply with the requirements of Schedule B Section 1 of the Title Commitment. At the Closing, Florida Water shall identify any Schedule B Section 1 requirements that cannot be satisfied as of the Closing. Florida Water and the Buyers shall agree on a post-Closing process to satisfy these requirements (the "Post-Closing 19
Schedule B Requirements"). Florida Water shall indemnify the Buyers as to all Post-Closing Schedule B requirements that are not satisfied in accordance with the agreed upon post-Closing process. The Buyers shall cooperate with Florida Water in satisfying the Post-Closing Schedule B requirements, including, but not limited to, exercise of eminent domain powers if requested by Florida Water (with Florida Water to bear the expense of any such eminent domain action). (F) The Buyers shall have the right, but not the obligation, to do such surveys on the Real Property as Buyers desire. Surveys done pursuant to this Section shall be at the sole cost and expense of the Buyers. (G) In the event that the Buyers would like to have any standard survey exceptions deleted or modified in the Title Policy, the Buyers shall deliver to Florida Water's attorneys, not later than thirty (30) days prior to the Closing Date, properly certified and current original surveys of the specified fee parcels which comply with Section 627.7842(1)(a), Florida Statutes. As to each such survey timely delivered by Buyers, Florida Water shall include in the title policy a "blanket exception" as to the applicable fee parcel/survey (i.e, As to parcel _______, all matters which appear on the survey by ______, P.L.S. dated __________.") (H) "Permitted Real Estate Encumbrances" shall include, in addition to the other matters provided herein, any Notices of Commencement which pertain to ongoing construction projects of Florida Water, provided Florida Water agrees to indemnify Buyers from same at Closing. (I) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, Title Commitments or title insurance with respect to Fee Parcels for extraterritorial properties located outside the corporate limits of Palm Coast and Marco Island may require evidence from Buyers satisfactory to the Title Insurer of such Buyer's authority to acquire said Fee Parcels, and Buyers shall accept 20
any exception from coverage for any claim based on a failure of such authority as determined by the Title Insurer. SECTION 3.07. ENVIRONMENTAL PROVISIONS (A) For purposes of this Section: (1) "Hazardous Materials" shall mean any substance or material regulated by any federal, state or local governmental entity under any Environmental Law as a hazardous material, hazardous substance, hazardous waste, pollutant, contaminant, toxic waste, toxic substance or words of similar import, including petroleum and petroleum products, by-products or breakdown products, but excluding mold and other biological contaminants, asbestos, asbestos containing materials, lead paint, insulating materials, paints and coatings applied to building surfaces and equipment, and other building and construction materials, whether or not toxic (collectively, "Building Substances"); (2) "Environmental Laws" shall mean any statute, law, regulation, ordinance, injunction, judgment, order, or other decree of any governmental authority pertaining to the protection of the environment, including the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, the Oil Pollution Act of 1990, Toxic Substances Control Act, and any comparable state statute, law, regulation, ordinance, injunction, judgment, order, or other decree, but excluding any statute, law, regulation, ordinance, injunction, judgment, order, or other decree of any governmental authority pertaining to Building Substances. (B) Florida Water has no Knowledge of any material non-compliance with any Environmental Law or material liability under any Environmental Law. For purposes of this Section, "material" shall mean any matter reasonably expected to result in the expenditure of 21
over one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to correct the non-compliance or satisfy the liability. (C) Buyers have performed assessments as they have deemed appropriate, including Phase I Environmental Assessments pursuant to applicable ASTM standards and Phase II Environmental Assessments for recognized environmental concerns identified in the Phase I Environmental Assessments. Buyers shall be responsible for the costs to remediate environmental concerns that are or should have been identified in the Phase I and Phase II Assessments. ARTICLE IV OTHER PRECLOSING MATTERS SECTION 4.01. ISSUANCE OF BONDS. Each Buyer intends to individually issue revenue Bonds (the "Bonds") to pay the Transaction Costs and the Purchase Price for such Buyer's Utility System as set forth in Section 2.04 of this Agreement. The Buyers' obligation to close the Contemplated Transactions in this Agreement shall be and is expressly conditioned upon the issuance of such Bonds. In the event any of the Buyers in good faith determine that its Bonds cannot be delivered on a date that permits the Closing to occur on or prior to December 8, 2003, such Buyer shall immediately notify Florida Water in writing of such determination, with such notice setting forth in reasonable detail the bases upon which such determination was made. Upon receipt of such notice, Florida Water shall have the option of canceling this Agreement as to: (1) any of the Utility Systems for which Bonds cannot be delivered; or (2) all Utility Systems; provided, however, that Florida Water shall have the right to elect to proceed to Closing on the sale of such Utility Systems for which Bonds can be delivered. As to any Utility System for which Florida 22
Water has exercised its right to terminate this Agreement, such Buyer and Florida Water shall have no liabilities and no further obligations to each other under this Agreement. SECTION 4.02. TRANSITION SERVICES. On or before forty-five (45) days after the Signature Date, the Buyers and Florida Water will enter into a contract delineating cooperation for certain services to be provided by Buyers to assist Florida Water in the operation of its systems not sold under this Agreement, and ownership transition and the transition services, if any, to be provided by Florida Water following the Closing (the "Transition Agreement"). It is understood and agreed between the parties that immediately upon the signing of this Agreement by Florida Water, Florida Water shall give the Buyers access to Florida Water's Facilities, records and computer systems and Florida Water employees shall cooperate with the Buyers to facilitate the transition to the Buyers' ownership and operation of the Purchased Assets. SECTION 4.03. PRE-CLOSING APPROVALS (A) Within ninety (90) days from the date of approval of this Agreement by Palm Coast, Palm Coast shall obtain the written consent of the governing regulatory body in Flagler County to Florida Water's application for transfer of the Utility System in Flagler County (the "Flagler County Consent"), which consent must remain in effect through the Closing Date. In the event that Palm Coast has not timely obtained the Flagler County Consent, Florida Water may (1) terminate this Agreement in total, (2) terminate this Agreement as to Palm Coast only; or (3) waive this requirement and proceed to Closing. (B) Within forty-five (45) days from the Signature Date, the GUA shall obtain the written consent of each Governmental Body within which the GUA Systems are located to the GUA's acquisition of the GUA Systems (the "GUA System Consents"), which consents must 23
remain in effect through the Closing Date. In the event that the GUA has not timely obtained all of the GUA County Consents, Florida Water may (1) terminate this Agreement in total, (2) terminate this Agreement as to the GUA only; (3) delete any or all of the GUA Systems for which the GUA has not obtained consent from the Purchased Assets to be acquired by the GUA under this Agreement; or (3) waive this requirement and proceed to Closing. (C) In the event that any of the Governmental Bodies within which the GUA Systems are located determine not to consent to the GUA acquisition of such part of the GUA Systems, and requests to join in on this Agreement as a direct purchaser of such part of the GUA Systems from Florida Water, the Buyers shall consent to such joinder. Florida Water shall have the sole discretion to determine whether to permit such a joinder, and shall have the sole right to negotiate the purchase price for such part of the GUA Systems with the requesting government. (D) Within ninety (90) days from the date of approval of this Agreement by Marco Island, Marco Island shall obtain the written consent of the governing body in Collier County to Florida Water's application for transfer of the Utility System in Collier County (the "Collier County Consent"), which consents must remain in effect through the Closing Date. In the event that Marco Island has not timely obtained the Collier County Consent, Florida Water may (1) terminate this Agreement in total, (2) terminate this Agreement as to Marco Island only; or (3) waive this requirement and proceed to Closing. (E) Within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of approval of this Agreement by Osceola, Osceola shall obtain an order from the PSC approving Osceola's acquisition of the Utility System in Osceola County (the "Osceola PSC Consent"), which consents must remain in effect through the Closing Date. In the event that Osceola has not timely obtained the Osceola PSC Consent, Florida Water may (1) terminate this Agreement in 24
total, (2) terminate this Agreement as to Osceola only; or (3) waive this requirement and proceed to Closing. (F) Within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of approval of this Agreement by GUA, GUA shall obtain an order from the PSC approving GUA's acquisition of the GUA Systems (the "GUA PSC Consents"), which consents must remain in effect through the Closing Date. In the event that GUA has not timely obtained the GUA PSC Consents, Florida Water may (1) terminate this Agreement in total, (2) terminate this Agreement as to GUA only; or (3) waive this requirement and proceed to Closing. (G) Within ninety (90) days from the date of approval of this Agreement by Hernando, Hernando shall obtain the written consent of the Hernando County Regulatory body to Hernando's acquisition of the Utility System in Hernando County (the "Hernando County Consent"), which consent must remain in effect through the Closing Date. In the event that Hernando has not timely obtained the Hernando County Consent, Florida Water may (1) terminate this Agreement in total, (2) terminate this Agreement as to Hernando only; or (3) waive this requirement and proceed to Closing. (H) Within ninety (90) days from the date of approval of this Agreement by GUA, GUA shall deliver to Florida Water a certified statement evidencing that Citrus County has obtained the written consent of the Citrus County Regulatory body to Citrus County's acquisition of the Utility System in Citrus County (the "Citrus County Consent"), which consents must remain in effect through the Closing Date. In the event that Citrus County has not timely obtained the Citrus County Consent, Florida Water may (1) terminate this Agreement in total, (2) terminate this Agreement as to Citrus County only; or (3) waive this requirement and proceed to Closing. 25
(I) Within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of approval of this Agreement by Deltona, Deltona shall obtain an order from the PSC approving Deltona's acquisition of the Utility System in Volusia County (the "Deltona PSC Consent"), which consent must remain in effect through the Closing Date. In the event that Deltona has not timely obtained the Deltona PSC Consent, Florida Water may (1) terminate this Agreement in total, (2) terminate this Agreement as to Deltona only; or (3) waive this requirement and proceed to Closing. (J) Within forty-five (45) days of the Signature Date, the Contemplated Transactions shall be formally approved by the governing body of each Buyer following a public hearing conducted pursuant to law; provided that, as to Deltona, the forty-five (45) day period shall run from the date of the Stand-Down Agreement (as defined herein). In the event the governing body of a given Buyer does not approve the transaction, this Agreement will terminate as to that Buyer and, at the option of Florida Water, may terminate in its entirety, with no future obligation on the part of the parties affected by such termination. SECTION 4.04. DISMISSAL OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS. (A) Within 3 days after Closing, each Buyer participating in such Closing shall: (i) dismiss with prejudice any and all complaints, claims, lawsuits and/or regulatory proceedings pending against Florida Water and/or the Florida Water Services Authority; (ii) dismiss with prejudice any and all complaints claims, lawsuits and/or regulatory proceedings related in any way to the sale of Florida Water's Assets; and (iii) use Best Efforts to secure written confirmation from any county regulatory body with jurisdiction over the Florida Water assets purchased by the Buyer that such county regulatory body has dismissed or closed any formal or informal investigation or inquiry concerning such assets or Florida Water's operation thereof. 26
With respect to regulatory proceedings dismissed per the preceding sentence, dismissal with prejudice means that no future regulatory proceedings can be initiated which relate to matters addressed in the dismissed proceeding. For the GUA Closing, the GUA shall provide evidence that each Governmental Body within which the GUA Systems are located shall comply with the requirements of this Section. This includes, without limitation, dismissal by Charlotte County of its litigation against Florida Water. (B) Within 3 days after each Buyer has secured dismissal all of the legal proceedings described in Section A related to that Buyer's acquisition, Florida Water will dismiss with prejudice any and all complaints, claims, lawsuits and/or regulatory proceedings pending against such Buyer that has secured dismissal of all legal proceedings described to in Section A. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, in response to a Person bringing a claim against Florida Water relating to low pressure issues in Hernando County, Florida Water reserves the right to maintain current and bring new claims, counter-claims, cross-claims or lawsuits against Hernando County. (C) Following execution and delivery of this Agreement by Florida Water, each party shall agree to hold all proceedings affected by this Section 4.04 in abeyance until Closing and dismissal. ARTICLE V CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO THE BUYERS' OBLIGATION TO CLOSE The Buyers' obligation to purchase the Purchased Assets and to take the other actions required to be taken by the Buyers at the Closing is subject to the satisfaction, at or prior to the Closing, of each of the following conditions (any of which may be waived by the Buyers, in whole or in part). 27
SECTION 5.01. FLORIDA WATER'S PERFORMANCE. All of the covenants and obligations that Florida Water is required to perform or to comply with pursuant to this Agreement at or prior to the Closing (considered collectively), and each of these covenants and obligations (considered individually), shall have been duly performed and complied with in all material respects. SECTION 5.02. ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTS. Florida Water shall have caused the documents and instruments required by this Agreement and the following documents to be delivered (or made available ) to the Buyers: (A) The articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto of Florida Water, duly certified as of a recent date by the Secretary of State; (B) A legal opinion in substantially the form attached in APPENDIX G; and (C) Such other documents as the Buyers may reasonably request for the purpose of: (1) evidencing the performance by Florida Water of, or the compliance by Florida Water with, any covenant or obligation required to be performed or complied with by Florida Water; (2) evidencing the satisfaction of any condition referred to in this Article; or (3) evidence showing the release of all liens, security interests, and other encumbrances other than Permitted Encumbrances (but excluding any Permitted Encumbrances that encumber the Purchased Assets held by any entity which has provided or may provide financing to Florida Water). SECTION 5.03. NO CONFLICT. Neither the consummation nor the performance of any of the Contemplated Transactions will, directly or indirectly, materially contravene or conflict with or result in a material violation of or cause the Buyers or any Related Person of the 28
Buyers to suffer any material adverse consequence under (a) any applicable Legal Requirement or Order, or (b) any valid Legal Requirement or Order that has been entered by any Governmental Body. ARTICLE VI CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO FLORIDA WATER'S OBLIGATION TO CLOSE Florida Water's obligation to sell the Purchased Assets and to take the other actions required to be taken by Florida Water at the Closing is subject to the satisfaction, at or prior to the Closing, of each of the following conditions (any of which may be waived by Florida Water in whole or in part): SECTION 6.01. THE BUYERS' PERFORMANCE. All of the covenants and obligations that the Buyers are required to perform or to comply with pursuant to this Agreement at or prior to the Closing (considered collectively), and each of these covenants and obligations (considered individually), shall have been performed and complied with in all material respects. SECTION 6.02. ADDITIONAL DOCUMENTS. Each of the Buyers shall have caused a legal opinion in the form set forth in APPENDIX G to be supplied and the documents and instruments required by this Agreement and the following documents to be delivered or made available such other documents as Florida Water may reasonably request for the purpose of: (A) evidencing the performance by the Buyers of, or the compliance by the Buyers with, any covenant or obligation required to be performed or complied with by the Buyers; or (B) evidencing the satisfaction of any condition referred to in this Article. SECTION 6.03. NO INJUNCTION. There shall not be in effect any Legal Requirement or any injunction or other Order that (a) prohibits the consummation of the 29
Contemplated Transactions, and (b) has been adopted or issued, or has otherwise become effective, since the Signature Date. ARTICLE VII COVENANTS OF FLORIDA WATER PRIOR TO CLOSING SECTION 7.01. ACCESS AND INVESTIGATION. Between the Signature Date and the Closing Date, and upon reasonable advance notice received from the Buyers and subject to any applicable confidentiality obligations, Florida Water shall (a) afford the Buyers and Buyers' representatives and prospective lenders, underwriters, and their representatives (collectively, "Buyer Group") full and free access, during regular business hours, to Florida Water's personnel, properties (including subsurface testing), contracts, Governmental Authorizations, books and Records and other documents and data, such rights of access to be exercised in a manner that does not unreasonably interfere with the operations of Florida Water; (b) furnish the Buyer Group with copies of all such contracts, Governmental Authorizations, books and Records and other existing documents and data as the Buyer Group may reasonably request; (c) furnish the Buyer Group with such additional financial, operating and other relevant data and information as the Buyer Group may reasonably request; (d) provide access for conducting environmental site assessments; and (e) otherwise cooperate and assist, to the extent reasonably requested by the Buyer Group, with the Buyer Group's investigation of the properties, assets and financial condition related to Florida Water. In addition, Buyers shall have the right to have the Real Property and Personal Property inspected by Buyer Group, at the Buyers' sole cost and expense, for purposes of determining the physical condition and legal characteristics of the Real Property and Personal Property. In the event subsurface or other destructive testing is recommended by 30
any of the Buyer Group, the Buyers shall be permitted to have the same performed with the prior consent of Florida Water, which shall not be unreasonably withheld. SECTION 7.02. OPERATION OF THE BUSINESS OF FLORIDA WATER. Between the Signature Date and the Closing, Florida Water: (A) shall conduct its business in the Ordinary Course of Business; (B) shall confer with the Buyers prior to implementing operational decisions relating to the Utility System of a material nature; (C) shall maintain the Purchased Assets in a state of repair and condition that complies with Legal Requirements and is consistent with the requirements and normal conduct of Florida Water's business; (D) shall comply with all Legal Requirements and contractual obligations applicable to the operations of Florida Water's business; (E) shall cooperate with the Buyers and shall assist the Buyers in identifying the Governmental Authorizations required by the Buyers to operate the business from and after the Closing Date and either transferring existing Governmental Authorizations of Florida Water to the Buyers, where permissible, or assisting the Buyers in obtaining new Governmental Authorizations for the Buyers; (F) upon request from time to time, shall execute and deliver all documents, shall make all truthful oaths, testify in any Proceedings and do all other acts that may be reasonably necessary to consummate the Contemplated Transactions, all without further consideration; and (G) shall maintain all books and Records of Florida Water relating to Florida Water's business in the Ordinary Course of Business. 31
SECTION 7.03. NEGATIVE COVENANT. Except as otherwise expressly permitted herein, between the Signature Date and the Closing Date, Florida Water shall not without the prior written consent of an affected Buyer which shall not be unreasonably withheld and which shall be promptly acted upon by such Buyer, (a) make any material modification to any Governmental Authorization that relate to the Purchased Assets; or (b) allow the levels of raw materials, supplies or other materials included in the Purchased Assets to vary materially from the levels customarily maintained. SECTION 7.04. REQUIRED APPROVALS. Florida Water shall make the reasonably required filings necessary to be made by it in order to consummate the Contemplated Transactions. Florida Water also shall cooperate with the Buyers and their Representatives with respect to all filings that the Buyers elect to make or, pursuant to Legal Requirements, shall be required to make in connection with the Contemplated Transactions. Florida Water also shall cooperate with the Buyers and their Representatives in obtaining all consents. SECTION 7.05. NOTIFICATION. Between the Signature Date and the Closing, Florida Water shall promptly notify the Buyers and Buyers shall promptly notify Florida Water in writing if any of them becomes aware of (a) any fact or condition that causes or constitutes a Breach of the Agreement or (b) the occurrence after the Signature Date of any fact or condition that would or be reasonably likely to (except as expressly contemplated by this Agreement) cause or constitute a Breach of the Agreement. During the same period, Florida Water also shall promptly notify the Buyers of the occurrence of any Breach of any covenant of Florida Water in this Article VII or of the occurrence of any event that may make the satisfaction of the conditions in Article V impossible or unlikely. 32
SECTION 7.06. PAYMENT OF LIABILITIES. Florida Water shall pay or otherwise satisfy in the Ordinary Course of Business all of its Liabilities and obligations as they come due. ARTICLE VIII COVENANTS OF THE BUYERS SECTION 8.01. REQUIRED APPROVALS. As promptly as practicable after the Signature Date, the Buyers shall make, or cause to be made, all filings required by Legal Requirements to be made by it to consummate the Contemplated Transactions. The Buyers also shall cooperate, and cause its Related Persons to cooperate, with Florida Water with respect to all filings Florida Water shall be required by Legal Requirements to make. SECTION 8.02. CERTAIN REGULATORY PROCEEDINGS. In the event that a Person initiates a docket, investigation, complaint, claim, lawsuit, objection or other inquiry relating to or arising out of an issue of sharing, allocation or refund of Florida Water's economic gain on any or all of the Utility System transfers contemplated by this Agreement ("Gain on Sale Inquiry"), whether initiated before or after the Closing of the Contemplated Transactions, each Buyer shall promptly request to intervene in any Gain on Sale Inquiries which relate to their Utility System and actively oppose the imposition of any such sharing, allocation or refund of any such economic gains with or to Florida Water's customers, past, present and future, or the imposition of any similar liabilities or burdens upon Florida Water, its customers or its affiliates in connection therewith, based upon the recitals in the fourth "WHEREAS" clause of this Agreement, which each Buyer hereby represents to be accurate and true, and based upon such other grounds as may reasonably be advanced. SECTION 8.03. LEGAL OPINIONS. Within 30 days of the Signature Date of this Agreement by Florida Water, Marco Island, Deltona and Palm Coast shall each cause its outside 33
legal counsel acceptable to Florida Water to deliver to Florida Water a legal opinion acceptable to Florida Water stating that it has extraterritorial power under the Florida Constitution and the laws of Florida to acquire Florida Water's utility assets outside its boundaries. SECTION 8.04. HERNANDO OBLIGATION. Florida Water and Hernando recognize that there are concerns regarding water pressure in the Hernando System that could affect service to current customers and the ability of the Hernando System to provide service to future customers. The purchase price for the Hernando System reflects in part the retention by Hernando of capital monies to remedy these water pressure concerns that would otherwise have been paid to Florida Water as additional purchase price. Accordingly, as material consideration for Florida Water agreeing to sell the Hernando System for the Purchase Price set forth in this Agreement, Hernando County covenants that after the Closing Hernando County shall assume service obligations to all persons desiring utility service within the utility service area for the Hernando System and Hernando County agrees that post-Closing it will be responsible for resolving any low pressure concerns. Hernando County covenants to use its Best Efforts and all diligence after Closing to remedy the Hernando System water pressure problems, for which time is of the essence. SECTION 8.05. FLORIDA WATER EMPLOYEES. (A) No later than 5:00 p.m. on the day which is forty-five (45) days after the Signature Date or 70 days before Closing Date, whichever is earlier, each Buyer shall deliver to Florida Water a written list of all Florida Water's employees to whom the Buyers will offer employment upon Closing. Florida Water shall be responsible for payment of all wages, salaries and benefits accrued and payable to individuals employed by Florida Water through the Effective Time and the Buyers shall be responsible for payment of all wages, salaries and 34
benefits relating to the period commencing on and from the Effective Time. If required, Florida Water and the Buyers will comply with the notice requirements under the Worker Adjustment Retraining and Notification Act ("WARN Act"), or any similar federal, state or local legislation with respect to such employee matters. It is expressly understood and agreed that the Buyers shall not be responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for payment of any benefits, severance liability, compensation, pay or other obligations, of whatever nature, due or alleged to be due to any employee attributable to any time period up to or as a result of Closing. It is expressly understood and agreed that Florida Water is not and shall not be responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for payment of any benefits, severance, liability, compensation, pay or other obligations, of whatever nature, due or alleged to be due any employee attributable to any time period upon or after Closing. (B) The Buyers shall hire, or shall cause to be hired, as of the Closing Date, all employees designated on the list referred to in Section 8.05 for at least one year after Closing at rates of wages or salary comparable to those being paid by Florida Water on the Signature Date, including any employees on the list who are on short-term disability, and shall provide employee benefits to such employees comparable to those offered by Florida Water, provided, however, that each of the Buyers shall retain the right at all times after the first anniversary of Closing to determine its own staffing needs, personnel policies and employment practices with regard to such employees. Employees and any managerial personnel who accept employment with the Buyers as of, or within sixty (60) days following the Closing Date shall hereinafter be referred to as "Transitioned Employees." The Buyers shall provide for group health coverage for the Transitioned Employees and their dependents comparable to the health insurance currently provided by Florida Water with no waiting period for eligibility or entry into the plan and no 35
exclusion or limitation for preexisting conditions currently covered for such Transitioned Employee under Florida Water's health insurance plan. If within twelve (12) months after the Closing Date, any Transitioned Employee is terminated (for any reason other than for cause), the terminated Transitioned Employee shall continue to be paid such wages or salary which the Transitioned Employee would have received if the Transitioned Employee had remained employed for twelve (12) months after the Closing Date. ARTICLE IX CLOSING PROCEDURES AND ADJUSTMENTS SECTION 9.01. CLOSING DATE AND PLACE. The closing shall be held at such place or offices designated by Florida Water in the Orlando area and on such date on or before December 8, 2003, as mutually agreed among the parties (the "Closing" or "Closing Date"). With respect to any Contemplated Transaction not closed as of the Closing Date, Florida Water and the remaining Buyers will continue to use all reasonable efforts to close at the earliest practicable date, subject to the rights to terminate in Sections 10.09 and 4.03. Except as set forth herein, no extension of the Closing Date shall modify any of the other deadlines set forth in this Agreement unless specifically noted in a written extension executed in accordance with the terms of this Section. Any Buyer that desires to Close prior to the Closing Date may submit a written request to Florida Water to close the transaction with respect to such Buyer at an earlier date than the Closing Date ("Early Closing Date"). Florida Water, in its sole discretion, may elect to agree to the Early Closing Date with respect to any particular Buyer, or may elect to retain the Closing Date for such Buyer. Florida Water's determination to agree to an Early Closing Date as to a particular Buyer shall not obligate Florida Water to agree to an Early Closing Date as to any other Buyer. In the event that some, but not all, of the Buyers have met all requirements under 36
the Agreement for Closing on the Closing Date, Florida Water, in its sole discretion, may elect to Close with any or all of such Buyers that are prepared to Close ("Partial Closing") and may elect to terminate the Agreement as to any or all of the other Buyers. Florida Water's determination to agree to a Partial Closing with a particular Buyer shall not obligate Florida Water to agree to a Partial Closing with any other Buyer. SECTION 9.02. DOCUMENTS AFTER THE CLOSING. From time to time after Closing, each party hereto shall, upon request of the other, execute, acknowledge and deliver, or shall cause to be executed, acknowledged and delivered, all such further acts, special warranty deeds, assignments, bills of sale, transfers or other documentation for (1) confirming or correcting title in the name of the Buyers or their successor(s) or perfecting possession by the Buyers or their successor(s) of any or all of the Purchased Assets, including the establishment of record of Easements without resort to litigation, expenditure of monies or other extraordinary means, for all Facilities which are a part of the Utility System in existence or use at the time of Closing, or (2) otherwise fulfilling the obligations of the parties hereunder. Further, from time to time after Closing should the parties discover that certain land parcels, Easements, or other rights owned or enjoyed by Florida Water at Closing and necessary to the proper operation and maintenance of the Utility System had not been included in the appropriate appendices hereto and thus not transferred to the Buyers or their successor(s) at Closing in accordance with this Agreement, then the parties agree that Florida Water shall execute or cause to be executed the documents including, but not limited to, deeds, easements and bills of sale necessary to convey such ownership or rights to the Buyers or their successor(s), at no cost to the Buyers, provided such conveyances may be accomplished without resort to litigation, expenditure of monies or other extraordinary means. 37
SECTION 9.03. RECORDING FEES AND DOCUMENTARY TAXES. (A) Recording fees to record the deeds and any other instruments necessary to deliver title to the Buyers shall be paid by the Buyers. (B) The Purchased Assets are being purchased by the Buyers for public purposes in lieu of eminent domain and condemnation by various local governments throughout Florida which have passed resolutions or taken other actions confirming their desire to cooperate in the Buyers purchase of Florida Water's systems such that this transaction is immune from documentary stamp tax in accordance with the ruling in DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE V. ORANGE COUNTY, 605 So. 2d 1333 (Fla. DCA 1992), affd, 620 So. 2d 991 (Fla. 1993). To the extent that documentary stamp taxes are due and payable, such taxes and any related penalty shall be paid by the Buyers. SECTION 9.04. ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE; UNBILLED REVENUES; CUSTOMER DEPOSITS; ACCOUNTS PAYABLE. (A) Florida Water shall furnish to the appropriate Buyer, at least ten (10) days prior to Closing, a listing of each respective Facility's accounts receivable ("Accounts Receivable"), customer deposits, by customer and individual amount and accrued interest ("Customer Deposits") and estimated unbilled revenue through the date of Closing ("Unbilled Revenues"). Florida Water shall assign to the appropriate Buyer at Closing, the Buyer's respective Facility's Accounts Receivable and Unbilled Revenues and all rights of collection therefor, together with the liabilities of Customer Deposits, in accordance with the following terms. At the Closing, each appropriate Buyer shall reimburse Florida Water for the excess of the sum of Accounts Receivable that are not more than sixty (60) days in arrears plus 98% of Unbilled Revenues over the Customer Deposits for the Buyer's respective Facility. Should the total Customer Deposits 38
exceed the sum of Accounts Receivable and Unbilled Revenue, then Florida Water shall reimburse the appropriate Buyer at Closing for any excess amount. Unbilled Revenues shall be based upon the actual billings for the month immediately preceding the month of the Closing and shall be prorated through the date of Closing based on the number of days that have elapsed since the last billing period. All amounts received by Florida Water through the date of closing for Accounts Receivable which were collected by Florida Water subsequent to the date Florida Water provided the Buyers with the list of Accounts Receivable, shall be credited to the appropriate Buyer at the Closing. After the Closing, Florida Water will promptly pay to Buyers any payments received by Florida Water on a Buyer's customer's account. (B) All bills for services, materials and supplies rendered in connection with the operation of the Utility System prior to Closing, including but not limited to electricity, for a period up to and including the Closing Date ("Accounts Payable"), shall be paid by Florida Water. Prorations shall be required only for the following Accounts Payable: (1) electricity, to the extent meters are not read on the Closing Date; (2) telephone, to the extent no final bill is rendered to Florida Water on the Closing Date and the Buyers continue service with the provider; (3) rental, maintenance or lease charges under contracts assumed by the Buyers or the Buyers' Contractors; (4) charges under maintenance and service contracts assumed by the Buyers of the Buyers' Contractors; (5) purchased water and wastewater to the extent meters are not read on the Closing Date; (6) sludge hauling charges; and (7) other invoices that include pre-Closing and post-Closing obligations. (C) Property Taxes. Florida Water shall be responsible for any past due and all ad valorem taxes, prorated through the date of Closing in accordance with Section 196.295, Florida 39
Statutes, and shall escrow funds with the tax collector of the counties in which the Systems are located if so required. SECTION 9.05. CONNECTION CHARGES (A) Connection Charges collected by Florida Water prior to Closing shall remain Florida Water's sole and separate property with no claim of the Buyers therefore. (B) Connection Charges collected from and after Closing shall be paid to the Buyers with no claim of Florida Water therefore. (C) Notwithstanding the foregoing, if Florida Water entered into an agreement with a developer or individual customer prior to the Signature Date which provides for payment of Connection Charges in installments payable over a period of time, Florida Water shall be entitled to retain payments from such developer or individual customer that come due after the Closing Date to the extent that such payments are attributable to connections of customers made prior to the Closing Date. (D) Florida Water shall supply to the Buyers documents relating to deposits ("Vendee Deposit") made by land contract vendees ("Deposit Vendee") pursuant to land contracts for which deposits Florida Water has agreed to give the relevant Deposit Vendee a credit equal to such deposits made by such Deposit Vendee against Connection Charges which such Deposit Vendee would have to pay at the time it obtains water and/or sewage service from the Utility System. After Closing, some of such Deposit Vendees will continue to make such deposits and Florida Water agrees to promptly after Closing take such action to cause all such future deposits to be paid to the Buyers and shall supply the Buyers with evidence that it has done so. (E) Notwithstanding any contract rights which Hernando County may claim against Florida Water as a result of the transfer of the Hernando Facilities to Hernando County, 40
Hernando County expressly waives any rights to return or credit of Connection Charges which Hernando County has paid to Florida Water. SECTION 9.06. COSTS AND PROFESSIONAL FEES. (A) Each party shall be responsible for securing its own counsel and advisors for representation in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement, and all other matters associated with performance, cancellation or closing hereunder, unless otherwise specified herein. Each party shall be responsible for the payment of the fees of its own attorneys, bankers, engineers, accountants, and other professional advisors or consultants in connection herewith. The Buyers shall be responsible for payment of the Transaction Costs. (B) In any litigation arising out of this Agreement, each party shall pay its own attorney's fees and taxable costs at all judicial levels. SECTION 9.07. RISK OF LOSS. At all times prior to and through the time of Closing, Florida Water shall maintain adequate fire and extended insurance coverage for the cost of any repairs to the Purchased Assets that maybe required as a result of casualty damage. The risk of loss during the said period of time shall fall upon Florida Water. The risk of loss shall pass to the Buyers at Closing. SECTION 9.08. PROCEEDS OF SALE; CLOSING PROCEDURE. (A) On or prior to the Closing Date, Florida Water and the Buyers shall execute all documents necessary to Close the transaction. At the Closing, the appropriate parties shall execute and deliver to the closing agent appointed by Florida Water (the "Closing Agent") all of the documents related to each Utility System as delineated in subsection (D) below. The parties agree that legal counsel for Florida Water may act as Closing Agent and waive any potential conflict regarding the same. 41
(B) In order to secure title insurance coverage against the existence of material adverse matters recorded during the period of time between the effective date(s) of the Title Commitment and the date of recording of the documents creating the estate to be insured, Florida Water and the Buyers agree that the Closing Agent may also be the Title Company, or the Title Company's agent, selected by Florida Water to issue the Title Policy, and waive any conflict regarding the same. (C) At the Closing, the appropriate party shall execute or cause to be executed and deliver to the Closing Agent the following documents effecting the separate transfer of the Purchased Assets related to each Utility System to the appropriate Buyer (the "Transfer Documents") (E.g., Florida Water shall execute a special warranty deed transferring the Fee Parcels within the Palm Coast System to Palm Coast). These Transfer Documents shall be in final form, together with any exhibits or appendices thereto and shall include, without limitation, the following: (1) Special warranty deeds for the conveyance of Fee parcels to be conveyed; (2) Conveyance instruments for Easements; (3) The Transfer, Assignment and Assumption Agreement covering all other interests in the Purchased Assets, together with a general assignment of all contracts, agreements, permits and approvals; (4) Bills of Sale or other documents of assignment and transfer, with full warranties of title, to the Purchased Assets, other than Fee Parcels and Easements; (5) Post closing agreements, affidavits, assignments certificates, estoppel certificates, corrective instruments, releases, satisfactions or terminations necessary or required pursuant to this Agreement; 42
(6) "Marked-up" Title Commitments for each Utility System consistent with Section 3.06 of this Agreement; (7) Non-foreign affidavit and a Florida Department of Revenue Form DR-219 completed and executed by Florida Water for each Utility System; (8) Any affidavits, assignments certificates, estoppel certificates, corrective instruments, releases, satisfactions or terminations necessary to close, including, but not limited to, a no lien affidavit, a "gap" affidavit along with those instruments identified by the Title Company insuring the real property; (D) Florida Water acknowledges that the Buyers will issue the Bonds to generate proceeds to pay the Purchase Price as described in Section 4.01 hereof. Therefore, all Closing procedures shall be subject to the customary and reasonable requirements of the underwriters selected by the Buyers, the purchasers of the Bonds or the provider of any interim financing. The disbursement of proceeds shall be at the direction of the Title Company, or its agent, in order to secure coverage against material adverse matters or defects in title which are recorded during the period of time between the effective date of the Title Commitment and the date of recording of the document creating the estate or interest to be insured. SECTION 9.09. TRANSFER OF PERMITS. The Buyers shall be responsible for obtaining the transfer to each of the Buyers of the operating permits related to the Utility System each Buyer is acquiring, as described in APPENDIX H hereof. Florida Water and the Buyers shall cooperate in the preparation of all requisite documents to notify, apply for and seek the transfer of such permits. Any permit transfer application fees shall be paid by the appropriate Buyer, and the parties will pay their respective costs to process such transfers. 43
SECTION 9.10. REGULATORY MATTERS. Subject to and with the exception of the provisions set forth in Sections 4.04 and 8.02, and to the extent that Florida Water has any regulatory proceedings pending before the PSC or any other regulatory body with jurisdiction over the Utility System at the time of Closing, Florida Water shall retain responsibility for all actions and costs incurred to bring such proceedings to completion including all financial responsibility or liability for any rate relief, refund or other obligations imposed by the PSC or any county regulatory authority as a result of such proceeding, and responsibility therefore is expressly not assumed by the Buyers. All such matters are set forth and described in APPENDIX I. Notwithstanding the above, upon Closing, Hernando shall cause all regulatory proceedings before the Hernando County regulatory authority to be dismissed with prejudice. SECTION 9.11. REGULATORY TRANSFER FILINGS. Within thirty (30) days of the later of the Signature Date or the approval of the Agreement by the Governing Bodies of each of the Buyers pursuant to Section 4.03(I) above, Florida Water shall make any filings necessary to the PSC and appropriate county regulators regarding the transfer of the Utility System and Purchased Assets from Florida Water to the Buyers. Florida Water agrees to pay its fees and costs incident to such filings. It is agreed that the Buyers shall apply every reasonable effort to cooperate with Florida Water with respect to these filings and will render all reasonable assistance necessary to Florida Water. The Buyers will pay their fees and costs associated with its cooperation and assistance. The sale and transfer of Utility System from Florida Water to the Buyers is contingent upon any required approval by the PSC or other appropriate county regulators. 44
SECTION 9.12. ASSUMPTION BY THE BUYERS OF RESPONSIBILITY FOR SERVICE. The Buyers shall assume responsibility for providing service to Florida Water's customers who are receiving service at the time of Closing. SECTION 9.13. PURCHASE PRICE ALLOCATION. Within ninety (90) days subsequent to the Closing Date, Florida Water shall provide to the Buyers an allocation of the Utility System Purchase Price to the Purchased Assets (tangible, intangible and real estate assets, etc.) for each Utility System which allocation shall comply with Section 1060 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, as amended and supplemented from time to time, or any successor statute thereto. The parties affirm and agree that each of them shall adhere to such allocation for all federal and state income tax purposes, including the filing of all federal and state returns, if any, filed by them subsequent to the Closing Date. ARTICLE X GENERAL PROVISIONS SECTION 10.01. RADON. Radon is a naturally occurring radioactive gas that, when it has accumulated in a building in sufficient quantities, may present health risks to persons who are exposed to it over time. Levels of radon that exceed federal and state guidelines have been found in buildings in Florida. Additional information regarding radon and radon testing may be obtained from any county public health unit. SECTION 10.02. TIME IS OF THE ESSENCE. Time is of the essence in this Agreement. Time periods specified in this Agreement shall expire at midnight on the date stated unless the parties agree in writing to a different date or time. Any time period provided for herein 45
which ends on Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday shall extend to 5:00 p.m. on the next Business Day. SECTION 10.03. ENFORCEMENT OF AGREEMENT. In the event that a dispute arises from the Agreement, each party shall bear its own costs and expenses, including attorneys' fees. Venue for any dispute shall be in the Circuit Court of Orange County, Florida. SECTION 10.04. APPLICABLE LAW; JURISDICTION AND VENUE. This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Florida. SECTION 10.05. NOTICE. (A) All notices, certificates or other communications hereunder shall be sufficiently given and shall be deemed given when hand delivered or mailed by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, or by courier service, charges prepaid, to the parties at the following addresses: To Hernando County: Garth C. Coller, Esquire County Attorney Hernando County Attorneys Office 20 North Main Street Suite 462 Brooksville, Florida 34601 with a copy to: John R. Jenkins, Esquire Rose, Sundstrom & Bentley, LLP 2548 Blairstone Pines Drive Tallahassee, Florida 32301 To Osceola: Jo Thacker, Esquire 1 Courthouse Square Kissimmee, Florida 34742 With a copy to: Brian Wheeler 101 North Church Street Kissimmee, Florida 34742 46
To Marco Island: Mr. A. William Moss City Manager City of Marco Island City Hall 50 Bald Eagle Drive Marco Island, Florida 34145 with a copy to: John R. Jenkins, Esquire Rose, Sundstrom & Bentley, LLP 2548 Blairstone Pines Drive Tallahassee, Florida 32301 To Palm Coast: Mr. Richard M. Kelton City Manager City of Palm Coast 264 Palm Coast Parkway NE Palm Coast, Florida 32135 with a copy to: Lonnie N. Groot, Esquire Stenstrom, McIntosh, Colbert, Whigham & Simmons, P.A. 200 West 1st Street Sanford, Florida 32771 To the GUA: Florida Governmental Utility Authority c/o Government Services Group, Inc. 1500 Mahan Drive, Suite 250 Tallahassee, Florida 32308 Attention: Robert E. Sheets with a copy to: George H. Nickerson, Jr., Esquire Nabors, Giblin & Nickerson, P.A. 2502 North Rocky Point Drive Suite 1060 Tampa, Florida 33607 To Deltona: Fritz A. Behring City Manager City of Deltona 2345 Providence Boulevard Deltona, Florida 32725 With a copy to: Richard Blossom, Esq. City Attorney City of Deltona 2345 Providence Boulevard Deltona, Florida 32725 47
To Florida Water: Forrest Ludsen, COO and Carlyn Kowalsky, Esq., General Counsel Florida Water Services Corporation Post Office Box 609520 Orlando, Florida 32860-9520 With a copy to: Philip R. Halverson, Esq. 30 West Superior Street Duluth, MN 55802 And additional copy to: Greenberg Traurig, P.A. 777 South Flagler Drive Suite 300 East West Palm Beach, FL 33401 Attention: Phillip C. Gildan, Esq. (B) Any written notice given to one person in subsection (A) of this Section shall also be copied and provided to all other persons identified in subsection (A). (C) The parties may, by notice in writing given to the others, designate any future or different addresses to which the subsequent notices, certificates or other communications shall be sent. Any notice shall be deemed given on the date such notice is delivered by hand or by facsimile transmission or five (5) days after the date mailed. SECTION 10.06. ASSIGNMENT AND JOINDER. (A) Except as provided in under Section 10.06(B) below, Neither Florida Water nor the Buyers shall have the power or authority to assign this Agreement or any of their rights, duties or obligations hereunder to a third party without the express written consent of the other party and this Agreement shall be construed as solely for the benefit of the Buyers and Florida Water, and their successors by law, and no claim or cause of action shall accrue to or for the benefit of any other third party by reason hereof. (B) Consistent with the Tohopekaliga Transition Interlocal Agreement entered into between the City of Kissimmee, Osceola County and Tohopekaliga Water Authority, (an 48
independent Special District, established and created pursuant to Chapter 189, Florida Statutes, by Special Act of the Legislature) on July 17, 2003 (the "Tohopekaliga Transition Interlocal Agreement") and this Agreement, Osceola may hereby assign, transfer, convey, grant, bargain and sell unto the Tohopekaliga Water Authority all of Osceola's rights, remedies, powers, title, interests, duties, obligations and responsibilities arising under this Agreement which relate to the Osceola System and the Facilities associated therewith; and the parties hereto, including specifically Florida Water, hereby consent and agree to such assignment and assumption. The Tohopekaliga Water Authority shall accept and agree to, and Florida Water hereby consents to, such assignment and assumption of all of Osceola's rights, remedies, powers, title, interests, duties, obligations and responsibilities arising under the Agreement which relate to the Osceola System and the Facilities associated therewith. Such assignment and assumption shall be deemed subject to and be in all respects in conformance with all provisions of this Agreement. The parties agree and acknowledge that in facilitating closing pursuant to such assignment and assumption all instruments required to close relating to the Osceola System will be separately executed and directly conveyed from Florida Water to the Tohopekaliga Water Authority as the assignee of Osceola. If the Tohopekaliga Water Authority does not perform its obligations under the Agreement, Osceola shall remain liable to Florida Water for such performance. SECTION 10.07. AMENDMENTS AND WAIVERS. Except as otherwise provided in this Agreement, no amendment, supplement, modification or waiver of this Agreement shall be binding upon any party hereto unless executed in writing by such party. No waiver of any of the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed or shall constitute a waiver of any other provision of this Agreement, whether or not similar, unless otherwise expressly provided. 49
SECTION 10.08. ENTIRE AGREEMENT. This Agreement is the entire agreement between the parties and supersedes all prior and contemporaneous agreements, understandings, negotiations and discussions of the agreements, understandings, negotiations and discussions of the parties, whether oral or written, pertaining to the subject matter hereof, and there are no warranties, representations or other agreements between the parties in connection with the subject matter hereof, except as specifically set forth herein. SECTION 10.09. TERMINATION EVENTS. By notice given prior to or at the Closing, subject to Section 10.10, this Agreement may be terminated as follows: (A) by written notice from all of the Buyers that have not closed if a material breach of any provision of this Agreement has been committed by Florida Water and such breach has not been waived by such Buyers; provided in the event of a breach which does not result in termination, Buyers retain all other remedies available at law or in equity for such breach. (B) by Florida Water if a material Breach of any provision of this Agreement has been committed by the Buyers and such Breach has not been waived by Florida Water; (C) by written notice from all of the Buyers that have not closed if any condition in Article V has not been satisfied as of the date specified for Closing, or if satisfaction of such a condition by such date is or becomes impossible (other than through the failure of the Buyers to comply with their obligations under this Agreement), and the Buyers have not waived such condition on or before such date; (D) by Florida Water if any condition in Article VI has not been satisfied as of December 8, 2003 (the date specified for Closing), or if satisfaction of such a condition by such date is or becomes impossible (other than through the failure of Florida Water to comply with its 50
obligations under this Agreement), and Florida Water has not waived such condition on or before such date; (E) by mutual consent of all of the Buyers that have not closed and Florida Water; (F) by all of the Buyers that have not closed if the Closing has not occurred on or before July 31, 2004, or such later date as the parties may agree upon, unless the Buyers are in material Breach of this Agreement; (G) by Florida Water if the Closing has not occurred on or before the Closing Date or such later date as the parties may agree upon, unless Florida Water is in material Breach of this Agreement; (H) by Florida Water in the event that any Person initiates any Gain on Sale Inquiry. Upon the occurrence of a Gain on Sale Inquiry, Florida Water may (1) terminate this Agreement in total, (2) terminate this Agreement as to any particular Buyer; or (3) waive this requirement and proceed to Closing; or (I) by Florida Water in the event it is, in its discretion, dissatisfied with any condition, requirement or burden imposed by any entity in any regulatory approval process related to the Contemplated Transactions under this Agreement. SECTION 10.10. EFFECT OF TERMINATION (A) Each party's right of termination under Section 10.09 is in addition to any other rights it may have under this Agreement or otherwise, and the exercise of such right of termination will not be an election of remedies. If this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 10.09, all obligations of the parties under this Agreement will terminate unless otherwise stated in this Agreement, provided, however, that, if this Agreement is terminated because of a Breach of this Agreement by the non-terminating party or because one or more of the conditions 51
to the terminating party's obligations under this Agreement is not satisfied as a result of the party's failure to comply with its obligations under this Agreement, the terminating party's right to pursue all legal remedies will survive such termination unimpaired. (B) Neither the Buyers nor Florida Water shall be liable to the other in the event that after the execution of this Agreement there occurs (1) a change of law that prevents the Closing, (2) any action by a third party that prevents the Closing or (3) any order by a Governmental Body or court that prevents the Closing. Both parties agree to diligently defend against a third party attempt to prevent a Closing. SECTION 10.11. BUYERS' REPRESENTATIVE. Within thirty (30) days after the Signature Date, Buyers shall designate in writing a single Buyer's representative who shall be authorized to act on behalf of Buyers with respect to Buyers communications with Florida Water under the terms of the Agreement (the "Buyers' Representative"). Buyers have the right to replace the Buyers Representative at any time without cause by delivering written notice of such replacement to Florida Water. Florida Water shall have the right to rely upon all written notices and written communications from Buyers' Representative as the authorized representative of the Buyers under the Agreement. SECTION 10.12. SURVIVAL. The provisions set forth in Sections 2.06, 2.09, 3.07, 4.02, 4.04, 6.04, 7.03, 8.01, 8.02, 8.04, 8.05, 9.02, 9.04, 9.05, 9.06, 9.09, 9.10, 9.12, 9.13, 10.03, 10.10 and this Section 10.12 shall survive Closing and not merge therein. SECTION 10.13. JOINT AND SEVERABLE LIABILITY In the event of a breach of this Agreement by a Buyer, liability for such breach shall remain with such Buyer, and such liability shall not be joint and several as to other Buyers. 52
Remedy for a breach of Section 4.03 of this Agreement by a Buyer shall be limited to cancellation of the Agreement, at Florida Water's option, as provided therein. SECTION 10.14. COUNTERPARTS. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall be considered an original. [SIGNATURE PAGES TO FOLLOW] 53
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Buyers and Florida Water have caused this Agreement to be duly executed and entered into on the date first above written, subject to the provisions of Section 4.03(I). HERNANDO COUNTY By: /s/ Garth Coller --------------------------- Its: County Attorney --------------------------- Attest: THE CITY OF MARCO ISLAND By: /s/ A. William Moss --------------------------- Its: City Manager --------------------------- Attest: /s/ Laura M. Litzan THE CITY OF PALM COAST By: /s/ Richard M. Kelton --------------------------- Its: City Manager --------------------------- Attest: /s/ Clare M. Hoeni Clare M. Hoeni Deputy City Clerk OSCEOLA COUNTY By: /s/ Ken Shipley --------------------------- Its: Vice Chairman --------------------------- Attest: /s/ Teena Jenkins THE CITY OF DELTONA By: /s/ Fritz Behring --------------------------- Its: City Manager --------------------------- Attest: 54
FLORIDA GOVERNMENTAL UTILITY AUTHORITY By: /s/ Lee Ann Thomas --------------------------- Its: Board Chair --------------------------- Attest: /s/ Faith Doyle FLORIDA WATER SERVICES CORPORATION By: /s/ James Vizanko --------------------------- Its: Chairman --------------------------- Attest: /s/ Philip R. Halverson 55



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20030904164415.txt.gz
TIME:20030904164415
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - SEPTEMBER 4, 2003 ALLETE, Inc. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following updates. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 21. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 20, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 27, 2003 On September 4, 2003 ALLETE announced that its subsidiary, Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), closed on the sale of its water and wastewater system serving Hillsborough County, Florida. The system has been sold to Hillsborough County for approximately $15 million. Florida Water has been in the process of selling its assets as part of an ALLETE strategic initiative to exit its water businesses. Presently, approximately 80 percent of Florida Water's assets have been sold, or are under contract to be sold, for $394 million. These completed and contracted sales are expected to result in an after-tax gain to Florida Water of approximately $75 million and net cash proceeds of approximately $190 million, after transaction costs, retirement of Florida Water's debt and payment of income taxes. Net proceeds from these sales will be used to retire debt at ALLETE. Florida Water continues to seek buyers for its remaining systems. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 4, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 4, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. September 4, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 4, 2003 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20030915155139.txt.gz
TIME:20030915155139
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - SEPTEMBER 15, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following updates. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 21. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 20, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 27, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 4, 2003 On September 15, 2003 ALLETE announced that its subsidiary, Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), closed on a sale, by condemnation, of its water and wastewater system serving Marion County, Florida. The system has been sold to Marion County for approximately $22 million. Florida Water has been in the process of selling its assets as part of an ALLETE strategic initiative to exit its water businesses. Presently, approximately 85 percent of Florida Water's assets have been sold, or are under contract to be sold, for $417 million. To date, these completed and contracted sales are expected to result in an after-tax gain to Florida Water of approximately $75 million and net cash proceeds of approximately $210 million, after transaction costs, retirement of Florida Water's debt and payment of income taxes. Net proceeds from these sales will be used to retire debt at ALLETE. Florida Water continues to seek buyers for its remaining systems. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 15, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 15, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. September 15, 2003 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 15, 2003 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20031015154912.txt.gz
TIME:20031015154912
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - October 15, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 21. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 20, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 27, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 4, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 15, 2003 On October 15, 2003 Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, announced that it had sold its water and wastewater system serving Duval County, Florida to the Jacksonville Electric Authority for approximately $25 million, pending regulatory approval. Florida Water has been in the process of selling its assets as part of an ALLETE strategic initiative to exit its water businesses. Presently, approximately 90 percent of Florida Water's assets have been sold, or are under contract to be sold, for $442 million, which represents an after-tax gain to Florida Water, net of all selling and transaction costs, of about $85 million. To date, the expected net cash proceeds after transaction costs, retirement of most Florida Water debt, and payment of income taxes are approximately $260 million. Net proceeds from these sales will be used to retire debt at ALLETE. Florida Water continues to seek buyers for its remaining systems. ------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 15, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 15, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. October 15, 2003 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------ James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 15, 2003 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20031024093339.txt.gz
TIME:20031024093339
EVENTS:		Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - OCTOBER 24, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 40. - Fourth Full Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 17. - First Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2003, Page 21. - Fifth Paragraph On October 24, 2003 ALLETE issued a press release announcing plans to spin-off the Company's Automotive Services business which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99(a) and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. ---------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS. (a) Financial Statements - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------ 99(a) - ALLETE News Release dated October 24, 2003 announcing plans to spin-off the Company's Automotive Services. ITEM 12. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On October 24, 2003 ALLETE issued a press release announcing third quarter 2003 earnings which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99(b) and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. The information is being furnished pursuant to Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition. This information, including Exhibit 99(b) attached hereto, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 24, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 24, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. October 24, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 24, 2003 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99(a) - ALLETE News Release dated October 24, 2003 announcing plans to spin-off the Company's Automotive Services business. 99(b) - ALLETE News Release dated October 24, 2003 announcing 2003 third quarter earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 24, 2003

[ALLETE LOGO] EXHIBIT 99(a) For Release: October 24, 2003 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE ANNOUNCES DECISION TO SPIN-OFF ITS AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES ------------------------------------------------------------- BUSINESS TO SHAREHOLDERS ------------------------ DULUTH, Minn.--ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) announced today that its Board of Directors has approved a plan to spin-off its automotive services business which will become a publicly traded company to be named ADESA Corporation. The spin-off is expected to take the form of a tax-free stock dividend to ALLETE's shareholders who will receive one ADESA share for each share of ALLETE stock they own. ALLETE has not yet finalized details of the spin-off. The Board's decision was made after a lengthy review of strategic alternatives and reflects ALLETE's intention to create long-term shareholder value. To prepare for the spin-off and its operation as a stand-alone entity, ALLETE's automotive services business will immediately begin refinancing its debt. ALLETE and ADESA are two very distinct businesses and the Company believes that this spin-off will better facilitate the strategic objectives of both businesses. With its strong cash flow, the Company believes that ADESA Corporation will be better positioned to pursue growth opportunities as a stand-alone company and will appeal to a broader group of institutional investors. For ALLETE, the Company believes the split will create a simplified regulatory and risk profile and a more stable credit rating, which will enhance its ability to pursue strategic growth initiatives. "Since the beginning of the year our Board has carefully weighed a number of alternatives to optimize ALLETE's long-term value for our shareholders," said Dave Gartzke, ALLETE Chairman, President and CEO. "These companies have very different characteristics and capital requirements. As two separate companies, we believe ALLETE and ADESA will offer investors the opportunity to target their investments more specifically. Each company will have its own distinct path for growth. Our board of directors has given its full support to this initiative." ALLETE Automotive Services, the company which will become ADESA Corporation, had 2002 revenue of $844 million. Its ADESA wholesale auctions is a leader in the industry, growing from the initial 12 auctions ALLETE purchased in 1995 into a network of 53 wholesale vehicle auctions, 28 salvage auctions, and 82 Automotive Finance Corporation offices, that span the United States and Canada. Automotive Finance Corporation is the largest provider of floorplanning for independent car dealers in North America; ADESA Impact is the Company's salvage auction business. ADESA is based in Indianapolis, Indiana, with plans to move into a new headquarters building in Carmel, Indiana in spring 2004. (more)
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- After the spin-off, ALLETE will be comprised of Minnesota Power and ALLETE Properties, Inc. ALLETE's headquarters will remain in Duluth, Minnesota. In 2002, Minnesota Power and ALLETE's Investments business (which includes ALLETE Properties, Inc.) generated revenue of approximately $663 million. Minnesota Power generates, transmits, distributes and markets electrical power for retail and wholesale customers in the Upper Midwest. It serves 146,000 residents of Minnesota and Wisconsin and some of the nation's largest industrial customers. Its subsidiary, Superior Water, Light and Power, sells electricity to 14,000 customers, natural gas to 12,000 customers and provides water services to 10,000 customers in northwest Wisconsin. Minnesota Power also includes BNI Coal, a lignite coal mine in North Dakota and Enventis, a telecom subsidiary. ALLETE Properties owns Florida real estate operations in six different locations. The Board, in consultation with its financial and legal advisors, is working on the details that need to be finalized to accomplish ADESA's refinancing and the spin-off. The spin-off is subject to the approval of ALLETE's Board of Directors of the final plan, favorable market conditions, receipt of tax opinions, satisfaction of U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) requirements and other customary conditions, and is expected to occur in mid-2004. Specific information concerning this transaction at this time is limited by SEC regulations. The Company noted that additional details will be forthcoming. UBS Warburg and Merrill Lynch & Co., Inc. are financial advisers, and Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP, and Kaplan, Strangis and Kaplan, P.A., are legal counsel to ALLETE. ALLETE will be hosting a conference call to discuss its third quarter financial results and the information contained in this press release on Friday, October 24, 2003, at 9:00 AM Central Time. Interested parties may listen to the conference by calling (913) 981-5550 or by listening to a Webcast on ALLETE's Web site at www.allete.com. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. For more information about ALLETE, visit the company's Web site at www.allete.com. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 www.allete.com

[ALLETE LOGO] EXHIBIT 99(b) For Release: October 24, 2003 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS AUTOMOTIVE EARNINGS GROWTH HIGHLIGHTS ALLETE'S THIRD-QUARTER RESULTS -------------------------------------------------------------------- DULUTH, Minn.--Bolstered by a strong showing from its Automotive Services businesses, ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE:ALE) today reported third quarter 2003 earnings of 57 cents per share, compared with 55 cents per share in the third quarter of 2002. Net income for the quarter rose six percent to $47.6 million on revenue of $397 million, compared with $45.1 million on revenue of $389 million during the same time period last year. "Our third quarter results were on target with our expectations," said Dave Gartzke, ALLETE Chairman, President and CEO. "And I remain confident that we'll achieve our earnings projections for the year." Net income at AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES was $29.2 million in the third quarter of 2003, an increase of 20 percent over last year. This was due primarily to an increase in the number of vehicles sold at ADESA auctions and improved conversion rates compared with the third quarter of 2002 when difficult market conditions were present. Separately today, ALLETE announced that its Board of Directors has approved a plan to spin-off its Automotive Services business which will become a publicly traded company to be named ADESA Corporation. Energy Services net income was $15.3 million for the quarter compared with $17.5 million during the same time period in 2002. Higher employee benefit costs in 2003 and a positive one-time adjustment in 2002 related to the utility fuel adjustment clause impacted the third quarter comparison. FLORIDA WATER SERVICES SALE UPDATE - ---------------------------------- ALLETE continues to divest of its water businesses. Significant progress was made during the third quarter with to-date sales or sales agreements totaling $442 million, which represents approximately 90 percent of Florida Water's assets. "Nearly all of the Florida Water systems are now sold or contracted to be sold," said Gartzke. "We expect most of the transactions to close by the end of the year." Proceeds from these sales will be used to strengthen ALLETE's balance sheet. Earlier this month ALLETE issued a redemption notice on its $50 million, 7 3/4 percent First Mortgage Bonds. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE's holdings include ADESA, the second largest wholesale vehicle auction network in North America; AFC, the leading provider of independent auto dealer financing; Minnesota Power, a low-cost electric utility that serves some of the largest industrial customers in the United States; and significant real estate holdings in Florida. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 www.allete.com
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20031030161811.txt.gz
TIME:20031030161811
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - October 30, 2003 ALLETE, Inc. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 21. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 20, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 27, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 4, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 15, 2003 On October 30, 2003 Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, announced that it has closed on the sale of its water and wastewater system serving Palm Coast, Florida, to the city of Palm Coast for approximately $83 million. Florida Water has been in the process of selling its assets as part of an ALLETE strategic initiative to exit its water businesses. Presently, approximately 90 percent of Florida Water's assets have been sold, or are under contract to be sold, for $442 million, which represents an after-tax gain to Florida Water, net of all selling and transaction costs, of about $85 million. To date, the expected net cash proceeds after transaction costs, retirement of most Florida Water debt, and payment of income taxes are approximately $260 million. Net proceeds from these sales will be used to retire debt at ALLETE. ---------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 30, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 30, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. October 30, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 30, 2003 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20031031162908.txt.gz
TIME:20031031162908
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - OCTOBER 31, 2003 ALLETE, Inc. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 21. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 20, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 27, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 4, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 30, 2003 On October 31, 2003 Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, received approximately $36 million pursuant to final judgement in a condemnation action through which Hernando County took ownership of Florida Water's water and wastewater system serving Hernando County, Florida. Florida Water has been in the process of selling its assets as part of an ALLETE strategic initiative to exit its water businesses. Presently, approximately 90 percent of Florida Water's assets have been sold, or are under contract to be sold, for $442 million, which represents an after-tax gain to Florida Water, net of all selling and transaction costs, of about $85 million. To date, the expected net cash proceeds after transaction costs, retirement of most Florida Water debt, and payment of income taxes are approximately $260 million. Net proceeds from these sales will be used to retire debt at ALLETE. ---------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 31, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 31, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. October 31, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 31, 2003 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20031106160722.txt.gz
TIME:20031106160722
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - NOVEMBER 6, 2003 ALLETE, Inc. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 21. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 20, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 27, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 4, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 30, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 31, 2003 On November 6, 2003 Florida Water received approximately $145 million from the communities of Marco Island and Deltona for the sale under threat of condemnation of Florida Water's water and wastewater systems serving those communities in Florida. Florida Water has been in the process of selling its assets as part of an ALLETE strategic initiative to exit its water businesses. Presently, approximately 90 percent of Florida Water's assets have been sold, or are under contract to be sold, for $442 million, which represents an after-tax gain to Florida Water, net of all selling and transaction costs, of about $85 million. To date, the expected net cash proceeds after transaction costs, retirement of most Florida Water debt, and payment of income taxes are approximately $260 million. Net proceeds from these sales will be used to retire debt at ALLETE. __________ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 6, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - our ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 6, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. November 6, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 6, 2003 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20031113163240.txt.gz
TIME:20031113163240
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - NOVEMBER 13, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Page 68. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 21. - Third Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2003, Page 21. - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 20, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 27, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 4, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 30, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 31, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed November 6, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2003, Page 31. - Fourth Paragraph On November 13, 2003 Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, closed on the sale of its water and wastewater system serving Osceola County, Florida. The system has been sold to a local governmental authority for approximately $38 million. Florida Water has been in the process of selling its assets as part of an ALLETE strategic initiative to exit its water businesses. Presently, approximately 90 percent of Florida Water's assets have been sold, or are under contract to be sold, for $442 million, which represents an after-tax gain to Florida Water, net of all selling and transaction costs, of about $85 million. To date, the expected net cash proceeds after transaction costs, retirement of most Florida Water debt, and payment of income taxes are approximately $260 million. Net proceeds from these sales have been and will be used to retire debt at ALLETE. ---------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 13, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - our ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 13, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. November 13, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 13, 2003 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20031118163859.txt.gz
TIME:20031118163859
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - NOVEMBER 18, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 43. - Fifth Full Paragraph On November 18, 2003 ALLETE announced the redemption by ALLETE Capital I, a wholly owned statutory trust of ALLETE, of all $75 million aggregate liquidation amount of its 8.05% Cumulative Quarterly Income Preferred Securities (QUIPS). The redemption price is $25 per QUIPS plus accumulated and unpaid distributions to the redemption date, December 18, 2003. A notice of redemption is being sent to all registered holders of the QUIPS. The QUIPS were issued in March 1996 and represent preferred ownership interests in the assets of ALLETE Capital I. The sole asset of ALLETE Capital I are 8.05% Junior Subordinated Debentures, Series A, Due 2015 (Debentures) issued by ALLETE. ALLETE has elected to redeem the Debentures and such redemption will result in the redemption of the QUIPS on the date specified above. The source of funds used to redeem the Debentures, and consequently the QUIPS, is ALLETE's recent sales of water and wastewater systems in Florida. ---------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 18, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - our ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 18, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. November 18, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 18, 2003 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20031121154449.txt.gz
TIME:20031121154449
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - NOVEMBER 20, 2003 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Ninth Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 16. - Last Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2003, Page 21. - Second through Fourth Paragraphs Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 20, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 27, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 4, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 30, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 31, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed November 6, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2003, Page 25. - Second and Third Paragraphs and Page 31. - Fourth and Fifth Paragraphs Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed November 13, 2003 On November 20, 2003 ALLETE Water Services, Inc. (ALLETE Water Services), a subsidiary of ALLETE, signed a stock purchase agreement to sell its North Carolina subsidiary, Heater Utilities, Inc. (Heater) to Philadelphia Suburban Corporation (PSC). Heater provides water and wastewater utility services in North Carolina. The stock purchase agreement provides for a $48 million cash payment at closing to ALLETE Water Services and the assumption by PSC of approximately $28 million in debt. Closing is expected by mid-2004 and is subject to customary conditions, including approval of the North Carolina Utilities Commission. ALLETE has been in the process of selling its Water Services business which is comprised primarily of Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water) and Heater. Presently, approximately 90 percent of Florida Water assets have been sold, or are under contract to be sold, for $442 million. Including the proposed sale of Heater, the after-tax gain, net of all selling and transaction costs is expected to be approximately $90 million. The expected net cash proceeds after transaction costs, retirement of most debt, and payment of income taxes are approximately $300 million. Net proceeds from these sales have been and will be used to retire debt and securities at ALLETE. __________ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ITEM 7. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS. (a) Financial Statements - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 2 - Stock Purchase Agreement (without Exhibits and Schedules), dated November 20, 2003, by and between Philadelphia Suburban Corporation, as Purchaser, and ALLETE Water Services, Inc., as Shareholder. ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 21, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - our ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 21, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. November 21, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 21, 2003 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 2 - Stock Purchase Agreement, (without Exhibits and Schedules), dated November 20, 2003, by and between Philadelphia Suburban Corporation, as Purchaser, and ALLETE Water Services, Inc., as Shareholder. ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 21, 2003

EXHIBIT 2 STOCK PURCHASE AGREEMENT BY AND BETWEEN PHILADELPHIA SUBURBAN CORPORATION (PURCHASER) AND ALLETE WATER SERVICES, INC. (SHAREHOLDER) DATE: NOVEMBER 20, 2003
TABLE OF CONTENTS ----------------- PAGE ---- ARTICLE 1 DEFINITIONS...................................................1 ARTICLE 2 PURCHASE OF STOCK; PURCHASE PRICE............................10 2.1 Purchase and Sale of Stock........................................10 2.2 Purchase Price....................................................10 2.3 Payment of Purchase Price on the Closing Date.....................11 2.4 Closing and Closing Deliveries....................................11 ARTICLE 3 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE SHAREHOLDER..................................................13 3.1 Organization......................................................13 3.2 Capitalization....................................................14 3.3 Due Authorization.................................................14 3.4 No Breach.........................................................14 3.5 Clear Title.......................................................15 3.6 Condition of Assets...............................................15 3.7 Litigation........................................................15 3.8 Labor Matters.....................................................15 3.9 Tax Matters.......................................................16 3.10 Employee Benefits.................................................17 3.11 No Guarantees.....................................................20 3.12 Financial Statements..............................................20 3.13 Absence of Certain Developments...................................21 3.14 Intellectual Property.............................................21 3.15 Compliance with Laws..............................................22 3.16 Operating Contracts...............................................22 3.17 Real Estate.......................................................23 3.18 Accounts Receivable...............................................25 3.19 Books and Records; Bank Accounts..................................25 3.20 Employees.........................................................25 3.21 Permits and Certificate Applications..............................26 3.22 Developer Contracts...............................................26 -i-
TABLE OF CONTENTS ----------------- (continued) PAGE ---- 3.23 Subsidiaries......................................................26 3.24 Insurance.........................................................26 3.25 Brokers...........................................................27 3.26 Relationship with Related Persons.................................27 3.27 Internal Disclosure Controls and Procedures.......................28 3.28 Environmental Matters.............................................28 3.29 Debt Instruments..................................................28 3.30 Customers and Suppliers...........................................29 3.31 Shareholder Loans.................................................29 3.32 Adequacy of Properties............................................29 3.33 Absence of Certain Business Practices.............................29 3.34 Trade Regulation..................................................30 3.35 Shareholder Ownership of the Stock................................30 3.36 Virginia Operations...............................................30 3.37 Employee Retention................................................30 3.38 Regulation as Utilities...........................................31 3.39 Limitation on Representations and Warranties......................31 3.40 Internal Accounting Controls......................................31 3.41 Water Quality.....................................................31 ARTICLE 4 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE PURCHASER....................................................31 4.1 Organization......................................................32 4.2 Due Authorization.................................................32 4.3 No Breach.........................................................32 4.4 Investment Representations........................................32 4.5 Brokers...........................................................32 ARTICLE 5 PERFORMANCE AND COVENANTS PENDING CLOSING....................33 5.1 Continuing Due Diligence..........................................33 5.2 Conduct of Business...............................................33 5.3 Encumbrances......................................................33 -ii-
TABLE OF CONTENTS ----------------- (continued) PAGE ---- 5.4 Pay Increases.....................................................34 5.5 Restrictions on New Contracts.....................................34 5.6 Preservation of Business..........................................34 5.7 Payment and Performance of Obligations............................34 5.8 Restrictions on Sale of Assets....................................34 5.9 Prompt Notice.....................................................34 5.10 Consents..........................................................35 5.11 Copies of Documents...............................................35 5.12 No Solicitation of Other Offers...................................35 5.13 Accounts Receivable and Payable...................................35 5.14 Title Matters; Surveys............................................35 5.15 Insurance.........................................................37 5.16 Filing Reports and Making Payments................................37 5.17 Capital Expenditures..............................................37 5.18 Monthly and Year-End 2003 Financials..............................37 5.19 Litigation........................................................38 5.20 Notification of Inaccuracy........................................38 5.21 Debt Instruments..................................................38 5.22 Guarantees........................................................38 5.23 Environmental Assessment..........................................39 5.24 Cooperation with Respect to Permits, Licenses and Regulatory Matters................................................39 5.25 Performance and Other Bonds.......................................39 5.26 Absence of Certain Developments...................................40 5.27 Certain Accounting Matters........................................40 5.28 Capital Expenditures..............................................41 ARTICLE 6 MUTUAL CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO THE PARTIES' OBLIGATIONS..................................................41 6.1 Proceedings.......................................................41 6.2 Consents and Approvals............................................42 6.3 Antitrust Matters.................................................42 -iii-
TABLE OF CONTENTS ----------------- (continued) PAGE ---- ARTICLE 7 ADDITIONAL CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO THE PURCHASER'S OBLIGATIONS......................................43 7.1 Accuracy of Representations and Warranties........................43 7.2 Compliance with Covenants and Agreements..........................43 7.3 No Material Adverse Effect........................................43 7.4 Legal Opinion.....................................................43 ARTICLE 8 ADDITIONAL CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO THE SHAREHOLDER'S OBLIGATIONS....................................43 8.1 Accuracy of Representations and Warranties........................43 8.2 Compliance with Covenants and Agreements..........................43 8.3 Legal Opinion.....................................................44 8.4 Delivery of Purchase Price and Other Consideration................44 ARTICLE 9 INDEMNIFICATION..............................................44 9.1 Indemnification by the Shareholder................................44 9.2 Indemnification by the Purchaser..................................45 9.3 Procedure for Indemnification.....................................46 9.4 Dispute Resolution................................................47 9.5 Effect of Insurance...............................................48 9.6 Effect of Taxes...................................................49 ARTICLE 10 TAX MATTERS..................................................50 10.1 Tax Returns.......................................................50 10.2 Controversies.....................................................50 10.3 Transfer Taxes....................................................51 10.4 Amended Tax Returns...............................................51 10.5 Non-foreign Person Affidavit......................................51 10.6 Tax Indemnification...............................................51 10.7 Section 338 Election..............................................52 10.8 Post-Closing Access and Cooperation...............................52 ARTICLE 11 PERFORMANCE FOLLOWING THE CLOSING DATE.......................52 11.1 Further Acts and Assurances.......................................52 11.2 Non-Competition Agreement.........................................53 -iv-
TABLE OF CONTENTS ----------------- (continued) PAGE ---- 11.3 Non-Solicitation Agreement........................................53 11.4 Reasonableness of Covenants.......................................53 11.5 Injunctive Relief.................................................53 11.6 Blue Pencil Doctrine..............................................54 11.7 Guarantees........................................................54 11.8 Employee Matters..................................................54 11.9 Indemnification of Officers and Directors of the Company and the Subsidiaries......................................................56 ARTICLE 12 TERMINATION..................................................57 12.1 Termination.......................................................57 12.2 Return of Documents and Nondisclosure.............................57 ARTICLE 13 MISCELLANEOUS................................................58 13.1 Survival of Representations and Warranties, Covenants and Agreements........................................................58 13.2 Preservation of and Access to Records.............................58 13.3 Cooperation.......................................................58 13.4 Public Announcements..............................................58 13.5 Notices...........................................................59 13.6 Entire Agreement..................................................59 13.7 Remedies..........................................................59 13.8 Amendments........................................................60 13.9 Successors and Assigns............................................60 13.10 Fees and Expenses.................................................60 13.11 Governing Law and Jurisdiction....................................60 13.12 Counterparts and Facsimile Signature..............................61 13.13 Headings..........................................................61 13.14 Scope of Agreement................................................61 13.15 Number and Gender.................................................61 13.16 Severability......................................................61 13.17 Parties in Interest...............................................61 13.18 Waiver............................................................62 -v-
TABLE OF CONTENTS ----------------- (continued) PAGE ---- 13.19 Construction......................................................62 13.20 Specific Performance..............................................62 13.21 Supplementation of Schedules......................................62 -vi-
STOCK PURCHASE AGREEMENT THIS STOCK PURCHASE AGREEMENT (this "AGREEMENT") is made and entered into as of the 20th day of November, 2003, by and between PHILADELPHIA SUBURBAN CORPORATION, a Pennsylvania corporation (the "PURCHASER"), and ALLETE WATER SERVICES, INC., a Minnesota corporation (the "SHAREHOLDER"). RECITALS -------- A. The Shareholder is the sole owner of 6,000 issued and outstanding shares of capital stock (the "STOCK") of Heater Utilities, Inc., a South Carolina corporation (the "COMPANY"). B. The Company owns all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of its two subsidiary corporations: (i) Brookwood Water Corporation, a North Carolina corporation ("BROOKWOOD"), and (ii) LaGrange Waterworks Corporation, a North Carolina corporation ("LAGRANGE") (individually, each of Brookwood and LaGrange may herein be referred to as a "SUBSIDIARY," and collectively, may be referred to herein as the "SUBSIDIARIES"). C. The Company owns and operates approximately 450 community water systems and 33 wastewater utility systems within the State of North Carolina, and also owns and operates 2 small community water systems located in Carroll County, Virginia. D. Brookwood owns and operates approximately 10 community water systems in and about Fayetteville, North Carolina (in Cumberland and Hoke Counties) and LaGrange owns and operates 3 community water systems in and about Fayetteville, North Carolina (in Cumberland County). Neither of the Subsidiaries owns or operates any wastewater utility systems. E. The Purchaser desires to purchase the Stock held by the Shareholder and the Shareholder desires to sell the Stock to the Purchaser on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth in this Agreement. F. Upon consummation of the purchase and sale of the Stock pursuant to this Agreement, the Purchaser will own all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of the Company. AGREEMENT --------- In consideration of the foregoing Recitals and the mutual promises contained in this Agreement, and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the Purchaser and the Shareholder agree as follows: ARTICLE 1 DEFINITIONS For purposes of this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified: 1
"ACQUISITION PROPOSAL" means any proposal relating to the possible acquisition of the Company, Brookwood and/or LaGrange, whether by way of (i) merger, (ii) purchase of any capital stock of any of the foregoing, or (iii) purchase of all or substantially all of the assets of the foregoing. "AFFILIATE" when used in reference to a specified Person, means any Person that, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with the specified Person. "AGREEMENT" has the meaning set forth in the introductory paragraph of this Agreement. "ALLETE, INC." means ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation, the ultimate corporate parent of the Shareholder, Company and its Subsidiaries. "ALLETE, INC. GUARANTEE" means that certain ALLETE, Inc. Guarantee executed and delivered on the date hereof by ALLETE, Inc., the form of which is set forth as EXHIBIT B to this Agreement, and which will become effective only upon the Closing of this Agreement and shall be applicable only to obligations of the Shareholder that arise after the Closing Date. "ANCILLARY DOCUMENTS" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.3 of this Agreement. "APPLICABLE LAWS" means any and all laws (including Environmental Laws), ordinances, constitutions, regulations, statutes, treaties, rules, codes, licenses, certificates, franchises, permits, requirements and Injunctions adopted, enacted, implemented, promulgated, issued, entered or deemed applicable by or under the authority of any Governmental Body having jurisdiction over a specified Person or any of such Person's properties or assets. "BALANCE SHEETS" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.12 of this Agreement. "BALANCE SHEET DATE" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.12 of this Agreement. "BASKET AMOUNT" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.1(a) of this Agreement. "BENEFIT PLAN" means any and all bonus, stock option, restricted stock, stock purchase, stock appreciation, phantom stock, profit participation, profit-sharing, deferred compensation, severance, retention, pension, retirement, disability insurance, medical insurance, dental insurance, health insurance, or life insurance, death benefit, incentive, welfare and/or other benefit, compensation and/or retirement plan, policy, arrangement and/or Contract maintained, sponsored or participated in by the Company or any Subsidiary. "BROOKWOOD" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals to this Agreement. "BUSINESS" means the ownership and/or operation of community water and wastewater utility systems which serve primarily residential customers and, to a much lesser extent, serve a commercial customer base. With respect to the Company, the Business refers to community water utility systems and wastewater utility systems, and with respect to the Subsidiaries, the Business refers to community water utility systems. 2
"CARY PROPERTY" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.14(a) of this Agreement. "CLOSING" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.4(a) of this Agreement. "CLOSING DATE" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.4(a) of this Agreement. "CODE" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or rules and regulations issued by the IRS pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code or any successor law. "COMPANY" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals to this Agreement. "COMPANY PLAN" has the meaning set forth in Section 11.8(b) of this Agreement. "COMPETING BUSINESS" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.26 of this Agreement. "CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION" means any information or compilation of information not generally known to the public or the industry or which the Company or the Subsidiaries have not disclosed to third parties without a written obligation of confidentiality, which is proprietary to the Company or the Subsidiaries, relating to the Company's or the Subsidiaries' procedures, techniques, methods, concepts, ideas, affairs, products, processes and services, including, but not limited to, information relating to marketing, merchandising, selling, research, development, manufacturing, purchasing, accounting, engineering, financing, costs, customers, plans, pricing, billing, needs of customers and products and services used by customers, all lists of customers and their addresses, prospects, sales calls, products, services, prices and the like as well as any specifications, formulas, plans, drawings, accounts or sales records, sales brochures, code books, manuals, trade secrets, knowledge, know-how, pricing strategies, operating costs, sales margins, methods of operations, invoices or statements and the like. "CONTRACT" means any agreement, lease of personal or mixed property, license, contract, obligation, promise, commitment, arrangement, understanding or undertaking, instrument, document (whether written or oral and whether express or implied) of any type, nature or description that is legally binding but excluding leases of Leased Real Estate. As used herein, the word "Contract" shall be limited in scope if modified by an adjective specifying the type of contract to which this Agreement or a Section hereof refers. "CONVERTIBLE SECURITIES" means any and all securities convertible or exchangeable for any shares of capital stock of the Company or either Subsidiary, including, without limitation, common stock. "DOJ" means the United States Department of Justice. "DEBT INSTRUMENTS" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.29 of this Agreement. "DEBT SECURITIES" means any and all indebtedness issued by or on behalf of the Company or either Subsidiary which constitutes a security under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "SECURITIES ACT"). "DEVELOPER CONTRACTS" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.16 of this Agreement. 3
"DIRECTOR INDEMNIFIED PARTY" or "DIRECTOR INDEMNIFIED PARTIES" has the meaning set forth in Section 11.9(a) of this Agreement. "DISCLOSE" means to reveal, deliver, divulge, disclose, publish, copy, communicate, show or otherwise make known or available to any other Person, or in any way to copy, any of the Confidential Information of the Company and/or its Subsidiaries. "EMPLOYEES" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.20(a) of this Agreement. "ENCUMBRANCE" means and includes: (i) with respect to any personal property, any intangible property or any property other than real property, any security or other property interest or right, claim, lien, pledge, option, charge, security interest, contingent or conditional sale, or other title claim or retention agreement or lease or use agreement in the nature thereof whether voluntarily incurred or arising by operation of law, and including any agreement to grant or submit to any of the foregoing in the future; and (ii) with respect to any real property (whether and including Owned Real Estate or Leased Real Estate), any mortgage, lien, easement, interest, right-of-way, condemnation or eminent domain proceeding, encroachment, any building, use or other form of restriction, encumbrance or other claim (including adverse or prescriptive) or right of third parties (including Governmental Bodies), any lease or sublease, boundary dispute, and agreements with respect to any real property including: purchase, sale, right of first refusal, option, construction, building or property service, maintenance, property management, conditional or contingent sale, use or occupancy, franchise or concession, whether voluntarily incurred or arising by operation of law, and including any agreement to grant or submit to any of the foregoing in the future. "ENVIRONMENTAL ASSESSMENT" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.23 of this Agreement. "ENVIRONMENTAL ASSESSMENT FIRM" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.23 of this Agreement. "ENVIRONMENTAL LAWS" means any and all Applicable Laws (i) regulating the use, treatment, generation, transportation, storage, control, management, recycling or disposal of any Hazardous Material, including, but not limited to, the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act (42 U.S.C. Section 9601 ET SEQ.), the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (42 U.S.C. Section 6901 ET SEQ.), the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act (49 U.S.C. Section 1801 ET SEQ.), the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. Section 1251 ET SEQ.), the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Section 1251 ET SEQ.), the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Section 7401 ET SEQ.), the Toxic Substances Control Act (15 U.S.C. Section 2601 ET SEQ.), and/or (ii) relating to the protection, preservation or conservation of the environment, all as existing, defined or interpreted as of the date hereof. "ERISA" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended. "ERISA AFFILIATE" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.10(b) of this Agreement. 4
"EXISTING POLICY" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.14(a) of this Agreement. "FINAL ORDER" has the meaning set forth in Section 6.2 of this Agreement. "FTC" means the United States Federal Trade Commission. "GAAP" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States. "GOVERNMENTAL BODY" means any: (i) nation, state, county, city, town, village, district or other jurisdiction of any nature; (ii) federal, state, local, municipal, foreign or other government; (iii) governmental or quasi-governmental authority of any nature (including any governmental agency, branch, board, commission, department, instrumentality, office or other entity, and any court or other tribunal); (iv) multinational organization or body; and/or (v) body exercising, or entitled or purporting to exercise, any administrative, executive, judicial, legislative, police, regulatory or taxing authority or power of any nature. "HSR" means the Hart Scott Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, as amended. "HAZARDOUS MATERIALS" means any and all (i) dangerous, toxic or hazardous pollutants, contaminants, chemicals, wastes, materials or substances listed or identified in, or directly or indirectly regulated by, any Environmental Law, and (ii) any of the following, whether or not included in the foregoing: polychlorinated biphenyls, asbestos in any form or condition, urea-formaldehyde, petroleum (including crude oil or any fraction thereof), natural gas, natural gas liquids, liquefied natural gas, synthetic gas usable for fuel or mixtures thereof, nuclear fuels or materials, chemical wastes, radioactive materials, explosives and known possible carcinogens. "IRS" means the United States Internal Revenue Service. "INACTIVE EMPLOYEES" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.20(a) of this Agreement. "INDEMNIFIED PARTY" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.3 of this Agreement. "INDEMNIFYING PARTY" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.3 of this Agreement. "INJUNCTION" means any and all writs, rulings, awards, directives, injunctions (whether temporary, preliminary or permanent), judgments, decrees or orders (whether executive, judicial or otherwise) adopted, enacted, implemented, promulgated, issued, entered or deemed applicable by or under the authority of any Governmental Body. 5
"INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY" means any and all (i) inventions (whether patentable or unpatentable and whether or not reduced to practice), all improvements thereto, and all patents, patent applications and patent disclosures, together with all reissuances, continuations, continuations in part, revisions, extensions and reexaminations thereof; (ii) trademarks, service marks, trade dress, logos, trade names, assumed names and corporate names, together with all translations, adaptations, derivations and combinations thereof and including all goodwill associated therewith, and all applications, registrations and renewals in connection therewith; (iii) copyrightable works, all copyrights and all applications, registrations and renewals in connection therewith; (iv) mask works and all applications, registrations and renewals in connection therewith; (v) trade secrets and confidential business information (including ideas, research and development, know-how, technology, formulas, compositions, manufacturing and production processes and techniques, technical data, designs, drawings, specifications, customer and supplier lists, pricing and cost information and business and marketing plans and proposals); (vi) computer software (including data and related software program documentation in computer-readable and hard-copy forms); (vii) other intellectual property and proprietary rights of any kind, nature or description, including web sites, web site domain names and other e-commerce assets and resources of any kind or nature; and (viii) copies of tangible embodiments thereof (in whatever form or medium). "KNOWLEDGE" means, with respect to an individual who is a natural being, an individual's actual knowledge (following due inquiry and investigation) of a fact or other matter. With respect to an entity that is a party to this Agreement, "Knowledge" shall be solely attributed to the Knowledge of an officer, director, or the Senior Management Employees of the Purchaser, the Shareholder, the Company or the Subsidiaries, respectively, and as applicable to the context used in this Agreement. As used herein, the Knowledge of the Subsidiaries shall be attributed to the Company for purposes of this Agreement and, as a consequence, the "Knowledge of the Company" shall be deemed to include the Knowledge of the Subsidiaries. "LAGRANGE" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals to this Agreement. "LEASED REAL ESTATE" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.17 of this Agreement. "LEASES" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.17(a) of this Agreement. "LIABILITY" or "LIABILITIES" means any and all debts, liabilities and/or obligations of any type, nature or description (whether known or unknown, asserted or unasserted, secured or unsecured, absolute or contingent, accrued or unaccrued, liquidated or unliquidated and whether due or to become due). "LOSS" or "LOSSES" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.1 of this Agreement. "MATERIAL ADVERSE EFFECT" or "MATERIAL ADVERSE CHANGE" means, in connection with the Company and the Subsidiaries (evaluated on the basis of the three (3) companies taken as a whole and not on an individual company-by-company basis) with due consideration to the size and complexity of the Business and transactions contemplated by this Agreement, any event, change or effect that is materially adverse, individually or in the aggregate, to the condition (financial or otherwise), properties, assets, Liabilities, revenues, income, business, operations, 6
results of operations of such Persons, taken as a whole; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that in no event shall any of the following constitute a material adverse change, or be deemed to have a material adverse effect, in the business, operations, assets, results of operations or condition of the Company and the Subsidiaries: (i) any change or effect resulting from conditions affecting the industry in which the Company and the Subsidiaries operate or from changes in general business or economic conditions, (ii) any change or effect resulting from the announcement or pendency of any of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (iii) any change or effect resulting from compliance by the Company and/or the Subsidiaries with the terms of, or the taking of any action contemplated or permitted by, this Agreement and any Ancillary Document, or (iv) any change or effect resulting from any change in Applicable Law. In furtherance of the foregoing, and notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in this Agreement, any Material Adverse Effect or any Material Adverse Change with respect to the Company and/or either of the Subsidiaries shall be evaluated on the basis of the Company and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole (in the aggregate) and not on an individual company-by-company basis. "NCDEH" means the Division of Environmental Health of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources, a regulatory agency of the state of North Carolina which, among other things, regulates the issuance of water system permits and compliance with federal and state Applicable Laws. "NCDWQ" means the Division of Water Quality of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources, a regulatory agency of the state of North Carolina which, among other things, regulates the issuance of wastewater permits and compliance with federal and state Applicable Laws. "NCUC" means the North Carolina Utilities Commission, a regulatory agency of the state of North Carolina which, among other things, regulates rates, service and PCN Certificates of entities that own and/or operate water systems and wastewater utility systems. "OPERATING CONTRACTS" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.16 of this Agreement. "ORDINARY COURSE OF BUSINESS" means an action taken by a Person only if: (i) such action is consistent with the past practices of such Person and is taken in the ordinary course of the normal day-to-day operations of such Person; and (ii) such action is not required to be authorized by the board of directors of such Person (or by any Person or group of Persons constituting a governing body of a Person exercising similar authority). "OVERLAP PERIOD" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.2 of this Agreement. "OWNED REAL ESTATE" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.17 hereof. "PBGC" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation. "PCBs" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.28 of this Agreement. 7
"PCN CERTIFICATES" means the certificates of public convenience and necessity that are issued and regulated by the NCUC. "PERMITS" means all right, title and interest in and to any permits, licenses, filings, authorizations, approvals, or other indicia of authority (and any pending applications for approval or renewal of a Permit), to own, construct, operate, sell, inventory, disburse or maintain any asset or conduct any business as issued by any Governmental Body. "PERMITTED ENCUMBRANCES" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.17(c) of this Agreement. "PERMITTED EXCEPTIONS" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.14(b) of this Agreement. "PERSON" means any individual, corporation (including any non-profit corporation), general, limited or limited liability partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, estate, trust, association, organization, or other entity or Governmental Body. "PRE-CLOSING PERIOD" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.9(b) of this Agreement. "PROCEEDING" means any suit, litigation, arbitration, hearing, audit, investigation, order, or other action (whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative) noticed, commenced, brought, conducted, or heard by or before, or otherwise involving, any Governmental Body or arbitrator. "PURCHASE PRICE" has the meaning set forth in Section 2.2 of this Agreement. "PURCHASER" has the meaning set forth in the introductory paragraph of this Agreement. "PURCHASER PLAN" has the meaning set forth in Section 11.8(b) of this Agreement. "REAL ESTATE" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.17 of this Agreement. "RELATED PERSON" or "RELATED PERSONS" means, with respect to a particular individual, (i) each other member of such individual's Family (as hereafter defined); and (ii) any Affiliate of one or more members of such individual's Family. With respect to a specified Person other than an individual: (i) any Affiliate of such specified Person; and (ii) each Person that serves as a director, governor, officer, manager, general partner, executor or trustee of such specified Person (or in a similar capacity). For purposes of this definition, the "FAMILY" of an individual includes (i) such individual, (ii) the individual's spouse, (iii) any lineal ancestor or lineal descendant of the individual, or (iv) a trust for the benefit of any of the foregoing. 8
"REQUIRED CONSENT" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.17(k) of this Agreement. "RETENTION AND SEVERANCE AGREEMENTS" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.37 of this Agreement. "RETENTION PAYMENT" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.37 of this Agreement. "RIGHTS" means any and all outstanding subscriptions, warrants, options, or other arrangements or commitments obligating or which may obligate (with or without notice or passage of time or both) the Company or either Subsidiary to issue or dispose of any of their respective (as opposed to third party) securities including, without limitation, Convertible Securities and Debt Securities. "SCHEDULES" has the meaning set forth in the introductory paragraph to Article 3 of this Agreement. "SECURITIES ACT" has the meaning set forth in the definition of "Debt Securities" in Article 1 of this Agreement. "SENIOR MANAGEMENT EMPLOYEE(S)" means the chief executive officer, president, any vice president, the chief financial officer, treasurer or secretary of a party to this Agreement. With respect to the Company and the Subsidiaries, the Senior Management Employees shall mean and be limited solely to William E. Grantmyre, Jerry H. Tweed, Freda H. Hilburn, Kristin O. Brandenburg, Richard J. Durham, Kenneth Strickland, Ruel C. Shaw, Jill Strickler, Donald Sutter and Gary Moseley. "SEVERANCE PAYMENT" has the meaning set forth in Section 11.8(f) of this Agreement. "SHAREHOLDER" has the meaning set forth in the introductory paragraph of this Agreement. "SHAREHOLDER GUARANTEE" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.22(b) of this Agreement. "SHAREHOLDER'S REPRESENTATIVE" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.2 of this Agreement. "STOCK" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals to this Agreement. "SUBSIDIARY" OR "SUBSIDIARIES" has the meaning set forth in the Recitals to this Agreement. "SUPPLEMENT" has the meaning set forth in Section 13.21 of this Agreement. "TAX" or "TAXES" means any and all net income, gross income, gross revenue, gross receipts, net receipts, ad valorem, franchise, profits, transfer, sales, use, social security, employment, unemployment, disability, license, withholding, payroll, privilege, excise, value-added, severance, stamp, occupation, property, customs, duties, real estate and/or other taxes, assessments, levies, fees or charges of any kind whatsoever imposed by any Governmental Body, together with any interest or penalty relating thereto. 9
"TAX MATTER" has the meaning set forth in Section 10.2 of this Agreement. "TAX RETURN" or "TAX RETURNS" means any return, declaration, report, claim for refund or information return or statement relating to Taxes, including, without limitation, any schedule or attachment thereto, any amendment thereof, and any estimated report or statement. "THIRD PARTY PLANS" has the meaning set forth in Section 11.8(d) of this Agreement. "THREATENED" means a claim, Proceeding, dispute, action, or other matter for which any demand or statement has been made, orally or in writing, or any oral or written notice has been given, that would lead a reasonably prudent Person to conclude that such a claim, Proceeding, dispute, action, or other matter may, with reasonable certainty, be asserted, commenced, taken or otherwise pursued in the future; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the foregoing shall not include customer billing or service disputes in the Ordinary Course of Business. "TITLE DOCUMENTS" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.14(a) of this Agreement. "TITLE POLICY" has the meaning set forth in Section 5.14(c) of this Agreement. "TRANSACTIONAL EXPENSES" has the meaning set forth in Section 13.10 of this Agreement. "USE" means to appropriate any of the Confidential Information of the Company and/or its Subsidiaries for the benefit of oneself or any other Person other than the Company. "VDH" means the Office of Water Programs of the Virginia Department of Health, a regulatory agency of the Commonwealth of Virginia which, among other things, regulates the issuance of water system permits and compliance with federal and state Applicable Laws. "WARN ACTS" has the meaning set forth in Section 3.10(k) of this Agreement. ARTICLE 2 PURCHASE OF STOCK; PURCHASE PRICE 2.1 PURCHASE AND SALE OF STOCK. In reliance upon the representations, warranties and covenants contained in this Agreement as of the date hereof and on the Closing Date, the Purchaser agrees to purchase the Stock from the Shareholder, and the Shareholder agrees to sell, transfer, convey, assign and deliver the Stock to the Purchaser on the terms and conditions set forth in this Agreement. Such sale, transfer, conveyance, assignment and delivery of the Stock shall convey good and marketable title to the Stock, free and clear of any and all Rights and Encumbrances, and at such time the Stock will be fully paid and non-assessable. At the Closing the Shareholder will deliver to the Purchaser certificate(s) evidencing the Stock duly endorsed in blank or with stock powers duly executed by the Shareholder. 2.2 PURCHASE PRICE. The purchase price to be paid to the Shareholder by the Purchaser for the Stock (the "PURCHASE PRICE") shall be Forty-Eight Million Dollars ($48,000,000). 10
2.3 PAYMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE ON THE CLOSING DATE. The Purchase Price shall be paid on the Closing Date by wire transfer of immediately available funds to an account (or accounts) designated by the Shareholder at least two (2) business days prior to the Closing. 2.4 CLOSING AND CLOSING DELIVERIES. (a) CLOSING AND CLOSING DATE. Subject to the satisfaction or waiver of the conditions precedent contained in Articles 6, 7 and 8 hereof, the closing of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement (the "CLOSING") shall be held at a mutually agreed time, but in no event no more than ten (10) business days after (i) all consents and approvals (including the Final Order(s) described and defined in Section 6.2 of this Agreement) required to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby have been received from any Governmental Body, including the FTC, DOJ, the NCUC and the VDH, and (ii) all other conditions to the Closing have been duly satisfied or waived in writing, at the offices of Briggs and Morgan, Professional Association, 2400 IDS Center, Minneapolis, Minnesota, 55402. The Closing shall be effective as of 11:59 P.M. on the date of Closing and such date is referred to in this Agreement as the "CLOSING DATE." (b) CLOSING DELIVERIES BY THE SHAREHOLDER. At the Closing, the Shareholder shall execute, where necessary or appropriate, and deliver to the Purchaser each and all of the following: (i) A certificate in the form of EXHIBIT A hereto signed by a duly authorized officer of the Shareholder, and dated as of the Closing Date, to the effect that the representations and warranties made by the Shareholder in this Agreement (as modified by the Schedules and any Supplement(s)) and in any document, instrument and/or agreement to be executed and delivered by the Shareholder pursuant to this Agreement are true and correct in all material respects at and as of the Closing and the Shareholder has performed and complied with all of its covenants, agreements and obligations under this Agreement which are to be performed and complied with by the Shareholder on or prior to the Closing Date; (ii) The certificates evidencing the Stock duly endorsed by the Shareholder in blank or accompanied by stock powers duly executed by the Shareholder; (iii) A copy certified by the Secretary of the Shareholder of the duly adopted resolutions of the Board of Directors of the Shareholder approving this Agreement, including the Ancillary Documents, authorizing the execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby; (iv) The corporate minute books, the corporate seals, and stock books for the Company and the Subsidiaries; (v) A satisfaction of debt in a form satisfactory to the Purchaser executed by the Shareholder with respect to the payment of intercompany 11
liabilities and obligations between the Shareholder and its Affiliates (other than the Company and the Subsidiaries) and the Company and the Subsidiaries; (vi) Delivery of any and all documents relating to Permits; (vii) A duly executed written opinion letter by counsel for the Shareholder, dated as of the Closing Date, addressed to the Purchaser, as contemplated by Section 7.4 of this Agreement; (viii) Duly executed resignations of (A) the officers of the Company and the Subsidiaries who are also officers of the Shareholder, and (B) the directors of the Company and the Subsidiaries, effective as of the Closing Date; (ix) Certificates of good standing for the Shareholder, the Company and each of the Subsidiaries dated within five (5) days of the Closing Date issued by the Secretary of State of their respective states of incorporation; (x) The non-foreign person affidavit required by Section 1445 of the Code; (xi) The termination documents for the guarantees described in Section 5.22; (xii) Evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser that the Company and the Subsidiaries have arranged for the payment of the Retention Payments concurrently upon the Closing; and (xiii) Such other documents and items as are reasonably necessary or appropriate to effect the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or which may be customary under local law. (c) CLOSING DELIVERIES BY THE PURCHASER. At the Closing, the Purchaser shall execute, where necessary or appropriate, and deliver to the Shareholder each and all of the following: (i) Payment of the Purchase Price in the manner set forth in Section 2.3 of this Agreement; (ii) A certificate in the form of EXHIBIT C hereto signed by a duly authorized officer of the Purchaser, and dated as of the Closing Date, to the effect that the representations and warranties made by the Purchaser in this Agreement (as modified by the Schedules and any Supplement(s)) and in any document, instrument and/or agreement to be executed and delivered by the Purchaser pursuant to this Agreement are true and correct in all material respects at and as of the Closing and the Purchaser has performed and complied with all of its covenants, agreements and obligations under this Agreement which are to be performed and complied with by the Purchaser on or prior to the Closing Date; 12
(iii) A copy certified by the Secretary of the Purchaser of the duly adopted resolutions of the Board of Directors of the Purchaser approving this Agreement, including the Ancillary Documents, and authorizing the execution and delivery of this Agreement, including the Ancillary Documents, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby; (iv) A duly executed written opinion letter by counsel for the Purchaser, dated as of the Closing Date, addressed to the Shareholder, as contemplated by Section 8.3 of this Agreement; (v) Evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Shareholder that the performance and other bonds required by Section 5.25 have been secured in accordance with the provisions of such section; (vi) A certificate of good standing of the Purchaser dated within five (5) days of the Closing Date issued by the Secretary of State of the Purchaser's state of incorporation; and (vii) Such other documents and items as are reasonably necessary or appropriate to effect the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or which may be customary under local law. ARTICLE 3 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE SHAREHOLDER As an inducement for the Purchaser to enter into this Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby, the Shareholder represents and warrants to the Purchaser that each and all of the following representations and warranties (as modified by the Schedules to this Agreement (the "SCHEDULES") and any Supplement delivered by the Shareholder pursuant to Section 13.21 of this Agreement) are true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and will be true and correct as of the Closing Date. The Schedules shall be arranged in paragraphs corresponding to the sections and subsections contained in this Article 3. 3.1 ORGANIZATION. (a) THE SHAREHOLDER. The Shareholder is a Minnesota corporation and is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of Minnesota. The Shareholder has all requisite power and authority to own, operate and lease its properties and assets (including the Stock) and to conduct its business as it is now being conducted. (b) THE COMPANY AND THE SUBSIDIARIES. The Company and the Subsidiaries each (i) are a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of their respective states of incorporation, (ii) have all requisite power and authority, corporate and otherwise, to own, operate and lease its properties and assets and to conduct the Business as it is now being conducted by each entity. The Business is the only business conducted by the Company and the Subsidiaries. As set forth in SCHEDULE 3.1(b), each of the Company and the Subsidiaries is duly qualified to transact 13
business as a foreign corporation and is in good standing under the laws of every state or jurisdiction in which the nature of their activities or of their properties (owned, leased or operated) makes such qualification necessary and in which the failure to be so qualified could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. 3.2 CAPITALIZATION. The authorized capital stock of the Company consists solely of 6,000 shares of common voting stock, One Dollar ($1.00) par value, of which 6,000 shares are issued and outstanding on the date hereof, and are owned beneficially and of record by the Shareholder, free and clear of all liens and Encumbrances. The Company is the sole legal, beneficial and equitable shareholder of all of the equity interests in and with respect to the Subsidiaries. None of the Stock has been issued in violation of the rights of any Person. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.2 hereto, as of the date hereof, (i) there are no Convertible Securities or Debt Securities outstanding, (ii) there are no Rights outstanding, and (iii) there are no shareholder agreements or other agreements, understandings or commitments relating to the rights of the Shareholder to vote or dispose of the Stock. 3.3 DUE AUTHORIZATION. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, including the documents, instruments and agreements to be executed and delivered by the Shareholder pursuant to this Agreement (the "ANCILLARY DOCUMENTS"), and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Shareholder. This Agreement and the Ancillary Documents have been, or will be on or before the Closing Date, duly and validly authorized, executed and delivered by the Shareholder, and the obligations of the Shareholder hereunder and thereunder are or will be, upon such execution and delivery, valid, legally binding and enforceable against the Shareholder in accordance with their respective terms. 3.4 NO BREACH. The Shareholder has full power and authority, corporate and otherwise, to sell, assign, transfer, convey and deliver the Stock to the Purchaser and to otherwise perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents. The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents to be executed and delivered by the Shareholder pursuant to this Agreement, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby will not: (i) violate any provision of the Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws of the Shareholder, (ii) except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.4, or as contemplated by clause (iii) immediately following, violate any Applicable Laws or Injunction applicable to the Shareholder, the Company or the Subsidiaries, (iii) other than the filings required by HSR, the NCUC, and the VDH, and except as provided in SCHEDULE 3.4 hereto, require any filing with, Permits from, authorization, consent or approval of, or the giving of any notice to, any Person, (iv) except as provided in SCHEDULE 3.4 hereto, result in a violation or breach of, or constitute (with or without due notice or lapse of time or both) a default (or give another party any rights of termination, cancellation or acceleration) under any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any note, bond, mortgage, indenture, license, franchise, Permit (including, but not limited to, any Permits, approvals or authorizations of any Governmental Body), lease or other Contract to which the Company and/or the Shareholder is a party, or by which they or any of their properties or assets may be bound, or (v) result in the creation or imposition of any Encumbrance on any of the properties or assets of the Company or the Subsidiaries, such that in the case of any violation or the absence of Permit, consent or approval 14
described in clauses (ii), (iii) and (iv) above, the occurrence or omission of which would not be reasonably likely to have a Material Adverse Effect. 3.5 CLEAR TITLE. Except as otherwise set forth in SCHEDULE 3.5 or the leased property disclosed in SCHEDULE 3.16 hereto, on the Closing Date, (i) the Company and each of the Subsidiaries will hold good title to their respective personal property, and (ii) such personal property is and shall be free and clear of any and all Encumbrances of any kind, nature and description whatsoever, except for Encumbrances which are disclosed, reflected or reserved for or against in the Balance Sheets. 3.6 CONDITION OF ASSETS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.6 hereto, all of the properties and assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries (i) have been maintained in accordance with industry standards in all material respects, (ii) are in reasonable operating condition and repair, and (iii) are the assets used to operate the Company's Business as currently conducted. 3.7 LITIGATION. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.7 hereto, and except for any Proceeding which generally affects the business of all Persons conducting business similar to the Company and the Subsidiaries and in which the Company and/or the Subsidiaries are not a named defendant, there is no Proceeding: (a) that has been commenced by or served upon the Company, the Subsidiaries or the Shareholder, or of which the Shareholder or the Company have Knowledge; or (b) to the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, that challenges, or that will have, the effect of preventing, delaying, making illegal, or otherwise interfering with, any of the transactions contemplated hereby. To the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, no such Proceeding has been Threatened. Except as provided in SCHEDULE 3.7 hereto, to the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, the Company and the Subsidiaries are not (individually or otherwise) a party to or subject to the provisions of any Injunction which could, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or impair the ability of the Shareholder to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby. 3.8 LABOR MATTERS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.8 hereto, the Company and the Subsidiaries, individually or collectively, have never been a party to any collective bargaining agreement or other labor Contract and there has never been, and there is not presently pending or existing, and to the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, there is not Threatened (i) any strike, slowdown, walkout, picketing, work stoppage, labor arbitration or other Proceeding in respect of the grievance of any employee, (ii) any application or complaint filed by any employee or union with the National Labor Relations Board, or any comparable Governmental Body, (iii) any organizational activity or other labor dispute against or affecting the Company or the Subsidiaries, and no application for certification of a collective bargaining agreement is pending or, to the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, is Threatened. There is no lockout of any employees by the Company or the Subsidiaries and no such action is 15
contemplated by either the Company or the Subsidiaries. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.8 hereto, there is no Proceeding pending or, to the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, Threatened by any Person against the Company or the Subsidiaries or any of their current or former officers, directors or employees relating to employment, equal employment opportunity, discrimination, harassment, wrongful discharge, unfair labor practices, immigration, wages, hours, benefits, collective bargaining, the payment of social security or similar Taxes, occupational safety and health or plant closing. 3.9 TAX MATTERS. (a) TAX RETURNS. The Company and the Subsidiaries have timely filed, or caused to be timely filed, or will timely file or cause to be timely filed with the appropriate taxing authorities, all Tax Returns that are required to be filed by, or with respect to, the Company and the Subsidiaries on or prior to the Closing Date. The Returns have accurately reflected and will accurately reflect all Liability for Taxes of the Company and the Subsidiaries for the periods covered thereby. SCHEDULE 3.9(a) lists all income Tax Returns filed with any Governmental Body with respect to the Company and the Subsidiaries for the taxable periods ended on or after December 31, 1999. (b) PAYMENT OF TAXES. All Taxes and Tax Liabilities of the Company and the Subsidiaries for all taxable years or periods that end on or before the Closing Date and, with respect to any taxable year or period beginning before and ending after the Closing Date, the portion of such taxable year or period ending on the day immediately preceding the Closing Date ("PRE-CLOSING PERIOD") have been timely paid. (c) OTHER TAX MATTERS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.9(c): (i) the Company and the Subsidiaries have not been the subject of a dispute or claim or an audit or other examination of Taxes by the Tax authorities of any Governmental Body, nor have the Company or the Subsidiaries received any notices from any such Taxing authority relating to any issue which could have a Material Adverse Effect. SCHEDULE 3.9(c) also includes a list of all Tax examination reports and statements of deficiencies assessed against or agreed to by the Company and/or the Subsidiaries since January 1, 1998, each of which has been provided to the Purchaser. (ii) the Shareholder, the Company and the Subsidiaries have not (A) entered into an agreement or waiver or been requested to enter into an agreement or waiver extending any statute of limitations relating to the payment or collection of Taxes of the Company or the Subsidiaries, or (B) is presently contesting the Tax Liability of the Company or the Subsidiaries before any Governmental Body. (iii) the Company and the Subsidiaries have not been included in any "consolidated," "unitary" or "combined" Tax Return provided for under Applicable Law with respect to Taxes for any taxable period for which the statute of limitations has not expired. 16
(iv) all Taxes which the Company or the Subsidiaries are (or have been) required by law to withhold or collect have been duly withheld or collected, and have been timely paid over to the proper authorities to the extent due and payable. (v) neither the Company nor either of the Subsidiaries is a "United States real property holding corporation" within the meaning of Section 897(c)(2) of the Code. (vi) there are no Tax sharing, allocation, indemnification or similar agreements in effect as between the Company and/or the Subsidiaries or any predecessor or Affiliate thereof and any other party (including the Shareholder and any predecessors or Affiliates thereof) under which the Purchaser, the Company or either of the Subsidiaries could be liable for any Taxes or other claims of any Person. (vii) none of the Company or the Subsidiaries have applied for, been granted, or agreed to any accounting method change for which it will be required to take into account any adjustment under Section 481 of the Code or any similar provision of the Code or the corresponding Tax laws of any nation, state or locality. (viii) no election under Section 341(f) of the Code has been made or shall be made prior to the Closing Date to treat the Company or the Subsidiaries as a consenting corporation, as defined in Section 341 of the Code. (ix) neither the Company nor the Subsidiaries are, individually or collectively, a party to any agreement that would require any of them to make any payment that would constitute an "excess parachute payment" for purposes of Sections 280G and 4999 of the Code. (x) there are no requests for rulings in respect of any Taxes pending between the Company or the Subsidiaries and any Tax authority. 3.10 EMPLOYEE BENEFITS. (a) BENEFIT PLANS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10 hereto, the Company and the Subsidiaries do not maintain or contribute to any Benefit Plans. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing provision of this Section, except as described in SCHEDULE 3.10 hereto, there are no pension plans, welfare plans, or any employee benefit plans qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code, to which the Company or either of the Subsidiaries are required to contribute. Except as described in SCHEDULE 3.10 hereto, the Company and the Subsidiaries do not and will not have any unfunded Liability for services rendered prior to the Closing Date under any Benefit Plans. The Company and the Subsidiaries are not in any material default under any Benefit Plan. Other than claims for benefits in ordinary course, there are no actions, suits, disputes, arbitrations or other material claims pending or, to the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, Threatened with respect to any Benefit Plan. 17
(b) EMPLOYEE PENSION BENEFIT PLANS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10, none of the Company, the Subsidiaries, or any Person required to be aggregated with the Company and the Subsidiaries under Section 414(b), (c), (m), or (o) of the Code ("ERISA AFFILIATE"), maintains or has ever maintained an Employee Pension Benefit Plan as defined in Section 3(2) of ERISA, that is subject to Section 412 of the Code and Section 302 of ERISA. With respect to each such Employee Pension Benefit Plan maintained or ever maintained by the Company, by either Subsidiary, or by any ERISA Affiliate: (i) no unsatisfied liabilities to participants, the IRS, the United States Department of Labor, the PBGC, or to any other Person or entity have been incurred as a result of the termination of any Employee Pension Benefit Plan, (ii) no Employee Pension Benefit Plan, which is subject to the minimum funding requirements of Part 3 of Subtitle B of Title I of ERISA or subject to Section 412 of the Code, has incurred any "accumulated funding deficiency" within the meaning of Section 302 of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code and there has been no waived funding deficiency within the meaning of Section 303 of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code, (iii) all premiums to the PBGC have been timely paid in full, and (iv) the PBGC has not instituted proceedings to terminate any such Plan and no condition exists that presents a risk that such proceedings will be instituted or that would constitute grounds under Section 4042 of ERISA for the termination of, or the appointment of a trustee to administer, any such Plan. Neither the Company nor the Subsidiaries currently sponsor, maintain, contribute to, or are required to contribute to an Employee Pension Benefit Plan subject to Title IV of ERISA. (c) MULTIEMPLOYER PLANS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10 hereto, neither the Company nor any of its Subsidiaries contributes to, or has or could have, any Liability (including but not limited to withdrawal Liability) with respect to any multiemployer plan (as defined in Section 4064(a) of ERISA or Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA). (d) OTHER PLANS. Except as otherwise set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10, there are no present or former employees of the Company or the Subsidiaries who are entitled to (i) any pensions, group health, or other benefits to be paid upon or after termination of employment, including termination on account of disability (except as otherwise required under Section 601 of ERISA), or (ii) deferred compensation payments. (e) DOCUMENTS. The Shareholder has made available to the Purchaser the following documents, as they may have been amended to the date hereof, embodying or relating to each Benefit Plan of the Company and the Subsidiaries set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10 hereto: (i) all written plan documents for each such Benefit Plan, including all amendments to each such Benefit Plan, any related trust agreements, group annuity contracts, insurance policies or other funding agreements or arrangements, (ii) the most recent determination letter received from the IRS, if any, as to the qualified status of any such Benefit Plan under Section 401(a) of the Code, (iii) the current summary plan description, if any, for each such Benefit Plan, and (iv) the most recent annual return/report on form 5500, 5500-C or 5500-R, if any, for each such Benefit Plan. (f) PROHIBITED TRANSACTIONS. The Company and the Subsidiaries have not, nor has any other "disqualified person" or "party in interest", as defined in Section 4975(e)(2) 18
of the Code and Section 3(14) of ERISA, respectively, engaged in a "prohibited transaction," as such term is defined in Section 4975 of the Code and Section 406 of ERISA, with respect to any Benefit Plan of the Company or any Subsidiary subject to ERISA, which could reasonably be expected to subject the Company or any Subsidiary to a Tax or penalty on prohibited transactions imposed by either Section 502(i) of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code. The execution and delivery by the Shareholder of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby will not (i) involve any prohibited transaction within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code with respect to any Benefit Plan set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10 hereto, or (ii) accelerate the payment of any benefits under any Benefit Plan set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10 hereto. (g) FIDUCIARY DUTY. None of the Company, the Subsidiaries, nor any other fiduciary of any Benefit Plan set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10 hereto are engaged in any transaction with respect to such Benefit Plan or failed to act in a manner with respect to such Benefit Plan which could reasonably be expected to subject the Company or any Subsidiary to any material Liability for a breach of fiduciary duty under ERISA or any other Applicable Law. (h) GROUP HEALTH PLANS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10, the Company, the Subsidiaries and all ERISA Affiliates have complied in all material respects with the coverage continuation requirements of all Applicable Laws, including Sections 601 through 609 of ERISA, Section 4980B of the Code, and the requirements of any similar state law regarding continued health coverage, and the Company and the Subsidiaries have incurred no material Liability with respect to its failure to offer or provide continued coverage in accordance with the foregoing requirements, nor is there any suit or other action pending, or to the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, Threatened, with respect to such requirements. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10, (i) there has been no violation of the obligations imposed by Section 9801 of the Code and Part 7 of Subtitle B of Title I of ERISA with respect to any Benefit Plan to which such obligations apply, (ii) none of the Company, the Subsidiaries or any ERISA Affiliate has contributed to a nonconforming group health plan (as defined in Section 5000(c) of the Code), and (iii) none of the Company, the Subsidiaries or any ERISA Affiliate has incurred a Tax under Section 5000(a) of the Code which is, or is reasonably expected to become, a Liability of the Company, the Subsidiaries or an ERISA Affiliate. (i) TRIGGERING OF OBLIGATION AND OTHER BINDING COMMITMENTS. Except for the claims set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10, the consummation of the transactions described in this Agreement, in and of themselves, or in conjunction with any other event which has occurred on or prior to the date hereof (excluding the Retention and Severance Agreements), will not entitle any current or former employee of the Company or the Subsidiaries to severance pay, unemployment compensation or any other similar payment, or accelerate the time of payment or vesting, or increase the amount of compensation due to any such employee or former employee. (j) OPERATIONAL COMPLIANCE. Each Benefit Plan has been administered in all material respects in accordance with its terms and all Applicable Laws, and, except as set 19
forth in SCHEDULE 3.10, each Benefit Plan intended to be qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code is so qualified and is, as most recently amended, the subject of a favorable determination letter as to its qualification. No event has occurred and no condition or set of circumstances exists in connection with which the Company or any Subsidiary could be directly or indirectly subject to any Encumbrance or loss of Tax deduction under ERISA or the Code or under any agreement, instrument, statute, rule of law or regulations pursuant to or under which the Company or any Subsidiary has indemnified or is required to indemnify any Person against any such liability (except liability for benefit claims and funding obligations payable in the ordinary course). (k) WARN COMPLIANCE. The Company and the Subsidiaries have complied in all respects with the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, 29 U.S.C. ss. 2101 et seq., and its corresponding regulations, and any similar state law, rule or regulation or local ordinance, rule or regulation, in each case in effect as of the date hereof, providing for notification to employees affected by closing, relocation, sale of business, mass layoff or similar event (collectively, the "WARN ACTS") on account of closings, relocations, sales of businesses, mass layoffs or similar events occurring on or prior to the Closing and all related notices, payments, fines or assessments due to any Government Body pursuant to such WARN Acts. (l) ABSENCE OF TERMINATION RESTRICTIONS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10, (i) each Benefit Plan may be terminated by the Company or either Subsidiary, as applicable, in accordance with its terms and without the Company or any Subsidiary incurring any obligation or liability arising or resulting from such termination, and (ii) neither the Company, either Subsidiary nor the Shareholder has made any representations to employees of the Company or either Subsidiary that any Benefit Plan would be continued without change for any period of time on and after the Closing Date. The foregoing shall not be applicable to the Retention and Severance Agreements described in Section 3.37 and 11.8 hereof. 3.11 NO GUARANTEES. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.11, (i) none of the obligations of the Company or the Subsidiaries is guaranteed by, or subject to a similar contingent Liability to, any Person, and (ii) neither the Company nor the Subsidiaries have, individually or collectively, guaranteed, or otherwise become contingently liable for, any Liability of any Person. To the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, no event has arisen that would give rise to any obligation under any guarantee set forth in SCHEDULE 3.11 or under any of the bonds set forth in SCHEDULE 5.25. 3.12 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS. The Shareholder has caused the Company and the Subsidiaries to furnish true and correct copies of the financial statements identified in SCHEDULE 3.12 hereto to the Purchaser. All of said financial statements, including any notes thereto, fairly present the consolidated financial position and condition of the Company and the Subsidiaries as of their respective dates and the results of their operations for the periods covered in accordance with GAAP applied by the Company and the Subsidiaries on a consistent basis throughout the periods covered thereby and on a basis consistent with that of prior years and periods; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that any unaudited and/or interim financial statements listed on such SCHEDULE 3.12 are subject to year-end adjustments and lack footnotes and other required 20
presentation items. Except for Liabilities (i) reflected or reserved against in the consolidated balance sheets (the "BALANCE SHEETS") of the Company and the Subsidiaries as of December 31, 2002 (the "BALANCE SHEET DATE") or in the notes thereto, (ii) incurred in the Ordinary Course of Business since the BALANCE SHEET DATE (none of which resulted from, arose out of, is related to, or was caused by any breach of Contract), (iii) arising under Contracts entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business to which the Company or the Subsidiaries are a party, and/or (iv) set forth in SCHEDULE 3.12 hereto, the Company and the Subsidiaries do not have any Liabilities which, individually or in the aggregate, would have a Material Adverse Effect. The reserves reflected in the Balance Sheets are adequate. 3.13 ABSENCE OF CERTAIN DEVELOPMENTS. Except for the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or as otherwise set forth on SCHEDULE 3.13 hereto, since the Balance Sheet Date, (i) there has not been any development or combination of developments affecting the Company or the Subsidiaries of which the Shareholder, the Company or the Subsidiaries have Knowledge that has had, or is likely to have, a Material Adverse Effect, and (ii) the Company and the Subsidiaries have conducted the Business in the Ordinary Course of Business and have not: (a) declared, set aside or paid a dividend or made any other distribution with respect to any class of capital stock of the Company or the Subsidiaries; (b) changed accounting methods or practices (including, without limitation, any change in depreciation, amortization or cost accounting policies or rates); (c) except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.37, entered into any employment contract or collective bargaining agreement, written or oral, or modified the terms of any existing employment contract or agreement or adopted, amended, modified or terminated any Benefit Plan; (d) made any change or amendment in its articles of incorporation or bylaws; (e) issued or sold any securities; acquired, directly or indirectly, by redemption or otherwise, any securities; or granted or entered into any options, warrants, calls or commitments of any kind with respect thereto; (f) made any capital expenditure exceeding One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000); and/or (g) incurred any obligations for borrowed money or purchase money debt other than that incurred pursuant to the Debt Instruments described and set forth in SCHEDULE 3.29 of this Agreement. 3.14 INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY. SCHEDULE 3.14 hereto contains a list and description of all Intellectual Property owned by the Company and the Subsidiaries or used by the Company or the Subsidiaries in the operation of the Business. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.14, the Company and the Subsidiaries have all rights necessary to use such Intellectual Property, and the Shareholder and the Company have no Knowledge of any asserted claim to the effect that the operation of the Business or the possession or use in the Business of any of the Intellectual Property listed and set forth in SCHEDULE 3.14 hereto, infringes the Intellectual Property rights of 21
any other Person. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.14, the Shareholder and the Company have no Knowledge of any claim that any of the Intellectual Property set forth in SCHEDULE 3.14 is invalid; and, except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.14 hereto, neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is obligated under any Contract or otherwise to pay royalties, fees or other payments with respect to any of the Intellectual Property listed and set forth in SCHEDULE 3.14 hereto. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.14, the consummation of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement will not adversely affect the use by the Company or the Subsidiaries of any of the Intellectual Property set forth in SCHEDULE 3.14 hereto. 3.15 COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.15, (i) the Business has been operated and the Company and the Subsidiaries are in compliance in all respects with the requirements of Applicable Laws to which the Company and the Subsidiaries are subject such that any lack of compliance would not have a Material Adverse Effect, and (ii) neither the Company nor the Subsidiaries have received any notice of, and neither the Shareholder nor the Company have Knowledge of, any violation of a material nature of any Applicable Laws respecting the Company or the Subsidiaries. 3.16 OPERATING CONTRACTS. Except as disclosed in SCHEDULE 3.16 and the developer Contracts set forth in SCHEDULE 3.22 (the "DEVELOPER CONTRACTS"), and except with respect to (i) Contracts that have been fully performed as of the date hereof and have no further force or effect, (ii) Contracts for capital expenditures having a remaining balance of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000) or less, (iii) leases of personal property having a term of less than one (1) year or which require payments on an annual basis of Twenty Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000) or less per annum, (iv) Contracts for services, raw materials, supplies or equipment involving payments of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000) or less per annum, or (v) Contracts for the sale of any properties or services involving a value of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000) or less per annum, excluding properties or services sold in the Ordinary Course of Business, the Company and the Subsidiaries are not a party to any oral or written Contract. All of the Contracts set forth in SCHEDULE 3.16 hereto are referred to in this Agreement as the "OPERATING CONTRACTS." All of the Operating Contracts and the Developer Contracts were made in the Ordinary Course of Business, and, to the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, are valid, binding and currently in full force and effect. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.16 hereto, neither the Company nor the Subsidiaries are in material default under any of the Operating Contracts or the Developer Contracts, and, to the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, no event has occurred which, through the passage of time or the giving of notice, or both, would constitute a default by the Company or the Subsidiaries, or give rise to a right of termination or cancellation by another party under any of the Operating Contracts or the Developer Contracts, or cause the acceleration of any Liability of the Company or the Subsidiaries, or result in the creation of any Encumbrance upon any of the properties or assets of the Company or the Subsidiaries. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.16 hereto, to the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, no other party is in default under any of the Operating Contracts or the Developer Contracts. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.16 hereto, none of the Operating Contracts or the Developer Contracts have been canceled, terminated, amended or modified. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.4 hereto, the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby will not require the consent or approval of any Person under any of the Operating Contracts or the Developer Contracts. 22
3.17 REAL ESTATE. With respect to real estate (including fixtures and improvements) owned by the Company or the Subsidiaries (the "OWNED REAL ESTATE"), and real estate (including fixtures and improvements) leased by the Company or the Subsidiaries (the "LEASED REAL ESTATE") (collectively, Owned Real Estate and Leased Real Estate shall be referred to herein as "REAL ESTATE"): (a) SCHEDULE 3.17 contains a description (including system name, county internal identification numbers and deed and map references) segregated by each of the Company and the Subsidiaries of each parcel of Owned Real Estate and a listing and description (including the parties, term, expiration date(s), address, and the general use description of the leased premises) of each written or oral lease regarding Leased Real Estate which is not otherwise set forth in SCHEDULE 3.16 hereto (the leases of Leased Real Estate described in SCHEDULE 3.16 and SCHEDULE 3.17 are collectively, the "LEASES"); (b) Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17 hereto, there are no deferred property Taxes or assessments with respect to the Real Estate which may or will become due and payable as a result of the consummation of the transaction contemplated hereby; (c) The Company, and each Subsidiary, respectively, is the sole owner in fee simple title of each parcel of Owned Real Estate and each such parcel is free and clear of any and all Encumbrances, except (A) those parcels of Owned Real Estate that are held in fee simple determinable, fee simple subject to condition subsequent or are held solely pursuant to easement (perpetual or otherwise), and (B) (i) those Encumbrances set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17 hereto, (ii) municipal zoning ordinances, recorded or platted easements for public utilities and recorded building and use restrictions and covenants, (iii) general Real Estate Taxes and installments of special assessments payable in the year of Closing, and (iv) minor survey exceptions, Encumbrances, licenses, easements or reservations of, or rights of others for, oil, gas minerals, ores or metals, rights of way, sewers, electric lines, telegraph and telephone lines and other similar purposes, or zoning or other restrictions on the use of real property, minor defects in title or other similar charges or Encumbrances not interfering in any material respect with the Ordinary Course of Business of the Company or with the use or ownership of the Owned Real Estate (collectively the "PERMITTED ENCUMBRANCES"). To the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, the Permitted Encumbrances and those Encumbrances set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17 hereto do not individually or in the aggregate materially impair or prohibit the current use or operation of the Owned Real Estate by the Company or the Subsidiaries; (d) Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17 hereto, there are no condemnation Proceedings pending or, to the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, Threatened with respect to all or any part of any parcel of Real Estate. SCHEDULE 3.17 hereto sets forth all private condemnation proceedings that have been initiated by the Company under a statutory power of condemnation granted by the North Carolina General Statutes (Chapter 40A, Section 40A-3(a)(1)); (e) To the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, except for the Permitted Encumbrances and those Encumbrances set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17 hereto, 23
there are no Encumbrances which materially and adversely affect the use or occupancy of all or any part of any parcel of Owned Real Estate or any easements; (f) Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17 hereto, to the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, the improvements located on each parcel of Real Estate, including fences, driveways and other structures occupied, used or claimed by the Company or the Subsidiaries, are wholly within the boundary lines of such parcels of Real Estate and such improvements and the present uses thereof by the Company and the Subsidiaries, as applicable, do not in any material respect infringe upon the rights of any other Person; (g) Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17 hereto, to the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, no buildings, fences, driveways or other structures of any adjoining owner encroach, in any material respect which interferes with the operation of the Business, upon any part of any parcel of Real Estate or any easements; (h) Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17, the Company and the Subsidiaries, as applicable, have all easements (or access through public utility easements) on to private property, construction permits, highway encroachment agreements and permits (and other similar licenses and permits) and right-of-way-licenses reasonably necessary to conduct the Business and to use and operate the Real Estate in the manner it is currently being used and operated by the Company and the Subsidiaries, except where the failure to have any such easements or access, construction permits, highway encroachment agreements and permits (and other similar licenses and permits), and right-of-way licenses would not have a Material Adverse Effect; (i) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary is in default in the performance of any material obligation under the Leases or easements, and to the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, none of the other parties to the Leases or easements are in default in performance of their material obligations thereunder, the Leases and easements are in full force and effect, and neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiaries has assigned its rights under the Leases or easements; (j) Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17 neither the Company nor any Subsidiary has leased or granted to any other Person or entity the right to use or occupy all or any portion of the Owned Real Estate, and the Owned Real Estate is not subject to an option or right to purchase in favor of any Person or entity; (k) Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17, no consents to or approval of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement are required from any Person or entity under the terms of the easements or Leases, and to the extent a consent or approval is required (each, a "REQUIRED CONSENT"), on or before Closing, the Shareholder shall, at its sole cost, obtain the Required Consent, in form reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser; and (l) Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.17, each of the parcels of Owned Real Estate constitutes a separate tax parcel, and is not taxed with any other real property. 24
The Purchaser acknowledges and agrees that the title commitment and survey work and documentation provided in Section 5.14 of this Agreement may contain additional information regarding the Owned Real Estate of which the Shareholder does not have Knowledge as of the date of this Agreement and, as a result, may be properly included in a Supplement submitted by the Shareholder in accordance with the terms of Section 13.21 of this Agreement. 3.18 ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE. The accounts receivable of the Company and the Subsidiaries, and other rights to the payment of money represent, and on the Closing Date will represent, valid obligations arising from sales actually made or services actually performed in the Ordinary Course of Business. 3.19 BOOKS AND RECORDS; BANK ACCOUNTS. All of the books of account and other financial and corporate records of the Company and the Subsidiaries have been made available to the Purchaser and its representatives (or will be so made available prior to the Closing Date). Such books of account and records are current and complete in all material respects. All such books and records are consistent with the financial statements set forth in SCHEDULE 3.12 hereto. 3.20 EMPLOYEES. (a) SCHEDULE 3.20 sets forth a complete and accurate list of all the employees of the Company and each Subsidiary as of the date hereof (the "EMPLOYEES"), together with the following information for each such Employee: name, position held, current salary, 2002 bonus, commission and incentive amounts (if any), Fair Labor Standards Act status, date of hire, current salary grade, annual vacation entitlement, accrued, but unused vacation, service date for employee benefit plan purposes, social security number, work locations and any other information the Purchaser may reasonably request. SCHEDULE 3.20 will indicate which Employees are not actively at work due to an approved medical, family, military, or personal leave under the policies of the Company or any Subsidiary (the "INACTIVE EMPLOYEES") and, to the extent known, the date on which each Inactive Employee is expected to return to active employment. SCHEDULE 3.20 will be updated as of five (5) business days prior to the Closing Date and will be true and correct in all material respects as of that date. (b) Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.20, none of the Employees have informed the Company or either of the Subsidiaries that he/she intends to terminate employment with the Company or either of the Subsidiaries, as applicable. SCHEDULE 3.20 also sets forth a description of any written Contract, other than the Benefit Plans set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10 hereto, with respect to the conditions of employment of any of the Employees. All Employees are employed on an "at-will" basis. (c) Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.20, none of the Employees are working based upon a non-resident visa and the Company and the Subsidiaries have complied with their respective obligations under the Immigration Reform Control Act. (d) Based on the Contracts to which the Company and each of the Subsidiaries is a party, neither the Company nor either of the Subsidiaries is presently subject to the requirements of Executive Order 11246. 25
3.21 PERMITS AND CERTIFICATE APPLICATIONS. (a) ISSUED PERMITS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.21, (i) the Company and each Subsidiary have timely obtained, or applied and meet the requirements for, all Permits of each Governmental Body, including, without limitation, the NCDEH, the NCDWQ, the NCUC and the VDH, having jurisdiction over the Company and/or the Subsidiaries, or any of their respective properties or assets, required to operate and carry on the Business as now being conducted and have timely applied to renew any such Permits for which such renewal application is required, and (ii) the Permits of the Company and the Subsidiaries are in full force and effect such that the absence of or compliance with the requirements of any such Permit, restrictions upon or lack of force or effect of any such Permits (either obtained or applied for) would not have a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Company nor the Subsidiaries have received notice that any Permit is being considered for non-renewal, termination, revocation or suspension. (b) PERMIT APPLICATIONS. The Company and/or the Subsidiaries have several pending applications for Permits and Permit extensions pending before Governmental Bodies, including the NCUC and the VDH, as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.21, for their respective water and/or wastewater utility system extension(s). In connection therewith, the Person applying for every Permit certificate may be required to post a performance or other bond, which posted bonds are included in SCHEDULE 5.25 of this Agreement (or a Supplement thereto). 3.22 DEVELOPER CONTRACTS. Except for Contract agreements which have no further executory obligations other than compliance with Applicable Laws, or which are terminated or expired, SCHEDULE 3.22 sets forth the agreements with developers to which either the Company and/or the Subsidiaries are a party, including (i) agreements for installation and acquisition by the Company or any Subsidiary of new water and/or wastewater utility systems which require future payments by the Company or any Subsidiary to certain developers based upon prospective customer/system connections, and (ii) agreements whereby the developer has reserved portions of water and wastewater utility systems production facility capacity for the period of years specified in the applicable Contract. 3.23 SUBSIDIARIES. Except for the Subsidiaries, the Company has no subsidiaries and does not own any shares of stock or other securities or equity interests, directly or indirectly, in any other Person. Except as disclosed or described in this Agreement or as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.23 hereto, the Company is not subject to any obligation or requirement to provide funds to, or invest in, any such Person. 3.24 INSURANCE. (a) The Shareholder, the Company and the Subsidiaries, as applicable, have individually or jointly maintained, and will continue to maintain until the Closing Date, the insurance set forth in SCHEDULE 3.24, which insurance covers some of the tangible real and personal property and assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries, whether owned or leased, against loss or damage by fire or other casualty. All such insurance is in full force 26
on the date of this Agreement and is either self-insured or carried with insurers licensed in the states affected by such policies. (b) The Company and the Subsidiaries are presently insured for general liability, vehicle liability and worker's compensation risks through a third party insurance company, which insurance covers claims made against the Company or any Subsidiary related to occurrences arising on or after February 1, 2003. (c) The Company and the Subsidiaries have in the past self-insured for general liability, vehicle liability and worker's compensation risks with a pool of entities through ALLETE, Inc., which self-insurance covers claims made against the Company or any Subsidiary related to occurrences arising prior to February 1, 2003. (d) The Company and the Subsidiaries do not maintain, and have not in the past maintained, any form of environmental insurance coverage. (e) The Company and the Subsidiaries have promptly and adequately notified the insurance carriers of any and all claims known with respect to the operations, products or services of the Company or the Subsidiaries for which the Company or the Subsidiaries are insured and no insurance carrier has denied coverage or reserved its rights with respect to such claims. The Company and the Subsidiaries have not been refused any insurance coverage by any insurance carrier to which they, individually or collectively, have applied for insurance during the past three (3) years. 3.25 BROKERS. Except for the engagement of UBS Securities LLC by the Shareholder, neither the Company, the Subsidiaries, the Shareholder nor their respective Affiliates has employed or engaged any broker, finder, agent, banker or third party, nor have they otherwise dealt with anyone purporting to act in the capacity of a finder or broker in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby. No commissions, finder's fees or like charges have been or will be incurred by the Company or the Subsidiaries in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement or the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby. Any such commissions, finders' fees or like charges shall be directly chargeable to and will be paid by the Shareholder as contemplated by the terms of this Agreement. 3.26 RELATIONSHIP WITH RELATED PERSONS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.26 hereto, and except for benefits set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10, the Shareholder, directors, officers, and employees of the Company and the Subsidiaries, and their Related Persons do not have any interest in any of the properties or assets of or used by the Company or the Subsidiaries and do not own, of record or as a beneficial owner, an equity interest or any other financial or profit interest in any Person that (i) has had business dealings or a material financial interest in any transaction with the Company or the Subsidiaries or, (ii) has engaged or is engaged in competition with the Company or the Subsidiaries with respect to any line of products or services of the Company or the Subsidiaries in any market presently served by the Company or the Subsidiaries (a "COMPETING BUSINESS") (except for less than five percent (5%) of the outstanding capital stock of any Competing Business that is publicly traded on any recognized exchange or in the over-the-counter market). To the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, and except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.26 hereto, neither the Shareholder, nor any 27
director or officer of the Company or any Subsidiary, and none of their Related Persons, is a party to any Contract with, or has any claim or right against, the Company or the Subsidiaries, other than the rights the officers and directors of the Company and the Subsidiaries have with respect to indemnification under state law. All money owed by the Company and the Subsidiaries to their respective shareholders, directors or officers, or their Related Persons, (other than for salary) are for bona fide debts and are set forth in SCHEDULE 3.26 hereto. 3.27 INTERNAL DISCLOSURE CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES. ALLETE, Inc. has established and maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended); such disclosure controls and procedures are designed to ensure that material information relating to the Company and the Subsidiaries is made known to ALLETE, Inc.'s Chief Executive Officer and its Chief Financial Officer by others within those entities, and such disclosure controls and procedures are effective to perform the functions for which they were established; ALLETE, Inc.'s auditors and the Audit Committee of ALLETE, Inc.'s Board of Directors have been advised of: (i) any significant deficiencies and/or material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal controls which could adversely affect the Company's and/or the Subsidiaries' ability to record, process, summarize, and report financial data, and (ii) any fraud, whether or not material, that involves Senior Management Employees or other employees of ALLETE, Inc. and/or its Subsidiaries who have a significant role in ALLETE, Inc.'s internal control over financial reporting; and since the date of the most recent evaluation of such disclosure controls and procedures, there have been no changes in internal control over financial reporting or in other factors that could materially affect internal control over financial reporting. 3.28 ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.28 and except as would not have a Material Adverse Effect, the Company and its Subsidiaries: (i) have not transported, stored, and/or disposed of any Hazardous Materials handled by the Company and its Subsidiaries, (ii) do not have Knowledge (including Knowledge by the Shareholder) that the Real Estate is now being used, or has ever been used, as a landfill, dump or other disposal, storage, transfer, treating or handling area for any Hazardous Materials, (iii) do not have Knowledge (including Knowledge by the Shareholder) that asbestos, "PCBs" (polychlorinated biphenyls) or urea formaldehyde has been placed, stored, located, or disposed on the Real Estate, (iv) excluding storage tanks (whether underground or above ground) which are and have been utilized solely for storage of potable water, do not have Knowledge (including Knowledge by the Shareholder) that there are currently or ever have been any underground and/or above ground storage tanks (whether or not currently in use) on the Real Estate, (v) do not have Knowledge (including Knowledge by the Shareholder) that the Real Estate contains Hazardous Materials that require remediation under Environmental Laws, and (vi) have not agreed to assume and, to the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, have not assumed by operation of law, any environmental Liability of any other Person. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.28 hereto, the Real Estate is not listed on the National Priorities List, the Comprehensive Environmental Response Compensation and Liability Information System, the Resource Conservation and Recovery Information System or any other governmental list of potentially contaminated properties. 3.29 DEBT INSTRUMENTS. SCHEDULE 3.29 is a true, correct and complete list showing the names of the parties and outstanding indebtedness as of the respective dates set forth in 28
SCHEDULE 3.29 under all mortgages, indentures, notes, guarantees and other obligations for or relating to borrowed money, purchase money debt (including conditional sales contracts and capital leases) or covenants not to compete (the "DEBT INSTRUMENTS") for which the Company or a Subsidiary is primarily or secondarily obligated. The Shareholder has previously delivered to the Purchaser true, complete and correct copies of each of the Debt Instruments, other than the increase in the CoBank, ACB line of credit described in Section 5.26. Except as described in SCHEDULE 3.29, the Company and each Subsidiary have performed all of the material obligations required to be respectively performed by them, and are not in material default under any of the provisions of any of the Debt Instruments, and there has not occurred any event which, (with or without notice, lapse of time or the happening or occurrence of any other event) would constitute such a default. 3.30 CUSTOMERS AND SUPPLIERS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.30, (i) to the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, and except in the Ordinary Course of Business, no material customer, subscriber or a material (in the aggregate) group of customers or subscribers of the Company or the Subsidiaries have notified the Company or any Subsidiary on or after the Balance Sheet Date, that the customer intends to terminate, cancel, limit or modify their business relationship with the Company or any Subsidiary, except such terminations, cancellations, limitations or modifications as occur in the Ordinary Course of Business of the Company or the applicable Subsidiary, and (ii) no vendor or supplier of the Company or a Subsidiary which is material to the Business has notified the Company or any such Subsidiary after the Balance Sheet Date, that it intends to terminate, cancel, limit or modify its business relationship with the Company or the applicable Subsidiary in any material respect. 3.31 SHAREHOLDER LOANS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.31, there are no loans, advances or other obligations for borrowed money owing by the Company or the Subsidiaries to the Shareholder or its Affiliates (other than the Company and the Subsidiaries) as of the date hereof. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.31, the Shareholder and its Affiliates (other than the Company and the Subsidiaries) do not have any claim of any kind against the Company or the Subsidiaries. 3.32 ADEQUACY OF PROPERTIES. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.32, the Company and each Subsidiary, respectively, owns, leases or otherwise has adequate rights to use the tangible and intangible personal property necessary for the conduct of their Business in the manner in which such Business is presently being conducted with no material conflict with or infringement of the rights of others such that the absence of such ownership or rights could not reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. 3.33 ABSENCE OF CERTAIN BUSINESS PRACTICES. Except as disclosed in SCHEDULE 3.33, none of the Company, the Subsidiaries nor any Person acting on their behalf has, directly or indirectly, within the past six (6) years given or agreed to give any gift or similar benefit to any customer, supplier, governmental employee or other Person who is or may be in a position to help or hinder the Business of the Company or a Subsidiary (or assist the Company or a Subsidiary in connection with any actual or proposed transaction) which (i) might subject the Company or a Subsidiary to any damage or penalty in any civil, criminal or governmental litigation or Proceeding, (ii) if not given in the past, might have had a Material Adverse Effect, or 29
(iii) if not continued in the future, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. 3.34 TRADE REGULATION. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.34, (i) all of the prices charged by the Company and the Subsidiaries in connection with the marketing, sale or distribution of services have been in compliance with all Applicable Laws, and (ii) no claims have been communicated or, to the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, Threatened against the Company or the Subsidiaries with respect to wrongful termination of any third party independent contractor, discriminatory pricing, price fixing, unfair competition, false advertising, or any other violation of any Applicable Laws relating to anti-competitive practices or unfair trade practices of any kind, and to the Knowledge of the Company or the Shareholder, no specific situation, set of facts, or occurrence provides any basis for any such claim. 3.35 SHAREHOLDER OWNERSHIP OF THE STOCK. The Shareholder represents and warrants that the Shareholder is the lawful owner of 6,000 shares of Stock, free and clear of all Rights and Encumbrances. The Shareholder has the full legal right, power and authority to enter into this Agreement and to sell, assign, transfer and convey the shares of Stock so owned by the Shareholder pursuant to this Agreement, and the delivery to the Purchaser of the Stock pursuant to the provisions of this Agreement will transfer to the Purchaser good title thereto, free and clear of all Rights and Encumbrances. 3.36 VIRGINIA OPERATIONS. The operations of the Company in the Commonwealth of Virginia consist solely of two (2) water systems located in Carroll County, Virginia. These water systems are subject to the oversight and regulation of VDH. 3.37 EMPLOYEE RETENTION. On or about the date hereof, the Company and the Subsidiaries have entered into certain legal, binding and enforceable retention and severance agreements in the form of EXHIBIT D hereto (the "RETENTION AND SEVERANCE AGREEMENTS") with their respective employees as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.37 to this Agreement, which agreements entitle such employees to, among other things, one or more retention payments (the "RETENTION PAYMENT") by their applicable employer entity in the event, among other things, of their continued employment to and on the Closing Date. Promptly following the date of this Agreement, the Shareholder shall deliver to the Purchaser true, complete and correct copies of each Retention and Severance Agreement that is executed and delivered by the Company and its Subsidiaries. SCHEDULE 3.37 also sets forth the Retention Payment that may become payable pursuant to the Retention and Severance Agreements to each such employee in the event the employee complies with the terms of the retention provisions of the Retention and Severance Agreement. The Shareholder represents and warrants that it shall concurrently at and upon the Closing, (i) provide and remit to the Company and the Subsidiaries funds sufficient to pay (x) any interim payments on or for a Retention Payment obligation, (y) any remaining Retention Payment obligations, if not previously paid, as such exist, in the sole discretion of the Shareholder as provided in the Retention and Severance Agreements, on the Closing Date, and (z) any applicable employment taxes associated therewith, and (ii) cause the Company and the Subsidiaries to make the required Retention Payment on the Closing Date in accordance with the terms of the Retention and Severance Agreements. 30
3.38 REGULATION AS UTILITIES. The Company and the Subsidiaries are regulated as public utilities in North Carolina, and the Company is also regulated as a public utility in Virginia. Neither the Company, the Subsidiaries nor any "subsidiary company" or "affiliate" (as such terms are defined in the Public Utility Holding Companies Act of 1935, as amended) of the Shareholder is subject to regulation as a public utility or public service company (or similar designation) by any other state in the United States, by the United States or any agency or instrumentality of the United States or by any foreign country. 3.39 LIMITATION ON REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES. Except for the representations and warranties contained in this Article III, neither the Shareholder, the Company, the Subsidiaries nor any of their Affiliates, nor any other Person acting on behalf of the Shareholder, the Company, the Subsidiaries or any of their Affiliates, makes any representation or warranty, express or implied, concerning, without limitation, the Stock, the Business, the Company and its Subsidiaries or any other matter. 3.40 INTERNAL ACCOUNTING CONTROLS. The Company and each Subsidiary maintains a system of internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurances that in all material respects: (i) transactions are executed in accordance with the general or specific authorization of Senior Management Employees, (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP and to maintain accountability for assets, (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with the general or specific authorization of Senior Management Employees, and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. 3.41 WATER QUALITY. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.41 hereto, the quality of the drinking water supplied by the Company and the Subsidiaries to their respective customers is in compliance with the maximum contaminant levels for primary contaminants established by the Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, DEH (for North Carolina only), and VDH (for Virginia only), in effect, defined, interpreted and enforceable on the date hereof. Specifically excluded from this representation and warranty are any secondary drinking water standards and all maximum contaminant levels not in effect and enforceable on the date of the execution of this Agreement, including the promulgated but not yet effective and enforceable Groundwater Rule, Radionuclide Rule and Disinfectant/Disinfection Byproducts Rule. ARTICLE 4 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF THE PURCHASER As an inducement for the Shareholder to enter into this Agreement and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby, the Purchaser represents and warrants to the Shareholder that each and all of the following representations and warranties (as modified by the Schedules and any Supplement delivered by the Purchaser pursuant to Section 13.21 of this Agreement) are true and correct as of the date of this Agreement and will be true and correct as of the Closing Date. The Schedules shall be arranged in paragraphs corresponding to the sections and subsections contained in this Article 4. 31
4.1 ORGANIZATION. The Purchaser is a corporation duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and has all requisite power and authority, corporate and otherwise, to own, operate and lease its properties and assets and to conduct its business as it is now being conducted. The Purchaser is duly qualified to transact business as a foreign corporation and is in good standing under the laws of every state or jurisdiction in which the nature of its activities or of its properties owned, leased or operated makes such qualification necessary and in which the failure to be so qualified could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect on the Purchaser. 4.2 DUE AUTHORIZATION. The execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents to be executed and delivered by the Purchaser pursuant to this Agreement, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby have been duly and validly authorized by all necessary corporate action on the part of the Purchaser. This Agreement and the Ancillary Documents have been, or will be on or before the Closing Date, duly and validly authorized, executed and delivered by the Purchaser and the obligations of the Purchaser hereunder and thereunder are or will be, upon such execution and delivery, valid, legally binding and enforceable against the Purchaser in accordance with their respective terms. 4.3 NO BREACH. The Purchaser has full power and authority, corporate and otherwise, to purchase the Stock being purchased hereunder and to otherwise perform its obligations under this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents to be executed and delivered by the Purchaser pursuant hereto. The execution and delivery of this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents to be executed and delivered by the Purchaser pursuant to this Agreement, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby will not: (i) violate any provision of the Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws (or comparable governing documents or instruments) of the Purchaser, (ii) violate any Applicable Laws or Injunction applicable to the Purchaser, (iii) other than filings and approvals required to comply with Applicable Laws, including (A) any filing required by HSR, and (B) applicable requirements of the NCUC, the VDH and/or any Governmental Body, require any filing with, Permits from, authorization, consent or approval of, or the giving of any notice to, any Person, (iv) result in a violation or breach of, or constitute (with or without due notice or lapse of time or both) a default (or give another party any rights of termination, cancellation or acceleration) under, any of the terms, conditions or provisions of any note, bond, mortgage, indenture, license, franchise, Permit (including, but not limited to, any Permits, appeals or authorizations of any Governmental Body), lease or other Contract to which the Purchaser is a party, or by which it or any of its assets or properties may be bound. 4.4 INVESTMENT REPRESENTATIONS. The Purchaser understands that the Stock has not been registered under the Securities Act, or under the securities laws of any jurisdiction, by reason of reliance upon certain exemptions. 4.5 BROKERS. The Purchaser has not employed or engaged any broker, finder, agent, banker or third party, nor has it otherwise dealt with anyone purporting to act in the capacity of a finder or broker, in connection with the transactions contemplated hereby. 32
ARTICLE 5 PERFORMANCE AND COVENANTS PENDING CLOSING The Shareholder covenants and agrees that from and after the date of this Agreement and until the earlier of the Closing Date or the termination of this Agreement in accordance with Article 12 hereof: 5.1 CONTINUING DUE DILIGENCE. At the request of the Purchaser, the Shareholder shall, from time to time, give or cause to be given to the Purchaser, its officers, employees, counsel, accountants and other representatives, upon reasonable notice to the Shareholder, reasonable access during normal business hours, without undue disruption to the Business of the Company or any Subsidiary, to the properties and assets and all of the books, minute books, title papers, records, files, Contracts, insurance policies, environmental records and reports, licenses and documents of every character solely to conduct continuing due diligence investigations of the Company and the Subsidiaries relating to the Business for the purpose of monitoring the Business until and through the Closing Date and to plan for transitional matters after the Closing. For these purposes, the Shareholder shall furnish or cause to be furnished to the Purchaser, its officers, employees, counsel, accountants and other representatives the information with respect to the properties or assets of the Company and the Subsidiaries as any of them may reasonably request. The Purchaser, its officers, employees, counsel, accountants and other representatives shall have the authority to interview, as reasonably necessary and without undue disruption to the Business of the Company or any Subsidiary, all employees, customers, vendors, suppliers and other parties having relationships with the Company and/or the Subsidiaries, and the Shareholder shall make such introductions as may be requested; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that access to customers for investigatory purposes shall, if granted by the Shareholder, be undertaken in a commercially reasonably manner consistent with the best interests of the Company and the Subsidiaries and shall be subject to the prior consent of the Shareholder, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. 5.2 CONDUCT OF BUSINESS. The Shareholder shall cause the Company and the Subsidiaries to carry on their respective Business diligently, only in the Ordinary Course of Business and substantially in the same manner as heretofore conducted. The Company and the Subsidiaries shall not make any regulatory filings with any Governmental Body, except in the Ordinary Course of Business or with the prior written consent of the Purchaser (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned). The Shareholder shall cause the Company and each Subsidiary to provide to the Purchaser copies of each such regulatory filing made by the Company or such Subsidiary. The Shareholder shall not cause or permit any amendment of the Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws of the Company or any Subsidiary (or other governing instrument). 5.3 ENCUMBRANCES. The Shareholder shall not, directly or indirectly, perform or fail to perform any act which would result in the creation or imposition of any Encumbrance on any of the properties or assets of the Company or any Subsidiary, or otherwise adversely affect the marketability of the Company's or a Subsidiary's title to any of its properties or assets, outside of the Ordinary Course of Business. 33
5.4 PAY INCREASES. Except for payments pursuant to the Retention and Severance Agreements and normal increases in the Ordinary Course of Business, the Shareholder shall not permit the Company or a Subsidiary, and the Company and the Subsidiaries shall not, without the prior written consent of the Purchaser, grant any increase in the salaries or rate of pay to any of its employees, grant any increase in any benefits or establish, adopt, enter into, make any new grants or awards under, or amend any collective bargaining agreement, employment agreement or Benefit Plan for the benefit of any of its employees. 5.5 RESTRICTIONS ON NEW CONTRACTS. Except with the prior written consent of the Purchaser, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned, the Shareholder shall not permit the Company and the Subsidiaries to, and the Company and the Subsidiaries shall not, enter into any Contract, incur any Liability, assume, guarantee or otherwise become liable or responsible for any Liability of any other Person, make any loans, advances or capital contributions to any other Person (except for extensions of credit to its customers in the Ordinary Course of Business), or waive any right or enter into any other transaction, in each case other than in the Ordinary Course of Business and consistent with normal business practices of the Company and the Subsidiaries. Without limiting the foregoing, for the purposes of this Agreement, any Contract other than Contracts for capital improvements described in Section 5.17 hereof involving the sum of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000) or more shall be deemed to be outside the Ordinary Course of Business; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, for purposes of this Agreement, Developer Contracts involving a purchase price paid by the Company or any Subsidiary of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000) or less shall be considered to have been entered into in the Ordinary Course of Business. 5.6 PRESERVATION OF BUSINESS. The Shareholder shall use commercially reasonable efforts (i) to preserve intact the Business of the Company and the Subsidiaries, (ii) to keep available to the Purchaser the Employees, and (iii) to preserve for the Purchaser the present goodwill and relationship of the Company and the Subsidiaries with their respective vendors, suppliers, customers and others having business relationships with the Company and the Subsidiaries. 5.7 PAYMENT AND PERFORMANCE OF OBLIGATIONS. The Company and the Subsidiaries shall, and the Shareholder shall cause the Company and the Subsidiaries to, timely pay and discharge all invoices, bills and other monetary Liabilities. 5.8 RESTRICTIONS ON SALE OF ASSETS. Except for sales or transfers contemplated on the date of this Agreement and set forth in SCHEDULE 5.8, the Shareholder shall not permit the Company and the Subsidiaries to, and the Company and the Subsidiaries shall not, sell, assign, transfer, lease, sublease, pledge or otherwise encumber or dispose of any of its properties or assets, except for the provision of services in the Ordinary Course of Business and at regular prices. 5.9 PROMPT NOTICE. The Shareholder and the Purchaser shall promptly notify the other in writing upon becoming aware of any of the following: (i) any claim, demand or other Proceeding that may be brought, Threatened, asserted or commenced against the Company or any Subsidiary or the Purchaser, or their respective officers or directors, (ii) any changes in the accuracy of the representations and warranties made by the Shareholder or the Purchaser in this 34
Agreement, (iii) any Injunction or any complaint praying for an Injunction restraining or enjoining the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, or (iv) any notice from any Person of its intention to institute an investigation into, or institute a Proceeding to restrain or enjoin the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or to nullify or render ineffective this Agreement or such transactions if consummated. 5.10 CONSENTS. As soon as reasonably practicable and in any event on or before the Closing Date, the Shareholder and the Purchaser shall work cooperatively and will use commercially reasonable efforts to obtain or cause to be obtained all of the consents and approvals of all Persons necessary to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby, including the consents and approvals set forth in SCHEDULE 3.4 hereto. 5.11 COPIES OF DOCUMENTS. The Shareholder has furnished or made available to the Purchaser a true, complete and accurate copy of each Operating Contract set forth in SCHEDULE 3.16 hereto and any Developer Contract set forth in SCHEDULE 3.22 hereto. 5.12 NO SOLICITATION OF OTHER OFFERS. The Shareholder, the Company and the Subsidiaries will not, and will not permit their respective representatives, investment bankers, agents and Affiliates of any of the foregoing to, directly or indirectly, (i) solicit or encourage submission of or any inquiries, proposals or offers by, (ii) participate in any negotiations with, (iii) afford any access to the properties, books or records of the Company or the Subsidiaries, (iv) accept or approve, or (v) otherwise assist, facilitate or encourage, or enter into any Contract with, any Person or group (other than the Purchaser and its Affiliates, agents and representatives), in connection with any Acquisition Proposal. In addition, the Shareholder, the Company and the Subsidiaries will not, and will not permit their respective representatives, investment bankers, agents and Affiliates of any of the foregoing to, directly or indirectly, make or authorize any statement, recommendation or solicitation in support of any Acquisition Proposal made by any Person or group (other than the Purchaser). In addition, the Shareholder shall immediately cease, and shall cause the Company and the Subsidiaries to immediately cease, any and all existing activities, discussions or negotiations with any parties with respect to any of the foregoing. 5.13 ACCOUNTS RECEIVABLE AND PAYABLE. Except for payments to the Shareholder or its Affiliates (other than the Company and the Subsidiaries), the Company and the Subsidiaries shall not, and the Shareholder shall not cause the Company or any Subsidiary to, accelerate the collection of its accounts receivable or delay the payments of its accounts payable or other Liabilities, in each case arising out of the operation of the Business in a manner which would be inconsistent with past practice. 5.14 TITLE MATTERS; SURVEYS. (a) TITLE DOCUMENTS. As soon as practicable following the execution of this Agreement, the Shareholder, at its sole cost, shall provide to the Purchaser: (i) a current A.L.T.A. Form 1992 title insurance commitment, with extended coverage endorsements, from a title insurance company reasonably acceptable to the Purchaser (or if there is an existing title policy ("EXISTING POLICY") for such parcel issued by a title insurance company reasonably acceptable to the Purchaser, from such title insurance company) for 35
the parcel of Owned Real Estate which serves as the Cary, North Carolina operations center of the Company and which is more fully described in SCHEDULE 3.17 of this Agreement ("CARY PROPERTY") agreeing to insure the title of the owner in amounts reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser for such parcel, but in no event in excess of an insurable amount reasonably determined by the title insurance company, with standard exceptions waived, together with copies of all documents mentioned in said title insurance commitment, as well as a copy of the Existing Policy, if any, and (ii) a current-on-the-ground ALTA survey for the Cary Property, prepared by a reputable licensed surveyor in the State of North Carolina, containing a certification in form reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser, in favor of the Purchaser, the title insurance company and the owner of the Cary Property (collectively, with the items described in clause (i), the "TITLE DOCUMENTS"). (b) REVIEW OF TITLE DOCUMENTS. The Purchaser shall be allowed twenty (20) days after receipt of the Title Documents for examination thereof and the making and delivering of any written objections to the condition of title. If no title objection is made within such period, any objection shall be deemed to have been waived by the Purchaser. If there is a written objection to the condition of title to the Cary Property and such objection is made by the Purchaser within said twenty (20) day period, the Shareholder shall use commercially reasonable efforts, at its sole cost and expense, to cure said title objections within thirty (30) days after said objections have been raised by the Purchaser. If the Purchaser's title objections are not cured or endorsed over to the Purchaser's reasonable satisfaction within such thirty (30) day period, then the Purchaser shall have the right for a period of five (5) business days following the termination of such thirty (30) day cure period, (i) to terminate this Agreement by giving written notice of termination to the Shareholder, or (ii) if there is a title objection that can be stated in monetary terms, and if the Shareholder and the Purchaser mutually agree to such monetary terms, the Purchaser may accept the title objection and the Purchase Price shall be reduced by the mutually agreed upon amount. If the Purchaser does not exercise its right to terminate or if the parties cannot agree upon a reduction of the Purchase Price, the Purchaser shall be deemed to have waived all such uncured objections to the condition of title disclosed by the Title Documents. The title matters approved or deemed approved by the Purchaser pursuant to this Section 5.14(b) are referred to as "PERMITTED EXCEPTIONS"). (c) TITLE POLICY. It shall be a condition to the Purchaser's obligations to close the transactions contemplated herein that the Shareholder shall, at Closing, cause the title insurance company approved by the Purchaser pursuant to Section 15.4(a), to issue and deliver to the Purchaser (i) an ALTA owners extended coverage policy of title insurance on the 1970 form (or 1992 form, so long as all creditors rights, fraudulent conveyance and other similar exceptions are deleted), in an amount satisfactory to the Purchaser, showing title to the Cary Property vested in the Company and/or applicable Subsidiary, subject only to the Permitted Exceptions, and containing such endorsements as may be reasonably required by the Purchaser (the "TITLE POLICY"), or (ii) if there is an Existing Policy from a title insurance company satisfactory to the Purchaser, an endorsement or endorsements to the Existing Policy in each case in form reasonably satisfactory to the Purchaser, increasing the liability amounts thereunder to an amount satisfactory to the 36
Purchaser, but in no event in excess of an insurable amount reasonably determined by the title insurance company. The Purchaser shall be responsible for paying the costs of the foregoing and providing the title insurance company with such documentation and indemnifications as may be reasonably required to issue such coverage. (d) OTHER OWNED REAL ESTATE. In addition to the Cary Property, the Company and the Subsidiaries own approximately nine hundred fifty (950) water well lots, thirty-three (33) wastewater treatment plant lots, fourteen (14) elevated tank lots, and approximately eighty (80) wastewater pump (lift) station lots. While most of these properties are either (i) owned in fee simple absolute title (with several titled in fee simple determinable or fee simple subject to a condition subsequent), or (ii) are leased, some of the properties, as indicated, have perpetual easements only. The Shareholder shall be under no obligation pursuant to the terms of this Agreement to provide any title commitment, title insurance, survey or other documentation to the Purchaser unless such documentation is presently available in the files of the Shareholder, the Company or the Subsidiaries. 5.15 INSURANCE. The Shareholder shall maintain in full force and effect, for the benefit of the Company and the Subsidiaries, all insurance coverages for the Company and the Subsidiaries substantially comparable to coverages existing on the date hereof. 5.16 FILING REPORTS AND MAKING PAYMENTS. The Company and the Subsidiaries shall, and the Shareholder shall cause the Company and the Subsidiaries to, timely file all required reports and notices with applicable Governmental Bodies and timely make all uncontested payments due and owing to each such Governmental Body, including, but not by way of limitation, any filings, notices and/or payments required by reason of the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. 5.17 CAPITAL EXPENDITURES. The Company and the Subsidiaries shall not, and the Shareholder shall not permit the Company or any Subsidiary to, make any capital expenditures in excess of its approved capital expenditures budget (which has been previously provided to the Purchaser) without the Purchaser's prior written consent, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned. 5.18 MONTHLY AND YEAR-END 2003 FINANCIALS. Within fifteen (15) days of the close of each month after the execution of this Agreement by all parties hereto, the Shareholder shall deliver to the Purchaser a consolidated balance sheet and income statement for the Company and the Subsidiaries disclosing the financial position and results of operations of the Company and the Subsidiaries for the preceding month and year-to-date which shall be prepared on a basis consistent with the interim financial statements of the Company and the Subsidiaries, and consistent with the prior months and year-to-date financial statements. At least ten (10) days prior to Closing, the Shareholder shall deliver to the Purchaser audited consolidated financial statements, including a balance sheet and income statement, for the Company and the Subsidiaries which, including any notes thereto, fairly present the consolidated financial position and condition of the Company and the Subsidiaries as of December 31, 2003 and the results of their operations for the period then ended in accordance with GAAP applied by the Company and the Subsidiaries on a consistent basis throughout the periods covered. 37
5.19 LITIGATION. From the date hereof and through the Closing Date, the Shareholder will notify the Purchaser in writing of any actions or Proceedings of the type required to be described in Section 3.7 of this Agreement, that, from the time hereof, are, to the Knowledge of the Shareholder or the Company, Threatened or commenced against the Company or either Subsidiary or against any officer, director or Employee of the Company or either Subsidiary. 5.20 NOTIFICATION OF INACCURACY. The Shareholder agrees to promptly notify the Purchaser in writing of any material inaccuracy made by the Shareholder in this Agreement of which the Shareholder becomes aware prior to the Closing Date and which could result in a Material Adverse Effect. The Purchaser agrees to promptly notify the Shareholder in writing of any material inaccuracy made by the Purchaser in this Agreement of which the Purchaser becomes aware prior to the Closing Date. The foregoing shall not limit the ability of the Shareholder to Supplement the Schedules. 5.21 DEBT INSTRUMENTS. The Shareholder has provided the Purchaser with copies of all Debt Instruments of the Company and the Subsidiaries which are described in Section 3.29 of this Agreement and which are set forth in SCHEDULE 3.29. Upon payment of the Purchase Price at the Closing, any and all indebtedness of the Company and the Subsidiaries to ALLETE, Inc., the Shareholder and/or any of their Affiliates shall be deemed paid in full. 5.22 GUARANTEES. (a) COMPANY AND SUBSIDIARY GUARANTEES. All guarantees set forth in SCHEDULE 3.11 hereof and all other guarantees made by the Company or the Subsidiaries, contingent or otherwise, of any kind or nature made for or on behalf of ALLETE, Inc., the Shareholder, any Affiliate of ALLETE, Inc. or the Shareholder (other than the Company and the Subsidiaries), or any of their respective officers, directors, employees or other representatives shall be fully and finally terminated, without recourse, and delivered to the Purchaser at and upon the Closing. (b) SHAREHOLDER AND AFFILIATE GUARANTEES. SCHEDULE 5.22(b) sets forth a list of guarantees made by the Shareholder and/or its Affiliates (excluding the Company and the Subsidiaries) with respect to the Business. Each of the parties shall use all commercially reasonable efforts prior to the Closing to cause the Shareholder and its Affiliates to be released from any and all such guarantees, contingent or otherwise, of any kind or nature, made for or on behalf of the Company or any of the Subsidiaries (each a "SHAREHOLDER GUARANTEE"). The release of the Shareholder Guarantee(s) shall be evidenced by the return of the original guarantee at the Closing or by delivery of an irrevocable release executed by the named guarantee or beneficiary of the Shareholder Guarantee. In the event that such a release is not obtained at or prior to the Closing, the Purchaser, the Company and the Subsidiaries shall make continuous commercially reasonable efforts to terminate, extinguish or otherwise obtain the release of any such remaining Shareholder Guarantee(s) (along with all documents and instruments to evidence such binding termination extinguishment or release). In furtherance of the foregoing, the Purchaser shall defend, indemnify and hold the Shareholder and its Affiliates harmless from and against any Shareholder and/or Affiliate Guarantee. 38
5.23 ENVIRONMENTAL ASSESSMENT. The Shareholder shall permit and cooperate with the Purchaser or any reasonably qualified environmental consultant designated by the Purchaser (the "ENVIRONMENTAL ASSESSMENT FIRM") to conduct a Phase I environmental site assessment (the "ENVIRONMENTAL ASSESSMENT") of any Owned Real Estate or other Real Estate used in the Business prior to the Closing. The Purchaser shall pay all fees and expenses of the Environmental Assessment Firm. Any and all written report(s) of the Environmental Assessment Firm shall be concurrently delivered to the Shareholder with and upon the delivery of such report(s) to the Purchaser. The Shareholder shall have the right to Supplement its Schedules to this Agreement with specific information contained in the report(s) of the Environmental Assessment Firm in accordance with the Supplement provisions of Section 13.21 of this Agreement. 5.24 COOPERATION WITH RESPECT TO PERMITS, LICENSES AND REGULATORY MATTERS. (a) PERMITS. The Shareholder shall at its sole cost and expense promptly perform such lawful acts and execute and deliver to the Purchaser such documents as the Purchaser may request to obtain the full benefits of the transfer of ownership of the Stock, and the Shareholder shall use commercially reasonable efforts to and shall cooperate with the Purchaser to obtain for the Purchaser all transferable and nontransferable Permits issued by a Governmental Body necessary or appropriate to continue the operation of the Company and the Subsidiaries in the Ordinary Course of Business from and after the Closing Date. (b) REGULATORY MATTERS. Upon execution of this Agreement, the Purchaser and the Shareholder shall promptly proceed, and the Shareholder shall cause the Company and each Subsidiary to file, all applications, consent requests and associated documentary material required by or necessary to obtain all approvals of any Governmental Body necessary to complete or satisfy the conditions to Closing with respect to the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, including those required by HSR (if applicable), and the North Carolina General Statutes, the VDH and other Applicable Laws. Each party shall bear its own costs with respect to such applications and consent requests. 5.25 PERFORMANCE AND OTHER BONDS. As of or immediately following the Closing the Purchaser shall arrange to obtain replacement performance and other bonds which have been posted by the Company, the Subsidiaries and/or the Shareholder (in the coverage amounts and for the term(s) set forth on such bonds) for delivery at the Closing (and to the appropriate Governmental Body, including those required by the NCUC and the VDH) which are set forth in SCHEDULE 5.25. All such bonds to be obtained by the Purchaser shall be effective as of the Closing Date for events arising on or after the Closing Date. Evidence satisfactory to the Shareholder of compliance with Applicable Law (including North Carolina General Statute 62-110.3 and NCUC rules R7-37 (water) and R10-24 (wastewater)) with respect to such bonds shall also be provided at the Closing by the Purchaser. The Purchaser acknowledges that (i) it shall have no right or claim to the performance and other bonds presently in existence and which are executed by the Shareholder, and (ii) the Shareholder shall cause the termination and cancellation of each such performance and other bond as of the Closing Date, and the Shareholder shall have the right to any and all proceeds and rebates, if any, therefrom with respect to such termination and cancellation; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the cost for such 39
performance and other bonds was not previously charged to (and paid by) the Company and/or the Subsidiaries by the Shareholder. 5.26 ABSENCE OF CERTAIN DEVELOPMENTS. Except for the transactions contemplated by this Agreement or as otherwise set forth on SCHEDULE 5.26 hereto, the Company and the Subsidiaries will conduct the Business only in the Ordinary Course of Business and will not: (a) Declare, set aside or pay a dividend or make any other distribution with respect to any class of capital stock of the Company or the Subsidiaries; (b) Change accounting methods or practices (including, without limitation, any change in depreciation, amortization or cost accounting policies or rates); (c) Except for the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and as otherwise set forth in SCHEDULE 3.37, enter into any employment contract or collective bargaining agreement, written or oral, or modify the terms of any existing employment contract or agreement or adopt, amend, modify or terminate any Benefit Plan; (d) Make any change or amendment in its articles of incorporation or bylaws; (e) Issue or sell any securities; acquire, directly or indirectly, by redemption or otherwise, any securities; or grant or enter into any options, warrants, calls or commitments of any kind with respect thereto; (f) Make any capital expenditure exceeding One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000) which are not in the capital expenditure operating budgets of the Company and its Subsidiaries; and/or (g) Incur any obligations for borrowed money (as opposed to purchase money debt) other than pursuant to the existing credit facilities under the Debt Instruments described and set forth in SCHEDULE 3.29 of this Agreement; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, the Purchaser (i) acknowledges that the Company is presently in the process of expanding its line of credit with CoBank, ACB from an $8.5 million maximum principal amount available under such line of credit to a maximum principal amount of $11.0 million, and (ii) hereby consents to such expansion of the CoBank, ACB line of credit. 5.27 CERTAIN ACCOUNTING MATTERS. (a) UNAMORTIZED ACQUISITION COSTS. As an affirmative response and accommodation to the Purchaser's request, the Company has agreed to write-off in the November 30, 2003 and December 31, 2003, interim financial statements of the Company and its Subsidiaries certain capitalized preliminary investigation costs arising from development of a wastewater treatment system which would be permitted for discharge in Williamson County, Tennessee. The write-off will approximate $97,000, or $59,000 on an after-tax basis. The Company will also propose this write-off adjustment for the December 31, 2003, audited financial statements by including the write-off in the year-end trial balance prepared for the Company's auditor. 40
(b) INTERIM ACCRUAL OF VACATION LIABILITY. As a further affirmative response and accommodation to the Purchaser's request, the Company shall present an accrual of vacation pay liability for each interim financial statement of the Company and the Subsidiaries, to be prepared by the Company for delivery to the Purchaser, pursuant to and in accordance with Section 5.18 of this Agreement. In furtherance of the foregoing, the Shareholder shall cause the Company to, and the Company shall, as of January 1, 2004, accrue in accordance with the Company's vacation pay policy, a full year of vacation pay liability anticipated and calculated by the Company for the calendar year 2004. The amount shall be (i) initially recorded by a debit to "Vacation Pay Deferred Asset" (a balance sheet account) and by a credit to "Vacation Pay Liability" (a balance sheet account), and (ii) amortized on a monthly basis based on actual use of vacation time by all employees by an entry that debits "Vacation Pay Liability" and credits "Vacation Pay Deferred Asset". In the event an employee terminates employment in 2004, the full amount paid to such employee for accrued but unused vacation time shall be recorded as expense in the period incurred as a consequence of the cash payment to the employee, with a corresponding entry (in the same gross amount of the gross vacation pay liability which was remitted to such employee) that debits "Vacation Pay Liability" and credits Vacation Pay Deferred Asset". In the event an employee has carry-over vacation from 2003, the use of that vacation shall be recorded as a debit to "Vacation Pay Liability" and a credit to "Vacation Pay Deferred Asset". 5.28 CAPITAL EXPENDITURES. The Company and its Subsidiaries shall make best reasonable commercial efforts to continue their investment in capital resources in the Ordinary Course of Business consistent with the capital budget(s) established for the Company and the Subsidiaries. ARTICLE 6 MUTUAL CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO THE PARTIES' OBLIGATIONS Unless waived in writing by the parties, each and every obligation of the Purchaser and the Shareholder to be performed at the Closing shall be subject to the satisfaction at or prior thereto of each and all of the following conditions precedent: 6.1 PROCEEDINGS. There being no (i) Proceedings which have been brought, asserted or commenced against the Purchaser, the Company, the Subsidiaries and/or the Shareholder by any Person which enjoins or otherwise materially and adversely affects the Purchaser's, the Company's, the Subsidiaries' or the Shareholder's ability to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby or which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect if the transactions contemplated hereby were consummated, (ii) Proceedings that have been Threatened against the Purchaser, the Company, the Subsidiaries and/or the Shareholder by any Person which would enjoin or materially and adversely affect the Purchaser's, the Company's, the Subsidiaries' or the Shareholder's ability to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby or which could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect in the event the transactions contemplated hereby were consummated, or (iii) Applicable Laws restraining or enjoining or which may reasonably be expected to nullify or render ineffective this Agreement or 41
the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby or which otherwise could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect if the transactions contemplated hereby were consummated. 6.2 CONSENTS AND APPROVALS. The Purchaser and the Shareholder shall have received evidence, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the respective counsel for the Purchaser and the Shareholder, that all material consents, waivers, releases, authorizations, approvals, licenses, certificates, Permits and franchises of all Persons (including each and every Governmental Body) as may be necessary to lawfully consummate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and for the Purchaser to carry on and continue the operations of the Company and the Subsidiaries as they are now conducted have been obtained. All consents of a Governmental Body shall be by Final Order; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that if the Purchaser and the Shareholder waive the condition of Governmental Body consent by Final Order, the parties shall consider the Governmental Body consent without Final Order sufficient to proceed to Closing according to the other terms of this Agreement. All Final Orders shall impose no conditions that could have a Material Adverse Effect on the Company or the Subsidiaries after giving effect to the consummation of this Agreement. "FINAL ORDER" means an action or decision of the Governmental Body as to which (i) no request for a stay is pending, no stay is in effect, and any deadline for filing such request that may be designated by Applicable Law has passed, (ii) no petition for rehearing or reconsideration or application for review is pending and the time for the filing of such petition or application has passed, (iii) the Governmental Body does not have the action or decision under reconsideration on its own motion and the time within which it may effect such reconsideration has passed, and (iv) no judicial appeal is pending or in effect and any deadline for filing any such appeal that may be designated by statute or rule has passed. 6.3 ANTITRUST MATTERS. All waiting periods under HSR have expired, no temporary restraining order, preliminary Injunction or permanent Injunction enjoining the consummation of the transactions contemplated herein has been entered by any court, no action seeking to enjoin the consummation of this transaction has been commenced by any Person, and neither the FTC, the DOJ nor any State Attorney General has Threatened to take any action to enjoin or challenge the transaction contemplated herein. Promptly after the execution of this Agreement, the Purchaser and the Shareholder shall make all filings and submit information requested or required under HSR with the FTC and the DOJ. Neither party hereto shall initiate any substantive discussion with the FTC or DOJ concerning the transactions contemplated by this Agreement without giving the other party reasonable prior notice of such discussion and a reasonable opportunity to participate therein. Each party shall promptly report to the other the fact and general nature of any substantive discussion initiated with it by the FTC or DOJ concerning the transactions contemplated by this Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the parties hereto have presently determined that filings under HSR are not required due to the amount of the Purchase Price for the Stock. 42
ARTICLE 7 ADDITIONAL CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO THE PURCHASER'S OBLIGATIONS Unless waived by the Purchaser in writing, each and every obligation of the Purchaser to be performed at the Closing shall be subject to the satisfaction at or prior thereto of each and all of the following conditions precedent: 7.1 ACCURACY OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES. The representations and warranties (as amended by any Supplement) made by the Shareholder in this Agreement, and the Ancillary Documents to be executed and delivered by the Shareholder pursuant to this Agreement, shall be true and correct in all material respects at and as of the Closing with the same force and effect as though such representations and warranties had been made or given at and as of the Closing. 7.2 COMPLIANCE WITH COVENANTS AND AGREEMENTS. The Shareholder, the Company and the Subsidiaries shall have performed and complied with all of their covenants, agreements and obligations under this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents which are to be performed or complied with by them at or prior to the Closing, including the execution and delivery of the Ancillary Documents specified in Section 2.4(b) hereof, all of which shall be reasonably satisfactory in form and substance to the Purchaser. 7.3 NO MATERIAL ADVERSE EFFECT. As of the Closing Date, nothing shall have occurred which would, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect on the Company and/or the Subsidiaries. 7.4 LEGAL OPINION. The Purchaser shall have received an opinion from the counsel for the Shareholder, dated as of the Closing Date, in form and substance satisfactory to the Purchaser in the Purchaser's reasonable commercial discretion. ARTICLE 8 ADDITIONAL CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO THE SHAREHOLDER'S OBLIGATIONS Unless waived by the Shareholder in writing, each and every obligation of the Shareholder to be performed at the Closing shall be subject to the satisfaction at or prior thereto of each and all of the following conditions precedent: 8.1 ACCURACY OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES. The representations and warranties (as amended by any Supplement) made by the Purchaser in this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents to be executed and delivered by the Purchaser pursuant to this Agreement, shall be true and correct in all material respects at and as of the Closing with the same force and effect as though such representations and warranties had been made or given at and as of the Closing. 8.2 COMPLIANCE WITH COVENANTS AND AGREEMENTS. The Purchaser shall have performed and complied with all of its covenants, agreements and obligations under this 43
Agreement and the Ancillary Agreements which are to be performed or complied with by it at or prior to the Closing, including the execution and delivery of the Ancillary Documents specified in Section 2.4(c) hereof. 8.3 LEGAL OPINION. The Shareholder shall have received an opinion from the counsel for the Purchaser, dated as of the Closing Date, in form and substance satisfactory to the Shareholder in the Shareholder's reasonable commercial discretion. 8.4 DELIVERY OF PURCHASE PRICE AND OTHER CONSIDERATION. The Purchaser shall have delivered to the Shareholder, against receipt of the certificates for the Stock, the Purchase Price. ARTICLE 9 INDEMNIFICATION 9.1 INDEMNIFICATION BY THE SHAREHOLDER. The Shareholder hereby covenants and agrees to indemnify and hold the Purchaser, its officers, directors, employees, Affiliates, shareholders and agents, and each of their respective successors and assigns, harmless from, against and in respect of any and all losses, costs, expenses (including without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements of counsel), Liabilities, damages, fines, penalties, charges, assessments, judgments, settlements, claims, causes of action and other obligations of any nature whatsoever (excluding, however, Purchaser claims against the Shareholder for incidental, consequential or special damages, including punitive damages, other than those claims which arise from a third party claim against the Company) (individually, a "LOSS" and collectively "LOSSES") that any of them may at any time, directly or indirectly, suffer, sustain, incur or become subject to, arising out of, based upon or resulting from or on account of each of the following: (a) the breach or falsity of any representation or warranty made by the Shareholder in this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents to be executed and delivered by the Shareholder pursuant hereto and thereto; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the Shareholder shall not be required to provide such indemnification for the breach or falsity of any such representation or warranty (other than representations or warranties contained in Sections 3.1, 3.2, 3.3, 3.4, 3.9, 3.10, 3.23, 3.29, 3.31, 3.33 and 3.35) unless and until the Purchaser, its officers, directors, employees, Affiliates and other representatives shall have sustained cumulative Losses as a result of one or more such breaches or falsities of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000) (the "BASKET AMOUNT"). Once the aggregate of Losses exceeds the Basket Amount, the Shareholder shall provide indemnification for all Losses sustained as a result of such breach(es) or falsity(ies) of the applicable representations and warranties in excess of the Basket Amount; or (b) the breach of any covenant or agreement made by the Shareholder in this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents to be executed and delivered by the Shareholder or its representatives pursuant hereto or thereto; or 44
(c) any incurrence by the Purchaser, the Company or the Subsidiaries of an amount or amounts for Transactional Expenses of the Shareholder; or (d) any claim (i) for Retention Payments, severance pay, bonus, unpaid wages or salaries accruing, incurred or triggered by a termination of employment (voluntary or involuntary) of any employee of the Shareholder, the Company or the Subsidiaries which occurred at any time prior to the Closing or which arises immediately upon and as a consequence of the occurrence of the Closing (but not as a consequence of a hiring and subsequent termination by the Purchaser), or (ii) relating to any claim or Proceeding of any employee of the Shareholder, the Company or the Subsidiaries arising from any act, occurrence, or event, the basis of which is dated at any time prior to, or attributable to, the Closing; or (e) any and all Losses that arise from, in connection with or incident to any claim, obligation, cost or expense under a guarantee made by the Company or the Subsidiaries on behalf of the Shareholder as described in Section 5.22(a) that are not within the scope of the indemnity from the Purchaser to the Shareholder; or (f) any and all Losses that arise from, are in connection with, or are incident to any claims set forth in SCHEDULE 3.24 to the extent such Losses would otherwise be covered under any insurance or self-insurance arrangement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Loss or aggregate Losses to be indemnified by the Shareholder to the Purchaser under this Agreement shall not exceed Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($7.5 Million). Any claim of indemnification by the Purchaser from, in connection with or incident to any Loss or Losses related to Taxes shall be governed by Article 10 of this Agreement. 9.2 INDEMNIFICATION BY THE PURCHASER. The Purchaser covenants and agrees to defend, indemnify and hold the Shareholder and its respective officers, directors, successors and assigns, harmless from, against and in respect of any and all Losses that it may at any time, directly or indirectly, suffer, sustain, incur or become subject to, arising out of, based upon or resulting from or on account of each or all of the following: (a) the breach or falsity of any representation or warranty made by the Purchaser in this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents to be executed and delivered by the Purchaser pursuant hereto and thereto; or (b) the breach of any covenant or agreement made by the Purchaser in this Agreement and the Ancillary Documents to be executed and delivered by the Purchaser pursuant hereto or thereto; (c) any and all Losses arising from, in connection with or incident to the Shareholder and Affiliate Guarantees described in Section 5.22; or (d) any and all Losses arising from, in connection with or incident to the Severance Payments. 45
9.3 PROCEDURE FOR INDEMNIFICATION. In the event a party, including its trustees, officers, directors, employees, Affiliates and other representatives, intends to seek indemnification pursuant to the provisions of Sections 9.1 or 9.2 hereof (the "INDEMNIFIED PARTY"), the Indemnified Party shall promptly give notice hereunder to the other party (the "INDEMNIFYING PARTY") of a claim or after obtaining written notice of any claim, investigation, or the service of a summons or other initial or continuing legal or administrative process or Proceeding in any action instituted against the Indemnified Party as to which recovery or other action may be sought against the Indemnified Party because of the indemnification provided for in Section 9.1 or 9.2 hereof, and, if such indemnity shall arise from the claim of a third party, the Indemnified Party shall permit the Indemnifying Party to assume the defense of any such claim and any litigation resulting from such claim; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the Indemnified Party shall not be required to permit such an assumption of the defense of any claim or Proceeding which, if not first paid, discharged or otherwise complied with, would result in a material interruption or disruption of the business of the Indemnified Party, or any material part thereof. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the right to indemnification hereunder shall not be affected by any failure of the Indemnified Party to give such notice (or by delay by the Indemnified Party in giving such notice) unless, and then only to the extent that, the rights and remedies of the Indemnifying Party shall have been prejudiced as a result of the failure to give, or delay in giving, such notice. Failure by the Indemnifying Party to notify the Indemnified Party of its election to defend any such claim or action by a third party within twenty (20) days after notice thereof shall have been given to the Indemnifying Party shall be deemed a waiver by the Indemnifying Party of its right to defend such claim or action. If the Indemnifying Party assumes the defense of such claim, investigation or Proceeding resulting therefrom, the obligations of the Indemnifying Party hereunder as to such claim, investigation or Proceeding shall include taking all steps necessary in the defense or settlement of such claim, investigation or Proceeding and holding the Indemnified Party harmless from and against any and all Losses arising from, in connection with or incident to any settlement approved by the Indemnifying Party or any judgment entered in connection with such claim, investigation or Proceeding, except where, and only to the extent that, the Indemnifying Party has been prejudiced by the actions or omissions of the Indemnified Party. The Indemnifying Party shall not, in the defense of such claim or any Proceeding resulting therefrom, consent to entry of any judgment (other than a judgment of dismissal on the merits without costs) except with the written consent of the Indemnified Party (which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned) or enter into any settlement (except with the written consent of the Indemnified Party, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned) unless (i) there is no finding or admission of any violation of Applicable Law and no material effect on any claims that could reasonably be expected to be made by or against the Indemnified Party, (ii) the sole relief provided is monetary damages that are paid in full for Losses which are or may be properly applied against the Basket Amount, and (iii) the settlement shall include the giving by the claimant or the plaintiff to the Indemnified Party a release from all Liability in respect to such claim or litigation. If the Indemnifying Party assumes the defense of such claim, investigation or Proceeding resulting therefrom, the Indemnified Party shall be entitled to participate in the defense of the claim, but solely by observation and comment to the Indemnifying Party, and the counsel selected by the Indemnified Party shall not appear on its behalf in any Proceeding arising 46
hereunder. The Indemnified Party shall bear the fees and expenses of any additional counsel retained by it to participate in its defense unless any of the following shall apply: (i) the employment of such counsel shall have been authorized in writing by the Indemnifying Party, or (ii) the Indemnifying Party's legal counsel shall advise the Indemnifying Party in writing, with a copy to the Indemnified Party, that there is a conflict of interest that would make it inappropriate under applicable standards of professional conduct to have common counsel. If clause (i) or (ii) in the immediately preceding sentence is applicable, then the Indemnified Party may employ separate counsel at the expense of the Indemnifying Party to represent the Indemnified Party, but in no event shall the Indemnifying Party be obligated to pay the costs and expenses of more than one such separate counsel for any one complaint, claim, action or Proceeding in any one jurisdiction. If the Indemnifying Party does not assume the defense of any such claim by a third party or litigation resulting therefrom after receipt of notice from the Indemnified Party, the Indemnified Party may defend against such claim or litigation in such manner as it reasonably deems appropriate, and unless the Indemnifying Party shall deposit with the Indemnified Party a sum equivalent to the total amount demanded in such claim or litigation plus the Indemnified Party's estimate of the cost (including attorneys' fees) of defending the same, the Indemnified Party may settle such claim or Proceeding on such terms as it may reasonably deem appropriate and the Indemnifying Party shall, subject to its defenses and the applicability of any remaining threshold loss amount provided for in Section 9.1(a) hereof, promptly reimburse the Indemnified Party for the amount of such settlement and for all reasonable costs (including attorneys' fees), expenses and damages incurred by the Indemnified Party in connection with the defense against or settlement of such claim, investigation or litigation, or if any such claim or litigation is not so settled, the Indemnifying Party shall, subject to its defenses and the applicability of any remaining Basket Amount provided for in Section 9.1(a) hereof, promptly reimburse the Indemnified Party for the amount of any final nonappealable judgment rendered with respect to any claim by a third party in such litigation and for all costs (including attorneys' fees), expenses and damage incurred by the Indemnified Party in connection with the defense against such claim or litigation, whether or not resulting from, arising out of, or incurred with respect to, the act of a third party. Each party shall cooperate in good faith and in all respects with each Indemnifying Party and its representatives (including without limitation its counsel) in the investigation, negotiation, settlement, trial and/or defense of any Proceedings (and any appeal arising therefrom) or any claim. The parties shall cooperate with each other in any notifications to and information requests of any insurers. No individual representative of any Person, or their respective Affiliates shall be personally liable for any Loss or Losses under this Agreement, except as specifically agreed to by said individual representative. 9.4 DISPUTE RESOLUTION. In the event a dispute arises under this Agreement, except with respect to Section 2.2 or equitable remedies pursued under this Agreement, such disputes shall be resolved in the manner set forth in this Section 9.4. (a) If a dispute arises under this Agreement, including any question regarding the existence, validity, interpretation or termination hereof, which is not described as an exception in this Section 9.4, the Purchaser and the Shareholder may invoke the dispute 47
resolution procedure set forth in this Section 9.4 by giving written notice to the other party. The parties shall enter into discussions concerning this dispute. If the dispute is not resolved as a result of such discussion in ten (10) days, an attempt will be made to resolve the matter by a formal nonbinding mediation with an independent neutral mediator agreed to by the parties. If the parties cannot agree on a mediator within a period of ten (10) days after expiration of the ten (10) day period for resolution by discussion, then either party may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for appointment of a mediator, which appointment shall be binding and nonappealable. Upon commencement of the mediation process, the parties shall promptly communicate with respect to a procedure and schedule for the conduct of the Proceeding and for the exchange of documents and other information related to the dispute. The mediation process shall be deemed ended if the dispute has not been resolved within thirty (30) days after appointment of the mediator. (b) All claims, disputes or other matters in question between the parties to this Agreement arising out of or relating to this Agreement which are not resolved by mediation in accordance with Section 9.4(a) within thirty (30) days after appointment of a mediator may be resolved pursuant to Section 9.4(c). (c) The Shareholder and the Purchaser agree and consent that any legal action, suit or Proceeding seeking to enforce this Section 9.4 shall be instituted and adjudicated solely and exclusively in any court of general jurisdiction in North Carolina, or in the United States District Court having jurisdiction in North Carolina and the Shareholder and the Purchaser agree that venue will be proper in such courts and waive any objection which they may have now or hereafter to the venue of any such suit, action or Proceeding in such courts, and irrevocably consent and agree to the jurisdiction of said courts in any such suit, action or Proceeding. The Shareholder and the Purchaser further agree to accept and acknowledge service of any and all process which may be served in any such suit, action or Proceeding in said courts, and also agree that service of process or notice upon them shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process or notice upon them, in any suit, action or Proceeding, if given or made: (i) by a Person over the age of eighteen who personally serves such notice or service of process on the Shareholder or the Purchaser, as the case may be, or (ii) by certified mail, return receipt requested, mailed to the Shareholder or the Purchaser, as the case may be, at their respective addresses set forth in this Agreement. (d) In the event of a Proceeding filed or instituted between the parties pursuant to this Section 9.4, the prevailing party will be entitled to receive from the adverse party all costs, damages and expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, incurred by the prevailing party in connection with that action or Proceeding, whether or not the controversy is reduced to judgment or award. 9.5 EFFECT OF INSURANCE. An Indemnified Party who has a right to make a claim under any policy of insurance with respect to an indemnified claim made by the Indemnified Party shall use commercially reasonable efforts to make such claim on a prompt and competent basis in the manner required by the insurer. The Indemnified Party shall use commercially reasonable efforts to promptly and diligently pursue such claim and shall cooperate fully with the 48
insurer and the Indemnifying Party in the prosecution of the claim or claims. In the event an Indemnified Party receives insurance proceeds with respect to Losses for which the Indemnified Party has made an indemnification claim prior to the date on which the Indemnifying Party is required pursuant to this Article 9 to pay such indemnification claim, the indemnification claim shall be reduced by an amount equal to such insurance proceeds received by the Indemnified Party less all reasonable out-of-pocket costs incurred by the Indemnified Party in its pursuit of such insurance proceeds. If such insurance proceeds are received by the Indemnified Party after the date on which the Indemnifying Party is required pursuant to this Article 9 to pay such indemnification claim, the Indemnified Party shall, no later than five (5) days after the receipt of such insurance proceeds, reimburse the Indemnifying Party in an amount equal to such insurance proceeds (but in no event in an amount greater than the Losses theretofore paid to the Indemnified Party by the Indemnifying Party) less all reasonable out-of-pocket costs incurred by the Indemnified Party in obtaining such insurance proceeds. In either case, the Indemnifying Party shall compensate the Indemnified Party for all costs incurred by the Indemnified Party subsequent to either the reduction of any indemnification claim as provided above, or the delivery of any such insurance proceeds to the Indemnifying Party as provided above, as the case may be, as a result of any such insurance, including, but not limited to, retrospective premium adjustments, experience-based premium adjustments (whether retroactive or prospective) and indemnification or surety obligations of the Indemnified Party to any insurer. A claim for such costs shall be made by an Indemnified Party by delivery of a written notice to the Indemnifying Party requesting compensation and specifying this Section 9.5 as the basis on which compensation for such costs is sought, and the Indemnifying Party shall pay such costs no later than thirty (30) days after receiving the written notice requesting such compensation. Notwithstanding the foregoing, except to the extent set forth in the first two sentences of this Section 9.5, the Indemnified Party is not required to pursue a recovery from an insurer as a precondition to the Indemnifying Party's obligation to pay any indemnification claim as required by this Article 9, and the Indemnifying Party shall not be entitled to delay any payment beyond the respective payment dates for any indemnification claims referred to in this Article 9 for the purpose of awaiting receipt of insurance proceeds or credits therefor as provided herein. 9.6 EFFECT OF TAXES. The amount of indemnification payment due hereunder shall be reduced by the amount of any Income Tax benefit that the Purchaser, the Company and the Subsidiaries (or their Affiliates) realizes (or will realize) as a result of incurring such Loss. The amount of the Income Tax benefit realized (or that will be realized) as a result of incurring a Loss shall be computed on a hypothetical basis and shall equal the product of (i) the sum of (A) the amount of each Income Tax deduction (or similar benefit) of the Purchaser, the Company and the Subsidiaries (or their Affiliates) resulting from the Loss that is reasonably anticipated to be deductible (or used) in the tax year including the date of indemnification payment (or in any prior tax years) plus (B) the present value as of the date of the indemnification payment of each Income Tax deduction (or similar benefit) of the Purchaser, the Company and the Subsidiaries (or their Affiliates) resulting from the Loss that is reasonably anticipated to be deductible (or used) in any tax year after the tax year of the indemnification payment multiplied by (ii) forty percent (40%). For purposes of clause (B), the present value of a future Income Tax deduction (or similar benefit) shall be determined using a discount rate of five percent (5%) and assuming that all Tax benefits from the deduction (or similar benefit) are realized on the 182nd day of the Company's tax year for the year in which the deduction (or similar benefit) is reasonably anticipated to be claimed. 49
ARTICLE 10 TAX MATTERS The following provisions shall govern the allocation of responsibility as between the Purchaser and the Shareholder for certain Tax matters following the Closing Date: 10.1 TAX RETURNS. (a) The Shareholder has the exclusive authority and obligation to prepare, execute on behalf of the Company and the Subsidiaries and timely file, or cause to be prepared and timely filed, all Tax Returns of the Company and the Subsidiaries that are due with respect to any taxable year or other taxable period ending prior to or ending on and including the Closing Date. Such authority shall include, but not be limited to, the determination of the manner in which any items of income, gain, deduction, Loss or credit arising out of the income, properties and operations of the Company and the Subsidiaries shall be reported or disclosed in such Tax Returns; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that such Tax Returns shall be prepared by treating items on such Tax Returns in a manner consistent with the past practices with respect to such items and in a manner consistent with all applicable IRS regulations. (b) Except as provided in Section 10.1(a), the Purchaser shall have the exclusive authority and obligation to prepare, execute on behalf of the Company and the Subsidiaries and timely file, or cause to be prepared and timely filed, all Tax Returns of the Company and the Subsidiaries that are due with respect to any taxable year or other taxable period ending after the Closing Date; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, with respect to Tax Returns to be filed by the Purchaser pursuant to this Section 10.1 for taxable periods beginning before the Closing Date and ending after the Closing Date, items set forth on such Tax Returns shall be treated in a manner consistent with the past practices with respect to such items. Such authority shall include, but not be limited to, the determination of the manner in which any items of income, gain, deduction, Loss or credit arising out of the income, properties and operations of the Company shall be reported or disclosed on such Tax Returns. 10.2 CONTROVERSIES. The Purchaser shall promptly notify the Shareholder in writing upon receipt by the Purchaser or any Affiliate of the Purchaser (including the Company and the Subsidiaries after the Closing Date) of written notice of any inquiries, claims, assessments, audits or similar events with respect to Taxes relating to a taxable period ending prior to or ending on and including the Closing Date for which the Shareholder may be liable under this Agreement (any such inquiry, claim, assessment, audit or similar event, a "TAX MATTER"). The Shareholder, or its duly appointed representative (the "SHAREHOLDER'S REPRESENTATIVE"), at its sole expense, shall have the authority to represent the interests of the Company and the Subsidiaries with respect to any Tax Matter before the IRS, any other taxing authority, any other governmental agency or authority or any court and shall have the sole right to control the defense, compromise or other resolution of any Tax Matter, including responding to inquiries, filing Tax Returns and contesting, defending against and resolving any assessment for additional Taxes or notice of Tax deficiency or other adjustment of Taxes of, or relating to, a Tax Matter; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that 50
neither the Purchaser nor any of its Affiliates shall enter into any settlement of or otherwise compromise any Tax Matter that affects or may affect the Tax Liability of the Shareholder, the Company, the Subsidiaries or any Affiliate of the foregoing for any period ending after the Closing Date, which includes a portion of a period beginning before the Closing Date and ending after the Closing Date (the "OVERLAP PERIOD"), without the prior written consent of the Shareholder or the Shareholder's Representative, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned. The parties hereto shall keep the other fully and timely informed with respect to the commencement, status and nature of any Tax Matter. Except as otherwise provided in this Section 10.2, the Purchaser shall have the sole right to control any audit or examination by any taxing authority, initiate any claim for refund or amend any Tax Return, and contest, resolve and defend against any assessment for additional Taxes, notice of Tax deficiency or other adjustment of Taxes of, or relating to, the income, assets or operations of the Company and the Subsidiaries for all taxable periods; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the Purchaser shall not, and shall cause its Affiliates (including the Company and the Subsidiaries) not to, enter into any settlement of any contest or otherwise compromise any issue with respect to the portion of the Overlap Period ending on or prior to the Closing Date without the prior written consent of the Shareholder, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned. 10.3 TRANSFER TAXES. All transfer, documentary, stamp, registration, sales and use and similar Taxes and fees (including all penalties and interest) imposed in connection with the sale of the Stock or any other transaction that occurs pursuant to this Agreement shall be the obligation of the Shareholder. 10.4 AMENDED TAX RETURNS. The Shareholder, the Company and the Subsidiaries shall not file or cause to be filed any amended Tax Return or claims for refund without the prior written consent of the Purchaser, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld, delayed or conditioned, except for such amended Tax Returns or claims for refund filed in connection with the resolution of any Tax Matter in accordance with Section 10.2. 10.5 NON-FOREIGN PERSON AFFIDAVIT. The Shareholder shall furnish to the Purchaser on or before the Closing Date a non-foreign Person affidavit as required by Section 1445 of the Code. 10.6 TAX INDEMNIFICATION. (a) TAX INDEMNIFICATION. The Shareholder hereby covenants and agrees to indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Purchaser, its Affiliates (including the Company and the Subsidiaries) and the successors to the foregoing (and their respective shareholders, officers, directors, employees and agents) against (i) all Losses with respect to any claims that may be asserted by any party based upon the breach of any representation or warranty made with respect to Taxes in this Agreement, including those made pursuant to Section 3.9, (ii) all Taxes imposed on or asserted against the properties, income or operations of the Company or the Subsidiaries for all Pre-Closing Periods to the extent such Taxes have not been fully reserved for in the financial statements of the Company as of the last day of the month preceding the Closing Date, and (iii) all Taxes 51
imposed on the Company or the Subsidiaries, or for which the Company or the Subsidiaries may be liable, as a result of any transaction contemplated by this Agreement. The Purchaser shall promptly give the Shareholder or its respective representatives written notice of all Taxes, Losses, claims and expenses which the Purchaser has reasonably determined may give rise to a right of indemnification under this Section 10.6(a), including a computation of the amount of the claimed indemnification with sufficient detail and particularity to enable the Shareholder to reasonably determine the amount of such required indemnification. (b) NOTIFICATION OF CLAIMS. In the event that the Purchaser fails to notify the Shareholder with respect to a Tax Matter in accordance with the provisions of Section 10.2, the Shareholder shall not be obligated to indemnify the Purchaser under this Section 10.6 to the extent that such failure to notify the Shareholder has a Material Adverse Effect on the Shareholder's ability to defend against such Tax Matter. 10.7 SECTION 338 ELECTION. The Shareholder and the Purchaser have agreed that an election under Section 338(h)(10) of the Code, and any comparable state or local Tax provision, shall be made by the Purchaser and the Shareholder with respect to the Purchaser's acquisition of the Stock of the Company and each Subsidiary. In this regard, the Purchaser shall prepare, and the Shareholder shall assist in the preparation of, Forms 8883 or comparable state or local Tax forms in a manner consistent with the allocation of the Purchase Price to assets reflected in SCHEDULE 10.7. Upon presentation of any such Form 8883 or comparable state or local Tax form by the Purchaser, the Shareholder shall promptly execute and return such forms to the Purchaser for inclusion with the Purchaser's Tax Return and, if necessary, the Shareholder shall include a copy of such form with its own Tax Return for the Tax period that includes the purchase of the Stock. 10.8 POST-CLOSING ACCESS AND COOPERATION. From and after the Closing Date, the Purchaser agrees, and agrees to cause the Company and the Subsidiaries, to permit the Shareholder and its representatives to have reasonable access, during normal business hours, to the books and records of the Company and the Subsidiaries, to the extent that such books and records relate to a Pre-Closing Period, and personnel, for the purpose of enabling the Shareholder to: (i) prepare Tax Returns, (ii) investigate or contest any Tax Matter which the Shareholder has the authority to conduct, and (iii) evaluate any claim for indemnification. ARTICLE 11 PERFORMANCE FOLLOWING THE CLOSING DATE The following covenants and agreements are to be performed after the Closing by the parties and shall continue in effect for the periods respectively indicated or, where no indication is made, until performed: 11.1 FURTHER ACTS AND ASSURANCES. The parties agree that, at any time and from time to time, on and after the Closing Date, upon the reasonable request of the other party, they will do or cause to be done all such further acts and things and execute, acknowledge and deliver, or cause to be executed, acknowledged and delivered any and all papers, documents, instruments, 52
agreements, assignments, transfers, assurances and conveyances as may be necessary or desirable to carry out and give effect to the provisions and intent of this Agreement. In addition, from and after the Closing Date, the Purchaser will afford to the Shareholder and its attorneys, accountants and other representatives access, during normal business hours, to such personnel, books and records relating to the Company and/or the Subsidiaries as may reasonably be required in connection with the preparation of financial information or the filing of Tax Returns and will cooperate in all reasonable respects in connection with claims and Proceeding asserted by or against third parties, relating to or arising from the transactions contemplated hereby. 11.2 NON-COMPETITION AGREEMENT. During the period of thirty-six (36) months from and after the Closing Date, the Shareholder, on behalf of itself and its Affiliates (other than the Company and the Subsidiaries), covenants and agrees that it will not, without the Purchaser's prior written consent, which may be withheld or given in its sole discretion, directly or indirectly, or individually or collectively within the State of North Carolina, lend any material credit, advice or assistance, or engage in any activity or act in any manner, including but not limited to, as a founder, promoter, partner, joint venturer, shareholder other than as a less than five percent (5%) shareholder of a publicly traded corporation, officer, director, trustee, manager, licensor, licensee, principal, agent, broker, representative, consultant, advisor, investor or otherwise for the purpose of establishing, operating or managing any business or entity that is engaged in activities competitive with the Business of the Company or the Subsidiaries. 11.3 NON-SOLICITATION AGREEMENT. During the period of thirty-six (36) months from and after the Closing Date, the Shareholder covenants and agrees that it will not, whether for its own account or for the account of any other Person, directly or indirectly interfere with the relationship of the Company or the Subsidiaries with, or endeavor to divert or entice away from, the Company or the Subsidiaries any Person who or which at any time during the term of the Shareholder's affiliation with the Company or the Subsidiaries is an employee, vendor, supplier or customer of the Company or the Subsidiaries. The foregoing shall not apply to employees, vendors, suppliers or customers who do not, at the time of any solicitation, have a relationship with the Company or a Subsidiary in such capacity. 11.4 REASONABLENESS OF COVENANTS. The Shareholder, on behalf of itself, its trustees, shareholders and Affiliates, acknowledges and agrees that the geographic scope and period of duration of the restrictive covenants contained in Sections 11.2 and 11.3 of this Agreement are both fair and reasonable and that the interests sought to be protected by the Purchaser, the Company and the Subsidiaries are legitimate business interests entitled to be protected. The Shareholder further acknowledges and agrees that the Purchaser would not have purchased the Shareholder's Stock in the Company pursuant to this Agreement unless the Shareholder agreed to the covenants contained in such Sections. 11.5 INJUNCTIVE RELIEF. The parties agree that the remedy of damages at law for the breach by any party of any of the covenants contained in Sections 11.2 and 11.3 is an inadequate remedy. In recognition of the irreparable harm that a violation by the Shareholder, its officers, directors, shareholders or Affiliates, of any of the covenants, agreements or obligations arising under Sections 11.2 and 11.3 would cause the Purchaser and the Company, the Shareholder, on behalf of itself, its officers, directors, shareholders and Affiliates, agrees that in addition to any other remedies or relief afforded by law, an Injunction against an actual or threatened violation 53
or violations may be issued against it and/or them and every other Person concerned thereby, it being the understanding of the parties that both damages and Injunction shall be proper modes of relief and are not to be considered alternative remedies. 11.6 BLUE PENCIL DOCTRINE. In the event that any of the restrictive covenants contained in this Article shall be found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unreasonable by reason of its extending for too great a period of time or over too great a geographic area or by reason of its being too extensive in any other respect, then such restrictive covenant shall be deemed modified to the minimum extent necessary to make it reasonable and enforceable under the circumstances. 11.7 GUARANTEES. In furtherance of the provisions of Section 5.22 hereof, the Shareholder shall (i) have a continuing obligation after the Closing to terminate, extinguish or otherwise remove any and all of the guarantees described in Section 5.22 hereof, and (ii) defend and indemnify the Purchaser with respect to such guarantees in accordance with Article 9 of this Agreement, including Section 9.1. 11.8 EMPLOYEE MATTERS. (a) EMPLOYMENT. Each Employee who is employed by the Company or either Subsidiary on the Closing Date shall continue to be employed by the Company or the Subsidiary, as applicable, on and after the Closing Date at substantially the same base wage or salary as in effect immediately prior to the Closing Date. Such continued employment shall be employment at-will, and nothing in this Section 11.8 is intended to create, or shall create or confer, any right of employment after the Closing Date for any Employee. (b) BENEFIT PLANS. Prior to the Closing Date, the Company shall have (i) with respect to the Benefit Plans sponsored by the Company as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10(a)(1), (2), (3), (4) AND (11) THROUGH (23) (the "COMPANY PLANS"), terminated the participation in any such Company Plan of any individual who is not an employee of the Company, (ii) with respect to the Company Plan set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10(a)(4), timely amended such Company Plan to lower the health care spending account maximum annual election for the 2004 plan year to $3,600, and (iii) with respect to the Company Plan set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10(a)(13), prepared and made any necessary 5500 filings and, to the extent necessary, entered into the Department of Labor Delinquent Filers Voluntary Compliance Program to assure plan compliance. The Purchaser shall, in its sole discretion, decide (i) whether benefits for the Employees shall be provided under benefit plans designated by the Purchaser which are maintained by the Purchaser and its Affiliates for their employees (each a "PURCHASER PLAN") or (ii) whether such benefits shall continue to be provided under one or more of the Company Plans. The Shareholder shall cause the Company and the Subsidiaries to cooperate with the Purchaser, and the Purchaser shall cooperate with the Company and the Subsidiaries, in making arrangements to terminate on the Closing Date those Company Plans designated by the Purchaser and any contracts with respect to the provision of benefits under such Company Plans, in accordance with the terms of such Company Plans and contracts. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that arrangements cannot be made to ensure that termination of a Company Plan (which is to be replaced in whole or in part by a 54
corresponding Purchaser Plan) cannot occur without a period of non-coverage or interruption in coverage, then arrangements for the termination of such Company Plan shall not occur until it is ensured that there will be no period of non-coverage or interruption of coverage in the transition from the applicable Company Plan to the corresponding Purchaser Plan. The Purchaser shall waive any waiting periods for coverage under a Purchaser Plan which replaces a Company Plan for Employees covered under such replaced Company Plan. The Purchaser shall credit the Employees with any amounts credited under the Company's medical plan toward an out-of-pocket maximum with respect to satisfaction of an out-of-pocket maximum under Purchaser's medical plan. The Purchaser shall also cause the Company and the Subsidiaries to continue to recognize and honor each Employee's accrued but unused vacation days as of the Closing Date and in the event of an Employee's termination of employment, to provide for payment of any such accrued vacation days which remain unused and to which the Employee remains entitled upon termination of employment. (c) ROLLOVER OF ACCOUNTS. With respect to the Benefit Plan set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10(a)(5) (i) the Company shall, and/or shall cause its Affiliate: (A) to submit to the IRS, prior to the end of the remedial amendment period, an application for a determination letter with respect to such Benefit Plan as adopted effective January 1, 1997 and as amended thereafter and (B) to take such action, prior to the Closing Date, as may be necessary or appropriate to terminate the Company's and the Subsidiaries' participation in such Benefit Plan, and (ii) the Purchaser shall take such action, prior to the Closing Date, as may be necessary or appropriate to enable the Employees, effective immediately following the Closing Date, to rollover account balances and outstanding plan loans under such Benefit Plan, to a comparable pension benefit plan sponsored by the Purchaser. (d) DISCONTINUE PARTICIPATION IN THIRD PARTY PLANS. Prior to the Closing Date, the Company and the Subsidiaries shall, and shall cause their Affiliates, to take such action as may be necessary or appropriate to discontinue the Company's and the Subsidiaries' participation in the Benefit Plans sponsored by the Shareholder or Florida Water Services Corporation as set forth in SCHEDULE 3.10(a)(6), (7), (8), (9) AND (10) (collectively the "THIRD PARTY PLANS"). The parties understand and agree that (i) the Company and/or its Affiliates may amend such Third Party Plans prior to the Closing Date as may be necessary or appropriate, in the discretion of the Company and/or its Affiliates, to discontinue the Company's participation in such Third Party Plans or for other reasons, (ii) the Purchaser is not assuming any of such Third Party Plans nor the liabilities associated therewith, and (iii) the Shareholder shall assume all liabilities under such Third Party Plans with respect to Employees or former employees of the Company and the Subsidiaries and shall indemnify and hold the Purchaser, the Company and the Subsidiaries and their officers, directors, employees, Affiliates, shareholders and agents and each of their respective successors and assigns, harmless from, against and in respect of all such liabilities and any costs or expenses (including without limitation, reasonable attorneys' fees) and any and all other Losses with respect to such Third Party Plans. (e) SERVICE CREDIT. All past service of the Employees with the Company and/or the Subsidiaries shall be taken into account for purposes of eligibility and vesting 55
under the benefit plans provided by the Purchaser and for purposes of calculating vacation benefits and severance benefits under the vacation plan and severance plan maintained by the Purchaser. Nothing in this Section 11.8(e) shall abrogate or otherwise affect any Employee's right under the Employee severance provisions set forth in the Retention and Severance Agreements. (f) EMPLOYEE SEVERANCE. The Purchaser acknowledges and agrees that the Company and each of the Subsidiaries have entered into legal, binding and enforceable Retention and Severance Agreements with each of the Employees as set forth in Exhibit D to this Agreement. The "SEVERANCE PAYMENT" (as defined in EXHIBIT D) is calculated in accordance with the Employee's employment position, term of service and is capped at a specified level, as set forth in SCHEDULE 11.8. The Company or the applicable Subsidiary shall be responsible for funding and payment of any and all Severance Payments, without recourse to the Shareholder. 11.9 INDEMNIFICATION OF OFFICERS AND DIRECTORS OF THE COMPANY AND THE SUBSIDIARIES. (a) INDEMNIFICATION. After the Closing, the Company will, and the Purchaser will cause the Company and each of the Subsidiaries to: (i) indemnify, defend and hold harmless the present and former officers, directors, employees, representatives and agents of the Company and each of the Subsidiaries (collectively, the "DIRECTOR INDEMNIFIED PARTIES" and individually, a "DIRECTOR INDEMNIFIED PARTY") in respect of acts or omissions occurring on or prior to the Closing Date to the extent provided under Applicable Law or under the organizational documents of the Company or the Subsidiaries, in each case as in effect on the date hereof, and (ii) advance expenses as incurred by such officers, directors, employees, representatives and agents of the Company and/or the Subsidiaries to the fullest extent permitted under Applicable Law or under the organizational documents of the Company and/or the Subsidiaries, whichever is greater, in each case as in effect on the date hereof; PROVIDED, that such indemnification and advancement of expenses shall be subject to any limitation imposed from time to time under Applicable Law. (b) NO CLAIMS. Except as set forth in SCHEDULE 11.9, there are no pending, nor, to the Knowledge of the Company, Threatened, claims as described in Section 11.9(a) for indemnification by any Director Indemnified Party. (c) INSURANCE PROCEEDS. If the Company and/or the Subsidiaries provide indemnification and/or advancement of expenses as provided for in Section 11.9(a) above, the Company and/or the Subsidiaries shall be entitled to all of the proceeds of any insurance providing coverage under any policies maintained by the Parent, the Shareholder, the Company, the Subsidiaries, or any of their Affiliates for such acts or omissions prior to the Closing Date. (d) THIRD PARTY BENEFICIARIES. Notwithstanding any contrary provision set forth in this Agreement or any Ancillary Document, the provisions of this Section 11.9 56
are intended for the benefit of, and shall be directly enforceable by, each of the Director Indemnified Parties, their heirs and personal representatives. ARTICLE 12 TERMINATION 12.1 TERMINATION. This Agreement may be terminated and the transactions contemplated herein may be abandoned after the date of this Agreement, but not later than the Closing: (a) by mutual written consent of all parties hereto; (b) by the Purchaser or the Shareholder if (i) any of the conditions provided for in Article 6 of this Agreement have not been met and have not been waived in writing by the party seeking to terminate on or before the Closing Date, and (ii) any party seeking to terminate this Agreement was not the cause of the failure of the condition to be satisfied; (c) by the Purchaser if (i) any of the conditions provided for in Article 7 of this Agreement have not been met and have not been waived in writing by the Purchaser on or before the Closing Date, and (ii) the Purchaser was not the cause of the failure of the condition to be satisfied; (d) by the Shareholder if (i) any of the conditions provided for in Article 8 of this Agreement have not been met and have not been waived in writing by the Shareholder on or before the Closing Date, and (ii) the Shareholder was not the cause of the failure of the condition to be satisfied; (e) by either the Purchaser or the Shareholder if the Closing shall not have occurred on or before September 30, 2004; and (f) by a party who objects to a Supplement and meets the criteria for the exercise of a termination right under and pursuant to Section 13.21. In the event of termination or abandonment by any party as provided in this Section 12.1, written notice shall forthwith be given to the other party and, except as otherwise provided herein, each party shall pay its own expenses incident to preparation or consummation of this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereunder and neither party shall have any Liability to the other hereunder except such Liability as may arise as a result of a breach hereof. 12.2 RETURN OF DOCUMENTS AND NONDISCLOSURE. If this Agreement is terminated for any reason pursuant to Section 12.1 hereto, each party and its counsel shall return all documents and materials which shall have been furnished by or on behalf of the other party, and all copies thereof, and each party hereby covenants that it will not Use or Disclose to any Person any Confidential Information about the other party or any information about the transactions contemplated hereby, except insofar as may be necessary to comply with the requirements of any Governmental Body or Order or to assert its rights hereunder. 57
ARTICLE 13 MISCELLANEOUS 13.1 SURVIVAL OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES, COVENANTS AND AGREEMENTS. Each of the (i) representations and warranties of the parties contained in this Agreement and in any Ancillary Documents delivered by or on behalf of any of the parties hereto pursuant to this Agreement and the transactions contemplated hereby, and (ii) indemnification covenants set forth in Sections 9.1 and 9.2 hereof, shall survive the Closing of the transactions contemplated hereby and any investigation made by the parties or their agents for a period of eighteen (18) months after the Closing, after which no claim for indemnification for any breach of any representation or warranty under this Agreement or covenants to indemnify under Sections 9.1 and 9.2 hereof (i) may be brought, (ii) no action with respect thereto may be commenced, and (iii) no party shall have any Liability or obligation with respect thereto, unless (i) the Indemnified Party gave written notice to the Indemnifying Party specifying with particularity the breach of representation or warranty or indemnification covenants set forth in either of Sections 9.1 or 9.2 claimed on or before the expiration of such eighteen (18) month period, (ii) the claim relates to a breach of any representations or warranties contained in Sections 3.9, 3.10, 3.11 or 3.25, in which case the right to indemnification shall survive until the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations, or (iii) the claim relates to any representation or warranty in Sections 3.2 or 3.35, in which case the representation or warranty shall indefinitely survive the Closing. The covenants and agreements arising from, incident to or in connection with this Agreement, other than the indemnification covenants set forth in Section 9.1 and 9.2 hereof shall survive the Closing indefinitely, until such covenants and agreements are fully satisfied and require no performance or forbearance, or the rights of a party hereto expire on a specific date by the terms hereof. 13.2 PRESERVATION OF AND ACCESS TO RECORDS. The Purchaser shall preserve or cause the Company and the Subsidiaries to preserve all books and records of the Company and the Subsidiaries for a period of six (6) years after the Closing Date, or any later date of retention required by Applicable Law; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, the Purchaser may destroy any part or parts of such records upon obtaining written consent of the Shareholder for such destruction, which consent may be withheld in the Shareholder's absolute discretion. Such records shall be made available to the Shareholder and its representatives at all reasonable times during normal business hours of the Company and/or the Subsidiaries, as applicable, during said six-year period with the right at the Shareholder's expense to make abstracts from and copies thereof. 13.3 COOPERATION. The parties hereto shall cooperate with each other in all respects, including using commercially reasonable efforts to assist each other in satisfying the conditions precedent to their respective obligations under this Agreement, to the end that the transactions contemplated hereby will be consummated. 13.4 PUBLIC ANNOUNCEMENTS. The timing and content of all public announcements relating to the execution of this Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby shall be approved by both the Purchaser and the Shareholder prior to the release of such public announcements, and each party agrees to cooperate with the other party as appropriate to comply with all Applicable Laws. 58
13.5 NOTICES. All notices, demands and other communications provided for hereunder shall be in writing and shall be given (i) by personal delivery, (ii) via facsimile transmission (receipt telephonically confirmed), (iii) by nationally recognized overnight courier (prepaid), or (iv) by certified or registered first class mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, sent to each party, at its and its representative's address as set forth below or at such other address or in such other manner as may be designated by such party or the respective representative in a written notice to each of the other parties. All such notices, demands and communications shall be effective (i) when personally delivered, (ii) one (1) business day after delivery to the overnight courier, (iii) upon telephone confirmation of facsimile transmission, or (iv) upon receipt after dispatch by mail to the party to whom the same is so given or made: If to the Purchaser: Philadelphia Suburban Corporation 762 West Lancaster Avenue Bryn Mawr, PA 19010 Fax No.: (610) 645-1061 Attention: Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer With a copy to: Piper Rudnick LLP 3400 Two Logan Square 18th and Arch Streets Philadelphia, PA 19103 Fax No.: (215) 606-3341 Attention: Peter J. Tucci If to the Shareholder: ALLETE Water Services, Inc. 30 West Superior Street Duluth, MN 55802-2093 Fax No.: (218) 723-3960 Attention: General Counsel With a copy to: Briggs and Morgan, Professional Association 2400 IDS Center 80 South Eighth Street Minneapolis, MN 55402 Fax No.: (612) 334-8650 Attention: Michael J. Grimes 13.6 ENTIRE AGREEMENT. Except for any confidentiality agreement executed by a party hereto (which shall, by the terms hereof, expire upon the Closing), this Agreement, including the Ancillary Documents to be executed by the parties pursuant hereto, contains the entire agreement of the parties hereto and supersedes all prior or contemporaneous agreements and understandings, oral or written, between the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof. 13.7 REMEDIES. The respective indemnification obligations of the parties set forth in Article 9 of this Agreement are the exclusive remedies of the parties and their successors, assigns or others seeking to claim by, through, or on behalf of a party, under this Agreement, and no 59
other remedy or remedies, whether arising under any Applicable Law, common law or otherwise, may be used, asserted or prosecuted in connection with this Agreement and any transaction, occurrence, or omission arising from, in connection with or otherwise based upon this Agreement; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that all equitable remedies shall remain available other than rescission, which shall not be an available remedy of either party hereto, or their respective successors and assigns, under or pursuant to this Agreement. This Section 13.7 shall not be applicable in the specific instances in which a party hereto has committed fraud. 13.8 AMENDMENTS. No purported amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any of the documents, instruments or agreements to be executed by the parties pursuant hereto shall be effective unless in a writing specifically referring to this Agreement and signed by all of the parties hereto. 13.9 SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective heirs, personal representatives, successors and permitted assigns, but except as hereinafter provided in this Section, nothing in this Agreement is to be construed as an authorization or right of any party to assign its rights or delegate its duties under this Agreement without the prior written consent of the other parties hereto. In its sole discretion the Purchaser may assign its rights in and/or delegate its duties under this Agreement to an Affiliate of the Purchaser. In the event of such an assignment of rights and/or delegation of duties, all references to the Purchaser or the Shareholder, as applicable to the assignment in this Agreement shall also be deemed to be references to the Person to which this Agreement is assigned; provided that no such assignment and/or delegation shall relieve the assignor of any of its duties or obligations hereunder. 13.10 FEES AND EXPENSES. Each party hereto shall pay their own fees and expenses incurred in connection with negotiating and preparing this Agreement and consummating the transactions contemplated hereby, including but not limited to fees and disbursements of their respective attorneys, accountants and investment bankers. If the transaction is consummated, all fees and expenses, including legal, accounting, investment banking, broker's and finder's fees and expenses incurred by the Shareholder in connection with this transaction (the "TRANSACTIONAL EXPENSES") shall be deemed expenses of the Shareholder and shall be borne by the Shareholder. 13.11 GOVERNING LAW AND JURISDICTION. This Agreement, including the Ancillary Documents to be executed and/or delivered by the parties pursuant hereto, shall be construed, governed by and enforced in accordance with the internal laws of the State of North Carolina, without giving effect to the principles of comity or conflicts of laws thereof. The Shareholder and the Purchaser agree and consent that any legal action, suit or Proceeding seeking to enforce any provision of this Agreement with the exception of Section 9.4 (which is governed by Section 9.4(c)) shall be instituted and adjudicated solely and exclusively in any court of general jurisdiction in North Carolina, or in the United States District Court having jurisdiction in North Carolina and the Shareholder and the Purchaser agree that venue will be proper in such courts and waive any objection which they may have now or hereafter to the venue of any such suit, action or Proceeding in such courts, and each hereby irrevocably consents and agrees to the jurisdiction of said courts in any such suit, action or Proceeding. The Shareholder and the Purchaser further agree to accept and acknowledge service of any and all process which may be 60
served in any such suit, action or Proceeding in said courts, and also agree that service of process or notice upon them shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process or notice upon them, in any suit, action, Proceeding, if given or made (i) according to Applicable Law, (ii) by a Person over the age of 18 who personally served such notice or service of process on the Shareholder or the Purchaser, as the case may be, or (iii) by certified mail, return receipt requested, mailed to the Shareholder or the Purchaser, as the case may be, at their respective addresses set forth in this Agreement. 13.12 COUNTERPARTS AND FACSIMILE SIGNATURE. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same Agreement. The counterparts of this Agreement and all Ancillary Documents may be executed and delivered by facsimile signature by any of the parties to any other party and the receiving party may rely on the receipt of such document so executed and delivered by facsimile as if the original had been received. 13.13 HEADINGS. The headings of the articles, sections and subsections of this Agreement are intended for the convenience of the parties only and shall in no way be held to explain, modify, construe, limit, amplify or aid in the interpretation of the provisions hereof. The terms "this Agreement," "hereof," "herein," "hereunder," "hereto" and similar expressions refer to this Agreement as a whole and not to any particular article, section, subsection or other portion hereof and include the Schedules and Exhibits hereto and any document, instrument or agreement executed and/or delivered by the parties pursuant hereto. 13.14 SCOPE OF AGREEMENT. Unless the context otherwise requires, all references in this Agreement or in any Schedule or Exhibit hereto, to the assets, properties, operations, business, financial statements, employees, books and records, accounts receivable, accounts payable, Contracts or other attributes of the Business shall mean such items or attributes as they are used in, apply to, or relate to the Business. 13.15 NUMBER AND GENDER. Unless the context otherwise requires, words importing the singular number shall include the plural and vice versa and words importing the use of any gender shall include all genders. 13.16 SEVERABILITY. In the event that any provision of this Agreement is declared or held by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid or unenforceable, such provision shall be severable from, and such invalidity or unenforceability shall not be construed to have any effect on, the remaining provisions of this Agreement, unless such invalid or unenforceable provision goes to the essence of this Agreement, in which case the entire Agreement may be declared invalid and not binding upon any of the parties. 13.17 PARTIES IN INTEREST. Except for the third party beneficiaries specifically identified as a class in Section 11.9 hereof, nothing implied in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to confer any rights or remedies under or by reason of this Agreement upon any Person other than the Purchaser and the Shareholder and their respective representatives, successors and permitted assigns. Nothing in this Agreement is intended to relieve or discharge the Liabilities of any third Person to the Purchaser or the Shareholder. 61
13.18 WAIVER. The terms, conditions, warranties, representations and indemnities contained in this Agreement, including the documents, instruments and agreements executed and delivered by the parties pursuant hereto, may be waived only by a written instrument executed by the party waiving compliance. Any such waiver shall only be effective in the specific instance and for the specific purpose for which it was given and shall not be deemed a waiver of any other provision hereof or of the same breach or default upon any recurrence thereof. No failure on the part of a party hereto to exercise and no delay in exercising any right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right hereunder preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right. 13.19 CONSTRUCTION. The parties have participated jointly in the negotiation and drafting of this Agreement. In the event an ambiguity or question of intent or interpretation arises, this Agreement shall be construed as if drafted jointly by the parties and no presumption or burden of proof shall arise favoring or disfavoring any party by virtue of the authorship of any of the provisions of this Agreement. The words "including," "include" or "includes" shall mean including without limitation. The parties intend that each representation, warranty and covenant contained herein shall have independent significance. If any party has breached any representation, warranty or covenant contained herein in any respect, the fact that there exists another representation, warranty or covenant relating to the same subject matter (regardless of the relative levels of specificity) which the party has not breached shall not detract from or mitigate the fact that the party is in breach of the first representation, warranty or covenant. 13.20 SPECIFIC PERFORMANCE. The parties hereto agree that irreparable damage would occur in the event that any of the provisions of this Agreement were not performed in accordance with their specific terms or were otherwise breached. It is accordingly agreed that the parties shall be entitled to injunctive relief to prevent breaches of this Agreement and to enforce specifically the terms and provisions hereof in any court of the United States or any state having jurisdiction, this being in addition to any other remedy to which they are entitled at law or in equity. 13.21 SUPPLEMENTATION OF SCHEDULES. The Shareholder or the Purchaser may elect to deliver a supplement ("SUPPLEMENT") to one or more of the Schedules previously delivered to the other in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 13.21 as follows: (a) Prior to the Closing Date, any and all Supplements must be in writing and must be delivered to the other party as soon as practicable, but in no event later than the date that is five (5) business days prior to the scheduled Closing Date. The other party shall be given the opportunity during the five (5) business days following the delivery of the proposed Supplement to consider that Supplement. If the recipient does not object to the contents of the Supplement within such period, the Schedule in question shall be deemed amended as of the date of this Agreement by the Supplement. If the recipient objects to a proposed Supplement, the sole remedy of such objecting party shall be termination of this Agreement in accordance Section 12.1(f) of this Agreement, PROVIDED, HOWEVER, such termination right shall only be available if the matter(s) disclosed in the Supplement could reasonably be determined to have a Material Adverse Effect (and, if the foregoing prevents a termination due to the determination that the matter(s) disclosed in the Supplement could not reasonably be determined to have a Material Adverse Effect, 62
the Schedule in question shall be deemed amended, as described above); and PROVIDED, FURTHER, the right to provide the Supplement shall only be available if (i) the Supplement was prepared in connection with or was made necessary by a change in circumstance of which the party proposing the Supplement was unaware from the date of this Agreement to the date of the proposed Supplement, or (ii) the omission from the original Schedule(s) was ministerial in nature and the Supplement is not material to the Company and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole; and (b) Any and all Supplements delivered within five (5) business days prior to the scheduled Closing Date must be in writing and delivered to the other party pursuant to Section 13.5 of this Agreement, and will only be deemed to amend a Schedule with the written consent of the recipient of the Supplement. [SIGNATURE PAGE FOLLOWS] 63
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by duly authorized representatives as of the day, month and year first above written. SHAREHOLDER: PURCHASER: ALLETE WATER SERVICES, INC. PHILADELPHIA SUBURBAN CORPORATION By By --------------------------------- --------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Nicholas DeBenedictis President and Chief Financial Officer Its Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer [SIGNATURE PAGE TO STOCK PURCHASE AGREEMENT] 64



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20031205141750.txt.gz
TIME:20031205141750
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - DECEMBER 5, 2003 ALLETE, Inc. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 19. - Ninth Paragraph Ref. Page 40. - Third Full Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated March 7, 2003 and filed March 10, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed March 14, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2003, Page 16. - Last Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed July 24, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2003, Page 21. - Second through Fourth Paragraphs Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 20, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 27, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 4, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed September 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 15, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 30, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed October 31, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed November 6, 2003 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2003, Page 25. - Second and Third Paragraphs and Page 31. - Fourth and Fifth Paragraphs Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed November 13, 2003 Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed November 21, 2003 On December 5, 2003 Florida Water Services Corporation (Florida Water), a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, closed on the sale of its water and wastewater systems serving the counties of Lee and Citrus in Florida. The systems were sold to a local governmental authority for approximately $51 million. With these sales closed, ALLETE has substantially completed the sale of its Water Services businesses. ALLETE has been in the process of selling its Water Services businesses, which are comprised primarily of Florida Water and Heater Utilities, Inc. (Heater), another wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE. All of the previously announced water services transactions have been closed, with the exception of Charlotte County, Florida, which is scheduled to close in December 2003, and Heater, which is scheduled to close in 2004 after regulatory approvals are obtained. Pursuant to a stock purchase agreement, Heater will be sold for $48 million, including the buyer assuming approximately $28 million in debt. The Charlotte County water and wastewater system is expected to be sold for approximately $4 million. Total sale proceeds from all announced transactions are expected to be approximately $490 million, representing an after-tax gain of approximately $90 million. The associated net cash proceeds after transaction costs, retirement of most water services debt and payment of income taxes are approximately $300 million and are being used to retire debt and securities at ALLETE. __________ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 5, 2003 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - our ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 5, 2003
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. December 5, 2003 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 5, 2003 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040126165532.txt.gz
TIME:20040126165532
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - JANUARY 26, 2004 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2002 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2002 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 32 - Executive Officers of the Registrant Ref. Page 47 - First Paragraph On January 26, 2004 ALLETE announced that its Board of Directors (Board) has named Donald J. Shippar President and Chief Executive Officer of ALLETE. He will have responsibility for all non-automotive operations at ALLETE. Shippar previously was Executive Vice President of ALLETE, and President of Minnesota Power. David G. Gartzke remains Chairman of the Board of ALLETE, with responsibility for the consolidated company. ALLETE has previously announced that it will spin-off Indianapolis-based ADESA Corporation (ADESA), a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, into a publicly traded company by mid-2004. ADESA includes all of ALLETE's Automotive Services businesses including Automotive Finance Corporation and ADESA Impact (collectively, Automotive Recovery Services, Inc. and Impact Auto Auctions, Ltd.), a total loss vehicle remarketing company. Gartzke, in addition to his responsibility as Chairman of ALLETE, is currently Chief Executive Officer of ADESA. It is anticipated that at the time the ADESA separation is completed, Gartzke will become ADESA's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer and Bruce W. Stender will assume the role of ALLETE Chairman and remain an independent member of ALLETE's Board. ALLETE also announced that James K. Vizanko was named Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of ALLETE. Shippar, 54, joined ALLETE in 1976. His previous positions include Senior Vice President for Customer Service and Delivery, Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of Minnesota Power, and President and Chief Operating Officer of Minnesota Power. Stender, 61, has been a Director of ALLETE since 1995. He is the current Chairman of the Audit Committee and a member of the Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee. He is President and Chief Executive Officer of Labovitz Enterprises, Inc. which owns and manages hotel properties. Vizanko, 50, joined ALLETE in 1978 and was previously Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer of ALLETE. He was named Corporate Treasurer in March of 1993 and Vice President in 2001. ---------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 26, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - our ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition forretail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 26, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. January 26, 2004 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 26, 2004 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040130100917.txt.gz
TIME:20040130100917
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - JANUARY 30, 2004 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 12. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On January 30, 2004 ALLETE, Inc. issued a press release announcing 2003 earnings which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99 and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. The information is being furnished pursuant to Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition. This information, including Exhibit 99 attached hereto, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. ------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 30, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond the control of ALLETE and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - our ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as general vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated impacts of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including the competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as suppliers and purchasers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which that statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of those factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of those factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 30, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. January 30, 2004 James K. Vizanko ---------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 30, 2004 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated January 30, 2004 announcing 2003 earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 30, 2004

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: January 30, 2004 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE 2003 EARNINGS FROM CONTINUING OPERATIONS INCREASE 18 PERCENT ------------------------------------------------------------------- DULUTH, Minn.-- ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported 2003 earnings of $2.84 per share, compared with $1.68 per share in 2002, an increase of 69 percent. Net income was $236 million in 2003 on revenue of $1.62 billion, compared with prior year net income of $137 million on revenue of $1.49 billion. Earnings from continuing operations rose 18 percent year over year to $1.72 per share, compared with $1.46. Earnings from discontinued operations included a $71.6 million, or $0.86 per share, gain related to the sale of substantially all of our Water Services businesses. "ALLETE had a very successful year, exceeding our stated performance goals," said Dave Gartzke, ALLETE Chairman. "Our Automotive Services and Energy Services businesses both surpassed their earnings objectives, and we achieved a key strategic objective by substantially completing the sale of our Water Services holdings in Florida, the proceeds from which were used to repay debt and strengthen our balance sheet." 2003 YEAR-END RESULTS - --------------------- AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES reported 22 percent earnings growth for the year due mainly to increased sales, lower interest expense and improved margins. Net income was $115 million in 2003, compared with $94 million for the prior year. Automotive Services revenue was $922 million versus $836 million last year, a 10 percent increase. ADESA sold 69,000 more used vehicles than in 2002, an increase of 4 percent. The used vehicle conversion rate at ADESA was 61 percent in 2003, compared with 59 percent in 2002. Sales of salvage vehicles at ADESA Impact rose by 9 percent over last year. At AFC, units financed increased by about 4,000 and bad debt expense was down reflecting the improved credit quality of the portfolio. Net income at ENERGY SERVICES was $42 million in 2003, a slight increase over the prior year due mainly to sales of nonregulated generation from the Taconite Harbor facility and improved power prices. Energy Services revenue grew by 5 percent in the year to $660 million. The performance at Taconite Harbor in 2003 was offset by increased pension and benefit costs, and the performance of the Kendall County facility. The Kendall County facility operated at a loss in 2003 due to negative spark spreads (the differential between electric and natural gas prices) in the wholesale power market. This resulted in an inability to cover the fixed capacity charge on approximately 175 megawatts. Energy Services also incurred costs to exit the Split Rock Energy partnership. ALLETE's Florida real estate operations posted a 26 percent increase in net income over the prior year, earning $14.1 million compared to $11.2 million last year. Net income from discontinued operations increased by $75 million year over year primarily due to the gains recorded from the sale of the Water Services businesses. (more)
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Using both the proceeds from the sale of Water Services and internally generated cash, ALLETE repaid $360 million in debt and $75 million in manditorily redeemable preferred securities during 2003. By year end, ALLETE significantly strengthened its balance sheet and reduced its debt to total capital percentage to 36 percent (down from 46 percent at December 31, 2002), and improved its liquidity as illustrated by its current ratio of 1.3 (up from 0.9 at December 31, 2002). FOURTH QUARTER 2003 RESULTS - --------------------------- Fourth quarter earnings from continuing operations doubled those of the prior year, bolstered by a 66 percent increase at AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES compared with the fourth quarter of 2002. ADESA sold 7 percent more vehicles and ADESA Impact sold 9 percent more salvage vehicles in the quarter compared with the quarter a year ago. ADESA used vehicle auctions benefited from a significantly higher conversion rate, while same-store salvage sales in the U.S. climbed 13 percent in the quarter. Earnings for the quarter grew by 47 percent at ENERGY SERVICES compared with the quarter last year (including one-time charges incurred in the fourth quarter of 2002). While total electric sales for the quarter were about the same as last year, higher wholesale power prices helped improve 2003 earnings. Fourth quarter results were also impacted by two large real estate sales and reduced debt expense in 2003, and the liquidation of the securities portfolio in 2002. 2003 STRATEGIC REVIEW - --------------------- Significant strategic goals were attained during 2003 by ALLETE: - Substantially completing the sale of our Water Services businesses - Strengthening our balance sheet - Adding three board members with automotive expertise: Thomas Cunningham, Dennis Green and Deborah Weinstein - Adding new ADESA auction facilities in two key markets - Long Island and Atlanta - Strengthening management at Automotive Services In October, 2003 ALLETE announced its intention to separate its Automotive Services business into a publicly traded company to be named ADESA, with completion expected by mid-2004. A conference call will be scheduled for a later date as details are finalized. "The changes at ALLETE should be viewed with an eye on the future as well as on the success of our past accomplishments," Gartzke said. "We've been committed to long-term shareholder value creation, and this will continue as ALLETE begins an exciting new chapter in its history." ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE's holdings include ADESA, the second largest used vehicle auction network in North America; AFC, the leading provider of independent auto dealer financing; Minnesota Power, a low-cost electric utility that serves some of the largest industrial customers in the United States; and significant real estate holdings in Florida. For more information about ALLETE, visit the company's Web site at www.allete.com. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. #### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET, DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802 WWW.ALLETE.COM
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 4 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040422094549.txt.gz
TIME:20040422094549
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - APRIL 22, 2004 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 12. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On April 22, 2004 ALLETE, Inc. issued a press release announcing 2004 first quarter earnings which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99 and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. The information is being furnished pursuant to Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition. This information, including Exhibit 99 attached hereto, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. -------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 22, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - - war and acts of terrorism; - - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, Canadian federal government, state and provincial legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric and automotive industries; - - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - - weather conditions; - - natural disasters; - - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - - wholesale power market conditions; - - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as sellers and buyers of vehicles; - - pricing and transportation of commodities; - - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - - capital market conditions; - - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7. under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" located on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 22, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. April 22, 2004 James K. Vizanko ---------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 22, 2004 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated April 22, 2004 announcing 2004 first quarter earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 22, 2004

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: April 22, 2004 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE FIRST QUARTER NET INCOME CLIMBS 19 PERCENT OVER 2003 ----------------------------------------------------------- DULUTH, Minn.--ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE:ALE) today reported first quarter 2004 earnings of 62 cents per share, compared with 54 cents per share in the first quarter of 2003. Net income for the quarter rose 19% to $52.5 million on revenue of $458.5 million, compared with $44.3 million on revenue of $422.9 million during the same time period last year. "Our energy and automotive businesses both benefited from increased sales during the quarter," said Dave Gartzke, ALLETE Chairman. "We are also experiencing high demand for our real estate in Florida." ENERGY SERVICES net income was $14.3 million for the quarter compared with $12.2 million during the first quarter of 2003. At Minnesota Power, higher demand for energy by industrial customers contributed to the increase. Net income at AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES was $33.3 million in the first quarter of 2004, compared with $26.7 million in 2003, due primarily to increased vehicle sales and higher conversion rates at ADESA auctions. AFC arranged 263,000 loan transactions during the first quarter, an increase of 13% compared with the first quarter of 2003. A strong quarter of real estate sales boosted results at INVESTMENTS AND CORPORATE CHARGES. ALLETE Properties recorded net income of $11 million for the quarter versus $4.2 million last year. 2004 EARNINGS GUIDANCE - ---------------------- After the separation of Automotive Services is completed, ALLETE will be comprised of what is now classified as Energy Services and Investments and Corporate Charges. In 2003, net income from these operations totaled $28.3 million. ALLETE now estimates 2004 net income from these operations will increase by 10% to 15% over 2003, due primarily to stronger than originally anticipated sales at both Minnesota Power and ALLETE Properties. ALLETE expects to reduce its debt by an additional $150 million to $200 million after the ADESA initial public offering and recapitalization, which is expected to occur in the second quarter. The 2004 net income estimate does not include the financial implications of this debt reduction or transaction fees and debt retirement premiums related to the separation of Automotive Services. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE's holdings include ADESA, a leading integrated wholesale auction and dealer floorplan financing provider throughout North America; Minnesota Power, a low-cost electric utility that serves some of the largest industrial customers in the United States; and significant real estate holdings in Florida. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 www.allete.com
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040601151853.txt.gz
TIME:20040601151853
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - JUNE 1, 2004 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2003 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 11 - Last Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, Page 21. - Sixth Paragraph On June 1, 2004 ALLETE Water Services, Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, completed the sale of its North Carolina subsidiary, Heater Utilities, Inc. to Aqua America, Inc. (formerly Philadelphia Suburban Corporation) for $48 million in cash and the assumption by Aqua America, Inc. of approximately $28 million in debt. The North Carolina Utilities Commission approved the transaction on May 26, 2004. -------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 1, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - - war and acts of terrorism; - - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, Canadian federal government, state and provincial legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric and automotive industries; - - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - - weather conditions; - - natural disasters; - - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - - wholesale power market conditions; - - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as sellers and buyers of vehicles; - - pricing and transportation of commodities; - - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - - capital market conditions; - - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7. under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 1, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. June 1, 2004 James K. Vizanko ---------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 1, 2004 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040616164951.txt.gz
TIME:20040616164951
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - JUNE 15, 2004 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2003 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 11 - Sixth and Tenth Paragraphs Ref. Page 38 - Fourth Full Paragraph through Tenth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, Page 20 - Last Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, Page 21 - First Paragraph On June 15, 2004 the Securities and Exchange Commission declared the Form S-1 registration statement filed by ADESA, Inc. (ADESA), a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, effective. The registration statement relates to (1) the issuance of an initial public offering (IPO) of 6,250,000 shares, or approximately 7 percent, of ADESA common stock at a price of $24.00 per share, and (2) the issuance of $125 million in 7.625% senior subordinated notes with a maturity date of June 15, 2012. ADESA's common stock will trade on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol "KAR." The offerings are expected to close June 21, 2004. In October 2003 ALLETE's board of directors announced a plan to separate ADESA from ALLETE. The IPO is an important step in that process. ALLETE anticipates completing a tax-free spin-off, in which it will distribute its remaining equity interest in ADESA to ALLETE shareholders, within the next four months. Upon completion of the offerings, ADESA intends to repay a $100 million intercompany note, representing a $100 million dividend that was made by ADESA to ALLETE on May 25, 2004, and all other outstanding intercompany debt owed to ALLETE and its subsidiaries by ADESA. ALLETE expects to use a portion of the funds received from ADESA to further reduce debt. --------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 16, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, Canadian federal government, state and provincial legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric and automotive industries; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as sellers and buyers of vehicles; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7. under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 16, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. June 16, 2004 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 16, 2004 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040622114024.txt.gz
TIME:20040622114024
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - JUNE 21, 2004 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2003 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 11 - Sixth and Tenth Paragraphs Ref. Page 38 - Fourth Full Paragraph through Tenth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, Page 20 - Last Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, Page 21 - First Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed June 16, 2004, Page 1 On June 21, 2004 ADESA, Inc., a majority owned subsidiary of ALLETE, closed on (1) the issuance of 6,250,000 shares, or approximately 7 percent, of ADESA common stock at a price of $24.00 per share in an initial public offering and (2) the issuance of $125 million in 7.625% senior subordinated notes with a maturity date of June 15, 2012. ADESA will use a portion of the proceeds from these offerings to repay outstanding intercompany debt owed to ALLETE and its subsidiaries by ADESA. On June 21, 2004 ALLETE announced the redemption of all of its $125 million 7.80% Senior Notes due February 15, 2008 (Notes). The redemption price is equal to the sum of (1) 100 percent of the principal amount of the Notes plus (2) accrued and unpaid interest to July 26, 2004 (Redemption Date) plus (3) a make-whole premium. A notice of redemption is being sent to all registered holders of the Notes. ALLETE expects to use a portion of the funds received from ADESA to redeem these Notes. ------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 22, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - - war and acts of terrorism; - - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, Canadian federal government, state and provincial legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric and automotive industries; - - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - - weather conditions; - - natural disasters; - - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - - wholesale power market conditions; - - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as sellers and buyers of vehicles; - - pricing and transportation of commodities; - - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - - capital market conditions; - - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7. under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 22, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. June 22, 2004 James K. Vizanko ---------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 22, 2004 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040701115546.txt.gz
TIME:20040701115546
EVENTS:	Other events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - JUNE 30, 2004 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS AND REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE Reference is made to the 2003 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 11 - Last Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, Page 21 - Sixth Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed June 1, 2004, Page 1 On June 30, 2004 Florida Water Services Corporation, a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, completed the sale of its remaining 72 water and wastewater systems to Aqua America, Inc. and Seminole County for a total of $18 million. The transactions are subject to regulatory approval by the Florida Public Service Commission (FPSC). The approval process may result in an adjustment to the final purchase price based on the FPSC's determination of plant investment for the systems. Aqua America, Inc. purchased 63 of the water and wastewater systems for $13.8 million. Seminole County bought 9 systems for $4.2 million under a previously negotiated right of first refusal. The closings of these water utility sales essentially concludes ALLETE's successful strategy to exit its Water Services businesses. When the strategy was launched in late 2001, ALLETE owned the largest publicly-traded water and wastewater utilities in both Florida and North Carolina. Sale proceeds were used to strengthen ALLETE's balance sheet and retire debt. --------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INCLUDING THOSE CONTAINED ABOVE, SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH OUR DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 1, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business and the sale of our Water Services businesses; - - war and acts of terrorism; - - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, Canadian federal government, state and provincial legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric and automotive industries; - - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - - weather conditions; - - natural disasters; - - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - - wholesale power market conditions; - - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as sellers and buyers of vehicles; - - pricing and transportation of commodities; - - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - - capital market conditions; - - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7. under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 1, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. July 1, 2004 James K. Vizanko -------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 1, 2004 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040721160700.txt.gz
TIME:20040721160700
EVENTS:	
TEXT:
ITEM: 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 DATE OF REPORT (DATE OF EARLIEST EVENT REPORTED) - JULY 21, 2004 ALLETE, INC. A Minnesota Corporation Commission File No. 1-3548 IRS Employer Identification No. 41-0418150 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 Telephone - (218) 279-5000
ITEM 12. RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION On July 21, 2004 ALLETE, Inc. issued a press release announcing 2004 second quarter earnings which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99 and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. The information is being furnished pursuant to Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition. This information, including Exhibit 99 attached hereto, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. -------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 21, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the proposed spin-off of our Automotive Services business; - - war and acts of terrorism; - - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, Canadian federal government, state and provincial legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric and automotive industries; - - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - - weather conditions; - - natural disasters; - - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - - wholesale power market conditions; - - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as sellers and buyers of vehicles; - - pricing and transportation of commodities; - - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - - capital market conditions; - - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7. under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 21, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. July 21, 2004 James K. Vizanko ---------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 21, 2004 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated July 21, 2004 announcing 2004 second quarter earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 21, 2004

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: July 21, 2004 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE REPORTS SECOND QUARTER EARNINGS -------------------------------------- DULUTH, Minn.--ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported second quarter 2004 earnings of 40 cents per share, compared with 53 cents per share in the second quarter of 2003. Earnings from continuing operations were 38 cents per share for the quarter, compared with 45 cents per share in the second quarter of 2003. Net income from continuing operations was $32.9 million for the quarter, compared with $37.1 million in the second quarter of 2003. For the first six months of the year, earnings from continuing operations increased from $75.1 million to $86 million. "In spite of an impairment loss in our emerging technology investment portfolio and charges related to our business separation plans, earnings from continuing operations are up 15 percent year-to-date over last year," said Don Shippar, ALLETE President and CEO. "Energy Services reported another strong quarter, and demand for Florida real estate remains high." Second quarter earnings at ENERGY SERVICES climbed 37 percent from a year ago, aided by higher energy demand from industrial customers. Within INVESTMENTS AND CORPORATE CHARGES, ALLETE Properties performance remained strong, earning $2.2 million compared to an exceptional $5.2 million in the second quarter of 2003. For the six months ended June 30, 2004, net income from ALLETE Properties was $13.2 million compared with $9.4 million for the first six months of 2003. The second quarter of 2004 also reflected the $4.7 million after-tax impairment on the emerging technology investment portfolio and lower interest expense due to decreased debt balances. ALLETE expects 2004 net income for those businesses that will comprise post-spin-off ALLETE to increase by 15 percent over their 2003 results, excluding separation-related costs. Net income from continuing operations at AUTOMOTIVE SERVICES was $32.3 million for the quarter compared with $34.1 million during the same period last year and includes incremental expenses related to its separation from ALLETE. ADESA (NYSE: KAR) issued a press release today that provides details regarding its second quarter results. ALLETE's board of directors is expected to meet in late August to finalize details of the proposed spin-off of ADESA, Inc. Dave Gartzke, ADESA Chairman, President and CEO, said the spin-off is on track to be completed by the end of September. "Relevant details will be disclosed by press release, communications with our shareholders and public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission after ALLETE's August board meeting," Gartzke said. Gartzke will resign his position as ALLETE board chairman immediately after the ADESA spin-off and is expected to be succeeded by Bruce Stender, 62, a member of the ALLETE board since 1995. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE provides energy services in the upper Midwest and has significant real estate holdings in Florida. ALLETE is the majority owner of ADESA, Inc., a leading vehicle remarketing company. More information about the company is available on ALLETE's Web site at www.allete.com. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 www.allete.com
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040825141252.txt.gz
TIME:20040825141252
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Temporary Suspension of Trading Under Registrant's Employee Benefit Plans	Regulation FD Disclosure	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Temporary Suspension of Trading Under Registrant's Employee Benefit Plans
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - AUGUST 24, 2004 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in it charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 5.02 DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR PRINCIPAL OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF PRINCIPAL OFFICERS On August 24, 2004 Donald J. Shippar and Heidi J. Eddins were elected to serve on ALLETE, Inc.'s (ALLETE or Company) Board of Directors beginning September 21, 2004. Mr. Shippar and Ms. Eddins will serve as directors until the 2005 Annual Meeting of Shareholders of the Company. As previously anticipated in connection with the spin-off of ADESA, Inc. (ADESA), David G. Gartzke resigned from his positions as director and chairman of the Board of ALLETE effective September 20, 2004. Wynn V. Bussmann, Dennis O. Green, Donald C. Wegmiller and Deborah L. Weinstein also resigned from their positions as directors of ALLETE effective September 20, 2004. Mr. Gartzke, Mr. Bussmann, Mr. Green, Mr. Wegmiller and Ms. Weinstein will all serve on ADESA's Board of Directors. Mr. Shippar, 55, is currently president and chief executive officer of ALLETE. Ms. Eddins, 48, is executive vice president, secretary and general counsel of Florida East Coast Industries, Inc., which owns, develops, leases and manages commercial and industrial properties, and owns and operates a regional freight railroad along the east coast of Florida. It is anticipated that Ms. Eddins will be named to serve on the compensation committee. ITEM 5.03 AMENDMENT TO ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION OR BYLAWS; CHANGE IN FISCAL YEAR Effective July 20, 2004 ALLETE's Board of Directors adopted amendments to the Company's bylaws to include shareholder nomination procedures and advance notice. Under the bylaws, as amended, nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors must be made by either the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) or by a shareholder entitled to vote who has delivered written notice to the Company's Secretary (containing certain information specified in the bylaws about the shareholder and the proposed nominee) not less than 90 nor more than 120 days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting of shareholders. The bylaws provide alternative deadlines if the annual meeting is called for a date that is not within 25 days before or after such anniversary date or in the case of a special meeting of shareholders. Under the bylaws, as amended, no business may be transacted at an annual meeting of shareholders unless it is specified in the notice of the meeting or is otherwise brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors (or a committee thereof) or by a shareholder entitled to vote who has delivered written notice to the Company's Secretary (containing certain information specified in the bylaws about the shareholder and the proposed action) not less than 90 nor more than 120 days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting of shareholders. The bylaws provide alternative deadlines if the annual meeting is called for a date that is not within 25 days before or after such anniversary date. On August 24, 2004 ALLETE's Board of Directors adopted an amendment to the Company's bylaws, which clarifies that the notice required to be given by shareholders in order to raise an issue at a meeting of the shareholders of at least 60 days and no more than 90 days prior to the date of such meeting applies to the extent not otherwise provided by Rule 14a-8 of the rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission. ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 25, 2004 1
ITEM 5.04 TEMPORARY SUSPENSION OF TRADING UNDER REGISTRANT'S EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS ALLETE provided a notice dated August 25, 2004 to its directors and executive officers informing them that a blackout period will be in effect beginning 3:00 p.m. (Central Time) on September 10, 2004 through not later than September 23, 2004 (unless extended) restricting them from, directly or indirectly, purchasing, acquiring, exercising, selling or otherwise transferring certain equity securities of the Company. The notice was provided to ALLETE's directors and executive officers in accordance with Section 306 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and Rule 104 of Regulation BTR, "Blackout Trading Restriction." With respect to the notice required by Section 101(i)(2)(E) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, the issuer ALLETE is also the Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan administrator. Therefore, the notice to directors and officers required by Rule 104 of Regulation BTR has been provided in accordance with Rule 104(b)(2)(i)(B) of Regulation BTR. A copy of the notice is attached as Exhibit 99(a) to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference. ITEM 7.01 REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE On August 24, 2004 ALLETE sent a letter and communication material to its shareholders regarding the spin-off of the Company's majority-owned subsidiary, ADESA, and the one-for-three reverse stock split (as more fully described in Item 8.01 and Exhibit 99(b) of this Current Report on Form 8-K). Copies of the letter and communication material are attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99(c) and are furnished pursuant to Regulation FD. Such letter and communication material included in Exhibit 99(c) attached hereto shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS Reference is made to the 2003 Form 10-K of ALLETE for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Ref. Page 11 - Sixth and Tenth Paragraphs Ref. Page 38 - Fourth Full Paragraph through Tenth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, Page 20 - Last Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, Page 21 - First Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed June 16, 2004 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2004, Page 24 - Last Paragraph On August 24, 2004 ALLETE's Board of Directors declared the effective date of the previously announced spin-off of its majority-owned subsidiary, ADESA, to be September 20, 2004 at 11:59 a.m. Eastern Time. The spin-off will occur by means of a distribution to its shareholders of all of ALLETE's shares of common stock in ADESA. ALLETE estimates that one share of ADESA common stock will be distributed for each outstanding share of ALLETE common stock. The final ratio will be fixed after the record date and will be calculated based upon the ratio of the number of shares of ADESA common stock to be distributed by ALLETE to the actual number of shares of ALLETE common stock outstanding on September 13, 2004, the record date. Additionally, in connection with the spin-off, ALLETE's Board of Directors approved a one-for-three reverse stock split of ALLETE's common stock, which will become effective immediately following the effective time of the spin-off, that is 12:00 p.m. Eastern Time on September 20, 2004. ALLETE's August 25, 2004 press release regarding this information is attached as Exhibit 99(b) to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated by reference herein. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 25, 2004
ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 3 - Bylaws of ALLETE, Inc., as amended effective August 24, 2004. 99(a) - Notice of Blackout Period to Directors and Executive Officers of ALLETE, Inc. dated August 25, 2004. 99(b) - ALLETE News Release dated August 25, 2004 announcing the declared spin-off date of ADESA, Inc., a reverse stock split and a new dividend projection. -------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 4 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 25, 2004 3
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the planned spin-off of our Automotive Services business; - - war and acts of terrorism; - - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, Canadian federal government, state and provincial legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric and automotive industries; - - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - - weather conditions; - - natural disasters; - - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - - wholesale power market conditions; - - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as sellers and buyers of vehicles; - - pricing and transportation of commodities; - - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - - capital market conditions; - - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7. under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 4 ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 25, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. August 25, 2004 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 25, 2004 5
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 3 - Bylaws of ALLETE, Inc., as amended effective August 24, 2004. 99(a) - Notice of Blackout Period to Directors and Executive Officers of ALLETE, Inc. dated August 25, 2004. 99(b) - ALLETE News Release dated August 25, 2004 announcing the declared spin-off date of ADESA, Inc., a reverse stock split and a new dividend projection. 99(c) - Shareholder communication material dated August 24, 2004. ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 25, 2004

EXHIBIT 3 --------------------------------------- BYLAWS OF ALLETE, INC. As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 ---------------------------------------
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 BYLAWS OF ALLETE, INC. Section 1. The annual meeting of the shareholders of this Corporation for the election of Directors and the transaction of such other corporate business as may properly come before such meeting shall be held at a time and place anywhere within or without the State of Minnesota as may be designated by the Board of Directors on the second Tuesday of May in each year after the year 1923, unless such day is a legal holiday, in which case such meeting shall be held on the next day thereafter which is not a legal holiday or a Sunday. Section 2. Special meetings of the shareholders of this Corporation may be called for any purpose or purposes at any time by the Chairman of the Board, by the President, by the Board of Directors or any two or more members thereof, the Executive Committee, or, in the manner hereinafter provided, by one or more shareholders as permitted under Minnesota law. The place of such special meetings shall be at the registered office of this Corporation in Duluth, Minnesota, or at such other place in Duluth as the Directors may determine. Upon request in writing, by registered mail or delivered in person to the Chairman of the Board, the President, a Vice-President or Secretary, by any person or persons entitled to call a meeting of shareholders, it shall be the duty of such officer forthwith to cause notice to be given to the shareholders entitled to vote of a meeting to be held at such time as such officer may fix, not less than ninety (90) days after the receipt of such request. If such notice shall not be given within sixty (60) days after delivery or the date of mailing of such request, the person or persons requesting the meeting may fix the time of meeting and give notice in the manner hereinafter provided. 2
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 Notice of special meetings shall state the time, place and purpose thereof. Section 3. Notice of every meeting of shareholders shall be mailed by the Secretary or the officer or other person performing the Secretary's duties, not more than sixty (60) days and not less than ten (10) days before the meeting, to each shareholder of record entitled to vote, at his or her post office address as shown by this Corporation's records; provided, however, that if a shareholder waives notice thereof before, at, or after the meeting, notice of the meeting to such shareholder is unnecessary. It shall not be necessary to publish notice of any meeting of shareholders. No business may be transacted at an annual meeting of shareholders, other than business that is either (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors (or any duly authorized committee thereof), (b) otherwise properly brought before the annual meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors (or any duly authorized committee thereof), or (c) otherwise properly brought before the annual meeting by any shareholder of the Corporation (i) who is a shareholder of record on the date of the giving of the notice provided for in this Section 3 and on the record date for the determination of shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at such annual meeting and (ii) who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 3. Except as provided by Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 14a-8, and in addition to any other applicable requirements, for business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a shareholder, such shareholder must have given timely notice thereof in proper written form to the Secretary of the Corporation. 3
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 To be timely, a shareholder's notice to the Secretary must be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not less than ninety (90) days nor more than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting of shareholders; provided, however, that in the event that the annual meeting is called for a date that is not within twenty-five (25) days before or after such anniversary date, notice by the shareholder in order to be timely must be so received not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which such notice of the date of the annual meeting was mailed or such public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, whichever first occurs. To be in proper written form, a shareholder's notice to the Secretary must set forth as to each matter such shareholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (ii) the name and record address of such shareholder, (iii) the class or series and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation which are owned beneficially or of record by such shareholder, (iv) a description of all arrangements or understandings between such shareholder and any other person or persons (including their names) in connection with the proposal of such business by such shareholder and any material interest of such shareholder in such business and (v) a representation that such shareholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to bring such business before the meeting. 4
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 No business shall be conducted at the annual meeting of shareholders except business brought before the annual meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 3; provided, however, that, once business has been properly brought before the annual meeting in accordance with such procedures, nothing in this Section 3 shall be deemed to preclude discussion by any shareholder of any such business. If the Chairman of an annual meeting determines that business was not properly brought before the annual meeting in accordance with the foregoing procedures, the Chairman shall declare to the meeting that the business was not properly brought before the meeting and such business shall not be transacted. Section 4. The presence in person or by proxy of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote at any meeting shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In the absence of a quorum, any meeting may be adjourned from time to time. Section 5. Meetings of the shareholders shall be presided over by the Chairman of the Board, if there be a Chairman of the Board present, otherwise by the President, or, if the President is not present, by a Vice-President, or if neither the President nor a Vice-President is present, by a Chairman to be elected at the meeting. The Secretary of this Corporation shall act as Secretary of such meetings, if present. Section 6. Subject to the provisions of Article III of the Articles of Incorporation as amended, each shareholder entitled to vote shall be entitled to one vote for each share of voting stock held by the shareholder and may vote and otherwise act in person or by proxy at each meeting of shareholders. 5
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 Section 7. Any unissued stock of this Corporation, not or hereafter authorized, may be issued and disposed of by the Board of Directors at any time and from time to time, to such persons, firms, corporations or associations, upon such terms and for such consideration as the Board of Directors may, in its discretion, determine, except as may be limited by law or by the Articles of Incorporation of this Corporation. Shares of the Corporation's stock may be certificated or uncertificated, as provided under Minnesota law. Certificates of stock shall be of such form and device as the Board of Directors may elect, and shall be signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice-President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of this Corporation, but when a certificate is signed by a Transfer Agent or Registrar the signature of any such corporate officer and the corporate seal, if any, upon such certificate may be facsimiles, engraved or printed. Section 8. The stock of this Corporation shall be transferable or assignable on the books of this Corporation by the holders in person or by attorney, and in the case of stock represented by a certificate on surrender of the certificates therefor. The Board of Directors may appoint one or more transfer agents and registrars of the stock. The Board of Directors may fix a time not exceeding sixty (60) days and not less than ten (10) days preceding the date of any meeting of shareholders as the record date for the determination of the shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at such meeting, and in such case only shareholders of record on the date so fixed or their legal representatives shall be entitled to notice of and to vote at such meeting, notwithstanding any transfer of any shares on the books of the Corporation after any record date so fixed. The Board of Directors may close the books of the Corporation against transfer of shares during the whole or any part of such period. 6
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 Section 9. Subject to the provisions of Article III of the Articles of Incorporation of this Corporation, (1) the management of this Corporation shall be vested in a Board of Directors, the number of which shall be fixed from time to time exclusively by the Board of Directors pursuant to a resolution adopted by affirmative vote of the majority of the Disinterested Directors, as defined in Article VII of the Articles of Incorporation, but the number of Directors shall be no less than nine (9) and no greater than fifteen (15), but no decrease shall have the effect of shortening the term of any incumbent Director. Directors shall be elected annually by the shareholders by ballot by a majority of all the outstanding stock entitled to vote, to hold office until their successors are elected and qualify; (2) subject to any rights then existing by applicable law with respect to cumulative voting, the shareholders at any meeting by a majority vote of all the outstanding stock entitled to vote, at an election of Directors, may remove any Director and fill the vacancy; (3) subject to the rights of the holders of any class or series of the then outstanding shares of voting capital stock of this Corporation, newly created directorships resulting from an increase in the authorized number of Directors or any vacancies in the Board of Directors resulting from death, resignation, retirement, disqualification, removal from office or other cause may be filled only by the shareholders or by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Disinterested Directors then in office, although less than a quorum. Directors so elected shall hold office for a term expiring at the time of the next annual election of Directors by the shareholders and until their successors are duly elected and qualify. The Board of Directors, as soon as may be after the election in each year, shall elect from their number a Chairman of the Board and shall elect one of their number President of the Corporation, one of whom shall be designated the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, and 7
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 shall also elect one or more Vice-President, a Secretary and Treasurer and shall from time to time appoint such other officers as they may deem proper. The same person may hold more than one office, except those of President and Vice-President. The Board of Directors also may designate, from time to time, former Directors of this Corporation as Directors Emeritus, in recognition of their long and faithful service to this Corporation. Directors Emeritus shall have no duties or responsibilities in connection with the management of the Corporation. The officers of the Corporation shall have such powers and duties, except as modified by the Board of Directors, as generally pertain to their offices respectively, as well as such powers and duties as from time to time may be conferred upon them by the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors may, by unanimous affirmative action of the entire Board, designate two or more of their number to constitute an Executive Committee which, to the extent determined by unanimous affirmative action of the entire Board, shall have and exercise the authority of the Board in the management of the business of the Corporation, except the power to fill vacancies in the Board and the power to change the membership of or fill vacancies in said Committee. Any such Executive Committee shall act only in the interval between meetings of the Board, and shall be subject at all times to control and direction of the Board. By unanimous vote, the Board shall have the power at any time to change the membership of such Committee and to fill vacancies in it. The Executive Committee may make such rules for the conduct of its business and may appoint such Chairman and committees and assistants as it may deem necessary. A majority of the members of said Committee shall constitute a quorum. 8
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the following procedures shall be eligible for election as directors of the Corporation, except as may be otherwise provided in the Articles of Incorporation with respect to the right of holders of preferred stock of the Corporation to nominate and elect a specified number of directors in certain circumstances. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at any annual meeting of shareholders, or at any special meeting of shareholders called for the purpose of electing directors, (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors (or any duly authorized committee thereof) or (b) by any shareholder of the Corporation (i) who is a shareholder of record on the date of the giving of the notice provided for in this Section 9 and on the record date for the determination of shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at such meeting and (ii) who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 9. In addition to any other applicable requirements, for a nomination to be made by a shareholder, such shareholder must have given timely notice thereof in proper written form to the Secretary of the Corporation. To be timely, a shareholder's notice to the Secretary must be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the Corporation (a) in the case of an annual meeting, not less than ninety (90) days nor more than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting of shareholders; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that in the event that the annual meeting is called for a date that is not within twenty-five (25) days before or after such anniversary date, notice by the shareholder in order to be timely must be so received not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the date on which such notice of the date of the annual meeting was mailed or such public disclosure of the dateof the 9
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 annual meeting was made, whichever first occurs; and (b) in the case of a special meeting of shareholders called for the purpose of electing directors, not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which notice of the date of the special meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the special meeting was made, whichever first occurs. To be in proper written form, a shareholder's notice to the Secretary must set forth (a) as to each person whom the shareholder proposes to nominate for election as a director (i) the name, age, business address and residence address of the person, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of the person, (iii) the class or series and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation which are owned beneficially or of record by the person and (iv) any other information relating to the person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors pursuant to Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder; and (b) as to the shareholder giving the notice (i) the name and record address of such shareholder, (ii) the class or series and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation which are owned beneficially or of record by such shareholder, (iii) a description of all arrangements or understandings between such shareholder and each proposed nominee and any other person or persons (including their names) pursuant to which the nomination(s) are to be made by such shareholder, (iv) a representation that such shareholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the persons named in its notice and (v) any other information relating to such shareholder that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in 10
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. Such notice must be accompanied by a written consent of each proposed nominee to being named as a nominee and to serve as a director if elected. No person shall be eligible for election as a director of the Corporation unless nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 9. If the Chairman of the meeting determines that a nomination was not made in accordance with the foregoing procedures, the Chairman shall declare to the meeting that the nomination was defective and such defective nomination shall be disregarded. Section 10. Meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at the times fixed by resolution of the Board, or upon call of the Chairman of the Board, the President, or a Vice-President, or any two Directors. The Secretary or officer performing his or her duties shall give two days' notice of all meetings of Directors, provided that a meeting may be held without notice immediately after the annual election, and notice need not be given of regular meetings held at times fixed by resolution of the Board. Meetings may be held at any time without notice if all of the Directors are present, or if those not present waive notice, either before or after the meeting. Notice by mailing to the usual business or residence address of the Director not less than the time above specified before the meeting shall be sufficient. A majority of the Board shall constitute a quorum. Less than such a quorum shall have power to adjourn any meeting from time to time without notice. Section 11. Any and all officers of this Corporation may be required at any time to give bonds for the faithful discharge of their 11
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 duties in such sum, or sums, and with such sureties, as the Board of Directors may determine. Section 12. The term of office of all officers shall be until the next election of Directors and until their respective successors are chosen and qualify, but any officer may be removed from office at any time by the Board of Directors, unless otherwise agreed by agreement in writing duly authorized by the Board of Directors; and no agreement for the employment of any officer for a longer period than one year shall be so authorized. Section 13. The officers of this Corporation shall have such powers and duties as generally pertain to their offices, respectively, as well as such powers and duties as from time to time shall be conferred upon them by the Board of Directors or the Executive Committee. In case any officer of the Corporation who shall have signed any bonds or certificates of stock heretofore or hereafter issued by the Corporation, or attested the seal thereon, or whose facsimile signature appears on any bond coupon or stock certificates shall cease to be such officer of the Corporation before the bonds or stock certificates so signed or sealed shall have been authenticated, delivered or issued, such bonds or stock certificates nevertheless may be authenticated, delivered or issued with the same force and effect as though the person or persons who had signed same or attested the seal thereon, or whose facsimile signature appears thereon, had not ceased to be such officer of the Corporation. The Corporation shall reimburse or indemnify each present and future Director and officer of the Corporation (and his or her heirs, executors and administrators) for or against all expenses reasonably incurred by such Director or officer in connection with or arising out of 12
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 any action, suit or proceeding in which such Director or officer may be involved by reason of being or having been a Director or officer of the Corporation. Such indemnification for reasonable expenses is to be to the fullest extent permitted by the Minnesota Business Corporation Act, Minnesota Statutes Chapter 302A. By affirmative vote of the Board of Directors or with written approval of the Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, such indemnification may be extended to include agents and employees who are not Directors or officers of the Corporation, but who would otherwise be indemnified for acts and omissions under Chapter 302A of the Minnesota Business Corporation Act, if such agent or employee were an officer of the Corporation. Reasonable expenses may include reimbursement of attorneys' fees and disbursements, including those incurred by a person in connection with an appearance as a witness. Upon written request to the Corporation and approval by the Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, an agent or employee for whom indemnification has been extended, or an officer or Director may receive an advance for reasonable expenses if such agent, employee, officer or Director is made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding involving a matter for which indemnification is believed to be available under Minnesota Statutes Chapter 302A. The foregoing rights shall not be exclusive of other rights to which any Director or officer may otherwise be entitled and shall be available whether or not the Director or officer continues to be a Director or officer at the time of incurring such expenses and liabilities. Section 14. A Director of this Corporation shall not be disqualified by his or her office from dealing or contracting with this Corporation, 13
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 either as vendor, purchaser or otherwise, nor shall any transaction or contract of this Corporation be void or voidable by reason of the fact that any Director, or any firm of which any Director is a member, or any corporation of which any Director is a shareholder or director, is in any way interested in such transaction or contract, provided that such transaction or contract is or shall be authorized, ratified or approved either (1) by vote of a majority of a quorum of the Board of Directors or of the Executive Committee, without counting in such majority of quorum any Director so interested, or being a member of a firm so interested, or shareholder or a director of a corporation so interested, or (2) by vote at a shareholders' meeting of the holders of a majority of all the outstanding shares of the stock of this Corporation entitled to vote, or by a writing or writings signed by a majority of such holders, nor shall any Director be liable to account to this Corporation for any profit realized by the Director from or through any transaction or contract of this Corporation, authorized, ratified or approved as aforesaid, by reason of the fact that the Director, or any firm of which the Director is a member, or any corporation of which the Director is a shareholder or director, was interested in such transaction or contract; provided however, that this Corporation shall not lend any of its assets to any of its officers or Directors, nor to any of its shareholders on the security of its own shares. Nothing herein contained shall create any liability in the events above described or prevent the authorization, ratification or approval of such contracts or transactions in any other manner provided by law. Section 15. The Board of Directors is authorized to select such depository or depositories as they shall deem proper for the funds of this Corporation. All checks and drafts against such deposited funds shall be signed by persons to be specified by the Chairman of the Board, by the 14
As Amended Effective August 24, 2004 President or a Vice-President of the Corporation with the concurrence of its Treasurer. Section 16. The Board of Directors shall have power to authorize the payment of compensation to the Directors for services to this Corporation, including fees for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors, and to determine the amount of such compensation and fees. Section 17. The corporate seal of this Corporation shall be in such form as the Board of Directors shall prescribe. Section 18. The shareholders may alter or amend these Bylaws by a majority vote of all the outstanding stock of this Corporation entitled to vote at any meeting duly held as above provided, the notice of which includes notice of the proposed alteration or amendment. The Board of Directors may also alter or amend these Bylaws at any time by affirmative vote of a majority of the Board of Directors given at a duly convened meeting of the Board of Directors, the notice of which includes notice of the proposed alteration or amendment, subject to the power of the shareholders to change or repeal such Bylaws; provided that the Board of Directors shall not make or alter any Bylaws fixing their number, qualifications, classifications, or term of office, or changing the number of shares required to constitute a quorum for a shareholders' meeting. - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- The undersigned, Secretary of ALLETE, Inc., does hereby certify that the foregoing is a correct and complete copy of the Bylaws of ALLETE, Inc. effective as of August 24, 2004. /s/ Deborah A. Amberg ---------------------------------------- Secretary 15

EXHIBIT 99(a) [ALLETE LOGO] DEBORAH A. AMBERG VICE PRESIDENT, GENERAL COUNSEL AND SECRETARY 218-723-3930 Fax: 218-723-3960 E-mail: damberg@allete.com August 25, 2004 TO: Directors and Executive Officers of ALLETE RE: Notice of Blackout Period to Directors and Executive Officers of ALLETE, Inc. A blackout period for the Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Savings and Stock Option Plan (the "Plan") is expected to begin at 3:00 p.m. on September 10, 2004 and to end on September 23, 2004 following the spin-off of ADESA, Inc. (the "Blackout Period"). This Blackout Period will temporarily prevent participants in the Plan from engaging in transactions in ALLETE common stock in their individual accounts. This notice is to inform you that pursuant to Section 306 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, you will be unable to trade in ALLETE common stock or exercise any stock options (cashless or otherwise) during the Blackout Period when participants in the Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Account (the "Plan") are prevented from directing or diversifying assets in their ALLETE stock accounts under the Plan. The reason for the Plan's blackout is to create an ADESA stock fund, in addition to the ALLETE stock fund, following completion of the spin-off of ADESA, Inc. The Plan transactions affected include directing or diversifying investments in ALLETE stock accounts. Please be advised that the current policy established by the Board of ALLETE restricting market transactions in ALLETE common stock by directors and executive officers of both ALLETE and ADESA prior to the spin-off and restricting market transactions of ADESA common stock by the directors and executive officers of ADESA after the spin-off, remain in effect. ALLETE's policy 30 West Superior Street / Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093 / 218-279-5000 / www.allete.com
that limits trading in ALLETE common stock as set forth in ALLETE's Purchase and Sale of Company Securities Policy, also remains in effect. If you have any questions concerning this notice, please contact Randy Carter at 218/723-3904 or myself. Sincerely, /s/ Deborah A. Amberg Deborah A. Amberg dml

EXHIBIT 99(b) [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: August 25, 2004 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE DECLARES SPIN-OFF DATE, REVERSE STOCK SPLIT; --------------------------------------------------- NEW DIVIDEND PROJECTED FOR DECEMBER 1 PAYMENT --------------------------------------------- DULUTH, Minn.-- The board of directors of ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) announced today that the company will distribute its remaining equity interest in ADESA, Inc. (NYSE: KAR) to ALLETE shareholders on September 20, 2004. ALLETE expects to distribute to its shareholders one share of ADESA common stock for each outstanding share of ALLETE common stock they own on the record date of September 13, 2004. The distribution is structured to qualify as a tax-free stock dividend. "We're very pleased to report that the full separation of these companies is imminent," said David Gartzke, chairman and CEO of ADESA and outgoing chairman of the ALLETE board. "Both companies are well positioned for the future." ADESA common stock received by registered ALLETE shareholders as a result of the spin-off will be in book-entry form. Holders will receive a statement of ownership indicating the number of shares credited to their account. Given the nature of the transaction, any holder of ALLETE common stock who sells shares on or before September 20 will also be selling their entitlement to receive shares of ADESA common stock in the spin-off. Investors are encouraged to consult with their financial advisors regarding the specific implications of selling ALLETE common stock before the spin-off. ALLETE also announced that, in connection with the spin-off, its board of directors approved a one-for-three reverse stock split, which will become effective immediately following the spin-off. Every three shares of ALLETE common stock will be converted into one share of "new" ALLETE common stock. A letter of transmittal relating to the reverse stock split will be mailed to holders of ALLETE common stock certificates once the reverse stock split is effective. These holders will ultimately receive their "new" shares in book-entry form and a cash payment for any fractional share. Participants in Invest Direct, ALLETE's direct stock purchase and dividend reinvestment plan, and the ALLETE and Affiliated Companies Employee Stock Purchase Plan will receive their whole and fractional shares resulting from the reverse split credited to their accounts. The ALLETE board also announced that it anticipates declaring a post-spin-off quarterly dividend of 30 cents per share. The board expects to declare the dividend at a regularly scheduled meeting in October for payment on December 1. -over-
News Release August 25, 2004 "All registered holders of ALLETE common stock will be mailed information within the next few days," said Donald J. Shippar, president and CEO of ALLETE. "This information will describe the actions the board took and how it affects them individually." Upon completion of the spin-off, Gartzke will continue as chairman, president and CEO of ADESA, while Shippar will remain as president and CEO of ALLETE. Gartzke will be succeeded as chairman of the ALLETE board by current director Bruce Stender. ALLETE purchased ADESA, Automotive Finance Corporation (AFC) and several related automotive remarketing businesses in 1995. Under ALLETE's ownership, ADESA grew to become North America's largest publicly traded wholesale vehicle auction network and the largest provider of used vehicle dealer floorplan financing. The company's holdings include 53 ADESA used vehicle auctions, 28 Impact salvage vehicle auctions, and 80 AFC loan production offices. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ####

EXHIBIT 99(c) [ALLETE LOGO] DAVID G. GARTZKE CHAIRMAN, ALLETE BOARD OF DIRECTORS August 24, 2004 Dear Shareholder: Your board of directors has taken action on several issues related to the upcoming separation of ADESA from ALLETE. These matters are important to all ALLETE shareholders, and I urge you to read this letter carefully. We have enclosed with this mailing a question-and-answer sheet and a copy of a news release we issued. I want you to fully understand this transaction and the key events that will transpire over the next month. SPIN-OFF OF ADESA TO ALLETE SHAREHOLDERS: - ----------------------------------------- I'm pleased to report that the SPIN-OFF OF ADESA (NYSE:KAR) FROM ALLETE (NYSE:ALE) WILL TAKE PLACE SEPTEMBER 20, 2004. ON THAT DAY, INVESTORS WHO OWN SHARES OF ALLETE ON THE RECORD DATE OF SEPTEMBER 13, 2004, ARE EXPECTED TO RECEIVE ONE SHARE OF ADESA STOCK FOR EACH SHARE OF ALLETE THEY HOLD. Shareholders of ALLETE will receive their ADESA shares in direct registration form. Within days after the spin-off, all ALLETE shareholders of record will automatically receive a statement of ownership from ADESA and a check for any fractional share. NO ACTION IS REQUIRED BY YOU TO RECEIVE YOUR SHARES OF ADESA. The distribution of ADESA common stock is structured to qualify as a tax-free stock dividend. The result is that you will not recognize a taxable gain or loss as a result of the receipt of ADESA common stock, except with respect to any cash you may receive for a fractional share. You will receive information that will help you calculate the tax basis of your ADESA and ALLETE shares after the spin-off. ONE-FOR-THREE REVERSE STOCK SPLIT: - ---------------------------------- The ALLETE board of directors has also declared a one-for-three reverse stock split, effective immediately following the spin-off on September 20, whereby every three shares of ALLETE that you own will be converted into one share of "new" ALLETE common stock. This reverse split will not affect your investment interest in ALLETE and is intended to increase the share price to a range that is more appealing to a broader group of investors. Here's an example of how the reverse split will work. Let's say you own 300 shares of post-spin-off ALE priced at $9 per share before the reverse split on September 20, 2004. Immediately after the reverse stock split, you would have 100 shares of ALE priced at $27 per share. In both cases, the value of your investment is $2,700. 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
August 24, 2004 Page 2 Investors who hold ALLETE shares in stock certificate form will have to turn in their certificates to the Company's transfer agent, Wells Fargo Bank N.A., after the spin-off to receive their "new" ALLETE shares. The "new" shares will be in direct registration form, and shareholders will receive a statement of ownership and a check for any fractional share. PLEASE DO NOT SEND IN YOUR CERTIFICATES NOW; INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO DO SO WILL BE SENT TO YOU IN LATE SEPTEMBER. Investors who hold ALLETE shares within the Invest Direct stock purchase and dividend reinvestment plan will not have to take any action to receive their "new" shares. The changed price and quantity of your shares will be reflected in the next Invest Direct statement you receive after the spin-off. ALLETE COMMON STOCK DIVIDEND: - ----------------------------- ALLETE'S September 1 common stock dividend will be the same as the previous quarter's dividend of $0.2825 per share. The ALLETE BOARD OF DIRECTORS ANTICIPATES DECLARING A QUARTERLY DIVIDEND OF $.30 PER POST-SPLIT SHARE at its regular October meeting for payment on December 1, 2004 to shareholders of record on November 15, 2004. NOTICE TO PARTICIPANTS IN THE INVEST DIRECT PLAN: - ------------------------------------------------- In order to facilitate appropriate record keeping for these transactions, the company will be suspending all sales and transfer activity in its Invest Direct stock purchase plan from September 10 until September 20. Optional cash payments received after August 25 will buy shares in post-spin-off ALLETE. It's gratifying for all of us at ALLETE and ADESA to be reaching the point where these two fine companies are able to pursue their strategies independently. It has been my distinct pleasure to serve as ALLETE's board chairman during a period of growth and change. As I leave ALLETE to devote my full attention to the leadership of ADESA, you may be assured that your investment in both companies is very much appreciated. Sincerely, /s/ David G. Gartzke David G. Gartzke Chairman 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
- ------------------------ THE ADESA spin-off. - ------------------------ THE ALLETE reverse stock split. - ------------------------ A NEW ALLETE dividend. - ------------------------ QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS How the transactions work for you. ---- [ALLETE LOGO]
THE ADESA spin-off. - - Q. What am I going to receive when ADESA is spun off? A. On September 20, ALLETE expects to distrib- ute one share of ADESA stock for every share of ALLETE stock you own as of September 13, and a check for the value of any fractional share. Your ADESA shares will be held in a Direct Registration System (DRS) account managed by Wells Fargo Bank N.A., ADESA's transfer agent. - ------------------------------------------------------ - - Q. Do I have to do anything to receive my ADESA shares? A. No, you will not have to do anything to receive your shares. You will automatically be mailed a statement from ADESA reflecting your ownership. - ------------------------------------------------------ - - Q. What is DRS and how does it work? A. DRS is a system for book-entry ownership of stock. It is a service in which shares are owned, recorded and transferred electronically without issuing a physical stock certificate. By having the transfer agent keep shareholder records electronically, the risk of lost or stolen stock certificates is eliminated. Shareholders still have all their traditional rights and privileges, without the necessity of holding a physical certificate. You will receive information on how to perform transactions within your DRS account when you receive your new statement of owner- ship. A physical stock certificate will be issued only upon request. - ------------------------------------------------------ - - Q. What happens if I buy or sell shares of ALLETE before the spin-off date? A. If you buy ALLETE stock before September 21, you'll be eligible for the ADESA spin-off shares. If you sell shares of ALLETE prior to September 21 you will also sell your entitlement to receive any
THE ALLETE reverse stock split. corresponding ADESA spin-off shares. Please note that transactions in ALLETE's Invest Direct plan will be suspended between September 10 and September 20 to accommodate recordkeeping. - ------------------------------------------------------ - - Q. What is a reverse stock split? A. It is the opposite of a stock split. A reverse split results in a decrease in the number of out- standing shares with a proportionate increase in the price per share so that the total value of the stock owned remains the same. For example, if a shareholder owned 300 shares of ALLETE stock valued at $9 per share immediately after the spin- off of ADESA, he would own 100 shares valued at $27 after the one-for-three reverse stock split. In both cases the total value of his investment equals $2700. [GRAPHIC ILLUSTRATING THE FOLLOWING OMITTED] HOW A REVERSE STOCK SPLIT WORKS BEFORE AFTER you have... you will have... STOCK STOCK Three Shares Valued = $27 = One Share Valued At $9.00 Each Stock Value At $27.00 DIVIDEND DIVIDEND Quarterly Dividend = $.30 = Quarterly Dividend 10 Cents Each Share 30 Cents Each Share Total Quarterly Total Quarterly Dividend of 30 Cents Dividend of 30 Cents - ------------------------------------------------------ - - Q. Why was a reverse stock split declared? A. Our research indicates that common stock priced over $20 appeals to more investors than stock that is priced well under that level. Since ALLETE stock would likely trade at a price well under $20 immediately after the spin-off of ADESA, the board declared a one-for-three reverse stock split with the intention of increasing the price to a range that is more appealing to a broader group of investors.
A NEW ALLETE dividend. - - Q. What do I need to do to receive my "new" ALLETE shares after the reverse split? A. If you currently hold a stock certificate, it must be turned in. You should do nothing now; you will receive instructions in late September about how to turn in your old stock certificates. After you surrender your old certificate, you will automatically be mailed a new DRS statement of ownership from ALLETE and a check for any fractional share. If you hold your stock within an Invest Direct account, you do not have to do anything. Your next Invest Direct statement will reflect your share ownership. - ------------------------------------------------------ - - Q. What will the common dividend be? A. The September 1 common stock dividend of $0.2825 per share remains unchanged from the previous quarter. The ALLETE board of directors expects to declare a quarterly dividend of $0.30 per post-split share (which would be equivalent to $0.10 per pre-split share) at its regular October meeting for payment on December 1, 2004 to share- holders of record on November 15, 2004. - ------------------------------------------------------ - - Q. Who do I contact at ALLETE with questions? A. ALLETE Shareholder Services 30 W. Superior St., Duluth, MN 55802 800-535-3056 FAX: 218-720-2502 E-mail: shareholder@allete.com [ALLETE LOGO]
ALLETE, INC. will spin off its remaining equity interest in ADESA, Inc. to shareholders in late September. Effective immediately following and in connection with the spin-off, the ALLETE board will declare a one-for-three reverse stock split, whereby each three shares will be converted into one share of "new" ALLETE common stock. The ALLETE board expects to declare a quarterly dividend of 30 cents per post-split share at its October meeting for payment on December 1. [ALLETE LOGO]
What you will own after the spin-off: [OMITTED GRAPHIC OF NEW YORK STOCK EXCHANGE LISTING HIGHLIGHTING SECTIONS A AND K WHERE ALLETE STOCK "ALE" AND ADESA STOCK "KAR" ARE LISTED.] Add share prices and dividends of ALLETE and ADESA together. [ALLETE LOGO] 30 W. Superior St. / Duluth, MN 55802 www.allete.com



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040916141551.txt.gz
TIME:20040916141551
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - SEPTEMBER 15, 2004 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS Reference is made to the 2003 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) for background information on the following update. Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2004, Page 25 - Fifth Paragraph On September 15, 2004 Minnesota Power, a division of ALLETE, filed an integrated resource plan with the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission detailing the Company's retail energy demand projections and its energy sourcing options to meet the projected demand. ALLETE's September 16, 2004 press release regarding this information is attached as Exhibit 99 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein. Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 25, 2004 On August 24, 2004 ALLETE's Board of Directors approved a one-for-three reverse stock split of ALLETE's common stock. The effective date of the reverse stock split will be 12:00 p.m. Eastern Time on September 20, 2004. As a result of the reverse stock split, the remaining number of shares of ALLETE's common stock registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, under the Company's registration statements listed below will be adjusted in proportion to the one-for-three reverse stock split. 1. Registration Statement No.333-02109 (relating to Invest Direct, the Company's direct stock purchase and dividend reinvestment plan). 2. Registration Statement No. 333-41882 (relating to the Company's shelf registration). 3. Registration Statement No. 333-57104 (relating to the Company's omnibus shelf registration). 4. Registration Statement No. 333-105225 (relating to the ALLETE and Affiliated Companies Employee Stock Purchase Plan). 5. Registration Statement No. 333-110740 (relating to the Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan). 6. Registration Statement No. 333-16463 (relating to the Company's Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan). 7. Registration Statement No. 333-82901 (relating to the Company's Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan). 8. Registration Statement No. 333-91348 (relating to the Company's Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan). 9. Registration Statement No. 333-16445 (relating to the Company's Director Long-Term Stock Incentive Plan). ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 16, 2004 1
ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated September 16, 2004 regarding an Integrated Resource Plan filed with the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission. ---------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 16, 2004
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives, including the completion and impact of the planned spin-off of our Automotive Services business; - - war and acts of terrorism; - - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, Canadian federal government, state and provincial legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs) as well as vehicle-related laws, including vehicle brokerage and auction laws; - - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric and automotive industries; - - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - - weather conditions; - - natural disasters; - - market factors affecting supply and demand for used vehicles; - - wholesale power market conditions; - - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers, as well as sellers and buyers of vehicles; - - pricing and transportation of commodities; - - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - - capital market conditions; - - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 16, 2004 3
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. September 16, 2004 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 4 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 16, 2004
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated September 16, 2004 regarding an Integrated Resource Plan filed with the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 16, 2004

EXHIBIT 99 [MINNESOTA POWER LOGO] FOR RELEASE: September 16, 2004 CONTACT: Eric Olson (218) 723-3947 eolson@allete.com MINNESOTA POWER FORECASTS REGIONAL ENERGY DEMAND GROWTH ------------------------------------------------------- DULUTH, Minn.--Minnesota Power, a division of Duluth-based ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) predicts energy demand by customers in its service territory will increase at an average annual rate of 1.7% over the next decade, according to a report filed with the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission (MPUC). The MPUC requires all Minnesota electric utilities to periodically file a "Resource Plan" which outlines their best estimates of future energy needs and how those needs can best be met. "A core underlying growth of 20 to 30 megawatts per year primarily from residential and smaller commercial expansion is consistent and apparent," the report stated. Large energy users in northeastern Minnesota, such as taconite processing facilities and paper mills, also show a sustainable positive outlook, according to the report. Domestic steel industry consolidations have reached fruition while the global markets for steel, and consequently, taconite have improved considerably. A dramatic increase in the demand for Minnesota taconite began in early 2004. Paper customers also have seen significant price increases. Aside from an increase in system energy requirements, Minnesota Power will also realize a reduction in generating resource supply over the next few years under the terms of a long-term energy supply contract with a neighboring utility. The combination of increased demands and reduced supply means Minnesota Power will need to secure additional energy to make up for the shortfall. "We're well-positioned to provide for whatever energy needs arise in our region," said Don Shippar, ALLETE President and CEO. "Utilities need to take a long-term view in order to ensure energy needs are met, and this resource plan provides key stakeholders and the public with a useful overall blueprint for future energy supply and demand requirements." In its report Minnesota Power provides several options designed to meet the predicted growing energy demand in the service territory. The options range from purchasing additional power to building new energy generation facilities. The company will work with state regulators and stakeholders over the next several months to discuss the plan content, and the MPUC will formally consider the plan in early 2005. MINNESOTA POWER, HEADQUARTERED IN DULUTH, MINNESOTA, IS ONE OF THE COMPANIES OF ALLETE, INC. (NYSE:ALE). IT IS A LOW-COST ELECTRIC UTILITY THAT SERVES SOME OF THE LARGEST INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMERS IN THE UNITED STATES. LEARN MORE ABOUT MINNESOTA POWER AT WWW.MNPOWER.COM AND ABOUT ALLETE AT WWW.ALLETE.COM. ### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER Minnesota Power, Inc. - 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 www.mnpower.com



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040921152843.txt.gz
TIME:20040921152843
EVENTS:	Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Completion of Acquisition or Disposition of Assets
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - SEPTEMBER 20, 2004 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
Reference is made to the 2003 Form 10-K of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) for background information on the following update. Unless otherwise indicated, cited references are to ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. ITEM 2.01 COMPLETION OF ACQUISITION OR DISPOSITION OF ASSETS Ref. Page 11 - Sixth and Tenth Paragraphs Ref. Page 38 - Fourth Full Paragraph through Tenth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, Page 20 - Last Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, Page 21 - First Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed June 16, 2004 Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2004, Page 24 - Last Paragraph Ref. Form 8-K dated and filed August 25, 2004 At 11:59 a.m. Eastern Time on September 20, 2004, ALLETE completed the spin-off of ADESA, Inc. (ADESA), previously a majority owned subsidiary. The spin-off was completed by distributing to ALLETE shareholders all of ALLETE's shares of ADESA common stock. One share of ADESA common stock was distributed for each outstanding share of ALLETE common stock held at the close of business on September 13, 2004, the record date. ALLETE held 88.6 million shares, or 93.4 percent, of the outstanding common stock of ADESA. ITEM 5.03 AMENDMENTS TO ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION OR BYLAWS; CHANGE IN FISCAL YEAR On August 24, 2004 ALLETE's Board of Directors approved an amendment to the Company's Articles of Incorporation, as amended and restated as of May 8, 2001, which decreases the number of authorized shares of the Company's common stock, without par value (Common Stock) from 130,000,000 shares to 43,333,333 shares (Reverse Split Amendment) in accordance with a one-for-three reverse stock split, which was approved at the same meeting. The Reverse Split Amendment was effective at 12:00 p.m. Eastern Time on September 20, 2004, the effective time of the one-for-three reverse stock split. A copy of the press release in which ALLETE announced the one-for-three reverse stock split was filed as an exhibit to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K dated and filed August 25, 2004. ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS Ref. Page 12 - First Full Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2004, Page 31 - Item 5 - Second Paragraph In June 2004 Florida enacted legislation which provides that gains or losses resulting from the purchase or condemnation of a utility's assets, which results in the loss of customers and revenue served by such assets, are to be borne by the shareholders of the utility. In accordance with this legislation, on September 21, 2004 the Florida Public Service Commission closed all dockets related to its investigations into the ratemaking considerations of the gain on sale of Florida Water Services Corporation's (Florida Water) assets. Florida Water is a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE. ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information On September 20, 2004 ALLETE completed the spin-off of ADESA, its majority owned subsidiary. The following unaudited pro forma financial information has been prepared from, and should be read in conjunction with, the historical consolidated financial statements and related notes thereto of ALLETE. The following information is not necessarily indicative of the financial position or operating results that would have occurred had the spin-off of ADESA occurred on such date, or at the beginning of the periods, for which the spin-off are being given effect nor is it necessarily indicative of future operating results or financial position of ALLETE. All common shares and per share amounts have been adjusted for all periods to reflect ALLETE's September 20, 2004 one-for-three reverse stock split. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004 1
2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004
ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004 3
4 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004
ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004 5
6 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004
NOTE 1. PRO FORMA PRESENTATION The spin-off of ADESA will be accounted for as a discontinued operation under Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 144, "Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long-Lived Assets," when ALLETE issues financial statements subsequent to the consummation of the spin-off transaction. The unaudited pro forma financial information reflects ADESA as a discontinued operation and, accordingly, ADESA's net assets and results of operations are excluded from the continuing operations of ALLETE. The unaudited pro forma balance sheet as of June 30, 2004 presents the historical consolidated balance sheet of ALLETE adjusted to reflect the spin-off of ADESA as if it had occurred on June 30, 2004. NOTE 2. ACCOUNTING FOR SPIN-OFF The pro forma adjustments reflect the distribution of shares of ADESA's common stock to ALLETE shareholders. The distribution was made from ALLETE's retained earnings to the extent of ADESA's undistributed earnings ($347.1 million at June 30, 2004) with the remainder made from common stock ($594.5 million at June 30, 2004). Employee stock options outstanding at the date of the spin-off will be converted to reflect the spin-off and one-for-three reverse stock split. This conversion will be done to preserve the noncompensatory nature of the options under Financial Accounting Standards Board Interpretation No. 44, "Accounting for Certain Transactions Involving Stock Compensation." NOTE 3. REVERSE STOCK SPLIT ALLETE's one-for-three reverse stock split of its common stock was effective September 20, 2004 after the spin-off of ADESA. The following presents a comparison of pre- and post-split pro forma basic and diluted average shares of common stock and earnings per share of common stock. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004 7
(c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 3 - Amendment to ALLETE, Inc. Articles of Incorporation, effective 12:00 p.m. Eastern Time on September 20, 2004. 4 - Certificate of Adjustment to the Rights Agreement, dated as of July 24, 1996, between Minnesota Power & Light Company (now ALLETE, Inc.) and the Corporate Secretary of the Company, as Rights Agent. -------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 9 OF THIS FORM 8-K. 8 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives; - - war and acts of terrorism; - - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs); - - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - - weather conditions; - - natural disasters; - - wholesale power market conditions; - - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - - pricing and transportation of commodities; - - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - - capital market conditions; - - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Risk factors associated with our Automotive Services business are no longer applicable to ALLETE as that business was spun-off as of September 20, 2004. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004 9
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. September 21, 2004 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 10 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 3 - Amendment to ALLETE, Inc. Articles of Incorporation, effective 12:00 p.m. Eastern Time on September 20, 2004. 4 - Certificate of Adjustment to the Rights Agreement, dated as of July 24, 1996, between Minnesota Power & Light Company now ALLETE, Inc.) and the Corporate Secretary of the Company, as Rights Agent. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 21, 2004

EXHIBIT 3 ALLETE, INC. ARTICLES OF AMENDMENT AMENDING PARAGRAPH 1, ARTICLE III OF ALLETE, INC.'S ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION AS AMENDED AND RESTATED AS OF MAY 8, 2001 ARTICLE III 1. The total authorized number of shares of capital stock of this Corporation shall be 46,949,333 shares of which 116,000 shares of the par value of $100 each shall be 5% Preferred Stock, 1,000,000 shares without par value shall be Serial Preferred Stock, 2,500,000 shares without par value shall be Serial Preferred Stock A and 43,333,333 shares without par value shall be Common Stock. Any of the aforesaid shares may be issued and disposed of by the Board of Directors at any time and from time to time, to such persons, firms, corporations or associations, upon such terms and for such consideration as the Board of Directors may, in its discretion, determine, except as may be limited by law or by these Articles of Incorporation. STATE OF MINNESOTA DEPARTMENT OF STATE FILED SEP 17 2004 /s/ Mary Kiffmeyer Secretary of State

EXHIBIT 4 CERTIFICATE OF ADJUSTMENT TO THE RIGHTS AGREEMENT DATED AS OF JULY 24, 1996 ("RIGHTS AGREEMENT") BETWEEN ALLETE, INC. (FORMERLY MINNESOTA POWER, INC. AND MINNESOTA POWER & Light Company) AND THE CORPORATE SECRETARY OF ALLETE, INC., RIGHTS AGENT The undersigned, Deborah A. Amberg, Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the "Company"), does hereby certify, pursuant to Section 12(a) of the Rights Agreement, that: (1) At 12:00 p.m. Eastern Time on September 20, 2004 (the "Effective Date"), for shareholders of record on September 13, 2004, the Company engaged in a one-for-three reverse stock split of the Company's common stock, no par value. (2) Pursuant to Section 11(n) of the Rights Agreement, as of the Effective Date, each preferred share purchase right (a "Right") entitles the registered holder, until the earlier of the close of business on July 23, 2006 or the redemption or exchange of the Rights, to purchase from the Company one-and-a-half of one one-hundredth (three two-hundredth) of a share of Serial Preferred Stock A, without par value, of the Company ("Preferred Stock") at an exercise price of $90.00 per one one-hundredth ($135.00 per three two-hundredth) of a share of Preferred Stock. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has hereunto signed her name this 21st day of September, 2004. ALLETE, INC. By: /s/ Deborah A. Amberg ----------------------------------------



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20040929115445.txt.gz
TIME:20040929115445
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - SEPTEMBER 23, 2004 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.03 CREATION OF A DIRECT FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OR AN OBLIGATION UNDER AN OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENT OF A REGISTRANT On September 23, 2004 BNI Coal, Ltd. (BNI Coal), a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE), entered into a master lease agreement with Farm Credit Leasing Services Corporation (Farm Credit) to lease equipment and other property. It is expected that BNI Coal will lease, under this new agreement, a new dragline that is scheduled to go into operation at BNI Coal's mine in early October 2004. BNI Coal will be obligated to make lease payments totaling $2.8 million annually for the 23 year lease term which expires in 2027. BNI Coal will have the option at the end of the lease term to renew the lease at a fair market rental, to purchase the dragline at fair market value, or to surrender the dragline to Farm Credit and pay a $3.0 million termination fee. -------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 29, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives; - - war and acts of terrorism; - - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs); - - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - - weather conditions; - - natural disasters; - - wholesale power market conditions; - - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - - pricing and transportation of commodities; - - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - - capital market conditions; - - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Risk factors associated with our Automotive Services business are no longer applicable to ALLETE as that business was spun-off as of September 20, 2004. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 29, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. September 29, 2004 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 29, 2004 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20041022102046.txt.gz
TIME:20041022102046
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - OCTOBER 20, 2004 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 2.02 RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITIONS On October 22, 2004 ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) issued a press release announcing 2004 third quarter earnings which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99 and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. The information is being furnished pursuant to Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition. This information, including Exhibit 99 attached hereto, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. ITEM 5.02 DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR PRINCIPAL OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF PRINCIPAL OFFICERS Effective October 20, 2004 Madeleine W. Ludlow was elected to serve on ALLETE's Board of Directors until the 2005 Annual Meeting of Shareholders of the Company and to serve on the audit committee. Ms. Ludlow, 50, most recently held senior management positions at Cadence Network, Inc., a Cincinnati-based energy services company. Ludlow also held senior management positions with Cinergy Corporation, Public Service Enterprise Group Incorporated and Morgan Stanley & Co. --------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 22, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives; - - war and acts of terrorism; - - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, and present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs); - - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - - weather conditions; - - natural disasters; - - wholesale power market conditions; - - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - - pricing and transportation of commodities; - - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - - capital market conditions; - - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Risk factors associated with our Automotive Services business are no longer applicable to ALLETE as that business was spun-off as of September 20, 2004. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 22, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. October 22, 2004 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 22, 2004 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated October 22, 2004 announcing 2004 third quarter earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 22, 2004

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: October 22, 2004 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE REPORTS THIRD QUARTER RESULTS; ------------------------------------- RAISES 2004 EARNINGS GUIDANCE FOR CONTINUING OPERATIONS ------------------------------------------------------- DULUTH, Minn.-ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported 2004 year-to-date income from continuing operations of $23.2 million. Excluding a one-time charge of $10.9 million for the early repayment of debt in the third quarter, income from continuing operations was $34.1 million compared to $25.6 million for the first three quarters of 2003. Based on its year-to-date performance and fourth quarter projections, ALLETE has raised its expectation for income from continuing operations (excluding the aforementioned one-time charge) to approximately $38 million for 2004, an increase of 28 percent over 2003. The debt prepayment charge was incurred as a result of an early retirement of $125 million of long-term debt in July as ALLETE recapitalized in preparation for the spin-off of ADESA. Year-to-date interest expense decreased by about $7 million after-tax compared with the same period last year. Interest was reduced as a result of the debt retired in July and because proceeds of Water Services asset sales were applied to debt repayment in late 2003 and early 2004. "We are very pleased with how this year is progressing," said ALLETE President and CEO Don Shippar. "Power sales to Minnesota Power's industrial customers have shown healthy increases and our real estate business in Florida is having another solid year of financial performance. The strong operating results, combined with significantly lower interest expense than last year, have helped us absorb anticipated expense increases and an impairment charge associated with our emerging technology portfolio." ALLETE's quarterly income from continuing operations was primarily affected by the debt prepayment charge. Excluding the charge, income from continuing operations was slightly less than the $10.9 million recorded last year. Energy sales to Minnesota Power industrial customers rose 13 percent from the third quarter of 2003. Compared with last year, the regulated utility business incurred higher pension expense, increased costs associated with a plant outage at Square Butte, and lower power sales to other power suppliers--all of which were anticipated. "All in all, financial results for the regulated utility business exceeded our expectations for the quarter," Shippar said. Income from discontinued operations includes earnings from ADESA up until its spin-off to ALLETE shareholders on September 20, 2004, ALLETE expenses related to the spin-off, earnings from operations at the Water Services business and gains from the sales of Water Services assets. A change in an accounting principle used to account for ALLETE's emerging technology investment portfolio led to a $7.8 million retroactive non-cash charge. The charge, recorded in year-to-date results, reflects the change to the equity method of accounting from the cost method for these investments. ALLETE'S CORPORATE HEADQUARTERS ARE LOCATED IN DULUTH, MINNESOTA. ALLETE PROVIDES ENERGY SERVICES IN THE UPPER MIDWEST AND HAS SIGNIFICANT REAL ESTATE HOLDINGS IN FLORIDA. MORE INFORMATION ABOUT THE COMPANY IS AVAILABLE ON ALLETE'S WEB SITE AT WWW.ALLETE.COM. -------------- ### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET, DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802 WWW.ALLETE.COM
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- NOTES On September 20, 2004 ALLETE's common stock was split one-for-three. All common share and per share amounts have been adjusted for all periods to reflect the one-for-three reverse stock split.



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20041028163801.txt.gz
TIME:20041028163801
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - OCTOBER 28, 2004 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 7.01 REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) adjusted its interactive graphic website financial information to reflect the September 20, 2004 spin-off of ADESA, Inc. (ADESA) as discontinued operations and redefined its reportable business segments. In addition, all common share and per share amounts have been adjusted for all periods to reflect ALLETE's September 20, 2004 one-for-three reverse stock split. The following shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 28, 2004 1
As a result of the spin-off of ADESA (the Company's Automotive Services business) in September 2004, ALLETE redefined its business into four segments. REGULATED UTILITY includes the Company's rate regulated electric, water and gas services in northeastern Minnesota and northwestern Wisconsin. NONREGULATED ENERGY OPERATIONS includes the Company's coal mining activities in North Dakota and nonregulated generation consisting primarily of generation from the Company's Taconite Harbor Energy Center in northern Minnesota and generation secured through a 15-year power purchase agreement. REAL ESTATE includes the Company's Florida real estate operations. OTHER includes the Company's telecommunications activities, investments in emerging technologies, and general corporate charges and interest not specifically related to any one business segment. General corporate charges include employee salaries and benefits as well as legal and other outside service fees. DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS includes Automotive Services that was spun off on September 20, 2004, Water Services businesses, the majority of which were sold in 2003, and spin-off costs incurred by ALLETE. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 28, 2004
ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 28, 2004 3
4 ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 28, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. October 28, 2004 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 28, 2004 5



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20041112110049.txt.gz
TIME:20041112110049
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - NOVEMBER 12, 2004 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 7.01 REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE As a result of the September 20, 2004 spin-off of ADESA, Inc. (ADESA), ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) redefined its reportable business segments. REGULATED UTILITY includes the Company's rate regulated electric, water and gas services in northeastern Minnesota and northwestern Wisconsin. NONREGULATED ENERGY OPERATIONS includes the Company's coal mining activities in North Dakota and nonregulated generation consisting primarily of generation from the Company's Taconite Harbor Energy Center in northern Minnesota and generation secured through a 15-year power purchase agreement. REAL ESTATE includes the Company's Florida real estate operations. OTHER includes the Company's telecommunications activities, investments in emerging technologies, and general corporate charges and interest not specifically related to any one business segment. General corporate charges include employee salaries and benefits as well as legal and other outside service fees. DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS includes Automotive Services (ADESA), which was spun off on September 20, 2004, Water Services businesses, the majority of which were sold in 2003, and spin-off costs incurred by ALLETE. On October 28, 2004 ALLETE furnished an 8-K that contained certain historical financial information for the years 2002, 2003 and 2004 adjusted to reflect the spin-off of ADESA as discontinued operations and the redefined reportable business segments. ALLETE's Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2004 contained comparable financial information with respect to the third quarters of 2004 and 2003. This 8-K is being furnished to provide comparable segment information for the year ended December 31, 2003. The following shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 12, 2004 1
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. November 12, 2004 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 12, 2004



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20041213160012.txt.gz
TIME:20041213160012
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - DECEMBER 10, 2004 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: /_/ Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) /_/ Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) /_/ Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) /_/ Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS Ref. Page 38 - Twelfth Full Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2004, Page 24 - Sixth and Seventh Paragraphs ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) sponsors a leveraged employee stock ownership plan (ESOP) as part of the Company's Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan. On December 10, 2004 ALLETE received a private letter ruling from the Internal Revenue Service which allows the ESOP until May 25, 2006 to complete the sale of 3.3 million shares of ADESA, Inc. (ADESA) common stock and use the proceeds to purchase ALLETE common stock. The ESOP received the ADESA shares in connection with ALLETE's spin-off of ADESA on September 20, 2004. To date the ESOP has sold 3.0 million shares of ADESA common stock for total proceeds of $58.9 million; 2.5 million of the shares were sold directly to ADESA. This resulted in an after-tax gain of $10.1 million which will be recognized by ALLETE in the fourth quarter of 2004. Approximately 0.8 million shares of ALLETE common stock have been purchased by the ESOP to date. Under the direction of the independent trustee, $29.5 million of cash is currently available in the ESOP to purchase ALLETE shares. The ADESA shares related to unearned ESOP shares that have not yet been allocated to participants. In accordance with the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants Statement of Position 93-6, "Employers' Accounting for Employee Stock Ownership Plans," unallocated ALLETE common stock currently held and purchased by the ESOP will be treated as unearned ESOP shares and not considered as outstanding for ALLETE's earnings per share computations. ESOP shares are included in earnings per share computations after they are allocated to participants. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 13, 2004 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Regulatory Energy Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Pubic Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Risk factors associated with the Automotive Services business are no longer applicable to ALLETE as that business was spun off as of September 20, 2004. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 13, 2004
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. December 13, 2004 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 13, 2004 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20050104091206.txt.gz
TIME:20050104091206
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - DECEMBER 28, 2004 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 1 - REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS ITEM 1.01 ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT On December 28, 2004 Rainy River Energy Corporation, a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, Inc., entered into an agreement, the "Master Agreement by and between Rainy River Energy Corporation and Constellation Energy Commodities Group, Inc.," to assign its power purchase agreement with LSP-Kendall Energy, LLC. ALLETE's January 4, 2005 press release describing this agreement is attached as Exhibit 99 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein. ----------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated January 4, 2005 announcing proposed transfer of Kendall Energy Agreements. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 4, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - war and acts of terrorism; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Regulatory Energy Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Pubic Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various county regulators and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - unanticipated effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - capital market conditions; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Risk factors associated with the Automotive Services business are no longer applicable to ALLETE as that business was spun off as of September 20, 2004. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 4, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. January 4, 2005 James K. Vizanko --------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 4, 2005 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated January 4, 2005 announcing proposed transfer of Kendall Energy Agreements. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 4, 2005

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] FOR RELEASE: January 4, 2005 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE, INC. ANNOUNCES PROPOSED TRANSFER OF KENDALL ENERGY ---------------------------------------------------------- AGREEMENTS ---------- DULUTH, Minn.--ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) announced today that its subsidiary, Rainy River Energy Corporation, has entered into an agreement to assign its power purchase agreement with LSP-Kendall Energy, LLC, the owner of an energy generation facility located in Kendall County, Ill., to Constellation Energy Commodities Group, Inc., a subsidiary of Constellation Energy Group, Inc. (NYSE: CEG). Under terms of the proposed agreement ALLETE's subsidiary will pay Constellation Energy $73 million in cash (approximately $47 million after taxes) to assume the power purchase agreement, which is in effect through mid-September, 2017. The proposed transaction is subject to the approvals of LSP-Kendall Energy, LLC and its project lenders, and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission. Pending these approvals, the transaction is scheduled for closing on April 1, 2005. In 1999 Rainy River Energy Corporation entered into a long-term agreement to purchase approximately 275 megawatts of nonregulated generation capacity (non rate-base generation sold at market-based rates to the wholesale market) from the Kendall County facility. Subsequent to that agreement, Rainy River sold approximately 130 megawatts of this capacity under long-term contracts. Those contracts will also be transferred to Constellation Energy at closing. The Kendall County facility, located just south of Chicago, became operational in May, 2002. "This proposed transaction is consistent with our stated goal of eliminating the significant ongoing losses resulting from our long-term agreement with the Kendall County facility," said Don Shippar, ALLETE President and CEO. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE provides energy services in the upper Midwest and has significant real estate holdings in Florida. More information about the company is available on ALLETE's Web site at www.allete.com. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 www.allete.com



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20050210092216.txt.gz
TIME:20050210092216
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - FEBRUARY 4, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION ITEM 2.02 RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITIONS On February 10, 2005, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) issued a press release announcing 2004 earnings, which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99 and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. The information is being furnished pursuant to Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition. This information, including Exhibit 99 attached hereto, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. ITEM 2.03 CREATION OF A DIRECT FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OR AN OBLIGATION UNDER AN OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENT OF A REGISTRANT On February 4, 2005, ALLETE accepted an offer from certain institutional buyers in the private placement market to purchase $35 million of ALLETE's First Mortgage Bonds. When issued, on or about August 1, 2005, the bonds will carry an interest rate of 5.28% and will have a term of 15 years. ALLETE intends to use the proceeds from the bonds to redeem a portion of ALLETE's outstanding debt. -------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------ 99 - ALLETE News Release dated February 10, 2005, announcing 2004 Earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 10, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - capital market conditions; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 46 of ALLETE's 2003 Form 10-K. Risk factors associated with the Automotive Services business are no longer applicable to ALLETE as that business was spun off as of September 20, 2004. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2003 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 10, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. February 10, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 10, 2005 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated February 10, 2005, announcing 2004 Earnings. ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 10, 2005

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: February 10, 2005 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE ANNOUNCES STRONG 2004 earnings RESULTS; ---------------------------------------------- EXPECTS EARNINGS PER SHARE GROWTH OF 45 TO 50 PERCENT in 2005 ------------------------------------------------------------- DULUTH, Minn.--ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported 2004 income from continuing operations of $39.1 million. Excluding a one-time charge for the early repayment of debt and a one-time gain realized by an employee stock ownership fund, income from continuing operations was $38.5 million, an increase of 29 percent over 2003. "Our company went through a significant transformation in 2004 and at the same time performed exceptionally well," said ALLETE President and CEO Don Shippar. "We are stronger as a result, and from what we've accomplished are poised for substantial earnings growth in 2005." Net income from ALLETE's REGULATED UTILITY business grew by 13 percent in 2004 and kilowatthour sales to Minnesota Power's industrial customers were 8 percent higher than last year. Higher benefit and maintenance expenses were more than offset by other lower expenses during 2004. NONREGULATED ENERGY OPERATIONS posted a slight loss in 2004. The net income contributions of the Taconite Harbor energy facility and BNI Coal were offset by losses incurred at the Kendall County facility. ALLETE recently announced that it has reached an agreement to transfer its Kendall County purchased power agreement to a subsidiary of Constellation Energy. The transfer is expected to close in April 2005. Net income from ALLETE's REAL ESTATE business increased by 4 percent in 2004. Demand for Florida property remained strong through the year. "We are excited about our future earnings prospects in this business," said Shippar. Year-end results for ALLETE's OTHER business segment improved by $7.8 million in 2004 over 2003, mainly due to reduced interest expense resulting from lower debt balances. The aforementioned fourth quarter gain of $11.5 million related to the fourth quarter sale of securities held by an employee stock ownership plan offset a third quarter charge of $10.9 million for the early repayment of debt. During 2004, ALLETE spun off its Automotive Services business and substantially completed the sale of its Water Services business. Net income from these DISCONTINUED OPERATIONS was $73.1 million in 2004. On February 4, 2005, ALLETE closed on the sale of its last wastewater system. For the quarter, income from continuing operations was 5 percent higher than the fourth quarter of 2003, excluding the previously mentioned one-time gain. Increased electric sales and lower interest and other expenses offset outage expenses at the Square Butte and the Taconite Harbor energy facilities. "We expect ALLETE's earnings per share from continuing operations to grow by 45 to 50 percent in 2005," said Shippar. The company expects the increase to come from continued strong real estate sales, lower interest expense, and the transfer of the Kendall County purchased power agreement. The earnings expectation excludes an anticipated one-time charge related to the Kendall County agreement. (more)
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE provides energy services in the upper Midwest and has significant real estate holdings in Florida. More information about the company is available on ALLETE's Web site located at www.allete.com. -------------- THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET, DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802 WWW.ALLETE.COM
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE Page 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE Page 4 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- NOTES On September 20, 2004 ALLETE's common stock was split one-for-three. All common share and per share amounts have been adjusted for all periods to reflect the one-for-three reverse stock split.



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20050217150330.txt.gz
TIME:20050217150330
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - FEBRUARY 15, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) sponsors a leveraged employee stock ownership plan (ESOP) as part of the Company's Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan. As a result of the September 2004 spin-off of ADESA, Inc. (ADESA), the ESOP received 3.3 million shares of ADESA common stock related to unearned ESOP shares that have not been allocated to participants. The ESOP was required to sell the ADESA common stock and use the proceeds to purchase ALLETE common stock on the open market. At December 31, 2004, the ESOP had sold all of these ADESA shares. The 3.3 million ADESA shares sold by the ESOP in 2004 resulted in total proceeds of $65.9 million. Under the direction of an independent trustee, the ESOP began using the proceeds to purchase shares of ALLETE common stock in October 2004. As of February 15, 2005, all of the proceeds had been used to purchase ALLETE common stock. As of February 15, 2005, there were 2,727,884 unallocated shares of ALLETE common stock in the ESOP (2,001,505 shares at December 31, 2004), which reflects 759,725 shares purchased and 33,346 shares allocated in 2005. Pursuant to the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants' Statement of Position 93-6, "Employers' Accounting for Employee Stock Ownership Plans," unallocated ALLETE common stock currently held by the ESOP will be treated as unearned ESOP shares and not considered as outstanding for earnings per share computations. ESOP shares are included in earnings per share computations after they are allocated to participants. -------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 17, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - capital market conditions; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 36 of ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 17, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. February 17, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 17, 2005 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20050318172111.txt.gz
TIME:20050318172111
EVENTS:	Changes in Registrant.s Certifying Accountant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Changes in Registrant.s Certifying Accountant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
[PAGE] SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - MARCH 15, 2005 MINNESOTA POWER AND AFFILIATED COMPANIES RETIREMENT SAVINGS AND STOCK OWNERSHIP PLAN (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) C/O ALLETE, INC. 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 4 - MATTERS RELATED TO ACCOUNTANTS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENTS ITEM 4.01 CHANGES IN REGISTRANT'S CERTIFYING ACCOUNTANT. (a) Previous Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm On March 15, 2005, the Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan (RSOP) dismissed PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP (PricewaterhouseCoopers) as its independent registered public accounting firm. ALLETE, Inc., the sponsoring employer and plan administrator of the RSOP, continues to engage PricewaterhouseCoopers as its independent registered public accounting firm. The decision to change independent registered public accounting firms was approved by the Employee Benefit Plans Committee of the RSOP. The reports of PricewaterhouseCoopers on the financial statements of the RSOP for the years ended December 31, 2003 and 2002, did not contain an adverse opinion or disclaimer of opinion, nor were they qualified or modified as to uncertainty, audit scope, or accounting principle. During the years ended December 31, 2003 and 2002, and through March 15, 2005, there have been no disagreements with PricewaterhouseCoopers on any matter of accounting principles or practices, financial statement disclosure, or auditing scope or procedure, which disagreements, if not resolved to the satisfaction of PricewaterhouseCoopers, would have caused PricewaterhouseCoopers to make reference thereto in their reports on the financial statements for such years. During the years ended December 31, 2003 and 2002, and through March 15, 2005, there were no "reportable events," as that term is defined in Item 304(a)(1)(v) of Regulation S-K. A copy of the foregoing disclosures was provided to PricewaterhouseCoopers prior to the date of the filing of this report. PricewaterhouseCoopers has furnished the RSOP a copy of the letter addressed to the Securities and Exchange Commission stating whether or not it agrees with the statements above. A copy of PricewaterhouseCoopers' letter, dated March 18, 2005, is filed as Exhibit 16 to this Form 8-K. (b) New Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm On March 15, 2005, the RSOP engaged the professional audit services of Reilly, Penner & Benton LLP (Reilly, Penner & Benton), an independent registered public accounting firm, to audit its financial statements for the year ended December 31, 2004. During the years ended December 31, 2003 and 2002, and through March 15, 2005, RSOP did not consult with Reilly, Penner & Benton regarding any of the matters or events set forth in Item 304(a)(2)(i) and (ii) of Regulation S-K. SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 16 - Letter from PricewaterhouseCoopers, dated March 18, 2005, to the Securities and Exchange Commission. ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 18, 2005 1
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan By: ALLETE, Inc., its Plan Administrator -------------------------------------------------- March 18, 2005 Deborah A. Amberg -------------------------------------------------- Deborah A. Amberg Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 18, 2005
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 16 - Letter from PricewaterhouseCoopers, dated March 18, 2005, to the Securities and Exchange Commission. ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 18, 2005

EXHIBIT 16 [PRICEWATERHOUSECOOPERS LLP LETTERHEAD] March 18, 2005 Securities and Exchange Commission 450 Fifth Street, N.W. Washington, D.C. 20549 Commissioners: We have read the statements made by the Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan (copy attached), which we understand will be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, pursuant to Item 4.01 of Form 8-K, as part of the Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan's Form 8-K report dated March 15, 2005. We agree with the statements concerning our Firm in such Form 8-K. Very truly yours, /s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20050329122237.txt.gz
TIME:20050329122237
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - MARCH 28, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS. On March 28, 2005, the Town Center at Palm Coast Community Development District (Palm Coast CDD) issued $26.4 million of tax-exempt, 6% Capital Improvement Revenue Bonds, Series 2005, due May 1, 2036 (Bonds). The Bonds were issued to fund a portion of ALLETE Properties, Inc.'s Town Center at Palm Coast development project in Florida (Town Center). Approximately $21 million of the Bond proceeds will be used for construction of infrastructure improvements at Town Center, with the remaining funds to be used for capitalized interest, a debt service reserve fund and costs of issuance. The Bonds are payable from and secured by the revenue derived from assessments imposed, levied and collected by the Palm Coast CDD. The assessments represent an allocation of the costs of the improvements, including bond financing costs, to the lands within the Palm Coast CDD benefiting from the improvements. The assessments will be included in the annual property tax bills of land owners beginning in November 2006. Additional Town Center development costs, estimated at approximately $26 million (up to $11 million of which are reimbursable through traffic impact fee credits), will be financed with an $8.5 million revolving development loan of Florida Landmark Communities, Inc., which is guaranteed by Lehigh Acquisition Corporation. The initial term of the revolving development loan is 36 months. Palm Coast CDD is an independent unit of local government, created and established in accordance with Florida's Uniform Community Development District Act of 1980 (Act). The Act provides legal authority for a community development district to finance the construction of major infrastructure for community development with general obligation, revenue and special assessment revenue debt obligations. ALLETE Properties, Inc. is a wholly-owned subsidiary of ALLETE, Inc. The developer of Town Center is Florida Landmark Communities, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of Lehigh Acquisition Corporation, which is an 80 percent owned subsidiary of ALLETE Properties, Inc. -------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 29, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - capital market conditions; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 36 of ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 29, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. March 29, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 29, 2005 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20050401125710.txt.gz
TIME:20050401125710
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - APRIL 1, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State of Incorporation) (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS On April 1, 2005, Rainy River Energy Corporation, a wholly owned subsidiary of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE), completed the assignment of its power purchase agreement with LSP-Kendall Energy, LLC, the owner of an energy generation facility located in Kendall County, Illinois, to Constellation Energy Commodities Group, Inc. ALLETE's April 1, 2005, press release describing this agreement is attached as Exhibit 99 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein. SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------ 99 - ALLETE News Release dated April 1, 2005, announcing the completion of the transfer of the Kendall Energy Agreements. -------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 1, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - capital market conditions; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 36 of ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 1, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. April 1, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 1, 2005 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated April 1, 2005, announcing the completion of the transfer of the Kendall Energy Agreements. ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 1, 2005

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: April 1, 2005 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE, INC. TRANSFERS KENDALL ENERGY AGREEMENTS ------------------------------------------------ DULUTH, Minn.--ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) announced today that its subsidiary, Rainy River Energy Corporation, completed the assignment of its power purchase agreement with LSP-Kendall Energy, LLC, the owner of an energy generation facility located in Kendall County, Ill., to Constellation Energy Commodities Group, Inc., a subsidiary of Constellation Energy Group, Inc. (NYSE: CEG). Rainy River Energy paid Constellation Energy Commodities $73 million in cash (approximately $46 million after taxes) to assume the power purchase agreement, which is in effect through mid-September 2017. The tax benefits of the transaction will be received in the first half of 2006. In addition, consent, advisory and closing costs of approximately $5 million were incurred to complete the transaction. In 1999, Rainy River Energy entered into a long-term agreement to purchase approximately 275 megawatts of nonregulated generation capacity (non-rate base generation sold at market-based rates to the wholesale market) from the Kendall County facility. Subsequent to that agreement, Rainy River Energy sold approximately 130 megawatts of this capacity under long-term contracts. Those contracts were also transferred to Constellation Energy Commodities at closing. The Kendall County facility, located just south of Chicago, became operational in May 2002. "The successful exit from the Kendall County position is a crucial component of our long-term strategy," said Don Shippar, ALLETE President and CEO. "We will now be better able to focus our attention on the growth and development of businesses that are central to our future." ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE provides energy services in the upper Midwest and has significant real estate holdings in Florida. More information about the company is available on ALLETE's Web site at www.allete.com. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES, AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET, DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802 WWW.ALLETE.COM



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20050516164226.txt.gz
TIME:20050516164226
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - MAY 10, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other jurisdiction (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer of incorporation or Identification No.) organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 1 - REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS ITEM 1.01 ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT On May 10, 2005, shareholders of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) approved the continuation of the Company's Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan (Plan), as amended and restated effective January 1, 2006. The Plan is integral to ALLETE's ability to attract and retain talented executives and to more closely align their interests with those of shareholders and customers. Approximately 58 officers and key employees of ALLETE and its subsidiaries currently participate in the Plan. The Plan is included as an Exhibit to this Form 8-K and is incorporated by reference herein. SECTION 7 - REGULATION FD ITEM 7.01 REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE In 2005, ALLETE began allocating corporate charges and interest expenses to its business segments. For comparative purposes, segment information for 2004 has been restated to reflect the new allocation method used in 2005 for corporate charges and interest expense. This restatement had no impact on net income or earnings per share. Segment information for the quarter ended March 31, 2004, was provided in the Company's Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2005, filed with the SEC on April 29, 2005. The following shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. 1 ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 16, 2005
SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 10 - Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan as amended and restated effective January 1, 2006. --------------------------------------------------- Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETE's disclosures under the heading: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" located on page 3 of this Form 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 16, 2005 2
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - our ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" beginning on page 36 of ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 3 ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 16, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. May 16, 2005 /s/ James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 16, 2005 4
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 10 - Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan as amended and restated effective January 1, 2006 ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 16, 2005

EXHIBIT 99 ALLETE EXECUTIVE LONG-TERM INCENTIVE COMPENSATION PLAN AS AMENDED AND RESTATED EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2006
ALLETE EXECUTIVE LONG-TERM INCENTIVE COMPENSATION PLAN AS AMENDED AND RESTATED EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2006 ARTICLE 1. ESTABLISHMENT, PURPOSE AND DURATION 1.1 ESTABLISHMENT OF THE PLAN. ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation, formerly Minnesota Power & Light Company (hereinafter referred to as the "Company"), established an incentive compensation plan known as the "ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan" (hereinafter referred to as the "Plan"), as set forth in this document. The Plan permits the grant of nonqualified stock options ("NQSO"), incentive stock options ("ISO"), stock appreciation rights ("SAR"), restricted stock, performance units, performance shares and other grants. Capitalized terms are defined in Article 17. The Plan first became effective as of January 1, 1996, and shall remain in effect as provided in Section 1.3 herein. This Plan document reflects the amendment and restatement of the Plan which will become effective upon shareholder approval as of January 1, 2006 (the "Effective Date"), and applies to Grants issued on or after January 1, 2006, and Grants exercised on or after January 1, 2006. 1.2 PURPOSE OF THE PLAN. The purpose of the Plan is to promote the success and enhance the value of the Company by linking the personal interests of Participants to those of Company shareholders and customers, providing Participants with an incentive for outstanding performance. The Plan is further intended to assist the Company in its ability to motivate, attract and retain the services of Participants upon whom the successful conduct of its operations is largely dependent. 1.3 DURATION OF THE PLAN. The Plan shall remain in effect, subject to the right of the Board of Directors to terminate the Plan at any time pursuant to Article 13 herein, until all Shares subject to it shall have been purchased or acquired according to the Plan's provisions; provided, however, in no event may a Grant be made under the Plan on or after the tenth anniversary of the Effective Date. ARTICLE 2. ADMINISTRATION 2.1 THE COMMITTEE. The Plan shall be administered by the Executive Compensation Committee of the Board consisting of not less than three (3) Directors. The members of the Committee shall be appointed from time to time by, and shall serve at the discretion of, the Board of Directors. The Committee, to the extent necessary, shall be comprised solely of Directors who are: (a) "non-employee directors" as contemplated by Rule 16b-3 under the Exchange Act; (b) "outside directors" as contemplated by Section 162(m) of the Code; and (c) "independent directors" as contemplated by Section 303A.02 of the New York Stock Exchange Listed Company Manual. 2.2 AUTHORITY OF THE COMMITTEE. The Committee shall have full power except as limited by law, the Articles of Incorporation and the Bylaws of the Company, subject to such other restricting limitations or directions as may be imposed by the Board and subject to the provisions herein, to determine the size and types of Grants; to determine the terms and conditions of such Grants in a manner consistent with the Plan; to construe and interpret the Plan and any agreement or instrument entered into under the Plan; to establish, amend or waive rules and regulations for the Plan's administration; and (subject to the provisions of Article 13 herein) to amend the terms and conditions of any outstanding Grant; provided, however, the Committee may award or grant only those types of Grants that either comply with the applicable requirements of Section 409A of the Code and related guidance, or do not result in the deferral of compensation within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code and related guidance. Further, the Committee shall make all other determinations which may be necessary or advisable for the administration of the Plan. As permitted by law, the Committee may delegate its authorities as identified hereunder. 1
2.3 DECISIONS BINDING. All determinations and decisions made by the Committee pursuant to the provisions of the Plan and all related orders or resolutions of the Board shall be final, conclusive and binding on all persons, including the Company, its shareholders, Employees, Participants and their estates and beneficiaries. 2.4 COSTS. The Company shall pay all costs of administration of the Plan. ARTICLE 3. SHARES SUBJECT TO THE PLAN 3.1 NUMBER OF SHARES. Subject to Section 3.2 herein, the total number of Shares available for grant under the Plan shall not exceed three million, two hundred thirty three thousand, three hundred thirty three (3,233,333) Shares as authorized at the time of the annual meeting of shareholders on May 10, 2005 reduced by the number of Shares as to which Options or Shares have been granted or exercised. Shares may be (i) authorized but unissued Shares of common stock, or (ii) Shares purchased on the open market. Shares underlying lapsed or forfeited Grants, Grants that are not paid in shares, previously acquired Shares tendered to exercise an Option, or Shares withheld in accordance with Section 14.2 to satisfy tax withholding obligations may be re-used for other Grants. Subject to Section 3.2 herein, to the extent consistent with Sections 422 and 424 of the Code, not more than an aggregate of three million, two hundred thirty three thousand, three hundred thirty three (3,233,333) Shares may be issued under Incentive Stock Options. 3.2 ADJUSTMENTS IN AUTHORIZED SHARES. In the event of any merger, reorganization, consolidation, recapitalization, separation, liquidation, stock dividend, split-up, share combination or other change in the corporate structure of the Company affecting the Shares, such adjustment shall be made in the number and class of Shares which may be delivered under the Plan, and in the number and class of and/or price of Shares subject to outstanding Grants made under the Plan, as may be determined to be appropriate and equitable by the Committee, in its sole discretion, to prevent dilution or enlargement of rights; provided, however, that the number of Shares subject to any Grant shall always be a whole number. Notwithstanding the foregoing or any Plan provision to the contrary, any substitution of a new Option pursuant to a corporate transaction for an outstanding Option or the assumption of an outstanding Option shall meet the requirements of Treasury Regulation Section 1.424-1. The preceding sentence shall apply to "incentive stock options" as that term is defined in Section 422 of the Code and nonqualified stock options. ARTICLE 4. ELIGIBILITY AND PARTICIPATION 4.1 ELIGIBILITY. Persons eligible to participate in the Plan include all officers and key employees of the Company and its Subsidiaries, as determined by the Committee, including Employees who are members of the Board, but excluding Directors who are not Employees. 4.2 ACTUAL PARTICIPATION. Subject to the provisions of the Plan, the Committee may, from time to time, select from all Eligible Employees those to whom Grants shall be made and shall determine the nature and amount of each Grant. ARTICLE 5. STOCK OPTIONS 5.1 GRANT OF OPTIONS. Subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan, Options may be granted to an Eligible Employee at any time and from time to time, as shall be determined by the Committee. The Committee shall have complete discretion in determining the number of Shares subject to Options granted to each participant (subject to Article 3 herein) and consistent with the provisions of the Plan, in determining the terms and conditions pertaining to such Options; provided, however, the maximum number of Shares subject to Options which may be granted to any single Participant during any one calendar year is one hundred thousand (100,000). The Committee may grant ISOs, NQSOs or a combination thereof. 5.2 OPTION GRANT AGREEMENT. Each Option grant shall be evidenced by an Option Grant Agreement that shall specify the Option Price, the duration of the Option, the number of Shares to which the Option pertains, the Exercise Period and such other provisions as the Committee shall determine. The Option Grant Agreement also shall specify whether the Option is intended to be an ISO or a NQSO. 5.3 OPTION PRICE. The Option Price for each Option granted under the Plan shall be the Fair Market Value of a Share on the date of grant, or such higher price as the Committee may determine. 2
5.4 DURATION OF OPTIONS. Each Option shall expire at such time as the Committee shall determine at the time of grant; provided, however, that no Option shall be exercisable later than the tenth (10th) anniversary of its date of grant. 5.5 DIVIDEND EQUIVALENTS. To the extent permitted by Section 2.2 herein, simultaneously with the grant of an Option, the Participant receiving the Option may be granted Dividend Equivalents with respect to the Shares subject to such Option. Dividend Equivalents shall constitute rights to amounts equal to the dividends declared on equal number of outstanding Shares on all payment dates occurring during the period between the grant date of an Option and the date the Option is exercised. The Committee shall determine at the time Dividend Equivalents are granted the conditions, if any, to which the payment of such Dividend Equivalents is subject. 5.6 EXERCISE OF AND PAYMENT FOR OPTIONS. Options granted under the Plan shall be exercisable at such times and be subject to such restrictions and conditions as the Committee shall in each instance approve, which need not be the same for each Grant or for each Participant. However, in no event may an Option granted under the Plan become exercisable prior to six (6) months following the date of its grant. A Participant may exercise an Option at any time during the Exercise Period. Options shall be exercised by the delivery of a written notice of exercise to the Company or its designated agent, setting forth the number of Shares with respect to which the Option is to be exercised, accompanied by provisions for full payment for the Shares. The Option Price upon exercise of any Option shall be payable to the Company in full either: (a) in cash or its equivalent, (b) by tendering, either by actual or constructive delivery, previously acquired Shares having an aggregate fair market value at the time of exercise equal to the total Option Price (provided that the Shares which are tendered must have been held by the Participant for at least six months prior to their tender to satisfy the Option Price), (c) by Share withholding or (d) by a combination of (a), (b), and/or (c). To the extent not prohibited by Section 402 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, the Committee also may allow cashless exercise as permitted under Federal Reserve Board's Regulation T, subject to applicable securities law restrictions, or by any other means which the Committee determines to be consistent with the Plan's purpose and applicable law. As soon as practicable after receipt of a written notification of exercise of an Option and provisions for full payment therefor, the Company shall deliver to the Participant, in the Participant's name, Shares in an appropriate amount based upon the number of Shares purchased under the Option(s). 5.7 RESTRICTIONS ON SHARE TRANSFERABILITY. The Committee may impose such restrictions on any Shares acquired pursuant to the exercise of an Option under the Plan as it may deem advisable, including, without limitation, restrictions to comply with applicable Federal securities laws, with the requirements of any stock exchange or market upon which such Shares are then listed and/or traded and with any blue sky or state securities laws applicable to such Shares. 5.8 TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT. Each Option Grant Agreement shall set forth the extent to which the Participant shall have the right to exercise the Option following termination of the Participant's employment with the Company and its Subsidiaries. Such provisions shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Committee, shall be included in the Option Grant Agreement entered into with Participants, need not be uniform among all Options granted pursuant to the Plan or among Participants and may reflect distinctions based on the reasons for termination of employment. 5.9 NONTRANSFERABILITY OF OPTIONS. No Option granted under the Plan may be sold, transferred, pledged, assigned, or otherwise alienated or hypothecated, other than by will or by the laws of descent and distribution. Further, all Options granted to a Participant under the Plan shall be exercisable during his or her lifetime only by such Participant or his or her legal representative. 3
ARTICLE 6. STOCK APPRECIATION RIGHTS 6.1 GRANT OF SARs. To the extent permitted by Section 2.2 herein, and subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan, an SAR may be granted to an Eligible Employee at any time and from time to time, as shall be determined by the Committee. The Committee may grant Freestanding SARs, Tandem SARs or any combination of these forms of SARs. The Committee shall have complete discretion in determining the number of SARs granted to each Participant (subject to Article 3 herein) and, consistent with the provisions of the Plan, in determining the terms and conditions pertaining to such SARs; provided, however, the maximum number of SARs which may be granted to any single Participant during any one calendar year is one hundred thousand (100,000). The Base Value of a Freestanding SAR shall equal the Fair Market Value of a Share on the date of grant of the SAR. The Base Value of Tandem SARs shall equal the Option Price of the related Option. In no event shall any SAR granted hereunder become exercisable within the first six (6) months of its grant. 6.2 SAR GRANT AGREEMENT. Each SAR grant shall be evidenced by a SAR Grant Agreement that shall specify the number of SARs granted, the Base Value, the term of the SAR (not to exceed ten (10) years), the Exercise Period and such other provisions as the Committee shall determine. 6.3 EXERCISE OF TANDEM SARs. Tandem SARs may be exercised for all or part of the Shares subject to the related Option upon the surrender of the right to exercise the equivalent portion of the related Option. A Tandem SAR may be exercised only with respect to the Shares for which its related Option is then exercisable. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Plan to the contrary, with respect to a Tandem SAR granted in connection with an ISO: (i) the Tandem SAR will expire no later than the expiration of the underlying ISO; (ii) the value of the payout with respect to the Tandem SAR may be for no more than one hundred percent (100%) of the difference between the Option Price of the underlying ISO and the Fair Market Value of the Shares subject to the underlying ISO at the time the Tandem SAR is exercised; and (iii) the Tandem SAR may be exercised only when the Fair Market Value of the Shares subject to the ISO exceeds the Option Price of the ISO. 6.4 EXERCISE OF FREESTANDING SARs. Freestanding SARs may be exercised upon whatever terms and conditions the Committee, in its sole discretion, imposes upon them. 6.5 EXERCISE AND PAYMENT OF SARs. A Participant may exercise an SAR at any time during the Exercise Period. SARs shall be exercised by the delivery of a written notice of exercise to the Company or its designated agent, setting forth the number of SARs being exercised. Upon exercise of an SAR, a Participant shall be entitled to receive payment from the Company in an amount equal to the product of: (a) the excess of (i) the Fair Market Value of a Share on the date of exercise over (ii) the Base Value of the SAR, multiplied by (b) the number of Shares with respect to which the SAR is exercised. The payment upon SAR exercise shall be in Shares of equivalent value. 6.6 TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT. Each SAR Grant Agreement shall set forth the extent to which the Participant shall have the right to exercise the SAR following termination of the Participant employment with the Company and its Subsidiaries. Such provisions shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Committee, shall be included in the SAR Grant Agreement entered into with Participants, need not be uniform among all SARs granted pursuant to the Plan or among Participants and may reflect distinctions based on the reasons for termination of employment. 6.7 NONTRANSFERABILITY OF SARs. No SAR granted under the Plan may be sold, transferred, pledged, assigned, or otherwise alienated or hypothecated, other than by will or by the laws of descent and distribution. Further, all SARs granted to a Participant under the Plan shall be exercisable during his or her lifetime only by such Participant or his or her legal representative. 4
ARTICLE 7. RESTRICTED STOCK 7.1 GRANT OF RESTRICTED STOCK. To the extent permitted by Section 2.2 herein, and subject to the terms and conditions of the Plan, Restricted Stock may be granted to Eligible Employees at any time and from time to time, as shall be determined by the Committee. The Committee shall have complete discretion in determining the number of shares of Restricted Stock granted to each Participant (subject to Article 3 herein) and, consistent with the provisions of the Plan, in determining the terms and conditions pertaining to such Restricted Stock; provided, however, the maximum number of shares of Restricted Stock which may be granted to any single Participant during any one calendar year is twenty thousand (20,000). 7.2 RESTRICTED STOCK GRANT AGREEMENT. Each Restricted Stock Grant shall be evidenced by a Restricted Stock Grant Agreement that shall specify the Period or Periods of Restriction, the number of Restricted Stock Shares granted and such other provisions as the Committee shall determine. The Period or Periods of Restriction shall end only on the terms and conditions determined by the Committee and specified in the Restricted Stock Grant Agreement, which may include the attainment of one or more Performance Goals or upon one or more specified dates. 7.3 TRANSFERABILITY. Except as provided in this Article 7, Restricted Stock granted herein may not be sold, transferred, pledged, assigned, or otherwise alienated or hypothecated until the end of the applicable Period of Restriction established by the Committee and specified in the Restricted Stock Grant Agreement. However, in no event may any Restricted Stock granted under the Plan become vested in a Participant prior to six (6) months following the date of its grant. All rights with respect to the Restricted Stock granted to a Participant under the Plan shall be available during his or her lifetime and such rights are not assignable or transferable. 7.4 CERTIFICATE LEGEND. Each certificate representing Restricted Stock granted pursuant to the Plan may bear a legend substantially as follows: "The sale or other transfer of the shares of stock represented by this certificate, whether voluntary, involuntary or by operation of law, is subject to certain restrictions on transfer as set forth in the ALLETE, Inc. Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan, and in a Restricted Stock Grant Agreement. A copy of such Plan and such Agreement may be obtained from ALLETE, Inc." The Company shall have the right to retain the certificates representing Restricted Stock in the Company's possession until such time as all restrictions applicable to such Shares have been satisfied. 7.5 REMOVAL OF RESTRICTIONS. Except as otherwise provided in this Article 7, Restricted Stock shall become freely transferable by the Participant after the last day of the Period of Restriction applicable thereto. Once Restricted Stock is released from the restrictions, the Participant shall be entitled to have the legend referred to in Section 7.4 removed from his or her stock certificate. 7.6 VOTING RIGHTS. During the Period of Restriction, Participants holding Restricted Stock may exercise full voting rights with respect to those Shares. 7.7 DIVIDENDS AND OTHER DISTRIBUTIONS. During the Period of Restriction, Participants holding Restricted Stock shall be credited with all regular cash dividends paid with respect to all Shares while they are so held. All cash dividends and other distributions paid with respect to Restricted Stock shall be credited to Participants subject to the same restrictions on transferability and forfeitability as the Restricted Stock with respect to which they were paid. If any such dividends or distributions are paid in Shares, such Shares shall be subject to the same restrictions on transferability and forfeitability as the Restricted Stock with respect to which they were paid. Subject to the restrictions on vesting and the forfeiture provisions, all dividends credited to a Participant shall be paid to the Participant promptly following the full vesting of the Restricted Stock with respect to which such dividends were paid. The provisions of this Section 7.7 are subject to the right of the Committee to determine otherwise at the time of grant. 7.8 TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT. Each Restricted Stock Grant Agreement shall set forth the extent to which the Participant shall have the right to receive unvested Restricted Shares following termination of the Participant's employment with the Company and its Subsidiaries. Such provisions shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Committee, shall be included in the Restricted Stock Grant Agreement entered into with 5
Participants, need not be uniform among all grants of Restricted Stock or among Participants and may reflect distinctions based on the reasons for termination of employment. ARTICLE 8. PERFORMANCE UNITS AND PERFORMANCE SHARES 8.1 GRANT OF PERFORMANCE UNITS AND PERFORMANCE SHARES. To the extent permitted by Section 2.2, and subject to the terms of the Plan, Performance Units and/or Performance Shares may be granted to an Eligible Employee at any time and from time to time, as shall be determined by the Committee. The Committee shall have complete discretion in determining the number of Performance Units and/or Performance Shares granted to each Participant (subject to Article 3 herein) and, consistent with the provisions of the Plan, in determining the terms and conditions pertaining to such Grants; provided, however, the maximum award to any single Participant with respect to Performance Units granted in any one calendar year shall be 200% of base salary determined at the time the Performance Goals are established by the Committee, but in no event more than $1,000,000, and with respect to Performance Shares shall be twenty thousand (20,000) Shares. 8.2 PERFORMANCE UNIT/PERFORMANCE SHARE GRANT AGREEMENT. Each grant of Performance Units and/or Performance Shares shall be evidenced by a Performance Unit and/or Performance Share Grant Agreement that shall specify the number of Performance Units and/or Performance Shares granted, the initial value (if applicable), the Performance Period, the Performance Goals and such other provisions as the Committee shall determine, including, but not limited to, any right to Dividend Equivalents during or after the Performance Period. 8.3 VALUE OF PERFORMANCE UNITS/SHARES. Each Performance Unit shall have an initial value that is established by the Committee at the time of grant. The value of a Performance Share shall equal the value of one Share. The Committee shall set Performance Goals in its discretion which, depending on the extent to which they are met, will determine the number and/or value of Performance Units/Shares that will be paid out to the Participants. 8.4 EARNING OF PERFORMANCE UNITS/SHARES. After the applicable Performance Period has ended, the holder of Performance Units/Shares shall be entitled to receive payout with respect to the Performance Units/Shares earned by the Participant over the Performance Period, to be determined as a function of the extent to which the corresponding Performance Goals have been achieved. 8.5 FORM AND TIMING OF PAYMENT OF PERFORMANCE UNITS/SHARES. Payment of earned Performance Units/Shares shall be made following the close of the applicable Performance Period. The Committee, in its sole discretion, may pay earned Performance Units/Shares in cash or in Shares (or in a combination thereof), which have an aggregate Fair Market Value equal to the value of the earned Performance Units/Shares at the close of the applicable Performance Period. Such Shares may be granted subject to any restrictions deemed appropriate by the Committee. 8.6 DIVIDEND EQUIVALENTS. To the extent permitted by Section 2.2 herein, simultaneously with the grant of Performance Shares, the Participant may be granted Dividend Equivalents with respect to such Performance Shares. Dividend Equivalents shall constitute rights to amounts equal to the dividends declared on an equal number of outstanding Shares on all payment dates occurring during the period between the grant date and the date the Performance Shares are earned or paid out. The Committee shall determine at the time Dividend Equivalents are granted the conditions, if any, to which the payment of such Dividend Equivalents is subject. 8.7 TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT. Each Grant Agreement shall set forth the extent to which the Participant shall have the right to receive a Performance Unit/Share payout following termination of the Participant's employment with the Company and its Subsidiaries. Such provisions shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Committee, shall be included in the Grant Agreement entered into with the Participants, need not be uniform among all grants of Performance Units/Shares or among Participants and may reflect distinctions based upon reasons for termination of employment. 8.8 NONTRANSFERABILITY. Performance Units/Shares may not be sold, transferred, pledged, assigned or otherwise alienated or hypothecated, other than by will or by the laws of descent and distribution. Further, a Participant's rights under the Plan shall be exercisable during his or her lifetime only by such Participant or his or her legal representative. 6
ARTICLE 9. OTHER GRANTS To the extent permitted by Section 2.2 herein and subject to Article 3 herein, the Committee shall have the right to make other Grants which may include, without limitation, the grant of Shares based on certain conditions, the payment of cash based on Performance Goals, or other criteria established by the Committee, and the payment of Shares in lieu of cash under other Company incentive or bonus programs. Payment under or settlement of any such Grants shall be made in such manner and at such times as the Committee may determine. ARTICLE 10. BENEFICIARY DESIGNATION Each Participant under the Plan may, from time to time, name any beneficiary or beneficiaries (who may be named contingently or successively) to whom any benefit under the Plan is to be paid in case of his or her death before he or she receives any or all of such benefit. Each such designation shall revoke all prior designations by the same Participant, shall be in a form prescribed by the Committee, and will be effective only when filed by the Participant in writing with the Committee during the Participant's lifetime. In the absence of any such designation, benefits remaining unpaid at the Participant's death shall be paid to the Participant's estate. The spouse of a married Participant domiciled in a community property jurisdiction shall join any designation of beneficiary or beneficiaries other than the spouse. ARTICLE 11. RIGHTS OF EMPLOYEES 11.1 EMPLOYMENT. Nothing in the Plan shall interfere with or limit in any way the right of the Company to terminate any Participant's employment at any time, for any reason or no reason in the Company's sole discretion, nor confer upon any Participant any right to continue in the employ of the Company. 11.2 PARTICIPATION. No Employee shall have the right to be selected to receive a Grant under the Plan, or, having been so selected, to be selected to receive a future Grant. ARTICLE 12. CHANGE IN CONTROL Upon the occurrence of a Change in Control, unless otherwise specifically prohibited by the terms of Article 16 herein or unless the Committee provides otherwise prior to the Change in Control: (a) Any and all Options and SARs granted hereunder shall become immediately exercisable; (b) Any Period of Restriction and restrictions imposed on Restricted Stock shall be deemed to have expired; (c) With respect to all outstanding Grants of Performance Units, Performance Shares and other performance-based Grants, the Committee (i) shall determine the greater of (x) the payout at 100% of the number of Performance Units or Shares granted for the entire Performance Period and (y) the payout based upon actual performance for the Performance Period ending as of the effective date of the Change in Control in either case after giving effect to the accumulation of Dividend Equivalents and (ii) shall pay to the Participants the greater of such amounts, prorated based upon the number of complete and partial calendar months within the Performance Period which have elapsed as of the effective date of the Change in Control in relation to the number of calendar months in the full Performance Period. Payment shall be made in cash or in stock, as determined by the Committee. However, there shall not be an accelerated payout under this Section 12(c) with respect to Grants of Performance Units, Performance Shares or other performance-based Grants which were made less than six (6) months prior to the effective date of the Change in Control; and (d) All earned Performance Units, Performance Shares and other performance-based Grants (as increased by any Dividend Equivalents to the date of payment) not yet paid out shall be paid out immediately, in cash or in stock, as determined by the Committee. 7
ARTICLE 13. AMENDMENT, MODIFICATION AND TERMINATION 13.1 AMENDMENT, MODIFICATION AND TERMINATION. The Board may, at any time and from time to time, alter, amend, suspend or terminate the Plan in whole or in part; provided, however, that no amendment which requires shareholder approval in order for the Plan to comply with Section 422 of the Code, Section 303A.08 of the New York Stock Exchange Listed Company Manual, or any other applicable law, regulation or rule, shall be effective unless such amendment shall be approved by the requisite vote of the shareholders of the Company entitled to vote thereon. 13.2 GRANTS PREVIOUSLY MADE. No termination, amendment or modification of the Plan shall adversely affect in any material way any Grant previously made under the Plan, without the written consent of the Participant holding such Grant unless such termination, modification or amendment is required by applicable law. ARTICLE 14. WITHHOLDING 14.1 TAX WITHHOLDING. The Company shall have the power and the right to deduct or withhold, or require a Participant to remit to the Company, an amount sufficient to satisfy federal, state and local taxes (including the Participant's FICA obligation) required by law to be withheld with respect to a Grant made under the Plan; provided, however, with respect to any Grant that is subject to Section 409A of the Code, the Company may, to the extent permitted by Section 409A of the Code, permit the acceleration of the time or schedule of a payment to pay the FICA Amount, and any related income tax at source imposed by Section 3401 of the Code on the FICA Amount. 14.2 SHARE WITHHOLDING. With respect to withholding required upon the exercise of Options or SARs, upon the lapse of restrictions on Restricted Stock, or upon any other taxable event arising out of or as a result of Grants made hereunder, Participants may elect, subject to the approval of the Committee, to satisfy the withholding requirement, in whole or in part, by having the Company withhold Shares having a Fair Market Value on the date the tax is to be determined equal to the minimum statutory total tax which could be imposed on the transaction; provided, however, with respect to any Grant that is subject to Section 409A of the Code, the Company may, to the extent permitted by Section 409A of the Code, permit the acceleration of the time or schedule of a payment to pay the FICA Amount, and any related income tax at source imposed by Section 3401 of the Code on the FICA Amount. All elections shall be irrevocable, made in writing and signed by the Participant. ARTICLE 15. SUCCESSORS All obligations of the Company under the Plan, with respect to Grants made hereunder, shall be binding on any successor to the Company, whether the existence of such successor is the result of a direct or indirect purchase, merger, consolidation or otherwise, of all or substantially all of the business and/or assets of the Company. ARTICLE 16. LEGAL CONSTRUCTION 16.1 GENDER AND NUMBER. Except where otherwise indicated by the context, any masculine term used herein also shall include the feminine, the plural shall include the singular and the singular shall include the plural. 16.2 SEVERABILITY. In the event any provision of the Plan shall be held illegal or invalid for any reason, the illegality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining parts of the Plan, and the Plan shall be construed and enforced as if the illegal or invalid provision had not been included. 16.3 REQUIREMENTS OF LAW. The making of Grants and the issuance of Shares under the Plan shall be subject to all applicable laws, rules and regulations, and to such approvals by any governmental agencies or national securities exchanges as may be required. Notwithstanding any other provision set forth in the Plan, if required by the then-current Section 16 of the Exchange Act, any "derivative security" or "equity security" offered pursuant to the Plan to any Insider may not be sold or transferred within the minimum time limits specified or required in such rule, except to the extent Rule 16b-3 exempts any such sale or transfer from the restrictions of Section 16. The terms "equity security" and "derivative security" shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the then-current Rule 16a-l under the Exchange Act. 8
16.4 SECURITIES LAW COMPLIANCE. With respect to Insiders, transactions under the Plan are intended to comply with all applicable conditions of the Federal securities laws. To the extent any provision of the Plan or action by the Committee fails to so comply, it shall be deemed null and void, to the extent permitted by law and deemed advisable by the Committee. 16.5 GOVERNING LAW. To the extent not preempted by Federal law, the Plan, and all agreements hereunder, shall be construed in accordance with, and governed by, the laws of the State of Minnesota. ARTICLE 17. DEFINITIONS Whenever used in the Plan, the following terms shall have the meanings set forth below and, when such meaning is intended, the initial letter of the word is capitalized: "Base Value" of an SAR shall have the meaning set forth in Section 6.1 herein. "Board" or "Board of Directors" means the Board of Directors of the Company. "Cause" means: (i) willful misconduct on the part of a Participant that is detrimental to the Company or (ii) the conviction of a Participant for the commission of a felony or crime involving moral turpitude. "Cause" under either (i) or (ii) shall be determined in good faith by the Committee. "Change in Control" of the Company shall be deemed to have occurred as of the first day that any one or more of the following conditions shall have been satisfied: (a) the dissolution or liquidation of the Company; (b) a reorganization, merger or consolidation of the Company with one or more unrelated corporations, as a result of which the Company is not the surviving corporation; (c) the sale, exchange, transfer or other disposition of shares of the common stock of the Company (or shares of the stock of any person that is a shareholder of the Company) in one or more transactions, related or unrelated, to one or more Persons unrelated to the Company if, as a result of such transactions, any Person (or any Person and its affiliates) owns more than twenty percent (20%) of the voting power of the outstanding common stock of the Company; or (d) the sale of all or substantially all the assets of the Company. "Code" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time. "Committee" means the committee, as specified in Article 2, appointed by the Board to administer the Plan with respect to Grants. "Company" means ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation, formerly known as Minnesota Power & Light Company, or any successor thereto as provided in Article 15 herein. "Director" means any individual who is a member of the Board of Directors of the Company. "Dividend Equivalent" means, with respect to Shares subject to Options or Performance Shares, a right to an amount equal to dividends declared on an equal number of outstanding Shares. "Effective Date" means January 1, 2006. "Eligible Employee" means an Employee who is eligible to participate in the Plan, as set forth in Section 4.1 herein. "Employee" means any employee of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries, who is not covered by any collective bargaining agreement to which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries is a party. Directors who are not otherwise employed by the Company shall not be considered Employees under the Plan. For purposes of the Plan, transfer of employment of a Participant between the Company and any one of its Subsidiaries (or between Subsidiaries) shall not be deemed a termination of employment. 9
"Exchange Act" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended from time to time, or any successor act thereto. "Exercise Period" means the period during which an SAR or Option is exercisable, as set forth in the related Grant Agreement. "Fair Market Value" means the closing sale price as reported in the composite reporting system or, if there is no such sale on the relevant date, then on the last previous day on which a sale was reported. "FICA Amount" means the FICA tax imposed on any Grant. "Freestanding SAR" means an SAR that is granted independently of any Options. "Grant" means, individually or collectively, a grant under the Plan of NQSOs, ISOs, SARs, Restricted Stock, Performance Units, Performance Shares or any other type of grant permitted under Article 9 of the Plan. "Grant Agreement" means an agreement entered into by each Participant and the Company, setting forth the terms and provisions applicable to a Grant made to a Participant under the Plan. "Incentive Stock Option" or "ISO" means an option to purchase Shares, granted under Article 5 herein, which is designated as an Incentive Stock Option and satisfies the requirements of Section 422 of the Code. "Insider" means an Employee who is, on the relevant date, an officer, director or ten percent (10%) beneficial owner of the common stock of the Company, as contemplated by Section 16 of the Exchange Act. "Nonqualified Stock Option" or "NQSO" means an option to purchase Shares, granted under Article 5 herein, which is not intended to be an Incentive Stock Option. "Option" means an Incentive Stock Option or a Nonqualified Stock Option. "Option Price" means the price at which a Share may be purchased by a Participant pursuant to an Option, as determined by the Committee and set forth in the Option Grant Agreement. "Participant" means an Employee who has outstanding a Grant made under the Plan. "Performance Goals" means, the general performance objectives, the attainment of which shall serve as a basis for the determination of the number or value of Restricted Stock, Performance Units, or Performance Shares granted under the Plan. Unless and until the Committee proposes for shareholder vote a change in the Performance Goals to be used for purposes of grants to Participants, the Performance Goals shall be based upon any one or more of the following: (a) Total shareholder return (measured as the sum of Share price appreciation and dividends declared). (b) Return on invested capital, assets or net assets. (c) Share earnings/earnings growth. (d) Cash flow/cash flow growth. (e) Cost of services to consumers. (f) Growth in revenue, sales, operating income, net income, stock price and/or earnings per share. (g) Return on shareholders' equity. (h) Economic value created. (i) Customer satisfaction and/or customer service quality. (j) Operating effectiveness. 10
If applicable tax and securities laws change to permit Committee discretion to alter the governing Performance Goals without obtaining shareholder approval of such changes and without losing any income tax benefits to the Company, the Committee shall have sole discretion to make such changes without obtaining shareholder approval. "Performance Period" means the period of time during which the Performance Goals will be measured to determine what, if any, Performance Units/Performance Shares have been earned. A Performance Period shall, in all cases, be at least six (6) months in length. "Performance Share" means a Grant made to an Employee, as described in Article 8 herein. "Performance Unit" means the right of a Participant to receive, upon satisfaction of the Performance Goal, an amount of cash or Shares equal to the difference between the value of the Performance Unit as the date of grant, which may be zero, and the value of the Performance Unit on the date the Performance Goals are met. The value of a Performance Unit at the date of grant is determined by the Committee and may be, but is not required to be, based on the underlying stock price. In accordance with the Plan, Performance Units may be paid in cash, shares, or a combination thereof, as determined by the Committee. "Period of Restriction" means the period during which the transfer of Restricted Stock is limited, as provided in Article 7 herein. "Person" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 3(a)(9) of the Exchange Act, as used in Sections 13(d) and 14(d) thereof including usage in the definition of a "group" in Section 13(d) thereof. "Restricted Stock" means a Grant of Shares made to a Participant pursuant to Article 7 herein. "Retirement" shall, with respect to a Participant, have the meaning ascribed to such term in the tax qualified retirement plan maintained by the Company or Subsidiary for the benefit of such Participant. In the event Participant is eligible for benefits under more than one such tax qualified retirement plan, the earliest date provided under any of said plans shall be the meaning ascribed under this Plan. "Shares" means the shares of common stock of the Company, without par value. "Stock Appreciation Right" or "SAR" means a right, granted alone or in connection with a related Option, designated as an SAR, to receive a payment on the day the right is exercised, pursuant to the terms of Article 6 herein. Each SAR shall be denominated in terms of one Share. "Subsidiary" means any corporation that is a "subsidiary corporation" of the Company as that term is defined in Section 424(f) of the Code. "Tandem SAR" means an SAR that is granted in connection with a related Option, the exercise of which shall require forfeiture of the right to purchase a Share under the related Option (and when a Share is purchased under the Option, the Tandem SAR shall be similarly canceled). ALLETE, INC. By: /s/ Donald J. Shippar -------------------------------------- Donald J. Shippar President and Chief Executive Officer Attest: /s/ Deborah A. Amberg ---------------------------- Deborah A. Amberg Vice President General Counsel & Secretary 11



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20050726170221.txt.gz
TIME:20050726170221
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - JULY 20, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission (IRS Employer jurisdiction of incorporation File Number) Identification No.) or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 1 - REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS ITEM 1.01 ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT On July 20, 2005, pursuant to the recommendation of the Executive Compensation Committee, the Board of Directors of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) approved increases to certain director compensation annual retainer fees. Effective May 1, 2005, pursuant to the terms of the ALLETE Director Stock Plan, the cash portion of the annual board retainer fee increased from $20,000 to $23,500, while the annual cash retainer fee for the Audit Committee chair increased from $6,000 to $8,500 and the Executive Compensation Committee chair increased from $4,500 to $5,500. 1 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 26, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. July 26, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 26, 2005



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20050831162133.txt.gz
TIME:20050831162133
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - AUGUST 30, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission (IRS Employer jurisdiction of incorporation File Number) Identification No.) or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS. On August 30, 2005, a Development of Regional Impact (DRI) Application for Development Approval was submitted to the East Central Florida Regional Planning Council by Tomoka Holdings, LLC for its nearly 6,000-acre Ormond Crossings project. Tomoka Holdings, LLC is owned by ALLETE Properties, Inc., a wholly-owned subsidiary of ALLETE, Inc. Ormond Crossings is a mixed-use, planned development project located along Interstate 95, at its interchange with U.S. Highway 1 and adjacent to the City of Ormond Beach airport. It also is bordered by the Florida East Coast Railroad. Because of its proximity to major road, rail, and air transportation links, Ormond Crossings, as planned, would incorporate areas for extensive business and light industrial development, commercial uses and a mixture of residential types. Development uses and intensities proposed in the DRI include 5 million square feet of commercial, office and industrial opportunities along with up to 4,400 residential units. Tomoka Holdings, LLC anticipates that the DRI approval process will be concluded within approximately 18 months at which time it would receive a Development Order from the City of Ormond Beach. The Ormond Crossings DRI application represents the launch of the third major real estate development of ALLETE Properties, Inc. in Florida and the largest in terms of acreage. Ground was broken on the Town Center at Palm Coast development earlier in 2005 and construction is slated to begin on the Palm Coast Park property in 2006. Florida's governor and cabinet recently approved the Palm Coast Park Community Development District with authority to issue special assessment revenue bonds to finance its property development. ---------------------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 31, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - our ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" in ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 31, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. August 31, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 31, 2005 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20051007142438.txt.gz
TIME:20051007142438
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - OCTOBER 6, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION ITEM 2.03 CREATION OF A DIRECT FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OR AN OBLIGATION UNDER AN OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENT OF A REGISTRANT On October 6, 2005, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) accepted an offer from certain institutional buyers in the private placement market to purchase $50 million of ALLETE's First Mortgage Bonds. When issued, on or about March 1, 2006, the bonds will carry an interest rate of 5.69% and will have a term of 30 years. ALLETE intends to use the proceeds from the bonds to redeem a portion of ALLETE's outstanding debt. ------------------------------------------ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 7, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - our ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 7 under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" in ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 7, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. October 7, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 7, 2005 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20051114101003.txt.gz
TIME:20051114101003
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - NOVEMBER 9, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission (IRS Employer jurisdiction of incorporation File Number) Identification No.) or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS Reference is made to ALLETE, Inc.'s (ALLETE) Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 (2004 Form 10-K), for background information on the following update. Ref. Page 15 - Second Paragraph On November 9, 2005, ALLETE's wholly-owned subsidiary, Minnesota Power Enterprises, Inc., entered into an agreement to sell its wholly-owned telecommunications subsidiary, Enventis Telecom, Inc. (Enventis Telecom), to Hickory Tech Corporation (HickoryTech) of Mankato, Minnesota, for $35.5 million, subject to customary working capital adjustments at closing. Under the terms of the agreement, Minnesota Power Enterprises, Inc. will sell all of its stock in Enventis Telecom to HickoryTech. The sale is expected to be completed on or about December 31, 2005, subject to customary regulatory approvals and closing conditions. ALLETE expects the transaction to result in an after-tax loss of $3.4 million and net cash proceeds of approximately $30 million. In accordance with Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 144, "Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long-Lived Assets," ALLETE will report its telecommunications business in discontinued operations for all periods presented. Net income from Enventis Telecom was $1.1 million for the nine months ended September 30, 2005 ($0.6 million for year ended 2004). HickoryTech (Nasdaq: HTCO) is a diversified communications company with operations in Minnesota and Iowa. ---------------------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 14, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - our ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" in Item 7 of ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K and Item 2 of its Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2005. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 14, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. November 14, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 14, 2005 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20051215170122.txt.gz
TIME:20051215170122
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - DECEMBER 14, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission (IRS Employer jurisdiction of incorporation File Number) Identification No.) or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS Reference is made to ALLETE, Inc.'s (ALLETE or Company) Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 (2004 Form 10-K), for background information on the following update. Ref. Page 18 - Executive Officers of the Registrant Ref. Page 42 - Item 10. Directors and Executive Officers of the Registrant On December 14, 2005, ALLETE's Board of Directors elected the Company's President and Chief Executive Officer, Donald J. Shippar, to also serve as its Chairman, effective January 1, 2006. Shippar, 56, was elected ALLETE President and Chief Executive Officer in January 2004. He joined the Company in 1976, and has held various positions since that time, including Senior Vice President for Customer Service and Delivery, Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of Minnesota Power, and President and Chief Operating Officer of Minnesota Power. He became a member of the ALLETE Board in September 2004. Shippar will replace Bruce Stender, the current Chairman of the ALLETE Board. Stender, 63, will remain on the ALLETE Board as Lead Director. He has been a Director of ALLETE since 1995, and will continue to chair the Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee. He is President and Chief Executive Officer of Labovitz Enterprises, Inc., which owns and manages hotel properties. ------------------------------ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 15, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - our ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" in Item 7 of ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K and Item 2 of its Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2005. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 15, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. December 15, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 15, 2005 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20051221142215.txt.gz
TIME:20051221142215
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - DECEMBER 16, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission (IRS Employer jurisdiction of incorporation File Number) Identification No.) or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 1 - REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS ITEM 1.01 ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT On December 16, 2005, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) entered into an agreement with Wisconsin Public Service Corporation and WPS Investments, LLC that provides for ALLETE, through its Wisconsin subsidiary Rainy River Energy Corporation - Wisconsin, to invest $60 million in cash in American Transmission Company LLC (ATC) by the end of 2006. ALLETE's investment will represent an estimated nine percent ownership interest in ATC. The investment by ALLETE's subsidiary in ATC is subject to review by the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin. ATC is a Wisconsin-based public utility that owns and maintains electric transmission assets in parts of Wisconsin, Michigan and Illinois. ATC provides transmission service under rates regulated by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) that are set to further the FERC's policy of establishing the independent operation and ownership of, and investment in, transmission facilities. The FERC approved the transaction on December 16, 2005. The agreement dated December 16, 2005, among ALLETE, Wisconsin Public Service Corporation and WPS Investments, LLC is filed as Exhibit 10 to this Form 8-K and incorporated by reference herein. SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------ 10 - Agreement (without Exhibit) dated December 16, 2005, among ALLETE, Wisconsin Public Service Corporation and WPS Investments, LLC. ------------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 21, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - our ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" in Item 7 of ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K and Item 2 of its Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2005. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 21, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. December 21, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 21, 2005 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 10 - Agreement (without Exhibit) dated December 16, 2005, among ALLETE, Wisconsin Public Service Corporation and WPS Investments, LLC. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 21, 2005

EXHIBIT 10 FINAL 11/30/05 AGREEMENT THIS AGREEMENT (the "AGREEMENT") is made as of the 16th day of December, 2005, among ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation ("ALLETE"), Wisconsin Public Service Corporation, a Wisconsin corporation ("WPSC") and WPS Investments, LLC, a Wisconsin limited liability company ("WPSI"). WPSC and WPSI are sometimes referred to herein collectively as "WPS." Each of ALLETE, WPSC and WPSI is sometimes referred to herein as a "PARTY" or collectively as the "PARTIES." WHEREAS, WPSC and ALLETE were originally joint applicants in connection with the construction of a 345 kV transmission line, which is planned to run from ALLETE's Arrowhead substation located near Duluth, Minnesota to American Transmission Company LLC's ("ATCLLC") Weston substation, located near Wausau, Wisconsin (the "PROJECT"); WHEREAS, in connection with the initial joint development of the Project, WPSC and ALLETE agreed that ALLETE would have the right to purchase a portion of the Project located in Wisconsin ("PROJECT RIGHT"); and WHEREAS, the primary responsibility for the Project was transferred to ATCLLC in 2003, pursuant to the November 8, 2002 agreement among ATCLLC, ATC Management Inc. ("ATCMI") (ATCLLC and ATCMI may be collectively referred to herein as "ATC"), WPSC and WPSI (WPSC and WPSI may be collectively referred to herein as "WPS") ("TRANSFER AGREEMENT"), and as approved by the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin ("PSCW") in Docket 05-AE-115 (Order dated April 17, 2003), and by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission ("FERC") in AMERICAN TRANSMISSION CO. LLC, ET AL., 102 FERC paragraph 62,172 (2003); NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the promises and mutual agreements herein contained, the Parties hereby agree as follows: 1. PURPOSE OF AGREEMENT. The Parties have determined it is preferable that, rather than exercising its Project Right, ALLETE or ALLETE's designated affiliate (collectively referred to herein as "ALLETE"), funds a portion of ATC's monthly capital calls to WPS pursuant to the Transfer Agreement ("PROJECT CAPITAL CALLS"); and in exchange for ALLETE's funding of such Project Capital Calls, ALLETE receives Member Units (as such term is defined in the ATCLLC Operating Agreement dated as of January 1, 2001) in ATCLLC, and Class A Common Stock (as such term is defined in the ATCMI Shareholders Agreement dated as of January 1, 2001) in ATCMI. ALLETE is willing to relinquish its Project Right in exchange for funding $60 million in Project Capital Calls by the end of 2006. 2. ALLETE PARTICIPATION IN PROJECT CAPITAL CALLS. The Parties hereby acknowledge and agree that: i. PROJECT CAPITAL CALLS: Commencing with the first Project Capital Call on or after the Effective Date (as defined in Section 5 below) and subject to the terms of this Agreement, ALLETE shall fund 72% of each Project Capital Call; provided however, 1
FINAL 11/30/05 if the Effective Date occurs after the December 2005 Project Capital Call, but before the January 2006 Project Capital Call, is funded, ALLETE shall fund 78% of each Project Capital Call beginning with the January 2006 Project Capital Call. If the Effective Date occurs after the January 2006 Project Capital Call has been funded, the Parties shall cooperate in good faith to modify ALLETE's percentage participation in Project Capital Calls for the remainder of 2006 with the intent that the modified ALLETE percentage participation will allow ALLETE to fund a total of $60 million in Project Capital Calls by the end of 2006. If, following the May 2006 Project Capital Call, the Parties reasonably determine that ALLETE's then-current percentage participation in Project Capital Calls will not likely result in ALLETE being able to fund $60 million in Project Capital Calls by the end of 2006, then the Parties shall agree to a one-time increase to ALLETE's percentage participation in Project Capital Calls, beginning with the June 2006 Project Capital Call. Such increased participation percentage will not exceed 100% of such Project Capital Calls but will be based on an intent to modify ALLETE's percentage participation to allow ALLETE to fund a total of $60 million in Project Capital Calls by the end of 2006. ii. FUNDING OF PROJECT CAPITAL CALLS: In the event that WPS, under the ATC-WPS Agreements (as such term is defined in Section 6(b) below), has the right to refuse to participate in a Project Capital Call, ALLETE shall also have the right, but not the obligation, to refuse to participate in such Project Capital Call. 3. TERMINATION OF PROJECT RIGHT. Upon ALLETE's funding of a total of $60 million in Project Capital Calls by the end of 2006, or in the event of WPS's termination of this Agreement in accordance with Section 7(i) below, ALLETE's Project Right shall automatically terminate; provided, however, if ALLETE is not offered the opportunity to fund a total of $60 million in Project Capital Calls by the end of 2006, then the Parties shall negotiate in good faith an amendment to this Agreement that preserves and reinstates, to the maximum extent possible, each Party's benefits of the bargain as set forth in this Agreement. 4. TRANSACTION DOCUMENTS. In order to effectuate the transaction contemplated in this Agreement, the Parties acknowledge and agree that the following agreements must be fully executed and delivered in addition to this Agreement: i. Transfer Agreement Amendment, as defined in Section 9 below, among ATCLLC, ATCMI, WPSC and WPSI; ii. Operating Agreement between ATCLLC and ALLETE; and iii. Subscription Agreement among ATCLLC, ATCMI and ALLETE. This Agreement and the agreements listed in subsections (i) through (iii) above are collectively referred to herein as the "TRANSACTION DOCUMENTS." 5. TERM AND EFFECTIVE DATE. The term of this Agreement shall commence as of the date first written above and shall expire when ALLETE has funded $60 million in Project Capital Calls, unless extended or earlier terminated as provided herein ("TERM"). The "EFFECTIVE DATE" shall be the date on which all Required Approvals, as set forth in Section 9 below, have been received and all Transaction Documents have been fully executed and delivered. 2
FINAL 11/30/05 6. REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES. a. Each of the Parties hereby represents and warrants to each of the other Parties that, from and after the Effective Date: i. This Agreement and the other Transaction Documents to which it is a party constitute valid and binding obligations of such Party, enforceable against it in accordance with their respective terms, except as such enforceability may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, or similar laws or equitable remedies affecting creditors' rights generally; ii. There are no lawsuits, claims, complaints or investigations pending, or to its knowledge threatened, against it, by any governmental entity or third party that would reasonably be likely to prohibit, or otherwise have a materially adverse consequence on, the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents to which it is a party; iii. It has obtained all consents, authorizations and approvals, and taken all other actions, that are required for it to execute, deliver and perform its obligations under this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents to which it is a party; and iv. The execution, delivery and performance by it of this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents to which it is a party will not: result in a material breach under any agreements to which it is a party, or constitute a violation of any applicable federal, state or local governmental law, regulation or order. b. Each of WPSC and WPSI further represents and warrants to ALLETE that: (i) all agreements between it and ATCLLC and/or ATCMI, which relate to the Project and are reasonably necessary for WPSC and WPSI to cede to ALLETE a percentage of their rights to participate in Project Capital Calls as set forth herein (the "ATC-WPS AGREEMENTS"), are in full force and effect; and (ii) neither it nor ATC is in violation or breach under any of the ATC-WPS Agreements, and it has received no notice and has no knowledge of any claim alleging a violation or breach under the ATC-WPS Agreements, which would reasonably be likely to prohibit or otherwise materially affect the transactions contemplated by this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents to which it is a party. WPSC and WPSI shall promptly notify ALLETE in writing of any party's termination, violation or breach, or claim or notice therefor, under any of the ATC-WPS Agreements. Any termination of the ATC-WPS Agreements, before the termination of the Project Right under Section 3 above, shall have no effect on the Project Right. The Parties' representations and warranties set forth in this Section 6 shall survive until the earlier of the expiration of the Term or termination of this Agreement. 7. TERMINATION. This Agreement may be terminated upon prior, written notice: i. by either WPS or ALLETE if any representation or warranty made by the other Party under this Agreement or any of the other Transaction Documents shall prove to have been materially false or misleading when made or ceases to remain true during the 3
FINAL 11/30/05 Term or if the other Party breaches any of its obligations under this Agreement, if such cessation or breach would reasonably be expected to have a materially adverse consequence on the other Party or the transactions contemplated in the Transaction Documents, provided that, if cure of the underlying condition that resulted in the untruth or cure of the breach would result in it having no materially adverse consequence on the other Party or the transactions contemplated in the Transaction Documents, such condition or breach has not been cured within thirty (30) days after receipt of written notice from the other Party; ii. by ALLETE in the event of ATC's: (i) dissolution or liquidation; (ii) assignment of any of its rights under the Transaction Documents for the benefit of creditors; or (iii)voluntarily filing, or having filed against it, a petition in bankruptcy or insolvency or for reorganization or arrangement under United States bankruptcy laws or the insolvency act of any State; or iii. by ALLETE for all future Project Capital Calls in the event that any of the agreements described in Section 4(i) - (iii) above expires or is terminated; provided however, if ALLETE terminates this Agreement under this subpart (iii), the Parties shall negotiate in good faith an amendment to this Agreement that preserves and reinstates, to the maximum extent possible, each Party's benefits of the bargain as set forth in this Agreement. 8. ASSIGNMENT. The Parties' respective rights and obligations under this Agreement may be assigned only with the written consents of the other Parties hereto, which consents shall not be unreasonably withheld or unduly delayed; PROVIDED HOWEVER, any Party may, without the other Parties' consents, assign all or part of its rights and obligations hereunder to its affiliated company including, without limitation, its successor in interest by way of merger, consolidation or sale of all or substantially all of its assets. This Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the Parties, their respective successors and permitted assigns, but shall not confer any rights or remedies upon any third party. Any purported assignment of this Agreement without the written consent of the other Parties, if required hereunder, shall be null and void. 9. REGULATORY AND OTHER REQUIRED APPROVALS. This Agreement is expressly conditioned on: (i) the PSCW's approval of an amendment to the Transfer Agreement, to facilitate ALLETE's participation in Project Capital Calls as set forth in Sections 1 and 2 above ("TRANSFER AGREEMENT AMENDMENT"); (ii) FERC 203 approval of ALLETE's acquisition of Member Units in ATCLLC and Class A Common Stock in ATCMI; and (iii) the approval of the ATCMI Board of Directors, which is attached as EXHIBIT A hereto and made a part hereof ("ATCMI BOARD OF DIRECTORS' APPROVAL"). (Collectively, subparts (i), (ii) and (iii) are referred to herein as "REQUIRED APPROVALS.") The Parties shall cooperate in good faith in seeking all Required Approvals necessary to effectuate this Agreement and the other Transaction Documents. If a Party receives notice, or otherwise becomes aware, that another regulatory approval is required in order to effectuate this Agreement or the other Transaction Documents, such Party shall notify the other Parties via telephone as soon as practicable, and they shall cooperate in good faith to obtain such additional regulatory approval as expeditiously as possible. 4
FINAL 11/30/05 10. SEVERABILITY. If: (i) any term of this Agreement is determined to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable by any court or governmental authority having jurisdiction; or (ii) one or more of the Required Approvals set forth in Section 9 above is not obtained by May 15, 2006, or is denied or conditioned in a manner that materially adversely affects a Party's respective benefits and obligations hereunder, then the Parties shall negotiate in good faith a new provision or new agreement that will be legally enforceable, or gain such Required Approvals as applicable, and to the maximum extent possible, restore each Party's benefits of the bargain contained in this Agreement. 11. COUNTERPARTS. This Agreement may be executed in any number of separate counterparts, each of which shall be deemed to be an original and all of which together shall constitute one and the same agreement. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, this Agreement has been executed and delivered by the Parties hereto on the date first written above. WISCONSIN PUBLIC SERVICE ALLETE, INC. CORPORATION By: /s/ Larry L. Weyers By: /s/ Donald J. Shippar ----------------------------------- ------------------------------------- Name: Larry L. Weyers Name: Donald J. Shippar Title: Chairman and Chief Executive --------------------------------- Officer Title: President & CEO -------------------------------- WPS INVESTMENTS, LLC BY WPS RESOURCES CORPORATION, ITS MANAGER By: /s/ Larry L. Weyers ----------------------------------- Name: Larry L. Weyers Title: Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer 5



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20051227084126.txt.gz
TIME:20051227084126
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - DECEMBER 21, 2005 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission (IRS Employer jurisdiction of incorporation File Number) Identification No.) or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS Reference is made to ALLETE, Inc.'s (ALLETE or Company) Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2004 (2004 Form 10-K), for background information on the following update. Ref. Page 9 - Last Paragraph Ref. Page 10 - First and Sixth Paragraphs Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2005, Page 22 - Sixth Full Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2005, Page 28 - Fourth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2005, Page 29 - Fifth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2005, Page 30 - Fourth Paragraph Minnesota Power, an operating division of ALLETE, filed a petition with the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission (MPUC) in February 2005 to amend its automatic fuel adjustment recovery mechanism (fuel clause) to accommodate costs and revenue related to Midwest Independent Transmission System Operation, Inc. (MISO) Day 2 market implementation. In March 2005, the MPUC approved interim ratemaking treatment of MISO Day 2 costs which allowed these costs to be recovered through the fuel clause, subject to refund with interest. On December 21, 2005, Minnesota Power received an Order Establishing Second Interim Accounting for MISO Day 2 Costs, Providing for Refunds, and Initiating Investigation (Order) from the MPUC related to the automatic recovery of certain MISO Day 2 costs through its fuel clause. This Order remains subject to rehearing and appeal, and if upheld, certain costs incurred by Minnesota Power cannot be recovered from customers through its fuel clause. As a result, Minnesota Power may be required to refund the disallowed portion of the costs that had been recovered on an interim basis through its fuel clause. Based on this Order, Minnesota Power estimates the total amount of possible disallowed MISO Day 2 costs for 2005 at approximately $7 million after tax. As this Order from the MPUC is subject to rehearing and appeal, the Company will not record a charge for this item in 2005 and will continue current recovery of MISO Day 2 costs. The Company intends to request rehearing of the Order in early January 2006, which could result in continued fuel clause recovery or deferral of costs to be addressed in a subsequent rate case. If the Company prevails in the rehearing process, there would be no disallowance of these costs. Because the outcome of the rehearing and any appeal is uncertain, the Company plans to file a Notice of Intent to Withdraw from MISO and pursue other options. ------------------------------ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 27, 2005 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - our ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" in Item 7 of ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K and Item 2 of its Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2005. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 27, 2005
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. December 27, 2005 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 27, 2005 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060117131409.txt.gz
TIME:20060117131409
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - JANUARY 11, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission (IRS Employer jurisdiction of incorporation File Number) Identification No.) or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION ITEM 2.03 CREATION OF A DIRECT FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OR AN OBLIGATION UNDER AN OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENT OF A REGISTRANT On January 11, 2006, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) renewed, increased and extended a committed, syndicated, unsecured, revolving credit facility with LaSalle Bank National Association, as Agent, for $150 million (Line). The Line matures on January 11, 2011. At ALLETE's request and subject to certain conditions, the Line may be increased to $200 million and extended for two additional 12-month periods. The Line may be used by ALLETE for general corporate purposes, working capital and to provide liquidity in support of ALLETE's commercial paper program. ALLETE may prepay amounts outstanding under the Line in whole or in part at its discretion. Additionally, ALLETE may irrevocably terminate or reduce the size of the Line prior to maturity. ALLETE has agreed to a financial covenant which requires ALLETE to maintain a quarterly ratio of its funded debt to total capital of less than or equal to .65 to 1.00. The Line also contains a cross-default provision, under which an event of default would arise if other ALLETE obligations in excess of $20.0 million were in default. The Fourth Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter (without Exhibits), dated January 11, 2006, by and among ALLETE and LaSalle Bank National Association, as Agent, is filed as Exhibit 10 to this Form 8-K and incorporated by reference herein. SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Shell Company Transactions - Not applicable (d) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 10 - Fourth Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter (without Exhibits), dated January 11, 2006, by and among ALLETE and LaSalle Bank National Association, as Agent. ---------------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 17, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - our ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" in Item 7 of ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K and Item 2 of its Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2005. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 17, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. January 17, 2006 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 17, 2006 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 10 - Fourth Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter (without Exhibits), dated January 11, 2006, by and among ALLETE and LaSalle Bank National Association, as Agent. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 17, 2006

EXHIBIT 10 FOURTH AMENDED AND RESTATED COMMITTED FACILITY LETTER January 11, 2006 ALLETE, Inc. 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802 Attn: Corporate Treasurer Ladies and Gentlemen: Reference is hereby made to that certain Third Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter among the banks party thereto, LaSalle Bank National Association, as agent for such banks and yourselves dated as of December 23, 2003, as amended by that certain First Amendment to Third Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter dated as of December 14, 2004 (together with all exhibits, schedules, attachments, appendices and amendments thereof, the "EXISTING COMMITTED FACILITY LETTER"). The parties to the Existing Committed Facility Letter desire that the Existing Committed Facility Letter be amended and restated in its entirety, without constituting a novation, all on the terms and conditions contained herein. Accordingly, in consideration of the premises and the agreements, provisions and covenants contained herein, the Existing Committed Facility Letter is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to be and to read as hereinafter set forth. LaSalle Bank National Association (the "AGENT" and, in its individual capacity, a "BANK") and the other Banks (as defined below) are pleased to advise ALLETE, Inc. (the "COMPANY") that the Banks (defined below) have severally approved, subject to the conditions outlined in this letter agreement (this "AGREEMENT"), a committed credit facility (the "FACILITY"). The amount available under the Facility shall not exceed at any time the aggregate sum of the Commitments (defined below) as may be increased or decreased from time to time in accordance with the terms hereof. This Facility shall terminate on the Maturity Date (defined below). The Facility shall be available under the following terms and conditions (certain capitalized terms being used and not otherwise defined as set forth in SECTION 8): 1. LOANS. The Company may from time to time before the Maturity Date borrow Eurodollar Loans, or if one or more conditions exist as set forth in Section 3(b) or Section 3(c) hereof, Prime Rate Loans. The aggregate outstanding amount of the Loans shall not at any time exceed the aggregate sum of the Commitments as increased or decreased in accordance with Section 1(d) hereof. The Company may borrow, repay and reborrow in accordance with the terms hereof. a. BORROWING PROCEDURES i. PRIME RATE LOANS. Each Prime Rate Loan shall be on prior telephonic notice (promptly confirmed in writing) from any Authorized Officer
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 2 received by the Agent not later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago, Illinois time), on the day such Loan is to be made. Each such Notice of Borrowing shall specify (i) the borrowing date, which shall be a Banking Day, and (ii) the amount of the Loan. Each Prime Rate Loan shall be in the amount of $5,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of $1,000,000. A Prime Rate Loan shall only be available if the Agent has given written notice to the Company that one or more conditions exist as set forth in Section 3(b) or Section 3(c) hereof. ii. EURODOLLAR LOANS. Each Eurodollar Loan shall be made upon at least three Banking Days' prior written or telephonic notice from any Authorized Officer received by the Agent not later than 3:00 p.m. (Chicago, Illinois time). Each such Notice of Borrowing shall specify (i) the borrowing date, which shall be a Banking Day, (ii) the amount of such Loan, and (iii) the Interest Period for such Loan. Each Eurodollar Loan shall be in the amount of $5,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of $1,000,000. iii. The Agent shall give prompt telephonic or telecopy notice to each Bank of the contents of each Notice of Borrowing and of such Bank's share of such Loan. iv. Not later than 11:00 a.m. (Chicago time) (or 1:00 p.m. (Chicago time) in the case of any Prime Rate Loan) on the date of each borrowing, each Bank participating therein shall (except as provided in subsection (v) of this Section) make available its share of such Loan, in Federal or other funds immediately available in Chicago, to the Agent at its address set forth next to its signature below. Unless the Agent is notified by a Bank that any applicable condition specified in Section 4 has not been satisfied, the Agent will make the funds so received from the Banks available to the Company by depositing such funds in the manner specified in the related Notice of Borrowing. v. Unless the Agent shall have received notice from a Bank prior to the date of any borrowing that such Bank will not make available to the Agent such Bank's share of such Loan, the Agent may assume that such Bank has made such share available to the Agent on the date of such borrowing in accordance with subsection (iv) of this Section 1(a), and the Agent may, in reliance upon such assumption (but shall not be obligated to), make available to the Company on such date a corresponding amount. If and to the extent that such Bank shall not have so made such share available to the Agent, such Bank and the Company severally agree to repay to the Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount together with interest thereon, for each day from the date such amount is made available to the Company until the date such amount is repaid to the Agent, at (i) in the case of the Company, a rate per annum equal to the higher of (x) the Prime Rate and (y) the interest rate applicable thereto pursuant to Section 1(b)(ii),
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 3 and (ii) in the case of such Bank, the Prime Rate. If such Bank shall repay to the Agent such corresponding amount, such amount so repaid shall constitute such Bank's Loan included in such Loan for purposes of this Agreement. b. INTEREST i. PRIME RATE LOANS. The unpaid principal of each Prime Rate Loan shall bear interest to the Maturity Date at a rate per annum equal to the Prime Rate in effect from time to time PLUS the Applicable Margin. Accrued interest on Prime Rate Loans shall be payable quarterly on the 30th day of each December, March, June and September and on the Maturity Date. ii. EURODOLLAR LOANS. The unpaid principal amount of each Eurodollar Loan shall bear interest prior to maturity at a rate per annum equal to LIBOR in effect for the Interest Period with respect to such Eurodollar Loan plus the Applicable Margin. Accrued interest on each Eurodollar Loan shall be payable on the last day of the Interest Period applicable to such Loan and, if such Interest Period shall exceed three months, at three month intervals after the date of the Eurodollar Loan. iii. INTEREST AFTER MATURITY. Any principal of any Loan which is not paid when due, whether at the stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, shall bear interest from and including the date such principal shall have become due to (but not including) the date of payment thereof in full at a rate per annum equal to the Prime Rate from time to time in effect PLUS the Applicable Margin PLUS 2.0% per annum (but until the end of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Rate Loan, not less than 2.0 % in excess of the rate otherwise applicable for such Loan). After maturity, accrued interest shall be payable on demand. iv. MAXIMUM RATE. In no event shall the interest rate applicable to any amount outstanding hereunder exceed the maximum rate of interest allowed by applicable law, as amended from time to time. Any payment of interest or in the nature of interest in excess of such limitation shall be credited as a payment of principal unless the Company shall request the return of such amount. v. METHOD OF CALCULATING INTEREST AND FEES. Interest on each Loan shall be computed on the basis of a year consisting of (i) 365/366, as applicable, days for Prime Rate Loans, and (ii) 360 days for Eurodollar Loans, and paid for actual days elapsed. Fees shall be computed on the basis of a year consisting of 360 days and paid for actual days elapsed.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 4 c. DISBURSEMENTS AND PAYMENTS The Agent shall transfer the proceeds of each Loan as directed by an Authorized Officer. Each Eurodollar Loan shall be payable on the earlier of the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto or the Maturity Date. Each Prime Rate Loan shall be payable on the Maturity Date. All payments to the Banks shall be made to the Agent at LaSalle Bank National Association ABA No. 071 000 505, Account No. 1378018, reference ALLETE not later than 2:00 p.m., Chicago, Illinois time, on the date when due and shall be made in lawful money of the United States of America (in freely transferable U.S. dollars) and in immediately available funds. Any payment that shall be due on a day, which is not a Banking Day, shall be payable on the next Banking Day, subject to the definition of "Interest Period". d. PREPAYMENT; COMMITMENT INCREASES AND REDUCTIONS The Company may prepay any Loan in whole or in part from time to time (but, if in part, in an amount not less than $1,000,000 and integral multiples of $1,000,000 in excess thereof) without premium or penalty (subject to the following paragraph) upon (i) 3 Business Days prior written notice to the Agent with respect to any Eurodollar Loan and (ii) prior written notice delivered to the Agent prior to 10:00 a.m. (Chicago, Illinois time) on the date of such prepayment with respect to any Prime Rate Loan. If the Company shall prepay any Loan, it shall pay to the Agent at the time of each prepayment, or at such later time designated by the Agent, any and all costs described in Section 3(g) hereof. The Company may permanently reduce the amount of Commitments from time to time in amounts not less than $1,000,000 and integral multiples of $1,000,000 in excess thereof without premium or penalty upon 3 Business Days prior written notice to the Agent, provided that the aggregate amount of Commitments shall not exceed the aggregate principal amount of Loans then outstanding. Any such reduction shall be applied ratably to the Commitments of the Banks and may not be reinstated. The initial aggregate amount of Commitments under this Agreement equals ONE HUNDRED FIFTY MILLION DOLLARS ($150,000,000). Notwithstanding the foregoing to the contrary and so long as no Event of Default exists, the Company may, upon written election delivered to Agent, permanently increase the aggregate Commitments under this facility by an amount not to exceed $50,000,000 to TWO HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS ($200,000,000) (less the amount of any previous reductions of the Commitments pursuant to this Section 1(d)), by (a) increasing the Commitments of one or more Banks which have agreed to such increase and/or (b) adding one or more commercial banks or other Persons as a Bank hereto (each an "ADDITIONAL BANK") with a Commitment in an amount agreed to by any such Additional Bank; PROVIDED that no Additional Bank shall be added as a party hereto without the written consent of the Agent (which shall not be unreasonably withheld) or if an Event of Default then exists. Any
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 5 such Commitment increases shall be in minimum aggregate amounts of $10,000,000 and $5,000,000 multiples in excess thereof. In no event shall the aggregate Commitments exceed $200,000,000. Any increase in the aggregate Commitments pursuant to this clause (d) shall be effective three Business Days after the conditions precedent date set forth in Section 4(c) are either fully satisfied or waived by Agent in writing. The Agent shall promptly notify the Company and the Banks of any increase in the amount of the aggregate Commitments pursuant to this Section and of the Commitment of each Bank after giving effect thereto. The Company acknowledges that, in order to maintain Loans in accordance with each Bank's pro-rata share of all outstanding Loans prior to any increase in the aggregate Commitments pursuant to this Section, a reallocation of the Commitments as a result of a non-pro-rata increase in the aggregate Commitments may require prepayment of all or portions of certain Loans on the date of such increase (and any such prepayment shall be subject to the provisions of Section 3(g)). e. NOTE The Company's obligations with respect to the Loans shall be evidenced by a note for each Bank in the form attached as EXHIBIT A (each, a "NOTE" and, collectively, the "NOTES"). The amount, the rate of interest for each Loan and the Interest Period (if applicable) shall be endorsed by the respective Bank on the schedule attached to its Note, or at any Bank's option, in its records, which schedule or records shall be conclusive, absent manifest error, PROVIDED, HOWEVER, that the failure of any Bank to record any of the foregoing or any error in any such record shall not limit or otherwise affect the obligation of the Company to repay all Loans made to it hereunder together with accrued interest thereon. The Company agrees to issue new notes to replace any existing Notes if requested by Agent in the event that the Commitments are increased pursuant to the terms of Section 1(d) hereof. f. MATURITY All of the Obligations shall become due and payable on the Maturity Date (as defined below) or upon the earlier termination of this Agreement. Without limiting the foregoing, all unpaid Obligations, if not sooner declared to be due in accordance with the terms hereof, together with all accrued and unpaid interest thereon, shall be due and payable in full on January 11, 2011 (the "INITIAL MATURITY DATE") or, if an Extension Option has been duly and timely exercised by the Company in accordance with the terms hereof, on the applicable Extended Maturity Date (as defined below). The date when all Obligations are due and payable hereunder, whether the Initial Maturity Date, an Extended Maturity Date, by acceleration or otherwise, is referred to as the "MATURITY DATE". Until all Obligations have been fully paid and satisfied (other than contingent indemnification obligations to the extent no unsatisfied claim with respect thereto has been asserted), this Agreement shall continue in force and effect for the benefit of Agent and the Banks and Agent shall be entitled to exercise all rights and remedies available to it hereunder and under applicable laws.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 6 Provided that no Event of Default then exists, either on the date that the Company delivers an Extension Request or on the applicable Maturity Date being extended, the Company shall have the right (the "EXTENSION OPTION") to extend the term of this Agreement for two additional 12-month periods commencing, in the case of (i) the first Extension Option, on the Initial Maturity Date and ending on January 11, 2012, and (ii) the second Extension Option, beginning on January 11, 2012 and ending on January 11, 2013 (each an "EXTENDED MATURITY DATE"), upon and subject to the following terms, provisions and conditions: (i) the Company shall deliver an Extension Request to Agent of its election to exercise the Extension Option in a timely manner as specified in the definition of Extension Request, accompanied by a statement certifying that no Event of Default then exists; (ii) no condition or circumstance then exists which could reasonably be expected to have, either individually or in the aggregate, a Material Adverse Change; (iii) Agent shall have received notice on or before the date that is 10 Business Days prior to the then applicable anniversary of the Closing Date that Banks having Commitments in excess of 50% of the aggregate Commitments then in effect (after giving effect to any concomitant or pending increase in Commitments being made pursuant to Section 1(d)) intend to renew their respective Commitments; and (iv) except as expressly provided to the contrary in this Agreement, all of the other terms, provisions and conditions of this Agreement, the Note and the Loan Documents remain in full force and effect in accordance with their respective terms, including without limitation, the obligation to make monthly payments of interest at the then applicable interest rate. Each Bank may elect, in its sole and absolute discretion to extend its Commitment in accordance with the Extension Request of the Company. Any Bank failing to respond within 10 Business Days of receiving written notice by Agent of its receipt of an Extension Request shall be deemed to have declined and to have refused to consent to such Extension Request. If Banks (including Replacement Banks, as defined below) holding more than 50% of the aggregate amount of the renewed Commitments (after giving effect to any concomitant or pending increase in Commitments being made pursuant to Section 1(d)) consent to the Extension Request of the Company, then the then applicable Maturity Date shall be extended by one additional year in accordance with such Extension Request, but only with respect to those Banks consenting to such extension of its Commitment. g. REPLACEMENT OF NON-CONSENTING BANKS. If any Bank declines to extend the Maturity Date in connection with its Commitment pursuant to an Extension Request made by the Company, then the Company may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Bank and the Agent, require such Bank to
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 7 assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in, and consents required by, Section 9(o)), all of its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement and the related Loan Documents to an assignee (a "REPLACEMENT BANK") that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Bank, if a Bank accepts such assignment), PROVIDED that: (i) the Company shall have paid to the Agent the assignment fee specified in Section 9(o); (ii) such Bank shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder and under the other Loan Documents (including any amounts under Section 3(g)) from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Company (in the case of all other amounts); and (iii) such assignment does not conflict with applicable law. A Bank shall not be required to make any such assignment or delegation if, prior thereto, such Bank consents to the Extension Request. 2. FEES. a. CERTAIN FEES The Company shall pay, or cause to be paid, to the Agent certain fees set forth in the Fee Letter at the time specified in the Fee Letter for payment of such amounts. b. FACILITY FEE The Company agrees to pay to the Banks a facility fee on the amount of the Facility (whether or not used) at a rate per annum equal to the Facility Fee Rate. Such facility fee shall be payable by the Company quarterly on the 30th day of each December, March, June and September after the date hereof and on the Maturity Date as set forth in Section 1(c) hereof. c. UTILIZATION FEE For each day the aggregate amount of Loans outstanding exceeds 50% of the Commitments as in effect on such day, the Company agrees to pay to the Banks, in addition to any other amounts payable hereunder, a utilization fee on the aggregate outstanding amount of Loans on such date at a rate per annum equal to the Utilization Fee Rate. Such utilization fee shall be payable by the Company on the date when the next interest payment on such Loans is due in accordance with Section 1(b) hereof and on the Maturity Date as set forth in Section 1(c) hereof.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 8 3. ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO LOANS. a. INCREASED COST The Company agrees to reimburse each Bank for any increase in the cost to such Bank of, or any reduction in the amount of any sum receivable by such Bank in respect of, making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loans (including the imposition, modification or deemed applicability of any reserves, deposits or similar requirements). The additional amount required to compensate any Bank for such increased cost or reduced amount shall be payable by the Company to such Bank within five days of the Company's receipt of written notice from such Bank specifying such increased cost or reduced amount and the amount required to compensate such Bank therefor, which notice shall, in the absence of manifest error, be conclusive and binding on the Company. In determining such additional amount, a Bank may use reasonable averaging, attribution and allocation methods. b. DEPOSITS UNAVAILABLE OR INTEREST RATE UNASCERTAINABLE; IMPRACTICABILITY If the Company has notified the Agent of its intention to borrow a Eurodollar Loan for an Interest Period and the Agent or any Bank determines (which determination shall be conclusive and binding on the Company) that: (1) deposits of the necessary amount for such Interest Period are not available to such Bank in the London interbank market or, by reason of circumstances affecting such market, adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Eurodollar Rate for such Interest Period; or (2) LIBOR will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to the Bank of making or funding a Eurodollar Loan for such Interest Period; or (3) the making or funding of Eurodollar Loans has become impracticable as a result of any event occurring after the date of this Agreement which, in the opinion of the Bank, materially and adversely affects such Loans or the interbank eurodollar market; then any notice of a Eurodollar Loan previously given by the Company and not yet borrowed shall be deemed to be a notice to make a Prime Rate Loan. c. CHANGES IN LAW RENDERING EURODOLLAR LOANS UNLAWFUL If at any time due to the adoption of, or change in, any law, rule, regulation, treaty or directive or in the interpretation or administration thereof by any court, central bank, governmental authority or governmental agency charged with the interpretation or administration thereof, or for any other reason arising subsequent to the date hereof, it shall become (or, in the good faith judgment of any Bank, raise a substantial question as to whether it is) unlawful for such Bank to make or fund any Eurodollar Loan, Eurodollar Loans shall not be made hereunder
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 9 for the duration of such illegality. If any such event shall make it unlawful for any Bank to continue any Eurodollar Loans previously made by it hereunder, the Company shall, after being notified by such Bank of the occurrence of such event, on such date as shall be specified in such notice, either convert such Eurodollar Loan to a Prime Rate Loan or prepay in full such Eurodollar Loan, together with accrued interest thereon, without any premium or penalty (except as provided in Section 3(g)). d. DISCRETION OF THE BANKS AS TO MANNER OF FUNDING Each Bank shall be entitled to fund and maintain its funding of all or any part of the Loans in any manner it sees fit; it being understood, however, that for purposes of this Note, all determinations hereunder shall be made as if such Bank had actually funded and maintained each Eurodollar Loan during the Interest Period for such Eurodollar Loan through the purchase of deposits having a term corresponding to such Interest Period and bearing an interest rate equal to LIBOR for such Interest Period. e. TAXES All payments by the Company of principal of, and interest on, the Loans and all other amounts payable hereunder shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any present or future income, excise, stamp or franchise taxes and other taxes, fees, duties, withholdings or other charges of any nature whatsoever imposed by any taxing authority, but excluding franchise taxes and taxes imposed on or measured by each respective Bank's net income or receipts (such non-excluded items being called "TAXES"). If any withholding or deduction from any payment to be made by the Company hereunder is required in respect of any Taxes pursuant to any applicable law, rule or regulation, then the Company will i. pay directly to the relevant authority the full amount required to be so withheld or deducted; ii. promptly forward to each Bank an official receipt or other documentation satisfactory to such Bank evidencing such payment to such authority; and iii. pay to each Bank such additional amount or amounts as is necessary to ensure that the net amount actually received by such Bank will equal the full amount such Bank would have received had no such withholding or deduction been required. Moreover, if any Taxes are directly asserted against any Bank or on any payment received by such Bank hereunder, such Bank may pay such Taxes and the Company will promptly pay such additional amount (including any penalty, interest or expense) as is necessary in order that the net amount received by such Bank after the payment of such Taxes (including any Taxes on such
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 10 additional amount) shall equal the amount such Bank would have received had no such Taxes been asserted. If the Company fails to pay any Taxes when due to the appropriate taxing authority or fails to remit to any Bank the required receipts or other required documentary evidence, the Company shall indemnify such Bank for any incremental Tax, interest, penalty or expense that may become payable by such Bank as a result of any such failure. f. INCREASED CAPITAL COSTS If any change in, or the introduction, adoption, effectiveness, interpretation, reinterpretation or phase-in of, any law or regulation, directive, guideline, decision or request (whether or not having the force of law) of any court, central bank, regulator or other governmental authority affects or would affect the amount of capital required or expected to be maintained by any Bank or any entity controlling any Bank, and such Bank determines (in its sole and absolute discretion) that the rate of return on its or such controlling entity's capital as a consequence of the Loans made by such Bank or the commitment hereunder is reduced to a level below that which such Bank or such controlling entity could have achieved but for the occurrence of any such circumstance, then, in any such case, upon notice from time to time by any Bank to the Company, the Company shall immediately pay directly to such Bank additional amounts sufficient to compensate such Bank or such controlling entity for such reduction in rate of return. A statement of any Bank as to any such additional amount or amounts (including calculations thereof in reasonable detail) shall, in the absence of manifest error, be conclusive and binding on the Company. In determining such amount, each Bank may use reasonable averaging, attribution and allocation methods. g. FUNDING LOSSES The Company will indemnify the Banks upon demand against any loss or expense which any Bank may sustain or incur (including, without limitation, any loss or expense sustained or incurred in obtaining, liquidating or employing deposits or other funds acquired to effect, fund or maintain any Loan) as a consequence of (i) any failure of the Company to make any payment when due of any amount due hereunder, (ii) any failure of the Company to borrow a Loan on a date specified therefor in a notice thereof, or (iii) any payment (including any payment upon any Bank's acceleration of the Loans) or prepayment of any Eurodollar Loan on a date other than the last day of the Interest Period for such Loan. 4. CONDITIONS PRECEDENT. a. INITIAL LOAN The obligation of each Bank to make the initial Loan shall be subject to the prior or concurrent satisfaction of each of the following conditions precedent:
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 11 i. The Company shall have delivered to the Agent a certificate dated the date of the initial Loan of its Secretary or Assistant Secretary as to (i) resolutions of its Board of Directors then in full force and effect authorizing the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement, the Notes, and each of the other Loan Documents; and (ii) the incumbency and signatures of those of its officers authorized to act with respect to this Agreement, the Note and each of the Loan Documents executed by it, upon which certificate the Banks may conclusively rely until it shall have received a further certificate of the Secretary or Assistant Secretary of the Company canceling or amending such prior certificate. ii. Each Bank shall have received its respective Note duly executed and delivered by the Company. iii. The Agent shall have received an opinion dated the date of the initial Loan from counsel to the Company in form satisfactory to the Agent. b. EACH LOAN The obligation of each Bank to make any Loan (including the initial Loan) shall be subject to the following statements being true and correct before and after giving effect to such Loan: (i) the representations and warranties set forth in Section 5 shall be true and correct with the same effect as if then made (unless stated to relate solely to an earlier date, in which case such representations and warranties shall be true and correct as of such earlier date); and (ii) no Event of Default or Unmatured Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, PROVIDED that this subsection 4(b)(ii) shall not apply to an Event of Default occurring solely under clause (vii) of subsection 7(a) with respect to a Loan if the proceeds of such Loan will be used exclusively to repay the Company's commercial paper (and, in the event of any such Loan, the Agent may require the Company to deliver information sufficient to disburse the proceeds of such Loan directly to the holders of such commercial paper or a paying agent therefor). Each request for a Loan shall be deemed a representation by the Company, as to the matters set forth in this Section. c. CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO FACILITY INCREASE The effectiveness of any increase in the aggregate Commitments hereunder pursuant to subsection 1(d) hereof, and the ability of the Company to borrow additional Loans in accordance with any such increased Commitment are subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions (unless waived in writing by Agent and the Banks): i. Agent shall have received and accepted the applicable documentation memorializing and evidencing such Commitment increases by the
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 12 applicable Banks together with any joinders to this Agreement from Additional Banks, all in form and substance reasonably acceptable to Agent; ii. This Agreement shall be amended to the extent necessary or reasonably required by Agent in connection with any such increase in Commitments; iii. The Company shall have issued new or replacement Notes as may be requested by any Bank; iv. The Agent shall have received such resolutions, consents and/or legal opinions of counsel to the Company as reasonably required to evidence the power and authority of the Company to incur the additional indebtedness associated with such increase in Commitments and its compliance with all corporate formalities necessary to duly effectuate the same; v. No Event of Default shall exist at the time such increase is requested or otherwise would become effective; and vi. Agent shall have received such other documentation and deliveries as it shall reasonably require. 5. REPRESENTATIONS. The Company represents and warrants to the Banks that: a. ORGANIZATION It is a corporation duly organized and in good standing under the laws of its state of organization and duly qualified to do business in each jurisdiction where such qualification is necessary. b. AUTHORIZATION The execution and delivery of this Agreement, the Note and the other Loan Documents and the performance by the Company of its obligations hereunder and thereunder are within the Company's powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary action on the Company's part, and do not and will not contravene or conflict with the Company's organizational documents or violate or constitute a default under any law, rule or regulation any presently existing requirement or restriction imposed by judicial, arbitral or other governmental instrumentality or any agreement, instrument or indenture by which the Company is bound.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 13 c. ENFORCEABILITY This Agreement is the Company's legal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable in accordance with its terms. d. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS The audited financial statements of the Company as of December 31, 2004 and the interim financial statements of the Company as of September 30, 2005, copies of which have been furnished to the Agent, have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied, and present fairly the financial condition of the Company at the date thereof and the results of its operations for the period then ended. Since the date of such interim financial statements, there has been no Material Adverse Change. e. USE OF PROCEEDS The Company agrees that proceeds of any Loan shall be used solely for the purpose of providing liquidity support with respect to commercial paper borrowings of the Company or for other valid general corporate purposes. 6. COVENANTS. From the date of this Agreement and thereafter until the termination of the Facility and until the Obligations are paid in full, the Company agrees that it will: a. FINANCIAL INFORMATION. Furnish to the Agent: i. As soon as available and in any event within 60 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of the Company, consolidated balance sheets, statements of earnings and cash flow of the Company and its Subsidiaries, and internally prepared unaudited consolidating (A) balance sheets and (B) statements of earnings of the Company, each for such quarter and for the period commencing at the beginning of such fiscal year and ending with the end of such quarter, certified by the chief financial officer of the Company (all of which consolidating balance sheets and consolidating statements of earnings shall be treated by the Banks as confidential information of the Company, whether or not specifically marked as such); ii. as soon as available and in any event within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company, a copy of the annual audit report for such fiscal year for the Company, including consolidated balance sheets as of the end of such fiscal year and statements of earnings and cash flow for such fiscal year of the Company and its Subsidiaries, in each case certified in a manner acceptable to the Agent by independent public accountants acceptable to the Agent together
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 14 with the internally prepared unaudited consolidating (a) balance sheets as of the end of such fiscal year, and (b) statements of earnings for the period commencing at the beginning of such fiscal year and ending with the end of such fiscal year of the Company (all of which consolidating balance sheets and statements of earnings shall be treated by the Banks as confidential information of the Company, whether or not specifically marked as such); iii. upon the occurrence of a Unmatured Event of Default or Event of Default, notice of such Unmatured Event of Default or Event of Default; and iv. such other information with respect to the condition or operations, financial or otherwise, of the Company as any Bank may from time to time reasonably request. b. MARGIN STOCK Not, and not permit any Subsidiary or affiliate of the Company to, use the proceeds of any Loan, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of purchasing or carrying any Margin Stock, for the purpose of reducing or retiring any indebtedness which was originally incurred to purchase or carry any Margin Stock or for any other purpose which might cause any of the Loans to be considered a "purpose credit" within the meaning of Regulation T, U or X of the Federal Reserve Board. c. FUNDAMENTAL CHANGES. The Company shall maintain and preserve, and cause each Material Subsidiary to maintain and preserve, (a) its existence and good standing in the jurisdiction of its organization, and (b) its qualification to do business and good standing in each jurisdiction where the nature of its business makes such qualification necessary (except in those instances in which the failure to be qualified or in good standing would not result in a Material Adverse Change) and shall not: i. Enter into any transaction of merger of consolidation or amalgamation, or liquidate, wind up or dissolve itself (or suffer any liquidation or dissolution); or ii. Convey, sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of, in one transaction or a series of transactions, all or a substantial portion of its business or property without the prior written consent of the Required Banks, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection (c), the Company may merge or consolidate with any other Person if the Company is the surviving corporation or the surviving corporation assumes the liabilities of the Company by operation of law or otherwise.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 15 d. MAXIMUM RATIO OF FUNDED DEBT TO TOTAL CAPITAL The Company shall at all times, measured as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the Company maintain a maximum ratio of Funded Debt to Total Capital of 0.65 to 1.0. e. COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS The Company, its Subsidiaries and its affiliates shall comply with the requirements of all applicable laws, rules and regulations, except to the extent such Person's noncompliance could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Change. Notwithstanding and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, none of the Company, its Subsidiaries, its affiliates or any of their respective agents acting or benefiting in any capacity in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement is (i) in violation of any Terrorism Law, (ii) engages in or conspires to engage in any transaction that has the purpose of evading or avoiding or is designed to evade or avoid, or attempts to violate, any of the prohibitions set forth in any Terrorism Law, or (iii) is a Blocked Person. No such Person nor, to the knowledge of any such Person, any of its affiliates or agents acting or benefiting in any capacity in connection with the transactions contemplated by this Agreement, (x) conducts any business or engages in making or receiving any contribution of funds, goods or services to or for the benefit of any Blocked Person, or (y) deals in, or otherwise engages in any transaction relating to, any property or interest in property blocked pursuant to Executive Order No. 13224, any similar executive order or other Terrorism Law. The Company will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, knowingly enter into any material contract with any Person who is a Blocked Person. The Company shall immediately notify Agent if it has knowledge that any affiliate thereof is or becomes a Blocked Person, or (i) is convicted on, (ii) pleads NOLO CONTENDERE to, (iii) is indicted on or (iv) is arraigned and held over on charges involving money laundering or predicate crimes to money laundering. The Company will not, nor will it permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, (i) conduct any business or engage in any transaction or dealing with any Blocked Person, including, without limitation, the making or receiving of any contribution of funds, goods or services to or for the benefit of any Blocked Person, (ii) deal in, or otherwise engage in any transaction relating to, any property or interests in property blocked pursuant to Executive Order No. 13224, any similar executive order or other Terrorism Law, or (iii) engage in or conspire to engage in any transaction that evades or avoids, or has the purpose of evading or avoiding, or attempts to violate, any of the prohibitions set forth in Executive Order No. 13224 or other Terrorism Law. 7. EVENTS OF DEFAULT. a. EVENTS. Each of the following shall constitute an Event of Default: i. The Company fails to pay when due any principal of, or interest on, any Loan or any other amount payable hereunder or under any Note;
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 16 ii. Any material representation or warranty of the Company made or deemed made hereunder or under any other writing or certificate furnished by or on behalf of the Company to the Agent for the purposes of or in connection with this Agreement shall prove to have been false or misleading in any material respect when made or deemed made; iii. The Company defaults in the due performance or observance of Section 6(b) hereof or the Company defaults in any material respect in the due performance or observance of any other agreement contained herein or in any other Loan Document and such default shall continue for 30 days after notice thereof shall have been given to the Company from the Agent; iv. The maturity of any indebtedness of the Company under any agreement or obligation in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $20,000,000 shall be accelerated, or any default shall occur under one or more agreements or instruments under which such indebtedness may be issued or created and such default shall continue for a period of time sufficient to permit the holder or beneficiary of such indebtedness or a trustee therefor to cause the acceleration of the maturity of such indebtedness or any mandatory unscheduled prepayment, purchase or funding thereof; v. Judgments or orders for the payment of money in excess of $20,000,000 shall be rendered against the Company and such judgments or orders shall continue unsatisfied and unstayed for a period of 30 days: vi. The Company or any Material Subsidiary shall (1) become insolvent or generally fail to pay, or admit in writing its inability or unwillingness to pay, debts as they become due; (2) apply for, consent to or acquiesce in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, sequestrator or other custodian for the Company or any Material Subsidiary or any property thereof, or make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors; (3) in the absence of such application, consent or acquiescence, permit or suffer to exist the appointment of a trustee, receiver, sequestrator or other custodian for the Company or any Material Subsidiary or for a substantial part of the property thereof, and such trustee, receiver, sequestrator or other custodian shall not be discharged within 30 days; (4) permit or suffer to exist the commencement of any bankruptcy, reorganization, debt arrangement or other case or proceeding under any bankruptcy or insolvency law, or any dissolution, winding up or liquidation proceeding, in respect of the Company or any Material
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 17 Subsidiary and, if any such case or proceeding is not commenced by the Company or such Material Subsidiary, such case or proceeding shall be consented to or acquiesced in by the Company or such Material Subsidiary or shall result in the entry of an order for relief or shall remain for 60 days undismissed; or (5) take any action authorizing, or in furtherance of, any of the foregoing; or vii. any Material Adverse Change shall have occurred. b. REMEDIES Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default under Section 7(a)(vi), the commitment of the Banks to make Loans shall be terminated and the Notes and all other obligations hereunder shall become immediately due and payable in full; and upon the occurrence of any other Event of Default, the commitment of the Banks to make Loans may be terminated by the Banks and the Agent may declare the Notes and the principal of and accrued interest on each Loan, and all other amounts payable hereunder, to be forthwith due and payable in full. 8. DEFINITIONS. As used in this Agreement: "AGENT" means LaSalle Bank National Association, in its capacity as Agent for the Banks hereunder, and its successors in such capacity. "APPLICABLE MARGIN" means (i) with respect to Eurodollar Loans, (a) 0.285% per annum for any day Level I Status exists; (b) 0.375% per annum for any day Level II Status exists; (c) 0.450% per annum for any day Level III Status exists; (d) 0.600% per annum for any day Level IV Status exists; (e) 0.825% per annum for any day Level V Status exists, and (f) 1.025% per annum for any day Level VI Status exists; and (ii) with respect to Prime Rate Loans, (a) 0.000% per annum for any day Level I Status exists; (b) 0.000% per annum for any day Level II Status exists; (c) 0.000% per annum for any day Level III Status exists; (d) 0.500% per annum for any day Level IV Status exists; (e) 0.750% per annum for any day Level V Status exists; and (f) 1.500% per annum for any day Level VI Status exists. "AUTHORIZED OFFICER" means each officer or employee of the Company who is authorized to request Loans, to confirm in writing any such request and to agree to rates of interest, as set forth on the schedule of Authorized Officers most recently delivered by the Company to the Agent.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 18 "BANK" means each bank listed on the signature page hereof, or which subsequently becomes a party hereto by execution of a Joinder Agreement, and its successors and assigns. "BANKING DAY" means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which the Banks are required or permitted to close in Chicago and, with respect to Eurodollar Loans on which dealings in Dollars are carried on in the London interbank market. "BLOCKED PERSON" means any Person: (i) listed in the annex to, or is otherwise subject to the provisions of, Executive Order No. 13224; (ii) a Person owned or controlled by, or acting for or on behalf of, any Person that is listed in the annex to, or is otherwise subject to the provisions of, Executive Order No. 13224; (iii) a Person with which any Bank is prohibited from dealing or otherwise engaging in any transaction by any Terrorism Law; (iv) a Person that commits, threatens or conspires to commit or supports "terrorism" as defined in Executive Order No. 13224 Executive Order No. 13224 (September 23, 2001) Blocking Property and Prohibiting Transactions With Persons Who Commit, Threaten to Commit or Support Terrorism (66 Fed. Reg. 49079(2001), any related enabling legislation or any other similar Executive Orders related thereto; or (v) a Person that is named a "specially designated national" or "blocked person" on the most current list published by OFAC or other similar list. "CLOSING DATE" means January 11, 2006. "COMMITMENT" means, with respect to each Bank, the amount set forth opposite the name of such Bank on the signature pages hereof, or on a Joinder Agreement, as applicable. "EURODOLLAR LOAN" means any Loan which bears interest at a rate determined with reference to LIBOR (plus the Applicable Margin). "EVENT OF DEFAULT" means an event described in Section 7(a). "EXTENSION REQUEST" means an request made by the Company, in writing, to the Agent to extend the then applicable Maturity Date for an additional period of one year, such request to be made by Borrower on or before 45 days prior to the next occurring anniversary of the Closing Date but not earlier than 90 days prior to such Closing Date anniversary and in any event prior to 365 days before the Maturity Date being extended, and which request shall be irrevocable once made but may be consented to by each Bank in its sole and absolute discretion and which may be subject to such further conditions, credit approval procedures, documentation requirements and due diligence as such Bank may require in its sole and absolute discretion. An Extension Request, in and of itself, shall not be deemed an agreement or commitment by the Company to any additional or different terms upon which any extension is conditioned by any Bank. "FACILITY" has the meaning set forth in the initial paragraph of this Agreement.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 19 "FACILITY FEE RATE" means a rate equal to (i) 0.090% per annum for any day Level I Status exists; (ii) 0.100% per annum for any day Level II Status exists; (iii) 0.125% per annum for any day Level III Status exists; (iv) 0.150% per annum for any day Level IV Status exists; (v) 0.175% per annum for any day Level V Status exists; and (vi) 0.225% per annum for any day Level VI Status exists "FEDERAL FUNDS RATE" means, the per annum rate at which overnight federal funds are from time to time offered to the Agent by any bank in the interbank market, as stated by the Agent. "FEE LETTER" means that certain letter between the Borrower and LaSalle Bank National Association and its affiliates relating to certain fees to be paid by the Borrower to, and solely for the account of, LaSalle Bank National Association and its affiliates, as such letter may from time to time be amended. "FUNDED DEBT" means, for any entity on a consolidated basis (without duplication): (i) all indebtedness of such entity for borrowed money; (ii) the deferred and unpaid balance of the purchase price owing by such entity on account of any assets or services purchased (other than trade payables and other accrued liabilities incurred in the ordinary course of business that are not overdue by more than 180 days unless being contested in good faith) if such purchase price is (A) due more than nine months from the date of incurrence of the obligation in respect thereof or (B) evidenced by a note or a similar written instrument; (iii) all capitalized lease obligations; (iv) all indebtedness secured by a Lien on any property owned by such entity, whether or not such indebtedness has been assumed by such entity or is nonrecourse to such entity; (v) notes payable and drafts accepted representing extensions of credit whether or not representing obligations for borrowed money (other than such notes or drafts from the deferred purchase price of assets or services to the extent such purchase price is excluded from clause (ii) above); (vi) indebtedness evidenced by bonds, notes or similar written instrument; (vii) the face amount of all letters of credit and bankers' acceptances issued for the account of such entity, and without duplication, all drafts drawn thereunder (other than such letters of credit, bankers' acceptances and drafts for the deferred purchase price of assets or services to the extent such purchase price is under interest rate agreements or currency agreements); (viii) guaranty obligations of such entity with respect to indebtedness for borrowed money of another entity (including affiliates) in excess of $25,000,000 in the aggregate; provided, however, that in no event shall any calculation of Funded Debt include (a) deferred taxes, (b) securitized trade receivables, (c) deferred credits including regulatory assets and contributions in aid of construction, (d) the lease obligations for Lake Superior Paper, Inc. relating to paper mill equipment as provided for under an operating lease extending to 2012 or (e) 75% of the indebtedness associated with Square Butte. "GAAP" means generally accepted accounting principles as in effect in the United States from time to time, applied by the Company and any Material Subsidiary on a basis consistent with the preparation of the Company's financial statements furnished to the Agent.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 20 "INTEREST PERIOD" means for any Eurodollar Loan, a period of one, two, three or six months, as designated by the Company, in each case commencing on the date of such Loan. Each Interest Period that would otherwise end on a day which is not a Banking Day shall end on the next succeeding Banking Day unless such next Banking Day would be the first Banking Day in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the preceding Banking Day. Any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Loan which begins on the last Banking Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Banking Day of the calendar month at the end of such Interest Period. No Interest Period shall extend beyond the Maturity Date, and in such case, the Maturity Date shall be deemed the end of the Interest Period. "JOINDER AGREEMENT" means a joinder agreement in the form attached hereto as Exhibit "B." "LEVEL I STATUS" means, subject to Section 9(r) hereof, the S&P Rating is A- or higher and the Moody's Rating is A3 or higher. "LEVEL II STATUS" means, subject to Section 9(r) hereof, Level I Status does not exist, but the S&P Rating is BBB+ or higher and the Moody's Rating is Baa1 or higher. "LEVEL III STATUS" means, subject to Section 9(r) hereof, neither Level I Status nor Level II Status exists, but the S&P Rating is BBB or higher and the Moody's rating is Baa2 or higher. "LEVEL IV STATUS" means, subject to Section 9(r) hereof, none of Level I Status, Level II Status nor Level III Status exists, but the S&P Rating is BBB- or higher and the Moody's Rating is Baa3 or higher. "LEVEL V STATUS" means, subject to Section 9(r) hereof, none of Level I Status, Level II Status, Level III Status nor Level IV Status exists, but the S&P Rating is BB+ or higher and the Moody's Rating is Ba1 or higher. "LEVEL VI STATUS" means, subject to Section 9(r) hereof, none of Level I Status, Level II Status, Level III Status, Level IV Status nor Level V Status exists. "LIBOR" means a rate of interest equal to the per annum rate of interest at which United States dollar deposits in an amount comparable to the principal balance of the Eurodollar Loan to be made by the Agent in its capacity as a Bank and for a period equal to the relevant Interest Period are offered in the London Interbank Eurodollar market at 11:00 a.m. (London time) two Business Days prior to the commencement of each Interest Period, as displayed in the Bloomberg Financial Markets system, or other authoritative source selected by the Agent in its reasonable discretion, divided by a number determined by subtracting from 1.00 the maximum reserve percentage for determining reserves to be maintained by member banks of the Federal
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 21 Reserve System for Eurocurrency liabilities, such rate to remain fixed for such Interest Period. The Agent's determination of LIBOR shall be conclusive, absent manifest error. "LOAN" means a loan made pursuant to Section 1. "LOAN DOCUMENTS" means this Agreement, the Notes and each other agreement, document or instrument delivered in connection with this Agreement. "MATERIAL ADVERSE CHANGE" means any change in the business, organization, assets, properties or condition (financial or other) of the Company which could materially and adversely affect the Company's ability to perform hereunder including, without limitation, representations, warranties, covenants and payment of Obligations. "MATERIAL SUBSIDIARY" means a Subsidiary of the Company which owns or holds, directly or indirectly, assets accounting for 10% or more of the aggregate, consolidated assets of the Company, as indicated on the most recent consolidating balance sheets delivered to Agent pursuant to Section 6(a) hereof, and which shall include, without limitation, ALLETE Properties, LLC but shall exclude ALLETE Water Services, Inc. "MOODY'S RATING" means the rating assigned by Moody's Investors Service, Inc. and any successor thereto that is a nationally recognized rating agency to the outstanding senior unsecured non-credit enhanced long-term indebtedness of the Company (or if neither Moody's Investors Service, Inc. nor any such successor shall be in the business of rating long-term indebtedness, a nationally recognized rating agency in the U.S. as mutually agreed between the Agent and the Company). Any reference in this Agreement to any specific rating is a reference to such rating as currently defined by Moody's Investors Service, Inc. (or such a successor) and shall be deemed to refer to the equivalent rating if such rating system changes. "NOTE" has the meaning set forth in Section 1.5. "NOTICE OF BORROWING" means a notice from the Company to the Agent requesting the making of a Loan and which is delivered pursuant to Section 1(a)(i) or Section 1(a)(ii) hereof. "OBLIGATIONS" means all obligations (monetary or otherwise) of the Company arising under or in connection with this Agreement, the Notes and each of the other Loan Documents. "OFAC" means the U.S. Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control. "PATRIOT ACT" means USA Patriot Act, Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 ("Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 22 Terrorism Act of 2001), signed into law October 26, 2001, together with all regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. "PRIME RATE" means a floating rate of interest equal to the higher (redetermined daily) of (i) the per annum rate of interest announced by the Agent from time to time at its principal office in Chicago as its prime rate for Dollar loans or (ii) the Federal Funds Rate plus 0.5%. (The "prime rate" is set by the Agent based upon various factors and is used as a reference point for pricing some loans. It is not necessarily the best rate available to the Agent's customers at any point in time.) "PRIME RATE LOAN" means any Loan which bears interest at a rate determined by reference to the Prime Rate. "REQUIRED BANKS" means, at any time, Banks having at least 66-2/3% of the aggregate amount of the Commitments. "S&P RATING" means the rating assigned by Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. and any successor thereto that is a nationally recognized rating agency to the outstanding senior unsecured non-credit enhanced long-term indebtedness of the Company (or, if neither such division nor any successor shall be in the business of rating long-term indebtedness, a nationally recognized rating agency in the U.S. as mutually agreed between the Agent and the Company). Any reference in this Agreement to any specific rating is a reference to such rating as currently defined by Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. (or such a successor) and shall be deemed to refer to the equivalent rating if such rating system changes. "SUBSIDIARY" means, as to the Company, any corporation or other entity of which more than fifty percent (50%) of the outstanding stock or comparable equity interests having ordinary voting power for the election of the board of directors of such corporation or similar governing body in the case of a non-corporation (irrespective of whether or not, at the time, stock or other equity interests of any other class or classes of such corporation or other entity shall have or might have voting power by reason of the happening of any contingency) is at the time directly or indirectly owned by the Company. "TAXES" has the meaning set forth in Section 3(e). "TERRORISM LAWS" means any Laws relating to terrorism or money laundering, including Executive Order No. 13224 (effective September 24, 2001), the PATRIOT Act, the Laws comprising or implementing the Bank Secrecy Act (i.e. The Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act, 31 USC ss.ss.5311-5330 and 12 USC ss.ss.1818(s), 1829(b) and 1951-1959, together with its implementing regulation, 31 CFR 103.), and the Laws administered by OFAC.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 23 "TOTAL CAPITAL" means the sum of retained earnings, stockholders' equity (including preferred stock and QUIPs), all determined with respect to the Company and its Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, and Funded Debt. "UNMATURED EVENT OF DEFAULT" means an event which with notice, the lapse of time or both would constitute an Event of Default. "UTILIZATION FEE RATE" means a rate equal to 0.100% per annum. 9. GENERAL. a. INSTRUCTIONS The Company hereby authorizes the Agent and each Bank to rely upon telephonic, written or facsimile instructions of any person identifying himself or herself as an Authorized Officer and upon any signature which the Agent or such Bank believes to be genuine, and the Company shall be bound thereby in the same manner as if such person were authorized or such signature were genuine. The Company agrees to indemnify the Agent and each Bank from and against all losses and expenses arising out of the Agent's or such Bank's reliance on said instructions or signatures. b. PAYMENTS Payments hereunder and under the Note shall be made in immediately available funds in Dollars without off-set, counter-claim or other deduction. c. COSTS The Company shall pay all costs of the Agent with respect to the negotiation, preparation, execution and delivery of this Agreement and the other Loan Documents, any amendments, waivers, consents or modifications with respect thereto and all costs of the Agent and each Bank in connection with the of enforcement or collection of every kind, including but not limited to all reasonable attorneys' fees, court costs and expenses incurred by the Agent or any Bank in connection with collection or protection or enforcement of any rights hereunder whether or not any lawsuit is ever filed. d. INDEMNIFICATION In consideration of the execution and delivery of this Agreement by the Agent and each Bank and the extension of credit hereunder, the Company hereby indemnifies, exonerates and holds the Agent and each Bank and each of its respective officers, directors, employees and agents (collectively, the "Indemnified Parties") free and harmless from and against any and all actions, causes of action, suits, losses, costs, liabilities and damages, and expenses incurred in
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 24 connection therewith (irrespective of whether such Indemnified Party is a party to the action for which indemnification hereunder is sought), including reasonable attorneys' fees and disbursements (collectively, the "Indemnified Liabilities"), incurred by the Indemnified Parties or any of them as a result of, or arising out of, or relating to any transaction financed or to be financed in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, with the proceeds of any Loan or any investigation, litigation or proceeding related to any environmental cleanup, audit, compliance or other matter relating to the protection of the environment or the release by the Company of any hazardous material, except for any such Indemnified Liabilities arising for the account of a particular Indemnified Party by reason of the relevant Indemnified Party's gross negligence or willful misconduct. If and to the extent that the foregoing undertaking may be unenforceable for any reason, the Company hereby agrees to make the maximum contribution to the payment in satisfaction of each of the Indemnified Liabilities which is permissible under applicable law. e. NOTICES All notices and other communications provided to any party hereto under this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be in writing or by facsimile and addressed, delivered or transmitted to such party at its address or facsimile number set forth below its signature hereto or at such other address or facsimile number as may be designated by such party in a notice to the other parties. Any notice, if mailed and properly addressed with postage prepaid shall be deemed given five days after mailed. Any notice sent by courier service shall be deemed given when received. Any notice, if transmitted by facsimile, shall be deemed given when transmitted. f. SURVIVAL The Obligations of the Company under Sections 2(b), 3(a), 3(e), 3(f), 3(g), 9(c), 9(d) and 10(g) hereof shall survive any payment of the principal of and interest on the Loans and the termination of this Agreement. g. COUNTERPARTS This Agreement may be executed in any number of separate counterparts, each of which when so executed and delivered shall be an original, and all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart via facsimile or other method shall be as effective as delivery of an original executed counterpart. h. AMENDMENT AND WAIVER Any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document may be amended or waived if, but only if, such amendment or waiver is in writing and is signed by the Company and the Required Banks (and, if the rights or duties of the Agent are affected thereby, by the Agent); PROVIDED that no such amendment, waiver or modification shall, unless signed by all the Banks, (i) change the Commitment of any Bank (except for a ratable decrease in the
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 25 Commitments of all Banks) or subject any Bank to any additional obligation, (ii) reduce the principal of or rate of interest on any Loan or any fees hereunder, (iii) postpone the date fixed for any payment of principal of or interest on any Loan or any fees hereunder or (iv) change the percentage of the Commitments or of the aggregate unpaid principal amount of the Notes, or the number of Banks, which shall be required for the Banks or any of them to take any action under this Section or any other provision of this Agreement. Any waiver by the Agent or any Bank of any rights hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall not constitute a waiver of any other rights of the Agent and the Banks from time to time. i. JURISDICTION ANY LITIGATION BASED HEREON, OR ARISING OUT OF, UNDER, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, THIS AGREEMENT OR THE NOTE OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR ANY COURSE OF CONDUCT, COURSE OF DEALING, STATEMENTS (WHETHER VERBAL OR WRITTEN) OR ACTIONS OF THE AGENT, ANY BANK OR THE COMPANY SHALL BE BROUGHT AND MAINTAINED EXCLUSIVELY IN THE COURTS OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS OR IN THE UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE NORTHERN DISTRICT OF ILLINOIS; PROVIDED, HOWEVER, THAT ANY SUIT SEEKING ENFORCEMENT AGAINST ANY COLLATERAL OR OTHER PROPERTY MAY BE BROUGHT, AT THE AGENT'S OPTION, IN THE COURTS OF ANY JURISDICTION WHERE SUCH COLLATERAL OR OTHER PROPERTY MAY BE FOUND. THE COMPANY HEREBY EXPRESSLY AND IRREVOCABLY SUBMITS TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE COURTS OF THE STATE OF ILLINOIS AND OF THE UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE NORTHERN DISTRICT OF ILLINOIS FOR THE PURPOSE OF ANY SUCH LITIGATION AS SET FORTH ABOVE AND IRREVOCABLY CONSENTS TO PERSONAL SERVICE WITHIN OR WITHOUT THE STATE OF ILLINOIS. THE COMPANY HEREBY EXPRESSLY AND IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, ANY OBJECTION WHICH IT MAY HAVE OR HEREAFTER MAY HAVE TO THE LAYING OF VENUE OF ANY SUCH LITIGATION BROUGHT IN ANY SUCH COURT REFERRED TO ABOVE AND ANY CLAIM THAT ANY SUCH LITIGATION HAS BEEN BROUGHT IN AN INCONVENIENT FORUM. TO THE EXTENT THAT THE COMPANY HAS OR HEREAFTER MAY ACQUIRE ANY IMMUNITY FROM JURISDICTION OF ANY COURT OR FROM ANY LEGAL PROCESS (WHETHER THROUGH SERVICE OR NOTICE, ATTACHMENT PRIOR TO JUDGMENT, ATTACHMENT IN AID OF EXECUTION OR OTHERWISE) WITH RESPECT TO ITSELF OR ITS PROPERTY, THE COMPANY HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES SUCH IMMUNITY IN RESPECT OF ITS OBLIGATIONS UNDER THIS AGREEMENT, THE NOTE AND EACH OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT. j. WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL THE COMPANY, THE AGENT AND THE BANKS WAIVE ANY RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING TO ENFORCE OR DEFEND ANY
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 26 RIGHTS UNDER THIS AGREEMENT, THE NOTE OR ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT, AND THE COMPANY, THE AGENT AND THE BANKS AGREE THAT ANY SUCH ACTION OR PROCEEDING SHALL BE TRIED BEFORE A COURT AND NOT A JURY. k. CONFIDENTIALITY The Company, the Agent and the Banks hereby agree and acknowledge that all information relating to the Company or any Subsidiary, which is (i) furnished by the Company to the Agent and the Banks pursuant hereto and (ii) non-public, confidential or proprietary in nature, shall be kept confidential by the Agent and the Banks in accordance with applicable law, PROVIDED that such information and other information relating to the Company and its Subsidiaries may be distributed by the Agent and each Bank to the Agent and such Bank's respective directors, officers, employees, attorneys, affiliates, auditors and regulators (and, upon the order of any court or other governmental agency having jurisdiction over the Agent or any Bank, to any other person or entity). The provisions of this Section 9(k) shall survive the termination of this Agreement. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, confidential "information" shall not include, and the Agent and each Bank may disclose to any and all persons, without limitation of any kind, any information with respect to the U.S. federal income tax treatment and U.S. federal income tax structure of the transactions contemplated hereby and all materials of any kind (including opinions or other tax analyses) that are provided to the Agent or such Bank relating to such tax treatment and tax structure. l. APPLICABLE LAW This Agreement, the Notes and each other Loan Document shall be governed by the internal laws of the State of Illinois applicable to contracts made and to be performed entirely within such State. m. SHARING OF SET-OFFS Each Bank agrees that if it shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, receive payment of a proportion of the aggregate amount of principal and interest due with respect to any Note held by it which is greater than the proportion received by any other Bank in respect of the aggregate amount of principal and interest due with respect to any Note held by such other Bank, the Bank receiving such proportionately greater payment shall purchase such participations in the Notes held by the other Banks, and such other adjustments shall be made, as may be required so that all such payments of principal and interest with respect to the Notes held by the Banks shall be shared by the Banks pro rata; PROVIDED that nothing in this Section shall impair the right of any Bank to exercise any right of set-off or counterclaim it may have and to apply the amount subject to such exercise to the payment of indebtedness of the Company other than its indebtedness under the Notes. The Company agrees, to the fullest extent
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 27 it may effectively do so under applicable law, that each Bank and any holder of a participation in a Note, whether or not acquired pursuant to the foregoing arrangements, may exercise rights of set-off or counterclaim and other rights under applicable law, and with respect to such holder of such a participation as fully as if such holder of a participation were a direct creditor of the Company in the amount of such participation. n. PARTICIPATIONS Any Bank may at any time grant to one or more banks or other institutions (each a "PARTICIPANT") participating interests in its Commitment or any or all of its Loans. In the event of any such grant by a Bank of a participating interest to a Participant, whether or not upon notice to the Company and the Agent, such Bank shall remain solely responsible for the performance of its obligations hereunder, and the Company and the Agent shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Bank in connection with such Bank's rights and obligations under this Agreement. Any agreement pursuant to which any Bank may grant such a participating interest shall provide that such Bank shall retain the sole right and responsibility to enforce the obligations of the Company hereunder including, without limitation, the right to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement. The Company agrees that each Participant shall, to the extent provided in its participation agreement, be entitled to the benefits of Section 3 with respect to its participating interest. o. ASSIGNMENTS Any Bank may at any time assign to one or more banks or other financial institutions (each an "ASSIGNEE") all, or a proportionate part of all, of its rights and obligations under this Agreement and the Notes, and such Assignee shall assume such rights and obligations, pursuant to a Joinder Agreement in substantially the form of Exhibit B hereto executed by such Assignee and such transferor Bank, with (and subject to) the subscribed consent of the Company, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, and the Agent, which shall not be unreasonably withheld; PROVIDED that if an Assignee is an affiliate of such transferor Bank or was a Bank immediately prior to such assignment, no such consent of the Company shall be required; and PROVIDED FURTHER that, if such assignment is in respect of a proportionate part of the transferor Bank's rights and obligations hereunder and under the Notes, the amount of such Bank's Commitment (together with the Commitment of any affiliate of such Bank), after taking into account such assignment, is at least an amount equal to $5,000,000. Upon execution and delivery of such instrument and payment by such Assignee to such transferor Bank of an amount equal to the purchase price agreed between such transferor Bank and such Assignee, such Assignee shall be a Bank party to this Agreement and shall have all the rights and obligations of a Bank with a Commitment as set forth in such instrument of assumption, and the transferor Bank shall be released from its obligations hereunder to a corresponding extent, and no further consent or action by any party shall be required. Upon the consummation of any assignment pursuant to this Subsection 9(o), the transferor Bank, the Agent and the Company shall make appropriate arrangements so that, if required, a new Note is issued to the Assignee. In connection with any
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 28 such assignment, the transferor Bank shall pay to the Agent an administrative fee for processing such assignment in the amount of $3,500. p. FEDERAL RESERVE BANKS Any Bank may at any time assign all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement and its Note to one or more of the Federal Reserve Banks which comprise the Federal Reserve System. No such assignment shall release the transferor Bank from its obligations hereunder. q. IDENTITY OF HOLDERS The Agent and the Company may, for all purposes of this Agreement, treat any Bank as the holder of any Note drawn to its order (and owner of the Loans evidenced thereby) until written notice of assignment, participation or other transfer shall have been received by them. r. SPLIT-RATINGS In the event the Company's S&P Rating and Moody's Rating do not fall within the same Level Status, then (1) if the S&P Rating's Level Status and the Moody's Rating's Level Status are in consecutive Level Status categories, the lower Level Status shall be deemed to apply for purposes of this Agreement or (2) if the S&P Rating's Level Status and the Moody's Rating's Level Status are not in consecutive Level Status categories, then the Level Status immediately above the lower of the S&P Rating's Level Status and the Moody's Rating's Level Status shall be deemed to apply for purposes of this Agreement. For purposes of this Agreement, Level I Status shall be deemed the highest and Level V Status shall be deemed the lowest. s. CONTINUED EFFECT; NO NOVATION Notwithstanding anything contained herein, this Agreement is not intended to and does not serve to effect a novation of the Obligations. Instead, it is the express intention of the parties hereto to reaffirm the indebtedness which is outstanding as of the date hereof created under the Existing Committed Facility Letter which is evidenced by the notes provided for therein. t. ADDITIONAL LENDERS The Company may, upon the approval of the Agent, add additional lenders as Banks hereto (each a "NEW BANK"), PROVIDED that if as a result of the addition of any New Bank the aggregate amount of Commitments then in effect would exceed $200,000,000, the approval of the Required Banks shall also be required prior to adding any such New Bank. Costs incurred by the Agent in connection with adding any New Bank shall be paid by the Company, and the
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 29 legal documentation pursuant to which any New Bank is added shall be in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Agent. u. CUSTOMER IDENTIFICATION - USA PATRIOT ACT NOTICE. Each Bank (including Agent) hereby notifies the Company that pursuant to the requirements of the PATRIOT Act, and such Bank's policies and practices, such Bank is required to obtain, verify and record certain information and documentation that identifies the Company and its affiliates, which information includes the name and address of the Company or affiliate and such other information that will allow such Bank to identify the Company and its affiliates in accordance with the PATRIOT Act. 10. THE AGENT. a. APPOINTMENT AND AUTHORIZATION Each Bank irrevocably appoints and authorizes the Agent to take such action as agent on its behalf and to exercise such powers under this Agreement and the Notes as are delegated to the Agent by the terms hereof or thereof, together with all such powers as are reasonably incidental thereto. b. AGENT'S FEE The Company shall pay to the Agent for its own account fees in the amounts and at the times previously agreed upon between the Company and the Agent. c. AGENT AND AFFILIATES LaSalle Bank National Association shall have the same rights and powers under this Agreement as any other Bank and may exercise or refrain from exercising the same as though it were not the Agent, and LaSalle Bank National Association and its affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to, and generally engage in any kind of business with the Company or affiliate of the Company as if it were not the Agent hereunder. d. ACTION BY AGENT The obligations of the Agent hereunder are only those expressly set forth herein. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the Agent shall not be required to take any action with respect to any Event of Default, except as expressly provided in Section 7(b). The Agent's duties hereunder and under the other Loan Documents are only those expressly set forth herein and therein and nothing herein or therein shall be deemed to impose on the Agent any fiduciary obligation to any Bank or the Company.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 30 e. CONSULTATION WITH EXPERTS The Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Company), independent public accountants and other experts selected by it and shall not be liable for any action taken or omitted to be taken by it in good faith in accordance with the advice of such counsel, accountants or experts. f. LIABILITY OF AGENT Neither the Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents, or employees shall be liable to any Bank for any action taken or not taken by it in connection herewith (i) with the consent or at the request of the Required Banks or (ii) in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. Neither the Agent nor any of its directors, officers, agents or employees shall be responsible to any Bank for or have any duty to any Bank to ascertain, inquire into or verify (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in connection with this Agreement or any borrowing hereunder; (ii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants or agreements of the Company; (iii) the satisfaction of any condition specified in Article III, except receipt of items required to be delivered to the Agent; (iv) the existence or continuance of an Event of Default; or (iv) the validity, effectiveness or genuineness of this Agreement, the Notes, the other Loan Documents or any other instrument or writing furnished in connection herewith. The Agent shall not incur any liability by acting in reliance upon any notice, consent, certificate, statement, or other writing (which may be a bank wire, telex or similar writing) believed by it in good faith to be genuine or to be signed by the proper party or parties. g. INDEMNIFICATION Each Bank shall, ratably in accordance with its Commitment, indemnify the Agent (to the extent not reimbursed by the Company) against any cost, expense (including counsel fees and disbursements), claim, demand, action, loss or liability (except such as result from the Agent's gross negligence or willful misconduct) that the Agent may suffer or incur in connection with this Agreement or any action taken or omitted by the Agent hereunder. h. CREDIT DECISION Each Bank acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Agent or any other Bank, and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Bank also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Agent or any other Bank, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking any action under this Agreement.
ALLETE, Inc. January 11, 2006 Page 31 i. SUCCESSOR AGENT The Agent may resign at any time by giving written notice thereof to the Banks and the Company. Upon any such resignation, the Required Banks shall have the right to appoint a successor Agent, which successor Agent shall be satisfactory to the Company. If no successor Agent shall have been so appointed by the Required Banks, and shall have accepted such appointment, within 30 days after the retiring Agent gives notice of resignation, then the retiring Agent may, on behalf of the Banks, appoint a successor Agent, which shall be a commercial bank organized or licensed under the laws of the United States of America or of any State thereof and having a combined capital and surplus of at least $100,000,000 and shall otherwise be subject to the consent of the Company, which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Agent hereunder by a successor Agent, such successor Agent shall thereupon succeed to and become vested with all the rights and duties of the retiring Agent, and the retiring Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. After any retiring Agent's resignation hereunder as Agent, the provisions of this Article shall inure to its benefit as to any actions taken or omitted to be taken by it while it was Agent. BALANCE OF PAGE INTENTIONALLY BLANK -SIGNATURE PAGE FOLLOW-
Please acknowledge your agreement to the foregoing by signing and returning a copy of this Fourth Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter. Commitment: $35,000,000 LASALLE BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, individually as a Bank and as Agent. By: /s/ Sean P. Drinan ---------------------------------- First Vice President Title: ------------------------------ /s/ Sean P. Drinan By: --------------------------------- First Vice President Title: ------------------------------ Address: LaSalle Bank National Association Syndications Unit 135 South LaSalle Street, Suite 1425 Chicago, Illinois 60603 Attention: Damatria Gilbert Facsimile: (312) 904-4448 Telephone: (312) 904-8277 With copies to: LaSalle Bank National Association 135 South LaSalle Street Chicago, Illinois 60603 Attention: Chip Campbell Facsimile: (312) 904-1994 Telephone: (312) 904-4497
Fourth Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter Signature Pages Continued Commitment: $30,000,000 U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as a Bank By: /s/ Christopher W. Rupp ---------------------------------- Name: Christopher W. Rupp -------------------------------- Title: Vice President -----------------------------
Fourth Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter Signature Pages Continued Commitment: $30,000,000 WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as a Bank By: /s/ Patrick McCue ---------------------------------- Name: Patrick McCue -------------------------------- Title: Vice President ------------------------------- By: /s/ Jennifer Barrett ---------------------------------- Name: Jennifer Barrett -------------------------------- Title: Vice President -------------------------------
Fourth Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter Signature Pages Continued Commitment: $30,000,000 JP MORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as a Bank By: /s/ Mike DeForge ---------------------------------- Name: Mike DeForge -------------------------------- Title: Vice President -------------------------------
Fourth Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter Signature Pages Continued Commitment: $25,000,000 THE BANK OF TOKYO - MITSUBISHI UFJ, LTD., Chicago Branch, as a Bank By: /s/ Mr. Tsuguyuki Umene ---------------------------------- Name: Mr. Tsuguyuki Umene -------------------------------- Title: Deputy General Manager -------------------------------
Agreed to this 11th day of January, 2006 ALLETE, INC., a Minnesota corporation By: /s/ James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------- Name: James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------- Title: Sr. Vice President & CFO ---------------------------------- Address: 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802 Attention: Corporate Treasurer Facsimile No.: (218) 723-3912



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060130164120.txt.gz
TIME:20060130164120
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - JANUARY 24, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission (IRS Employer jurisdiction of incorporation File Number) Identification No.) or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 1 - REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS ITEM 1.01 ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT On January 24, 2006, the Executive Compensation Committee of the ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) Board of Directors approved the 2006 long-term incentive award opportunities for eligible executives under the ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan. The form of nonqualified stock option grant and form of performance share grant are attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 10(a)1 and 10(a)2, respectively, and hereby incorporated by reference. The performance measure used to determine performance share awards for the three-year performance cycle ending December 31, 2008, is the Company's total shareholder return relative to its peer group. The Executive Compensation Committee also reviewed and approved the 2006 annual and long-term incentive award opportunities, financial and strategic nonfinancial goals for the President of ALLETE Properties, LLC, pursuant to the ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan and the ALLETE Executive Annual Incentive Plan. The form of long-term cash incentive award, form of stock grant and form of annual award, are attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 10(a)3, 10(a)4 and 10(b), respectively, and hereby incorporated by reference. The ALLETE Executive Annual Incentive Plan authorizes the Executive Compensation Committee to award cash bonuses based on the Company's performance during the year. The ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan authorizes the Executive Compensation Committee to grant awards in ALLETE common stock or cash. SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Shell Company Transactions - Not applicable (d) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 10(a)1 - Form of ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan 2006 Nonqualified Stock Option Grant. 10(a)2 - Form of ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan 2006 Performance Share Grant. 10(a)3 - Form of ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan 2006 Long-Term Cash Incentive Award - President of ALLETE Properties, LLC. 10(a)4 - Form of ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan 2006 Stock Grant - President of ALLETE Properties, LLC. 10(b) - Form of ALLETE Executive Annual Incentive Plan 2006 Award - President of ALLETE Properties, LLC. ------------------------------ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 30, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - our ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" in Item 7 of ALLETE's 2004 Form 10-K and Item 2 of its Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2005. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 30, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. January 30, 2006 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 30, 2006 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 10(a)1 - Form of ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan 2006 Nonqualified Stock Option Grant. 10(a)2 - Form of ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan 2006 Performance Share Grant. 10(a)3 - Form of ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan 2006 Long-Term Cash Incentive Award - President of ALLETE Properties, LLC. 10(a)4 - Form of ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan 2006 Stock Grant - President of ALLETE Properties, LLC. 10(b) - Form of ALLETE Executive Annual Incentive Plan 2006 Award - President of ALLETE Properties, LLC. ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 30, 2006 1

Exhibit 10(a)1 ALLETE EXECUTIVE LONG-TERM INCENTIVE COMPENSATION PLAN NONQUALIFIED STOCK OPTION GRANT [ELIGIBLE EXECUTIVES EXCLUDING PRESIDENT OF ALLETE PROPERTIES, LLC] Name SS# In accordance with the terms of ALLETE's Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan (the "Plan"), as determined by and through the Executive Compensation Committee of ALLETE's Board of Directors, ALLETE hereby grants to you (the "Participant"), subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Grant (including Annex A hereto and all documents incorporated herein by reference) the rights and options (the "Options") to purchase from ALLETE, shares of its common stock, without par value, as set forth below: Number of Options Granted: Number of Shares to which Options Pertain: Date of Grant: February 1, 2006 Option Price: Vesting: 33% on February 1, 2007 33% on February 1, 2008 34% on February 1, 2009 Expiration Date: Close of business on February 1, 2016 Exercise Period: Date of Vesting through Expiration Date Further terms and conditions of the Grant are set forth in Annex A hereto, which is an integral part of this Grant. This Grant is made in accordance with the Plan, which was approved by ALLETE's shareholders at the 2005 Annual Meeting. All terms, provisions and conditions applicable to the Options set forth in the Plan and not set forth herein are incorporated by reference. To the extent any provision hereof is inconsistent with a provision of the Plan, the provisions of the Plan will govern. These Options are not intended to qualify as incentive stock options under Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, ALLETE has caused this Grant to be executed by its Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer as of the date and year first above written. ALLETE By: ------------------------------------------------ Chairman, President and CEO Attachment: Annex A
ANNEX A TO EXECUTIVE LONG-TERM INCENTIVE COMPENSATION PLAN NONQUALIFIED STOCK OPTION GRANT [ELIGIBLE EXECUTIVES EXCLUDING PRESIDENT OF ALLETE PROPERTIES, LLC] 1. FURTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF OPTIONS. The Grant of Options evidenced by the Grant to which this is annexed is subject to the following additional terms and conditions: (a) EXERCISE OF OPTIONS. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) hereof, upon a Change in Control as set forth in the Plan or as the Executive Compensation Committee (the "Committee") may determine, the Participant must be in the employ of ALLETE or a Subsidiary thereof at the time the Options are exercised. Subject to the foregoing and to subsection (b) hereof, after vesting, the Options may be exercised in whole or in part from time to time by written or electronic notice of exercise delivered to Computershare, such notice to be received and effective not later than the Expiration Date, specifying the number of Shares to be purchased. In the event that the Expiration Date shall fall on a day that is not a regular business day at ALLETE's executive offices in Duluth, Minnesota, such notice must be delivered to Computershare no later than the last regular business day prior to the Expiration Date. (b) EXERCISE UPON DEATH, RETIREMENT, OR DISABILITY; FORFEITURE UPON TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT FOR CAUSE, DEMOTION, OR UNSATISFACTORY JOB PERFORMANCE. (1) If the Participant retires pursuant to the terms of a tax- qualified retirement plan of ALLETE or a Subsidiary or upon such other retirement as may be approved by the Committee, the Options, to the extent not yet vested, shall vest in full and all Options covered by the Grant, to the extent not yet exercised, shall be exercisable by the Participant in full at any time during the three-year period immediately following his retirement, but in no event after the Expiration Date. (2) In the event of the death of the Participant while in the employ of ALLETE or a Subsidiary, the Options, to the extent not yet vested, shall vest in full and all Options covered by the Grant, to the extent not yet exercised, shall be exercisable by the executors, administrators, legatees or distributees of his estate, as the case may be, in full at any time during the one-year period following his death, but in no event after the Expiration Date. (3) In the event of the termination of the employment of the Participant due to Disability (as defined in Section 22(e)(3) of the Code), the Options, to the extent not yet vested, shall vest in full and all Options covered by the Grant, to the extent not yet exercised, shall be exercisable in full at any time during the one-year period following such termination of employment, but in no event after the Expiration Date.
(4) If the Participant's employment or service with the Company terminates for any reason other than for Cause (defined below). Participant shall have ninety (90) days from the date of termination of employment or service to exercise vested options and all unvested options will be forfeited as of the date of termination. (5) If the Participant's employment with the Company or any Subsidiary is terminated for Cause, all outstanding unvested and vested Options shall be forfeited as of the date of such termination of employment or service. Cause is defined as (a) any conduct by the Participant that causes or threatens a loss to the Company; (b) any violation of any Company policy; (c) Participant's refusal or neglect to substantially perform his or her obligations and services; (d) violation of the Company's code of business conduct and ethics; or (e) Participant's arrest, conviction or admission of any crime involving injury to persons, misappropriation of money, or damage to property. (6) If the Participant is demoted, or if ALLETE or a Business Unit determines in its sole discretion that the Participants job performance is unsatisfactory, ALLETE reserves the right to cancel any grants and unvested options. (7) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Committee may, in its discretion and at any time, provide that the Options may be exercisable during a period of up to 5 years following termination of employment but in no event after the Expiration Date. 2. RATIFICATION OF ACTIONS. By receiving the Grant or other benefit under the Plan, the Participant and each person claiming under or through him shall be conclusively deemed to have indicated the Participant's acceptance and ratification of, and consent to, any action taken under the Plan or the Grant by ALLETE, the Board or the Committee. 3. NOTICES. Any notice hereunder to ALLETE shall be addressed to its office, 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802, Attention: Manager - Executive Compensation and Employee Benefits, Human Resources, and any notice hereunder to the Participant shall be directed to the Participant's address as indicated by ALLETE's records, subject to the right of either party to designate at any time hereafter in writing some other address. 4. DEFINITIONS. Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings given them in the Plan. 5. GOVERNING LAW AND SEVERABILITY. To the extent not preempted by Federal law, the Grant will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Minnesota, without regard to conflicts of law provisions. In the event any provision of the Grant shall be held illegal or invalid for any reason, the illegality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining parts of the Grant, and the Grant shall be construed and enforced as if the illegal or invalid provision had not been included. 2

Exhibit 10(a)2 ALLETE EXECUTIVE LONG-TERM INCENTIVE COMPENSATION PLAN PERFORMANCE SHARE GRANT [ELIGIBLE EXECUTIVES EXCLUDING PRESIDENT OF ALLETE PROPERTIES, LLC] Name SS # In accordance with the terms of ALLETE's Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan (the "Plan"), as determined by and through the Executive Compensation Committee of ALLETE's Board of Directors, ALLETE hereby grants to you (the "Participant") Performance Shares, as set forth below, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Grant (including Annexes A and B hereto and all documents incorporated herein by reference): Number of Performance Shares Granted: Date of Grant: February 1, 2006 Performance Period: January 1, 2006 through December 31, 2008 Performance Goals: See Annex B This Grant is made in accordance with the Plan, which was approved by ALLETE's shareholders at the 2005 Annual Meeting. Further terms and conditions of the Grant are set forth in Annex A hereto and Performance Goals are set forth in Annex B hereto, which are integral parts of this Grant. All terms, provisions and conditions applicable to the Performance Shares set forth in the Plan and not set forth herein are incorporated by reference. To the extent any provision hereof is inconsistent with a provision of the Plan, the provisions of the Plan will govern. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, ALLETE has caused this Grant to be executed by its Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer as of the date and year first above written. ALLETE By: ----------------------------------------- Chairman, President and CEO Attachments: Annex A and Annex B
ANNEX A TO ALLETE EXECUTIVE LONG-TERM INCENTIVE COMPENSATION PLAN PERFORMANCE SHARE GRANT [ELIGIBLE EXECUTIVES EXCLUDING PRESIDENT OF ALLETE PROPERTIES, LLC] 1. FURTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF PERFORMANCE SHARES. The Grant of Performance Shares evidenced by the Grant to which this is annexed is subject to the following additional terms and conditions: (a) DIVIDEND EQUIVALENTS. The Participant shall receive Dividend Equivalents with respect to the number of Performance Shares subject to the Grant. Dividend Equivalents shall be calculated and credited to the Participant at the end of the Performance Period. The Dividend Equivalents shall be in the form of additional Performance Shares, which shall be added to the number of Performance Shares subject to the Grant, and which shall equal the number of Shares (including fractional Shares) that could be purchased on the dividend payment dates, based on the closing sale price as reported in the consolidated transaction reporting system on that date, with cash dividends that would have been paid on Performance Shares, if such Performance Shares were Shares. (b) SATISFACTION OF GOALS. At the end of the Performance Period, the Executive Compensation Committee (the "Committee") shall determine the extent to which the Performance Goals have been met. The Participant will not be credited with any Performance Shares if the threshold level has not been met. Subject to the provisions of subsection (d) hereof and to provisions in the Plan for change in control, percentages of the Performance Share grant shall be credited to the Participant as follows: If the threshold level has been met, 50% of the Performance Shares (as increased by the Dividend Equivalents) shall be credited to the Participant. If the target level has been met, 100% of the Performance Shares (as increased by the Dividend Equivalents) shall be credited to the Participant. If the superior level has been met, 200% of the Performance Shares (as increased by the Dividend Equivalents) shall be credited to the Participant. Straight line interpolation will be used to determine earned awards based on achievement of goals between the threshold, target and superior levels. (c) PAYMENT. Subject to the provisions of subsection (d) hereof and to provisions in the Plan for change in control, Performance Shares as determined by the Committee according to subsection (b) hereof shall be paid out 100% (as increased by the Dividend Equivalents) within two and one half months after the end of the Performance Period and after the Committee has determined the extent to which Performance Goals have been met. Payment shall be made, after withholding Performance Shares equal in value to the Participant's income tax obligation via a deposit of ALLETE common stock into an Invest Direct account. Performance Share awards shall not vest until paid.
(d) PAYMENT UPON DEATH, RETIREMENT OR DISABILITY; FORFEITURE OF UNVESTED SHARES UPON DEMOTION, UNSATISFACTORY JOB PERFORMANCE OR OTHER TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT. (1) During a Performance Period (i) if the Participant retires pursuant to the terms of a tax qualified retirement plan of ALLETE or a Subsidiary or upon such other retirement as may be approved by the Committee, (ii) in the event of the death of the Participant while in the employ of ALLETE or a Subsidiary, or (iii) in the event of the termination of the employment of the Participant due to Disability (as defined in Section 22(e)(3) of the Code), the Participant (or the Participant's beneficiary or estate) shall receive a payment of any Performance Shares (as increased by the Dividend Equivalents) after the end of the Performance Period, promptly after the Committee has determined the extent to which Performance Goals have been met. The payment shall be prorated based upon the number of whole calendar months within the Performance Period which had elapsed as of the date of death, retirement or termination due to Disability in relation to the number of calendar months in the full Performance Period. A whole month is counted in the calculation if the Participant was in the position as of the 15th of the month. (2) After the end of a Performance Period, but before any or all Performance Shares have been paid, if as specified in subsection (d)(1) above, a Participant retires, dies or Participant's employment is terminated due to Disability, the Participant (or the Participant's beneficiary or estate) shall be entitled to a full payout of all Performance Shares (as increased by the Dividend Equivalents), which shall be paid out at the next scheduled performance share payment date. (3) If prior to payment of all Performance Shares, the Participant is demoted, or ALLETE or a Business Unit determines, in its sole discretion, that the Participant's job performance is unsatisfactory, ALLETE reserves the right to cancel or amend the Participant's grant relating to any unpaid Performance Shares, with the result that some portion or all of the Participant's unpaid Performance Shares are forfeited. (4) If the Participant's employment with ALLETE or any Subsidiary terminates for any reason other than death, Disability or retirement, as specified in subsection (d)(1) hereof, all Performance Shares and related Dividend Equivalents to the extent not yet paid shall, except as otherwise provided by the Committee, be forfeited on the date of such other termination of employment. 2. RATIFICATION OF ACTIONS. By receiving the Grant or other benefit under the Plan, the Participant and each person claiming under or through Participant shall be conclusively deemed to have indicated the Participant's acceptance and ratification of, and consent to, any action taken under the Plan or the Grant by ALLETE, the Board or the Committee. 3. NOTICES. Any notice hereunder to ALLETE shall be addressed to its office, 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802, Attention: Manager - Executive Compensation and Employee Benefits, Human Resources, and any notice hereunder to the Participant shall be 2
directed to the Participant's address as indicated by ALLETE's records, subject to the right of either party to designate at any time hereafter in writing some other address. 4. DEFINITIONS. Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings given them in the Plan. 5. GOVERNING LAW AND SEVERABILITY. To the extent not preempted by the Federal law, the Grant will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Minnesota, without regard to conflicts of law provisions. In the event any provision of the Grant shall be held illegal or invalid for any reason, the illegality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining parts of the Grant, and the Grant shall be construed and enforced as if the illegal or invalid provision had not been included. 3
ANNEX B TO ALLETE EXECUTIVE LONG-TERM INCENTIVE COMPENSATION PLAN PERFORMANCE SHARE GRANT [ELIGIBLE EXECUTIVES EXCLUDING PRESIDENT OF ALLETE PROPERTIES, LLC] FINANCIAL MEASURE: Total Shareholder Return (TSR) computed over the three-year period January 1, 2006 to December 31, 2008. PERFORMANCE SHARE AWARD: If ALLETE's TSR ranking is 3rd or higher among a peer group of 16 companies (superior performance), 200% of the Performance Share grant will be awarded. If ALLETE's TSR performance ranks 7th among the peer group (target performance), 100% of the Grant will be awarded. If ALLETE's TSR performance ranks 10th (threshold performance), 50% of the Grant will be awarded. If TSR performance is below threshold, no Performance Shares will be awarded. Straight-line interpolation will be used to determine earned awards based on the TSR ranking between threshold, target and superior. ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- TSR RANK PERF. LEVEL PAYOUT % ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 1 [Graphic Omitted - 200.0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 2 Arrow Pointing Up] 200.0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 3 Superior 200.0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 4 [Graphic Omitted - 175.0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 5 Arrow Pointing Up] 150.0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 6 125.0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 7 Target 100.0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 8 [Graphic Omitted - 83.3% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 9 Arrow Pointing Up] 66.7% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 10 Threshold 50.0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 11 0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 12 0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 13 0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 14 0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 15 0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 16 0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ---------------------------- 17 0% ----------------------------- -------------------- ----------------------------

Exhibit 10(a)3 ALLETE EXECUTIVE LONG-TERM INCENTIVE COMPENSATION PLAN FORM OF LONG-TERM CASH INCENTIVE AWARD PRESIDENT OF ALLETE PROPERTIES, LLC 2006 GOALS AND AWARD OPPORTUNITY -------------------------------- Base Salary $ TIMES Award Opportunity (percent of base salary) % ------ EQUALS Target Award Opportunity $ TIMES Performance Scorecard Achievement (0% - 120%) /1 EQUALS Cash Incentive Award /2 $ ------- /1 The Performance Scorecard includes one financial goal and six strategic nonfinanical goals. Goal achievement will be determined at the end of 2006. /2 Award Vesting: 30% on February 1, 2007; 30% on February 1, 2008; 40% on February 1, 2009.

Exhibit 10(a)4 ALLETE EXECUTIVE LONG-TERM INCENTIVE COMPENSATION PLAN STOCK GRANT [PRESIDENT OF ALLETE PROPERTIES, LLC] Name SS # In accordance with the terms of ALLETE's Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan (the "Plan"), as determined by and through the Executive Compensation Committee of ALLETE's Board of Directors, ALLETE hereby grants to you (the "Participant") the right to receive ALLETE Common Stock, as set forth below, subject to the terms and conditions set forth in this Grant (including Annex A hereto and all documents incorporated herein by reference): Number of Shares of ALLETE Common Stock: Date of Grant: February 1, 2006 Vesting Period: 30% on February 1, 2007 30% on February 1, 2008 40% on February 1, 2009 This Grant is made in accordance with the Plan, which was approved by ALLETE's shareholders at the 2005 Annual Meeting. Further terms and conditions of the Grant are set forth in Annex A hereto, which is an integral part of this Grant. All terms, provisions and conditions set forth in the Plan and not set forth herein are incorporated by reference. To the extent any provision hereof is inconsistent with a provision of the Plan, the provisions of the Plan will govern. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, ALLETE has caused this Grant to be executed by its Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer as of the date and year first above written. ALLETE By:________________________________________ Chairman, President and CEO Attachment: Annex A
ANNEX A TO ALLETE EXECUTIVE LONG-TERM INCENTIVE COMPENSATION PLAN STOCK GRANT [PRESIDENT OF ALLETE PROPERTIES, LLC] 1. FURTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF STOCK GRANT. The Grant of Shares evidenced by the Grant to which this is annexed is subject to the following additional terms and conditions: (a) DIVIDEND EQUIVALENTS. The Participant shall not receive Dividend Equivalents with respect to the number of Shares subject to the Grant. (b) PAYMENT. Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) hereof, payment shall be made within two and one half months after the end of the vesting period, after withholding Shares equal in value to the Participant's income tax obligation via a deposit of ALLETE common stock into an account in the ALLETE Invest Direct plan. (c) PAYMENT UPON DEATH, RETIREMENT, DISABILITY, FORFEITURE OF UNVESTED SHARES UPON UNSATISFACTORY JOB PERFORMANCE, OR OTHER TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT. (1) During the Vesting Period (i) if the Participant retires pursuant to the terms of a tax qualified retirement plan of ALLETE or a Subsidiary or upon such other retirement as may be approved by the Committee, (ii) in the event of the death of the Participant while in the employ of ALLETE or a Subsidiary, or (iii) in the event of the termination of the employment of the Participant due to Disability (as defined in Section 22(e)(3) of the Code), all unvested Shares of Stock shall vest and be paid within two and one half months after such event to the Participant (or the Participant's beneficiary or estate). The payment shall be prorated based upon the number of whole calendar months within the three year Vesting Period which had elapsed as of the date of death, retirement or termination due to Disability in relation to the number of calendar months in the three year Vesting Period. A whole month is counted in the calculation if the Participant was in the position as of the 15th of the month. (2) If prior to payment of all Shares, the Participant is demoted, or ALLETE or a Business Unit determines, in its sole discretion, that the Participant's job performance is unsatisfactory, ALLETE reserves the right to cancel or amend the Participant's grant relating to any unpaid Shares, with the result that some portion or all of the Participant's unpaid Shares are forfeited. (3) If the Participant's employment with ALLETE or any Subsidiary terminates for any reason other than death, Disability or retirement, as specified in subsection (c)(1) hereof, all Shares to the extent not yet vested shall, except as otherwise provided by the Committee, be forfeited on the date of such other termination of employment. 1
2. RATIFICATION OF ACTIONS. By receiving the Grant or other benefit under the Plan, the Participant and each person claiming under or through Participant shall be conclusively deemed to have indicated the Participant's acceptance and ratification of, and consent to, any action taken under the Plan or the Grant by ALLETE, the Board or the Committee. 3. NOTICES. Any notice hereunder to ALLETE shall be addressed to ALLETE, 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802, Attention: Manager - Executive Compensation and Employee Benefits, Human Resources, and any notice hereunder to the Participant shall be directed to the Participant's address as indicated by ALLETE's records, subject to the right of either party to designate at any time hereafter in writing some other address. 4. DEFINITIONS. Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings given them in the Plan. 5. GOVERNING LAW AND SEVERABILITY. To the extent not preempted by the Federal law, the Grant will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Minnesota, without regard to conflicts of law provisions. In the event any provision of the Grant shall be held illegal or invalid for any reason, the illegality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining parts of the Grant, and the Grant shall be construed and enforced as if the illegal or invalid provision had not been included.

Exhibit 10(b) ALLETE EXECUTIVE ANNUAL INCENTIVE PLAN FORM OF ANNUAL AWARD PRESIDENT OF ALLETE PROPERTIES, LLC 2006 FINANCIAL GOALS AND AWARD OPPORTUNITY ------------------------------------------ Achievement Bonus Pool (0.0% - 0.84% of Total Land Sales) $ PLUS Incentive Bonus Pool (0.0% - 0.35% of Total Net Income) $ EQUALS Bonus Pool Opportunity ------ $ TIMES Performance Scorecard Goal Achievement (0% - 120%) /1 % EQUALS Annual Incentive Award $ ====== /1 The Performance Scorecard includes one financial goal and six strategic nonfinanical goals. Goal achievement will be determined at the end of 2006.



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060216090926.txt.gz
TIME:20060216090926
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - FEBRUARY 16, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION ITEM 2.02 RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITIONS On February 16, 2006, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) issued a press release announcing 2005 earnings, which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99 and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. The information is being furnished pursuant to Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition. This information, including Exhibit 99 attached hereto, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Shell Company Transactions - Not applicable (d) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------ 99 - ALLETE News Release dated February 16, 2006, announcing 2005 earnings. [THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN FURNISHED AND SHALL NOT BE DEEMED "FILED" FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 18 OF THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1934, NOR SHALL IT BE DEEMED INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE IN ANY FILING UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, EXCEPT AS SHALL BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH BY SPECIFIC REFERENCE IN SUCH FILING.] ---------------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 16, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - ALLETE's ability to obtain viable real estate for development purposes; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Factors that May Affect Future Results" in Item 7 of ALLETE's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2004 (2004 Form 10-K), and Item 2 of its Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended September 30, 2005. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in its 2004 Form 10-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 16, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. February 16, 2006 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 16, 2006 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated February 16, 2006, announcing 2005 earnings. [THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN FURNISHED AND SHALL NOT BE DEEMED "FILED" FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 18 OF THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1934, NOR SHALL IT BE DEEMED INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE IN ANY FILING UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, EXCEPT AS SHALL BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH BY SPECIFIC REFERENCE IN SUCH FILING.] ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 16, 2006

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: February 16, 2006 CONTACT: Eric Olson 218-723-3947 eolson@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE REPORTS 2005 FINANCIAL RESULTS; PROJECTS 15-20 PERCENT 2006 EARNINGS PER SHARE GROWTH ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported 2005 earnings from continuing operations of $0.64 per diluted share, compared to $1.35 in 2004. Excluding transactions not representative of ongoing operations in 2005 and 2004 (described below), earnings from continuing operations were $2.26 per share in 2005 compared to $1.32 in 2004, an increase of 71 percent. "We couldn't be more pleased with the financial and operational performance of our company," said Donald J. Shippar, ALLETE's chairman, president and CEO. "Utility power sales were higher across all customer classes in 2005. Real estate sales were robust and our Town Center at Palm Coast project began to take shape." REGULATED UTILITY income improved $8.0 million from 2004 to 2005, primarily due to a four percent increase in overall electricity sales. Healthier economic conditions in Minnesota Power's service territory combined with warmer weather in the summer of 2005 contributed to stronger sales to all customer classes. NONREGULATED ENERGY OPERATIONS recorded a $1.9 million profit in 2005 compared to a loss of $2.9 million in 2004, excluding the $50.4 million, or $1.84 per share, charge related to the assignment of the Kendall County, Ill. power purchase agreement. Elimination of the operating loss related to this agreement and strong results from BNI Coal contributed to the 2005 increase. Earnings from the Taconite Harbor Energy Center were down from last year because of outage-related maintenance and other expenses. Income from REAL ESTATE climbed to $17.5 million in 2005, a 22 percent increase over 2004. The first real estate sales from ALLETE Properties' Town Center at Palm Coast development were recorded in 2005, representing 643,000 square feet of commercial space. After months of infrastructure construction, the first developer-owned structures on the 1,550-acre project will be built in 2006. ALLETE's OTHER segment recorded income of $2.9 million, a $13.5 million improvement from last year. In 2005, ALLETE recorded lower interest expense and higher earnings on excess cash, and had a smaller loss in its emerging technology investment portfolio. In addition, during the fourth quarter of 2005, a $3.7 million, or $0.13 per share, current tax benefit due to the positive resolution of income tax audit issues was recognized and comprehensive tax planning initiatives implemented by ALLETE in 2005 resulted in a $2.5 million, or $0.09 per share, deferred tax benefit. In 2004, a $10.9 million, or $0.38 per share, debt prepayment expense nearly offset an $11.5 million, or $0.41 per share, gain on the sale of ADESA, Inc. common shares. - more-
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- "Beyond the solid financial gains in this earnings report, we achieved a number of milestones and accomplished important strategic objectives in 2005," Shippar said. These events included: - Assigning the Kendall County power purchase agreement, eliminating projected after-tax operating losses of approximately $8 million per year; - Entering into an agreement to invest in American Transmission Company, which is expected to be a significant and consistent earnings contributor in our energy business; - Extending electric contracts with five of Minnesota Power's customers in the taconite mining and pulp and paper industries for an additional four to eight years; - Announcing a $60 million plan to reduce air emissions at two generating stations, while requesting current cost recovery; - Entering an agreement to purchase renewable energy from a new wind facility to be built in North Dakota and continuing to pursue the purchase of renewable energy from a new wind facility in northern Minnesota; - Recording the company's first real estate sales at ALLETE Properties' Town Center project, signing the company's first sales contract for the Palm Coast Park development, and beginning the Development of Regional Impact process for Ormond Crossings, the company's third major real estate development; - Completing the exit from the company's Water Services businesses by selling our water and wastewater assets in Georgia; and - Selling Enventis Telecom, a transaction that provided approximately $29 million in cash. Due in large part to these accomplishments, ALLETE expects 2006 earnings per share from continuing operations to increase by 15 percent to 20 percent. This earnings expectation is based on a 2005 diluted earnings per share from continuing operations of $2.26, which excludes transactions not representative of ongoing operations. The 2006 earnings expectation does not include earnings from additional investments we may make in growth initiatives. "Our company is in a good position to keep the positive momentum going in 2006," Shippar said. "We look forward to building upon ALLETE's strengths, and expect another strong year." Shippar also noted that, due to the company's near and long-term earnings outlook, the ALLETE Board of Directors recently declared a substantial 15 percent increase in the quarterly common stock dividend. "The board is confident in the company's ability to provide consistent future dividend increases while, at the same time, funding its growth strategy," he said. ALLETE, headquartered in Duluth, Minn., provides energy services in the upper Midwest and has significant real estate holdings in Florida. More information about the company is available at www.allete.com. THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES, AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ##### ALLETE - 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET, DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802 WWW.ALLETE.COM
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 4 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Note: In 2005, we began allocating corporate charges and interest expense to our business segments. For comparative purposes, segment information for 2004 has been restated to reflect the new allocation method used in 2005 for corporate charges and interest expense. This restatement had no impact on consolidated net income or earnings per share.
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 5 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- NON-GAAP FINANCIAL MEASURES ALLETE prepares financial statements in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States (GAAP). Along with this information, the company discloses and discusses certain non-GAAP financial information in our quarterly earnings releases, on investor conference calls and during investor conferences and related events. Management believes that non-GAAP financial data supplements ALLETE's GAAP financial statements by providing investors with additional information which enhances the investors' overall understanding of our financial performance and the comparability of our operating results from period to period. The presentation of this additional information is not meant to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for our results of operations prepared and presented in accordance with GAAP. Financial results for 2005 were significantly impacted by the following transactions: - A $50.4 million after tax, or $1.84 per share, charge due to the assignment of the Kendall County power purchase agreement to Constellation Energy Commodities; - A $3.7 million, or $0.13 per share, current tax benefit due to a positive resolution of income tax audit issues; and - A $2.5 million, or $0.09 per share, deferred tax benefit due to comprehensive tax planning initiatives. In 2004, financial results were significantly impacted by the following transactions: - A $10.9 million after tax, or $0.38 per share, debt prepayment cost as part of ALLETE's financial restructuring in preparation for the spin-off of Automotive Services; and - An $11.5 million after tax, or $0.41 per share, gain on the sale of shares of ADESA, Inc. common stock related to the company's Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan. Since these transactions significantly impacted the financial results from continuing operations in 2005 and 2004, ALLETE believes that for comparative purposes and a more accurate reflection of our ongoing operations, it is useful to present diluted earnings per share from continuing operations for each applicable period excluding the impact of these items. The table below reconciles actual reported diluted earnings per share from continuing operations before change in accounting principle to the adjusted results that exclude these transactions in the respective periods. [THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN FURNISHED AND SHALL NOT BE DEEMED "FILED" FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 18 OF THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1934, NOR SHALL IT BE DEEMED INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE IN ANY FILING UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, EXCEPT AS SHALL BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH BY SPECIFIC REFERENCE IN SUCH FILING.]



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060217142707.txt.gz
TIME:20060217142707
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - FEBRUARY 14, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 1 - REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS ITEM 1.01 ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT On February 14, 2006, the Executive Compensation Committee of the ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) Board of Directors approved the 2006 annual incentive award opportunities, and financial and strategic nonfinancial goals for eligible executives pursuant to the ALLETE Executive Annual Incentive Plan. The form of annual award and performance goals are attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 10 and hereby incorporated by reference. The ALLETE Executive Annual Incentive Plan authorizes the Executive Compensation Committee to award cash bonuses based on the Company's performance during the year. SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Shell Company Transactions - Not applicable (d) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------- 10 - Form of ALLETE Executive Annual Incentive Plan 2006 Award. ---------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 17, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Florida Public Service Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - ALLETE's ability to obtain viable real estate for development purposes; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading "Risk Factors" in ALLETE's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in its other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 17, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. February 17, 2006 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 17, 2006 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 10 - Form of ALLETE Executive Annual Incentive Plan 2006 Award. ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 17, 2006

EXHIBIT 10 ALLETE EXECUTIVE ANNUAL INCENTIVE PLAN 2006 FORM OF AWARD TARGET AWARD OPPORTUNITY ------------------------ Base Salary $ TIMES Award Opportunity (percent of base salary) % ----------- EQUALS Target Award $ GOALS ----- GOAL WEIGHTING FINANCIAL GOALS Net Income from Continuing Operations (NICO) 37.5% Operating Free Cash Flow (OFCF) 37.5% STRATEGIC NONFINANCIAL GOALS 25% ------- 100%



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060310093257.txt.gz
TIME:20060310093257
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - MARCH 10, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 7 - REGULATION FD ITEM 7.01 REGULATION FD DISCLOSURE ALLETE, Inc. adjusted its interactive graphic website financial information to reflect the December 30, 2005, sale of its telecommunications subsidiary, Enventis Telecom, Inc. to Hickory Tech Corporation, as discontinued operations in prior periods. The following shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 10, 2006 1
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. March 10, 2006 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------------ James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 10, 2006



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060505090724.txt.gz
TIME:20060505090724
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - MAY 5, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION ITEM 2.02 RESULTS OF OPERATIONS AND FINANCIAL CONDITIONS On May 5, 2006, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) issued a press release announcing earnings for the first quarter of 2006, which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K as Exhibit 99 and incorporated herein by reference in its entirety. The information is being furnished pursuant to Item 2.02. Results of Operations and Financial Condition. This information, including Exhibit 99 attached hereto, shall not be deemed "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing. SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Business Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Shell Company Transactions - Not applicable (d) Exhibits Exhibit Number ------ 99 - ALLETE News Release dated May 5, 2006, announcing 2006 first quarter earnings. (THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN FURNISHED AND SHALL NOT BE DEEMED "FILED" FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 18 OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, NOR SHALL IT BE DEEMED INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE IN ANY FILING UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, EXCEPT AS SHALL BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH BY SPECIFIC REFERENCE IN SUCH FILING.) ---------------------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 5, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - ALLETE's ability to obtain viable real estate for development purposes; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I, Item 1A of ALLETE's 2005 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in its other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 5, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. May 5, 2006 James K. Vizanko ------------------------------------------------- James K. Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 5, 2006 3
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 99 - ALLETE News Release dated May 5, 2006, announcing 2006 first quarter earnings. (THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN FURNISHED AND SHALL NOT BE DEEMED "FILED" FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 18 OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, NOR SHALL IT BE DEEMED INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE IN ANY FILING UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, EXCEPT AS SHALL BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH BY SPECIFIC REFERENCE IN SUCH FILING.) ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 5, 2006

EXHIBIT 99 [ALLETE LOGO] For Release: May 5, 2006 CONTACT: Margaret Hodnik 218-723-3966 mhodnik@allete.com INVESTOR Tim Thorp CONTACT: 218-723-3953 tthorp@allete.com NEWS ALLETE FIRST QUARTER EARNINGS INCREASED SIX PERCENT OVER 2005; -------------------------------------------------------------- GUIDANCE OF 15 PERCENT TO 20 PERCENT EARNINGS GROWTH REAFFIRMED --------------------------------------------------------------- ALLETE (NYSE: ALE) today reported earnings of 68 cents per share of common stock in the first quarter of 2006, a six percent increase over the 64 cents per share recorded during the same period a year ago. ALLETE recorded $18.8 million of net income on operating revenue of $192.5 million in the first quarter of 2006 compared to net income of $17.4 million and operating revenue of $193.3 million in the first quarter of 2005. "Our quarterly earnings were in line with what we anticipated at the beginning of the year," said CEO Donald J. Shippar. "ALLETE's energy and real estate businesses are positioned to deliver another solid year of financial performance. We're on track to meet our projected 15 percent to 20 percent increase in earnings per share compared to 2005." Although record warm temperatures in early 2006 curtailed energy sales to residential and commercial customers in Minnesota and Wisconsin, sales to large power customers remained strong. Minnesota Power's taconite mining customers continue to operate at historically high output levels. ALLETE's real estate segment was a significant contributor to earnings, with net income of $5 million during the first quarter. ALLETE Properties had $85 million of land sales under contract as of March 31, 2006. Most of that contracted land is located in the 1,550-acre Town Center at Palm Coast development taking shape in fast-growing Flagler County, Florida. On May 4, ALLETE Properties announced an additional $52.5 million contract for the sale of property at its Palm Coast Park development. Shippar said several factors support ALLETE's projection of a 15 percent to 20 percent increase in earnings per share from continuing operations this year. He noted that earnings from its investment in the American Transmission Company, the elimination of operating losses associated with the Kendall County agreement, a smaller loss in the emerging technology portfolio, and continued strong Florida real estate sales will contribute to earnings growth as the year unfolds. ALLETE plans to invest $60 million into ATC during 2006. ALLETE's corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE provides energy services in the upper Midwest and has significant real estate holdings in Florida. More information about the company is available on ALLETE's Web site at www.allete.com. -------------- THE STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS RELEASE AND STATEMENTS THAT ALLETE MAY MAKE ORALLY IN CONNECTION WITH THIS RELEASE THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. ACTUAL RESULTS MAY DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM THOSE PROJECTED IN THE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. THESE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS INVOLVE RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES, AND INVESTORS ARE DIRECTED TO THE RISKS DISCUSSED IN DOCUMENTS FILED BY ALLETE WITH THE SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION. ### [RECYCLE LOGO] RECYCLED PAPER ALLETE - 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET, DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802 WWW.ALLETE.COM
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 2 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
ALLETE NEWS RELEASE PAGE 3 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- [THIS EXHIBIT HAS BEEN FURNISHED AND SHALL NOT BE DEEMED "FILED" FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 18 OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, NOR SHALL IT BE DEEMED INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE IN ANY FILING UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, EXCEPT AS SHALL BE EXPRESSLY SET FORTH BY SPECIFIC REFERENCE IN SUCH FILING.]



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060519091628.txt.gz
TIME:20060519091628
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - MAY 19, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 5 - CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT ITEM 5.02 DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR PRINCIPAL OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF PRINCIPAL OFFICERS On May 19, 2006, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) announced James K. Vizanko, it's Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, will retire from the Company in early fall 2006 to assume a faculty position at the University of Minnesota, Duluth and to devote more time to his family and personal interests. Mr. Vizanko has been ALLETE's Chief Financial Officer since August 2001. The Company has initiated efforts to name a new Chief Financial Officer. ------------------------------ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 19, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - ALLETE's ability to obtain viable real estate for development purposes; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I, Item 1A of ALLETE's 2005 Form 10-K and Part II, Item 1A of ALLETE's Form 10-Q for the Quarter Ended March 31, 2006. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in its other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 19, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. May 19, 2006 Mark A. Schober ------------------------------------ Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Controller ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 19, 2006 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060526113940.txt.gz
TIME:20060526113940
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - MAY 23, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS Item 8.01 Other Events. On May 23, 2006, the Palm Coast Park Community Development District (Palm Coast CDD) issued $31.8 million of tax-exempt, 5.7% Special Assessment Bonds, Series 2006, due May 1, 2037 (Bonds). The Bonds were issued to fund ALLETE Properties, LLC's Palm Coast Park development project in Florida (Palm Coast Park). Bond proceeds of $26.3 million will be used for the construction of environmental, traffic mitigation and infrastructure improvements, including utility extensions, roadways, parks, drainage, recreational facilities, landscaping and a multi-purpose trail system. The remaining funds will be used for capitalized interest, a debt service reserve fund and the costs of issuing the Bonds. The Bonds are payable from and secured by the revenue derived from assessments imposed, levied and collected by the Palm Coast CDD. The assessments represent an allocation of the costs of the improvements, including bond financing costs, to the lands within the Palm Coast CDD benefiting from the improvements. The Bonds issued by the Palm Coast CDD are non-recourse debt to ALLETE Properties, LLC. The assessments will be included in the annual property tax bills of land owners beginning in 2007. Palm Coast CDD is an independent unit of local government, created and established in accordance with Florida's Uniform Community Development District Act of 1980 (Act). The Act provides legal authority for a community development district to finance the construction of major infrastructure for community development with general obligation, revenue and special assessment revenue debt obligations. ALLETE Properties, LLC is a wholly-owned subsidiary of ALLETE, Inc. The developers of Palm Coast Park are Florida Landmark Communities, Inc., Palm Coast Forest, LLC and Palm Coast Land, LLC, all are wholly-owned subsidiaries of Lehigh Acquisition Corporation, which is an 80 percent owned subsidiary of ALLETE Properties, LLC. Development costs funded by ALLETE Properties, LLC are expected to be minimal. ------------------------------ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 26, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - ALLETE's ability to obtain viable real estate for development purposes; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I, Item 1A of ALLETE's 2005 Form 10-K and Part II, Item 1A of ALLETE's Form 10-Q for the Quarter Ended March 31, 2006. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in its other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 26, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. May 26, 2006 Mark A. Schober ------------------------------------ Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Controller ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 26, 2006 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060608160413.txt.gz
TIME:20060608160413
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - JUNE 7, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 5 - CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT Item 5.02 DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR PRINCIPAL OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF PRINCIPAL OFFICERS On June 7, 2006, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) announced that Mark A. Schober will be the Company's Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer effective July 1, 2006. Mr. Schober, currently ALLETE's Senior Vice President and Controller, will succeed James Vizanko, who announced his retirement from the Company in May 2006. Mr. Schober has been ALLETE's Controller since 1993. The Company has initiated efforts to name a new controller. ---------------------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 8, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - ALLETE's ability to obtain viable real estate for development purposes; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I, Item 1A of ALLETE's 2005 Form 10-K and Part II, Item 1A of ALLETE's Form 10-Q for the Quarter Ended March 31, 2006. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in its other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 8, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. June 8, 2006 James K. Vizanko ----------------------------------------------------- James K .Vizanko Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 8, 2006 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060707130019.txt.gz
TIME:20060707130019
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - JULY 5, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION ITEM 2.03 CREATION OF A DIRECT FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OR AN OBLIGATION UNDER AN OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENT OF A REGISTRANT On July 5, 2006, the Collier County Industrial Development Authority (Issuer) issued $27.8 million of Industrial Development Variable Rate Demand Refunding Revenue Bonds Series 2006 due 2025 (Refunding Bonds) on behalf of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE). The proceeds of the Refunding Bonds will be used to redeem a portion of ALLETE's outstanding Collier County Industrial Development Refunding Revenue Bonds 6.5% Series 1996 due 2025. Under a Financing Agreement between the Collier County Industrial Development Authority and ALLETE dated as of July 1, 2006 (Financing Agreement), ALLETE is obligated to make payments to the Issuer sufficient to pay all principal and interest on the Refunding Bonds. These ALLETE obligations under the Financing Agreement are supported by a direct pay letter of credit. The Letter of Credit Agreement dated as of July 5, 2006, among ALLETE, Participating Banks and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Administrative Agent and Issuing Bank contains customary covenants, including a requirement that ALLETE maintain a maximum ratio of funded debt to total capital of 0.65 to 1.00. The Letter of Credit Agreement also contains customary events of default, including a cross default provision. ---------------------------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 7, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - ALLETE's ability to obtain viable real estate for development purposes; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I, Item 1A of ALLETE's 2005 Form 10-K and Part II, Item 1A of ALLETE's Form 10-Q for the Quarter Ended March 31, 2006. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in its other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 7, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. July 7, 2006 Mark A. Schober ------------------------------------------------- Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 7, 2006 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060714151753.txt.gz
TIME:20060714151753
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Material Modifications to Rights of Security Holders
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - JULY 12, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 1 - REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS ITEM 1.01 ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT On July 12, 2006, the Board of Directors of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) approved the Amended and Restated Rights Agreement by and between the Company and the Corporate Secretary of ALLETE, as Rights Agent (Rights Agent) (Amended Agreement). The Amended Agreement modifies the Company's Rights Agreement, dated as of July 24, 1996 (Rights Agreement), by and between ALLETE and the Corporate Secretary of ALLETE. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to them in the Amended Agreement. The Amended Agreement, among other things, extends the Final Expiration Date of the Rights Agreement to July 11, 2009, unless the Rights are earlier redeemed or exchanged by the Company under certain conditions as provided in the Amended Agreement. Further, the Amended Agreement provides that the Company may not consolidate, merge, or sell a majority of its assets or earning power if doing so would be counter to the intended benefits of the Rights or would result in the distribution of Rights to the shareholders of the other parties to the transaction. Finally, the Amended Agreement provides for the creation of a committee of independent directors to annually review the terms and conditions of the Amended Agreement, as well as to consider whether termination or modification of the Amended Agreement would be in the best interests of the shareholders and to make a recommendation based on such review to the Board of Directors. The Amended Agreement was entered into and effective as of July 12, 2006. Reference is hereby made to the description of the Rights Agreement and text of the Rights Agreement filed with the Company's Form 8-A dated August 6, 1996. The foregoing description of the Amended Agreement is qualified in its entirety by the actual terms of the Amended Agreement, which is incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2 of ALLETE's Amendment No. 1 to Form 8-A/A, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on July 14, 2006. SECTION 3 - SECURITIES AND TRADING MARKETS ITEM 3.03 MATERIAL MODIFICATION TO RIGHTS OF SECURITY HOLDERS See Item 1.01. SECTION 5 - CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT ITEM 5.02 DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR PRINCIPAL OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF PRINCIPAL OFFICERS Effective July 12, 2006, ALLETE named Steven Q. DeVinck the Company's Controller. Mr. DeVinck, 46, joined ALLETE in 1997 as a financial analyst in the accounting department, and was named assistant controller in 1999. In 2004, Mr. DeVinck was named director of ALLETE's non-utility business development group. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 14, 2006 1
SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS ITEM 9.01 FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS (a) Financial Statements of Businesses Acquired - Not applicable (b) Pro Forma Financial Information - Not applicable (c) Shell Company Transactions - Not applicable (d) Exhibits EXHIBIT NUMBER ------- 4 - Amended and Restated Rights Agreement, dated as of July 12, 2006, between ALLETE, Inc. and the Corporate Secretary of ALLETE, Inc., as Rights Agent. ---------------------------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 3 OF THIS FORM 8-K. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 14, 2006
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - ALLETE's ability to obtain viable real estate for development purposes; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I, Item 1A of ALLETE's 2005 Form 10-K and Part II, Item 1A of ALLETE's Form 10-Q for the Quarter Ended March 31, 2006. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in its other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 14, 2006 3
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. July 14, 2006 Mark A. Schober ------------------------------------------------- Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 4 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 14, 2006
EXHIBIT INDEX EXHIBIT NUMBER ---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 4 - Amended and Restated Rights Agreement, dated as of July 12, 2006, between ALLETE, Inc. and the Corporate Secretary of ALLETE, Inc., as Rights Agent. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 14, 2006

EXHIBIT 4 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- AMENDED AND RESTATED RIGHTS AGREEMENT between ALLETE, INC. and THE CORPORATE SECRETARY OF ALLETE, INC., RIGHTS AGENT DATED AS OF JULY 12, 2006 - --------------------------------------------------------------------------------
TABLE OF CONTENTS PAGE Section 1. Certain Definitions.........................................1 Section 2. Appointment of Rights Agent.................................7 Section 3. Issue of Right Certificates.................................7 Section 4. Form of Right Certificates..................................11 Section 5. Countersignature and Registration...........................12 Section 6. Transfer, Split Up, Combination and Exchange of Right Certificates; Mutilated, Destroyed, Lost or Stolen Right Certificates..........................................13 Section 7. Exercise of Rights; Purchase Price; Expiration Date of Rights...................................................15 Section 8. Cancellation and Destruction of Right Certificates..........19 Section 9. Availability of Preferred Stock.............................20 Section 10. Preferred Stock Record Date.................................21 Section 11. Adjustment of Purchase Price, Number of Shares or Number of Rights...................................................22 Section 12. Certificate of Adjusted Purchase Price or Number of Shares......................................................37 Section 13. Consolidation, Merger or Sale or Transfer of Assets or Earning Power...............................................37 Section 14. Fractional Rights and Fractional Shares.....................42 Section 15. Rights of Action............................................45 Section 16. Agreement of Right Holders..................................45 Section 17. Right Certificate Holder Not Deemed a Shareholder...........46 Section 18. Concerning the Rights Agent.................................47 Section 19. Merger or Consolidation or Change of Name of Rights Agent...48 Section 20. Duties of Rights Agent......................................49 Section 21. Change of Rights Agent......................................54 Section 22. Issuance of New Right Certificates..........................56 i
Section 23. Redemption..................................................56 Section 24. Exchange....................................................59 Section 25. Notice of Certain Events....................................61 Section 26. Notices.....................................................62 Section 27. Supplements and Amendments..................................63 Section 28. Successors..................................................64 Section 29. Benefits of this Agreement..................................64 Section 30. Severability................................................64 Section 31. Governing Law...............................................65 Section 32. Counterparts................................................65 Section 33. Descriptive Headings........................................65 Section 34. Determinations and Actions by the Board of Directors........65 Exhibit A - Form of Certificate of Resolution Fixing Terms of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A Exhibit B - Form of Right Certificate Exhibit C - Summary of Amended and Restated Rights Agreement ii
AMENDED AND RESTATED RIGHTS AGREEMENT Amended and Restated Rights Agreement (hereinafter the "Amended Rights Agreement"), dated as of July 12, 2006, between ALLETE, INC., a Minnesota corporation (the "Company"), and the Corporate Secretary of the Company (the "Rights Agent"). W I T N E S S E T H: WHEREAS, the Company and the Rights Agent entered into the Rights Agreement, dated as of July 24, 1996 (the "Original Rights Agreement"); WHEREAS, the Board of Directors of the Company has adopted, in accordance with Section 27 of the Original Rights Agreement, a resolution approving, and directing the appropriate officers of the Company to take all appropriate steps to execute and put into effect, this Amended Rights Agreement, and an appropriate officer of the Company has provided a certificate to the Rights Agent as provided for in such Section 27. NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and covenants set forth in the Original Rights Agreement and this Amended Rights Agreement, the parties hereby agree as follows: Section 1. CERTAIN DEFINITIONS For purposes of this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings indicated: "Acquiring Person" shall mean any Person (as such term is hereinafter defined) who or which, together with all Affiliates and Associates (as such terms are hereinafter defined) of such Person, shall be the Beneficial Owner (as such term is hereinafter defined) of 15% or more of the Common Stock of the Company then outstanding, but shall not include the Company, any Affiliate of the Company, any employee benefit plan of the Company or of any Affiliate of the Company, or any Person holding Common Stock for or pursuant to the terms of
any such plan to the extent, and only to the extent, of the Common Stock so held. Notwithstanding the foregoing, (i) no Person shall become an "Acquiring Person" as the result of (a) an acquisition of Common Stock by the Company which, by reducing the number of shares outstanding, increases the proportionate number of shares beneficially owned by such Person to 15% or more of the Common Stock of the Company then outstanding or (b) the acquisition by such Person of newly-issued Common Stock directly from the Company (it being understood that a purchase from an underwriter or other intermediary is not directly from the Company); provided, however, that if a Person shall become the Beneficial Owner of 15% or more of the Common Stock of the Company then outstanding by reason of share purchases by the Company or the receipt of newly-issued Common Stock directly from the Company and shall, after such share purchases or direct issuance by the Company, become the Beneficial Owner of any additional Common Stock of the Company (other than pursuant to a dividend or distribution paid or made by the Company on the Common Stock or as a result of a split or subdivision of the Common Stock or similar event), then such Person shall be deemed to be an "Acquiring Person"; provided further, however, that any transferee from such Person who becomes the Beneficial Owner of 15% or more of the Common Stock of the Company then outstanding shall nevertheless be deemed to be an "Acquiring Person." (ii) if the Board of Directors determines that a Person who would otherwise be an "Acquiring Person," as defined pursuant to the foregoing 2
provisions of this Section 1, has become such inadvertently, and such Person divests as promptly as practicable (and in any event within ten business days after notification by the Company) a sufficient number of shares of Common Stock so that such Person would no longer be an "Acquiring Person," then such Person shall not be deemed to be an "Acquiring Person" for any purposes of this Agreement unless and until such Person again becomes an "Acquiring Person." "Affiliate" and "Associate" shall the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in Rule 12b-2 of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act, as in effect on the date of this Agreement. A Person shall be deemed the "Beneficial Owner" of and shall be deemed to "beneficially own" any securities: (a) which such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates beneficially owns, directly or indirectly; (b) which such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates, directly or indirectly, has (A) the right to acquire (whether such right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time) pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding, whether written or oral (other than customary agreements with and between underwriters and selling group members with respect to a bona fide public offering of securities), or upon the exercise of conversion rights, exchange rights, rights (other than these Rights), warrants or options, or otherwise; provided, however, that a Person shall not be deemed the Beneficial Owner of, or to beneficially own, (1) securities tendered pursuant to a tender or exchange offer made by or on behalf of such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates until such tendered securities 3
are accepted for purchase or exchange, (2) securities issuable upon exercise of Rights at any time prior to the occurrence of a Triggering Event, or (3) securities issuable upon exercise of Rights from and after the occurrence of a Triggering Event which Rights were acquired by such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates prior to the Distribution Date or pursuant to Section 3(a) or Section 22 hereof (the "Original Rights") or pursuant to Section 11(i) hereof in connection with an adjustment made with respect to any Original Rights; (B) the sole or shared right to vote or dispose (including any such right pursuant to any agreement, arrangement or understanding, whether written or oral); provided, however, that a Person shall not be deemed the Beneficial Owner of, or to beneficially own, any security if the agreement, arrangement or understanding to vote such security (1) arises solely from a revocable proxy or consent given to such Person in response to a public proxy or consent solicitation made pursuant to, and in accordance with, the applicable rules and regulations promulgated under the Exchange Act and (2) is not also then reportable on Schedule 13D under the Exchange Act (or any comparable or successor report); or (C) "beneficial ownership" (as determined pursuant to Rule 13d-3 (or any successor rule) of the General Rules and Regulations under the Exchange Act); or (c) which are beneficially owned, directly or indirectly, by any other Person (or any Affiliate or Associate thereof) with which such Person or any of such Person's Affiliates or Associates has any agreement, arrangement or understanding, whether written or oral (other than customary agreements with and between underwriters and selling group members with respect to a bona fide public offering of securities) for the purpose of acquiring, holding, voting (except to the extent contemplated by the proviso to clause (B) of subparagraph (b) of this definition) or disposing of any securities 4
of the Company; provided, however, that no Person who is an officer, director or employee of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company shall be deemed, solely by reason of such Person's status or authority as such, to be the "Beneficial Owner" of, or to "beneficially own," any securities that are "beneficially owned" (as defined in this Section 1), including, without limitation, in a fiduciary capacity, by the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company, or by any other such officer, director or employee of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company. Notwithstanding anything in this definition of Beneficial Ownership to the contrary, the phrase "then outstanding," when used with reference to a Person's Beneficial Ownership of securities of the Company, shall mean the number of such securities then issued and outstanding together with the number of such securities not then actually issued and outstanding which such Person would be deemed to own beneficially hereunder. "Board of Directors" shall mean the Board of Directors of the Company. "Business Day" shall mean any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday, or a day on which banking or trust institutions in Minnesota are authorized or obligated by law or executive order to close. "Close of business" on any given date shall mean 5:00 P.M., Duluth, Minnesota time, on such date; provided, however, that if such date is not a Business Day it shall mean 5:00 P.M., Duluth time, on the next succeeding Business Day. "Common Stock" when used with reference to the Company shall mean the shares of common stock, without par value, of the Company. "Common Stock" when used with reference to any Person other than the Company shall mean the capital stock (or equity interest) 5
with the greatest voting power of such other Person or the equity securities or other equity interest having power to control or direct the management of such other Person. "Distribution Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3 hereof. "Exchange Act" shall mean the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. "Expiration Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7 hereof. "Final Expiration Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7 hereof. "Person" shall mean any individual, firm, corporation or other entity, and shall include any successor (by merger or otherwise) of such entity. "Preferred Stock" shall mean shares of Serial Preferred Stock A, without par value, of the Company, designated "Junior Serial Preferred Stock A" and having the rights and preferences set forth in the Form of Certificate of Resolution Fixing Terms of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A attached to this Agreement as Exhibit A. "Principal Party" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 13 hereof. "Purchase Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 4 hereof. "Redemption Date" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 7 hereof. "Redemption Period" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 23 hereof. "Redemption Price" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 23 hereof. "Right Certificate" shall have the meaning set forth in Section 3 hereof. "Securities Act" shall mean the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. "Stock Acquisition Date" shall mean the first date of public announcement (which, for purposes of this definition, shall include, without limitation, a report filed pursuant to Section 13(d) of the Exchange Act) by the Company or an Acquiring Person that an Acquiring Person has become such. 6
"Subsidiary" shall mean, with reference to any Person, any corporation or other entity of which a majority of the voting power of the voting equity securities or equity interest is owned, directly or indirectly, by such Person or is otherwise controlled by such person. "Triggering Event" shall mean any event described in Section 11(a)(ii) or Section 13(a) hereof. Any determination or interpretation required in connection with any of the definitions contained in this Section 1 shall be made by the Board of Directors, which determination shall be final and binding on the Rights Agent. Section 2. APPOINTMENT OF RIGHTS AGENT. The Company hereby appoints the Rights Agent to act as agent for the Company and the holders of the Rights (who, in accordance with Section 3 hereof, shall, prior to the Distribution Date, also be the holders of the Common Stock) in accordance with the terms and conditions hereof, and the Rights Agent hereby accepts such appointment. The Company may from time to time appoint such co-Rights Agents as it may deem necessary or desirable. The Rights Agent shall have no duty to supervise, and shall in no event be liable for, the acts or omissions of any such co-Rights Agents. Section 3. ISSUE OF RIGHT CERTIFICATES. (a) Until the earlier of (i) the close of business on the tenth day after the Stock Acquisition Date (or, if the tenth day after the Stock Acquisition Date occurs before the Record Date, the close of business on the Record Date), or (ii) the close of business on the fifteenth business day (or such later date as may be determined by action of the Board of Directors prior to such time as any Person becomes an Acquiring Person) after the date of the commencement by any Person (other than the Company, any Affiliate of the Company, any employee benefit plan of the Company or of any Affiliate 7
of the Company or any entity holding Common Stock for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan) of, or of the first public announcement of the intention of any Person (other than the Company, any Affiliate of the Company, any employee benefit plan of the Company or of any Affiliate of the Company or any entity holding Common Stock for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan) to commence, a tender or exchange offer the consummation of which would result in any Person becoming the Beneficial Owner of Common Stock aggregating 15% or more of the then outstanding Common Stock (including any such date which is after the date of this Agreement and prior to the issuance of the Rights; the earlier of such dates being herein referred to as the "Distribution Date"), (x) the Rights will be evidenced (subject to the provisions of Section 3(b) hereof) by the certificates for Common Stock registered in the names of the holders thereof (which certificates shall also be deemed to be certificates for Rights) and not by separate certificates, and (y) the Rights will be transferable only in connection with the transfer of the underlying Common Stock (including a transfer to the Company). As soon as practicable after the Distribution Date, the Company will prepare and execute, the Rights Agent will countersign, and the Company will send or cause to be sent (and the Rights Agent will, if requested, send) by first-class, insured, postage-prepaid mail, to each record holder of Common Stock as of the close of business on the Distribution Date, at the address of such holder shown on the records of the Company, a right certificate, in substantially the form of Exhibit B hereto (a "Right Certificate"), evidencing one Right for each share of Common Stock so held, subject to adjustment as provided herein. In the event that an adjustment in the number of Rights per share of Common Stock has been made pursuant to Section 11 hereof, at the time of distribution of the Rights Certificates, 8
the Company shall make necessary and appropriate rounding adjustments (in accordance with Section 14(a) hereof) so that Rights Certificates representing only whole numbers of Rights are distributed and cash is paid in lieu of any fractional Rights. As of the Distribution Date, the Rights will be evidenced solely by such Right Certificates. (b) On the Record Date, or as soon as practicable thereafter, the Company will send a copy of a Summary of Amended and Restated Rights Agreement, in substantially the form of Exhibit C hereto (the "Summary of Amended Rights Agreement"), by first class, postage-prepaid mail, to each record holder of Common Stock as of the close of business on the Record Date (other than any Acquiring Person or any Associate or Affiliate of any Acquiring Person), at the address of such holder shown on the records of the Company. With respect to certificates for Common Stock outstanding as of the Record Date, until the Distribution Date, the Rights will be evidenced by such certificates registered in the names of the holders thereof together with the Summary of Amended Rights Agreement, and registered holders of Common Stock shall also be the registered holders of the associated Rights. Until the Distribution Date (or the earlier Expiration Date), the transfer of any certificate for Common Stock outstanding on the Record Date, with or without a copy of the Summary of Amended Rights Agreement, shall also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented thereby. (c) Rights shall be issued in respect of all shares of Common Stock which are issued (whether originally issued or delivered from the Company's treasury) after the Record Date but prior to the earlier of the Distribution Date or the Expiration Date; provided, however, Rights shall also be issued to the extent provided in Section 22 9
hereof in respect of all shares of Common Stock which are issued after the Distribution Date and prior to the Expiration Date. Certificates representing such Common Stock shall also be deemed to be certificates for Rights. Certificates representing both Common Stock and Rights in accordance with this Section 3 which are executed and delivered (whether the Common Stock represented thereby are originally issued, delivered from the Company's treasury or are presented for transfer) by the Company (including, without limitation, certificates representing reacquired Common Stock referred to in the last sentence of this paragraph (c)) after the Record Date but prior to the earlier of the Distribution Date or the Expiration Date shall have impressed on, printed on, written on or otherwise affixed to them a legend substantially equivalent to the following: This certificate also evidences and entitles the holder hereof to certain rights as set forth in the Amended and Restated Rights Agreement between ALLETE, Inc. (the "Company") and the Secretary of the Company, dated as of July 12, 2006 (the "Amended Rights Agreement"), the terms of which are hereby incorporated herein by reference and a copy of which is on file at the principal offices of the Company. Under certain circumstances, as set forth in the Amended Rights Agreement, such Rights will be evidenced by separate certificates and will no longer be evidenced by this certificate. The Company will mail to the holder of this certificate a copy of the Amended Rights Agreement, as in effect on the date of mailing, without charge promptly after receipt of a written request therefor. Under certain circumstances set forth in the Amended Rights Agreement, Rights issued to, or held by, any Person who is, was or becomes an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate thereof (as such terms are defined in the Rights Agreement), whether currently held by or on behalf of such Person or by any subsequent holder, shall become null and void. Until the earlier of the Distribution Date and the Expiration Date, the Rights associated with the Common Stock shall be evidenced by the certificates representing the associated Common Stock alone, and the transfer of any such certificate shall also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented thereby. In the event that the Company 10
purchases or acquires any Common Stock after the Record Date but prior to the Distribution Date, any Rights associated with such Common Stock shall be deemed cancelled and retired so that the Company shall not be entitled to exercise any Rights associated with the Common Stock which are no longer outstanding. Notwithstanding this Section 3(c), the omission of the foregoing legend shall not affect the enforceability of any part of this Agreement or the rights of any holder of the Rights. Section 4. FORM OF RIGHT CERTIFICATES. (a) The Right Certificates (and the forms of election to purchase Preferred Stock and of assignment to be printed on the reverse thereof) shall each be substantially in the form set forth in Exhibit B hereto and may have such marks of identification or designation and such legends, summaries or endorsements printed thereon as the Company may deem appropriate and as are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Agreement, or as may be required to comply with any applicable law or with any rule or regulation made pursuant thereto or with any rule or regulation of any stock exchange on which the Rights may from time to time be listed, or to conform to usage. Subject to the provisions of Section 11 and Section 22 hereof, the Right Certificates shall entitle the holders thereof to purchase such number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock as shall be set forth therein at the price per one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock set forth therein (the "Purchase Price"), but the amount and type of securities purchasable upon the exercise of each Right and the Purchase Price thereof shall be subject to adjustment as provided herein. (b) Any Right Certificate issued pursuant to Section 3(a) or Section 22 hereof that represents Rights beneficially owned by: (i) an Acquiring Person or any 11
Associate or Affiliate of an Acquiring Person, (ii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee after the Acquiring Person becomes an Acquiring Person, or (iii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee prior to or concurrently with the Acquiring Person becoming such and receives such Rights pursuant to either (A) a transfer (whether or not for consideration) from the Acquiring Person to holders of equity interests in such Acquiring Person or to any Person with whom the Acquiring Person has any continuing agreement, arrangement or understanding, whether written or oral, regarding the transferred Rights or (B) a transfer which the Board of Directors has determined is part of a plan, arrangement or understanding, whether written or oral, which has as a primary purpose or effect avoidance of Section 7(e) hereof, and any Right Certificate issued pursuant to Section 6 or Section 11 hereof upon transfer, exchange, replacement or adjustment of any other Right Certificate referred to in this sentence, shall contain (to the extent feasible and otherwise reasonably identifiable as such) the following legend: The Rights represented by this Right Certificate are or were beneficially owned by a Person who was or became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person (as such terms are defined in the Amended and Restated Rights Agreement). Accordingly, this Right Certificate and the Rights represented hereby may become void in the circumstances specified in Section 7(e) of such Agreement. The provisions of Section 7(e) shall apply whether or not any Right Certificate actually contains the foregoing legend. Section 5. COUNTERSIGNATURE AND REGISTRATION. The Right Certificates shall be executed on behalf of the Company by its Chairman of the Board, its Chief Executive Officer, any Vice Chairman, its President, any of its Vice Presidents, or its Treasurer, either manually or 12
by facsimile signature; shall have affixed thereto the Company's seal or a facsimile thereof; and shall be attested by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the Company, either manually or by facsimile signature. The Right Certificates shall be manually countersigned by the Rights Agent and shall not be valid for any purpose unless so countersigned. In case any officer of the Company who shall have signed any of the Right Certificates shall cease to be such officer of the Company before countersignature by the Rights Agent and issuance and delivery by the Company, such Right Certificates, nevertheless, may be countersigned by the Rights Agent and issued and delivered by the Company with the same force and effect as though the person who signed such Right Certificates had not ceased to be such officer of the Company; and any Right Certificate may be signed on behalf of the Company by any person who, at the actual date of the execution of such Right Certificate, shall be a proper officer of the Company to sign such Right Certificate, although at the date of the execution of this Agreement any such person was not such an officer. Following the Distribution Date, the Rights Agent will keep or cause to be kept, at its office designated for such purpose, books for registration and transfer of the Right Certificates issued hereunder. Such books shall show the names and addresses of the respective holders of the Right Certificates, the number of Rights evidenced on its face by each of the Right Certificates and the date of each of the Right Certificates. Section 6. TRANSFER, SPLIT UP, COMBINATION AND EXCHANGE OF RIGHT CERTIFICATES; MUTILATED, DESTROYED, LOST OR STOLEN RIGHT CERTIFICATES. (a) Subject to the provisions of Sections 4(b), 7(e), 14 and 24 hereof, at any time after the close of business on the Distribution Date, and at or prior to the close of business on the Expiration Date, any Right Certificate or Right Certificates may be 13
transferred, split up, combined or exchanged for another Right Certificate or Right Certificates, entitling the registered holder to purchase a like number of shares of Preferred Stock (or, following a Triggering Event, Common Stock, other securities or property, as the case may be) as the Right Certificate or Right Certificates surrendered then entitled such holder to purchase. Any registered holder desiring to transfer, split up, combine or exchange any Right Certificate or Right Certificates shall make such request in writing delivered to the Rights Agent, and shall surrender the Right Certificate or Right Certificates to be transferred, split up, combined or exchanged at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose. Neither the Rights Agent nor the Company shall be obligated to take any action whatsoever with respect to the transfer of any such surrendered Right Certificate until the registered holder shall have completed and signed the certificate contained in the form of assignment on the reverse side of such Right Certificate accompanied by such documents as the Rights Agent may deem appropriate and the Company shall have been provided with such additional evidence of the identity of the Beneficial Owner (or former Beneficial Owner) or Affiliates or Associates thereof as the Company shall reasonably request. Thereupon the Rights Agent shall, subject to Sections 4 and 7 hereof, countersign and deliver to the person entitled thereto a Right Certificate or Right Certificates, as the case may be, as so requested. The Company may require payment by the holder of Rights of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or charge that may be imposed in connection with any transfer, split up, combination or exchange of Right Certificates. The Rights Agent shall have no duty or obligation to take any action under any Section of this Agreement which requires the payment by a Rights 14
holder of applicable taxes and/or charges unless and until it is satisfied that all such taxes and/or charges have been paid. (b) Upon receipt by the Company and the Rights Agent of evidence reasonably satisfactory to them of the loss, theft, destruction or mutilation of a Right Certificate, and, in case of loss, theft or destruction, of indemnity or security reasonably satisfactory to them, and, at the Company's request, reimbursement to the Company and the Rights Agent of all reasonable expenses incidental thereto, and upon surrender to the Rights Agent and cancellation of the Right Certificate if mutilated, the Company will make and deliver a new Right Certificate of like tenor to the Rights Agent for countersignature and delivery to the registered holder in lieu of the Right Certificate so lost, stolen, destroyed or mutilated. Section 7. EXERCISE OF RIGHTS; PURCHASE PRICE; EXPIRATION DATE OF RIGHTS. (a) Subject to Section 7(e) hereof, the registered holder of any Right Certificate may exercise the Rights evidenced thereby (except as otherwise provided herein) in whole or in part at any time after the Distribution Date upon surrender of the Right Certificate, with the form of election to purchase on the reverse side thereof duly executed, to the Rights Agent at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purpose, together with payment of the Purchase Price with respect to each surrendered Right for the total number of shares of Preferred Stock (or other securities or property, as the case may be) as to which the Rights are exercised, at or prior to the earliest of (i) the close of business on July 11, 2009 (the "Final Expiration Date"), (ii) the time at which the Rights are redeemed as provided in Section 23 hereof (the "Redemption Date"), (the 15
earliest of (i) or (ii) being herein referred to as the "Expiration Date") or (iii) the time at which such Rights are exchanged as provided in Section 24 hereof. (b) The Purchase Price for each one-hundredth of a share of Preferred Stock pursuant to the exercise of a Right shall initially be $90, shall be subject to adjustment from time to time as provided in Sections 11 and 13 hereof and shall be payable in lawful money of the United States of America in accordance with paragraph (c) below. (c) Upon receipt of a Right Certificate representing exercisable Rights, with the form of election to purchase and the certificate on the reverse side of the Right Certificate duly executed, accompanied by such documents as the Rights Agent may deem appropriate, payment of the Purchase Price for the shares (or other securities or property, as the case may be) to be purchased and an amount equal to any applicable transfer tax required to be paid by the holder of such Right Certificate in accordance with Section 9 hereof by certified check, cashier's check or money order payable to the order of the Company, the Rights Agent shall thereupon promptly (i) (A) requisition from any transfer agent of the Preferred Stock (or make available, if the Rights Agent is the transfer agent of the Preferred Stock) certificates for the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock to be purchased and the Company hereby irrevocably authorizes its transfer agent to comply with all such requests, or (B) if the Company shall have elected to deposit the Preferred Stock issuable upon exercise of the Rights with a depositary agent, requisition from the depositary agent depositary receipts representing such number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock as are to be purchased (in which case certificates for the shares of Preferred Stock represented by such receipts shall 16
be deposited by the transfer agent with the depositary agent) and the Company will direct the depositary agent to comply with such request, (ii) when appropriate, requisition from the Company the amount of cash to be paid in lieu of issuance of fractional shares in accordance with Section 14 hereof, (iii) after receipt of such certificates or depositary receipts, cause the same to be delivered to or upon the order of the registered holder of such Right Certificate, registered in such name or names as may be designated by such holder and (iv) when appropriate, after receipt, deliver such cash to or upon the order of the registered holder of such Right Certificate. In the event that the Company is obligated to issue other securities (including Common Stock) of the Company, pay cash and/or distribute other property pursuant to Section 11(a) hereof, the Company will make all arrangements necessary so that such other securities, cash and/or property are available for distribution by the Rights Agent, if and when appropriate. (d) In case the registered holder of any Right Certificate shall exercise less than all the Rights evidenced thereby, a new Right Certificate evidencing Rights equivalent to the Rights remaining unexercised shall be issued by the Rights Agent and delivered to the registered holder of such Right Certificate or to his duly authorized assigns, subject to the provisions of Section 14 hereof. (e) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, from and after the occurrence of a Triggering Event, any Rights beneficially owned by (i) an Acquiring Person or an Associate or Affiliate of an Acquiring Person, (ii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or of any such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee after the Acquiring Person becomes an Acquiring Person, or (iii) a transferee of an Acquiring Person (or such Associate or Affiliate) who becomes a transferee prior to or 17
concurrently with the Acquiring Person becoming an Acquiring Person and receives such Rights pursuant to either (A) a transfer (whether or not for consideration) from the Acquiring Person to holders of equity interests in such Acquiring Person or to any Person with whom the Acquiring Person has any continuing agreement, arrangement or understanding, whether written or oral, regarding the transferred Rights or (B) a transfer which the Board of Directors otherwise concludes is part of a plan, arrangement or understanding (whether written or oral) which has as a primary purpose or effect the avoidance of this Section 7(e), shall become null and void without any further action, and any holder of such Rights shall thereupon have no rights whatsoever with respect to such Rights, whether under any provision of this Agreement or otherwise, from and after the occurrence of a Triggering Event. The Company shall use all reasonable efforts to insure that the provisions of this Section 7(e) hereof are complied with, but shall have no liability to any holder of Rights or other Person as a result of its failure or inability to make any determinations with respect to an Acquiring Person or its Affiliates, Associates or transferees hereunder. (f) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, neither the Rights Agent nor the Company shall be obligated to undertake any action with respect to a registered holder upon the occurrence of any purported exercise as set forth in this Section 7 unless the certificate contained in the form of election to purchase set forth on the reverse side of the Right Certificate surrendered for such exercise shall have been completed and signed by the registered holder thereof and the Company shall have been provided with such additional evidence of the identity of the Beneficial Owner (or 18
former Beneficial Owner) or Affiliates or Associates thereof as the Company shall reasonably request. (g) The Company covenants and agrees that it will cause to be reserved and kept available out of its authorized and unissued Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) or any Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) held in its treasury, the number of shares of Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) that will be sufficient to permit the exercise in full of all outstanding Rights. (h) Notwithstanding any statement to the contrary contained in this Agreement or in any Right Certificate, if the Distribution Date or the Stock Acquisition Date shall occur prior to the Record Date, the provisions of this Agreement, including (without limitation) Sections 3 and 11(a)(ii), shall be applicable to the Rights upon their issuance to the same extent such provisions would have been applicable if the Record Date were the date of this Agreement. Section 8. CANCELLATION AND DESTRUCTION OF RIGHT CERTIFICATES. All Right Certificates surrendered for the purpose of exercise, transfer, split up, combination or exchange shall, if surrendered to the Company or to any of its agents, be delivered to the Rights Agent for cancellation or in cancelled form, or, if surrendered to the Rights Agent, shall be cancelled by it, and no Right Certificates shall be issued in lieu thereof except as expressly permitted by any of the provisions of this Agreement. The Company shall deliver to the Rights Agent for cancellation and retirement, and the Rights Agent shall so cancel and retire, any other Right Certificate purchased or acquired by the Company otherwise than upon the exercise thereof. The 19
Rights Agent shall deliver all cancelled Right Certificates to the Company, or shall, at the written request of the Company, cause such cancelled Right Certificates to be destroyed, and in such case cause a certificate of destruction to be delivered to the Company. Section 9. AVAILABILITY OF PREFERRED STOCK. The Company covenants and agrees that it will take all such action as may be necessary to ensure that all Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities) delivered upon exercise of Rights shall, at the time of delivery of the certificates for such Preferred Stock (and, following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, Common Stock and/or other securities), subject to payment of the Purchase Price, be duly and validly authorized and issued and fully paid and nonassessable shares. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, the Rights shall not be exercisable pursuant to Section 7 or pursuant to the provisions contemplated by Section 11(a)(ii) hereof (a) unless and until any regulatory approvals required for the issuance and/or sale of Preferred Stock or Common Stock upon such exercise have been obtained, (b) in any jurisdiction if the requisite qualification in such jurisdiction shall not have been obtained or (c) if the exercise thereof, or the issuance and/or sale of the Preferred Stock or Common Stock to be purchased upon such exercise, shall not be permitted under the Company's Restated Articles of Incorporation, as amended, or any applicable law or administrative or judicial regulation or order. The Company further covenants and agrees that it will pay when due and payable any and all federal and state transfer taxes and charges which may be payable in respect of the issuance or delivery of the Right Certificates or of any Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) upon the exercise of Rights. The Company shall not, 20
however, be required to pay any transfer tax or charge which may be payable in respect of any transfer or delivery of Right Certificates to a Person other than, or the issuance or delivery of certificates or depositary receipts for the Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) in a name other than that of the registered holder of the Right Certificate evidencing Rights surrendered for exercise or to issue or to deliver any certificates or depositary receipts for Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) upon the exercise of any Rights until any such tax or charge shall have been paid (any such tax or charge being payable by the holder of such Right Certificate at the time of surrender) or until it has been established to the Company's reasonable satisfaction that no such tax or charge is due. Section 10. PREFERRED STOCK RECORD DATE. Each person in whose name any certificate for Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) is issued upon the exercise of Rights shall for all purposes be deemed to have become the holder of record of the shares or securities represented thereby on, and such certificate shall be dated, the date upon which the Right Certificate evidencing such Rights was duly surrendered and payment of the Purchase Price (and any applicable transfer taxes and charges) was made; provided, however, that if the date of such surrender and payment is a date upon which the Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) transfer books of the Company are closed, such person shall be deemed to have become the record holder of such shares or securities on, and such certificate shall be dated, the next succeeding Business Day on which the Preferred Stock (or Common Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) transfer books of the Company are open. Prior to the exercise of the Rights evidenced thereby, the holder of a Right Certificate shall not be entitled to any rights of a holder of Preferred Stock (or Common 21
Stock and/or other securities, as the case may be) for which the Rights shall be exercisable, including, without limitation, the right to vote, to receive dividends or other distributions or to exercise any preemptive rights, and shall not be entitled to receive any notice of any proceedings of the Company, except as provided herein. Section 11. ADJUSTMENT OF PURCHASE PRICE, NUMBER OF SHARES OR NUMBER OF RIGHTS. The Purchase Price, the number of shares of Preferred Stock covered by each Right and the number of Rights outstanding are subject to adjustment from time to time as provided in this Section 11. (a) (i) In the event the Company shall at any time after the date of this Agreement (A) declare a dividend on the Preferred Stock payable in Preferred Stock, (B) subdivide the outstanding Preferred Stock, (C) combine the outstanding Preferred Stock into a smaller number of shares of Preferred Stock or (D) issue any shares of its capital stock in a reclassification of the Preferred Stock (including any such reclassification in connection with a consolidation or merger in which the Company is the continuing or surviving corporation), except as otherwise provided in this Section 11(a) and Section 7(e) hereof, the Purchase Price in effect at the time of the record date for such dividend or of the effective date of such subdivision, combination or reclassification, and the number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or capital stock issuable on such date, shall be proportionately adjusted so that the holder of any Right exercised after such time shall be entitled to receive, upon payment of the aggregate adjusted Purchase Price then in effect necessary to exercise a Right in full, the aggregate number and kind of shares of Preferred Stock or capital stock which, if such Right had been exercised immediately prior to such date and at a time when the Preferred Stock 22
transfer books of the Company were open, he would have owned upon such exercise and been entitled to receive by virtue of such dividend, subdivision, combination or reclassification; provided, however, that in no event shall the consideration to be paid upon the exercise of one Right be less than the aggregate par value of the shares of capital stock of the Company issuable upon exercise of one Right. If an event occurs which would require an adjustment under both Section 11(a)(i) and Section 11(a)(ii), the adjustment provided for in this Section 11(a)(i) shall be in addition to, and shall be made prior to, any adjustment required pursuant to Section 11(a)(ii). (ii) Subject to Section 23 and 24 of this Agreement, in the event any Person, alone or together with its Affiliates and Associates, becomes an Acquiring Person, unless the event causing such Person to become an Acquiring Person is a transaction set forth in Section 13(a) hereof, proper provision shall be made so that promptly following the Redemption Period (as defined in Section 23(a) hereof), each holder of a Right, except as provided below and in Section 7(e) hereof, shall thereafter have a right to receive, upon exercise thereof at a price equal to the then current Purchase Price multiplied by the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right is then exercisable, in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and in lieu of a share of Preferred Stock, such number of shares of Common Stock of the Company as shall equal the result obtained by (x) multiplying the then-current Purchase Price by the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right was or would have been exercisable immediately prior to the first occurrence of a Section 11(a)(ii) event, whether or not such Right was then exercisable and dividing that 23
product by (y) [50%] of the then current per share market price of the Company's Common Stock (determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) on the date of the occurrence of such event. In the event that any Person shall become an Acquiring Person and the Rights shall then be outstanding, the Company shall not take any action which would eliminate or diminish the benefits intended to be afforded by the Rights. (iii) In lieu of issuing Common Stock of the Company in accordance with Section 11(a)(ii) hereof, the Company may, in the sole discretion of the Board of Directors, elect to (and, in the event that the Board of Directors has not exercised the exchange right contained in Section 24 hereof and there are not sufficient issued but not outstanding and authorized but unissued shares of Common Stock to permit the exercise in full of the Rights in accordance with the foregoing subparagraph (ii), the Company shall) take all such action as may be necessary to authorize, issue or pay, upon the exercise of the Rights, cash (including by way of a reduction of the Purchase Price), property, other securities or any combination thereof having an aggregate value equal to the value of the Common Stock of the Company which otherwise would have been issuable pursuant to Section 11(a)(ii), which aggregate value shall be determined by the Board of Directors. For purposes of the preceding sentence, the value of the Common Stock shall be determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof and the value of any equity securities which the Board of Directors determines to be a "common stock equivalent" (including the Preferred Stock, in such ratio as the Board of Directors shall determine) shall be deemed to have the same value as the 24
Common Stock. Any such election by the Board of Directors must be made and publicly announced within 60 days following the date on which the event described in Section 11(a)(ii) shall have occurred. Following the occurrence of the event described in Section 11(a)(ii), the Board of Directors then in office may suspend the exercisability of the Rights for a period of up to 60 days following the date on which the event described in Section 11(a)(ii) shall have occurred to the extent that such directors have not determined whether to exercise the Company's right of election under this Section 11(a)(iii). In the event of any such suspension, the Company shall issue a public announcement stating that the exercisability of the Rights has been temporarily suspended. (b) In case the Company shall fix a record date for the issuance of rights, options or warrants to all holders of Preferred Stock entitling them (for a period expiring within 45 calendar days after such record date) to subscribe for or purchase Preferred Stock (or shares having the same rights, privileges and preferences as the Preferred Stock ("equivalent preferred shares")) or securities convertible into Preferred Stock or equivalent preferred shares at a price per share of Preferred Stock or equivalent preferred share (or having a conversion price per share, if a security convertible into Preferred Stock or equivalent preferred shares) less than the then current per share market price of the Preferred Stock (as defined in Section 11(d)) on such record date, the Purchase Price to be in effect after such record date shall be determined by multiplying the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such record date by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding on such record date plus the number of shares of Preferred Stock which the aggregate offering 25
price of the total number of shares of Preferred Stock and/or equivalent preferred shares so to be offered (and/or the aggregate initial conversion price of the convertible securities so to be offered) would purchase at such current market price and the denominator of which shall be the number of shares of Preferred Stock outstanding on such record date plus the number of additional shares of Preferred Stock and/or equivalent preferred shares to be offered for subscription or purchase (or into which the convertible securities so to be offered are initially convertible); provided, however, that in no event shall the consideration to be paid upon the exercise of one Right be less than the aggregate par value of the shares of capital stock of the Company issuable upon exercise of one Right. In case such subscription price may be paid in a consideration part or all of which shall be in a form other than cash, the value of such consideration shall be as determined by the Board of Directors, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes. Preferred Stock owned by or held for the account of the Company shall not be deemed outstanding for the purpose of any such computation. Such adjustment shall be made successively whenever such a record date is fixed; and in the event that such rights, options or warrants are not so issued, the Purchase Price shall be adjusted to be the Purchase Price which would then be in effect if such record date had not been fixed. (c) In case the Company shall fix a record date for the making of a distribution to all holders of the Preferred Stock (including any such distribution made in connection with a consolidation or merger in which the Company is the continuing or surviving corporation) of evidences of indebtedness or assets (other than a regular quarterly cash dividend or a dividend payable in Preferred Stock) or subscription rights or 26
warrants (excluding those referred to in Section 11(b) hereof), the Purchase Price to be in effect after such record date shall be determined by multiplying the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such record date by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the then current per share market price of the Preferred Stock on such record date, less the fair market value (as determined by the Board of Directors, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent) of the portion of the assets or evidences of indebtedness so to be distributed or of such subscription rights or warrants applicable to one share of Preferred Stock and the denominator of which shall be such current per share market price of the Preferred Stock; provided, however, that in no event shall the consideration to be paid upon the exercise of one Right be less than the aggregate par value of the shares of capital stock of the Company to be issued upon exercise of one Right. Such adjustments shall be made successively whenever such a record date is fixed; and in the event that such distribution is not so made, the Purchase Price shall again be adjusted to be the Purchase Price which would then be in effect if such record date had not been fixed. (d) (i) For the purpose of any computation hereunder, other than under Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, the "current per share market price" of any security (a "Security" for the purpose of this Section 11(d)(i)) on any date shall be deemed to be the average of the daily closing prices per share of such Security for the 30 consecutive Trading Days (as such term is hereinafter defined) immediately prior to such date, and for the purpose of any computation under Section 11(a)(iii) hereof, the "current per share market price" of a Security on any date shall be deemed to be the average of the daily closing prices per share of such security for thirty (30) consecutive Trading Days 27
immediately following such date; provided, however, that in the event that the current per share market price of the Security is determined during a period following the announcement by the issuer of such Security of (A) a dividend or distribution on such Security payable in shares of such Security or securities convertible into such shares (other than the Rights), or (B) any subdivision, combination or reclassification of such Security and prior to the expiration of 30 Trading Days after the ex-dividend date for such dividend or distribution, or the record date for such subdivision, combination or reclassification, then, and in each such case, the "current per share market price" shall be appropriately adjusted to reflect the current market price per share equivalent (ex-dividend) of such Security. The closing price for each day shall be the last sale price, regular way, or, in case no such sale takes place on such day, the average of the closing bid and asked prices, regular way, in either case as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed or admitted to trading on the New York Stock Exchange ("NYSE") or, if the Security is not listed or admitted to trading on the NYSE, as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed on the principal national securities exchange on which the Security is listed or admitted to trading or, if the Security is not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, the last quoted price or, if not so quoted, the average of the high bid and low asked prices in the over-the-counter market, as reported by the NASDAQ or such other system then in use, or, if on any such date the Security is not quoted by any such organization, the average of the closing bid and asked prices as furnished by a professional market maker making a market in the Security selected by the Board of Directors. If on any such date no market maker is making a 28
market in the Security, the fair value of such Security on such date (as determined by the Board of Directors) shall be used. The term "Trading Day" shall mean a day on which the principal national securities exchange on which the Security is listed or admitted to trading is open for the transaction of business or, if the Security is not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, a Business Day. If the Common Stock is not publicly held or not listed or traded, "current market price" shall mean the fair value per share as determined by the Board of Directors, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent and shall be conclusive for all purposes. (ii) For the purpose of any computation hereunder, the "current per share market price" of the Preferred Stock shall be determined in accordance with the method set forth in Section 11(d)(i). If the shares of Preferred Stock are not publicly traded, the "current per share market price" of the Preferred Stock shall be conclusively deemed to be the current per share market price of the Common Stock of the Company as determined pursuant to Section 11(d)(i) (appropriately adjusted to reflect any stock split, stock dividend or similar transaction occurring after the date hereof), multiplied by [one hundred]. If neither the shares of Common Stock of the Company nor the shares of Preferred Stock are publicly held or so listed or traded, "current per share market price" shall mean the fair value per share as determined by the Board of Directors, whose determination shall be described in a statement filed with the Rights Agent. (e) Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, no adjustment in the Purchase Price shall be required unless such adjustment would require an increase or 29
decrease of at least 1% in the Purchase Price; provided, however, that any adjustments which by reason of this Section 11(e) are not required to be made shall be carried forward and taken into account in any subsequent adjustment. All calculations under this Section 11 shall be made to the nearest cent or to the nearest [one-millionth] of a share of Preferred Stock or [one ten-thousandth] of any other share or security, as the case may be. Notwithstanding the first sentence of this Section 11(e), any adjustment required by this Section 11 shall be made no later than the earlier of (i) three years from the date of the transaction which requires such adjustment or (ii) the date of the expiration of the right to exercise any Rights. (f) If as a result of an adjustment made pursuant to Section 11(a) or Section 13(a) hereof, the holder of any Right thereafter exercised shall become entitled to receive any shares of capital stock of the Company other than Preferred Stock, thereafter the number of such other shares so receivable upon exercise of any Right and the Purchase Price thereof shall be subject to adjustment from time to time in a manner and on terms as nearly equivalent as practicable to the provisions with respect to the Preferred Stock contained in this Section 11, and the provisions of Sections 7, 9, 10, 13 and 14 with respect to the Preferred Stock shall apply on like terms to any such other shares. (g) All Rights originally issued by the Company subsequent to any adjustment made to the Purchase Price hereunder shall evidence the right to purchase, at the adjusted Purchase Price, the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock purchasable from time to time hereunder upon exercise of the Rights, all subject to further adjustment as provided herein. 30
(h) Unless the Company shall have exercised its election as provided in Section 11(i), upon each adjustment of the Purchase Price as a result of the calculations made in Sections 11(b) and (c), each Right outstanding immediately prior to the making of such adjustment shall thereafter evidence the right to purchase, at the adjusted Purchase Price, that number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock (calculated to the nearest [one-millionth] of a share of Preferred Stock) obtained by (i) multiplying (x) the number of one-hundredths of a share covered by a Right immediately prior to this adjustment by (y) the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to such adjustment of the Purchase Price and (ii) dividing the product so obtained by the Purchase Price in effect immediately after such adjustment of the Purchase Price. (i) The Company may elect on or after the date of any adjustment of the Purchase Price to adjust the number of Rights, in substitution for any adjustment in the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock purchasable upon the exercise of a Right. Each of the Rights outstanding after such adjustment of the number of Rights shall be exercisable for the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right was exercisable immediately prior to such adjustment. Each Right held of record prior to such adjustment of the number of Rights shall become that number of Rights (calculated to the nearest [one ten-thousandth]) obtained by dividing the Purchase Price in effect immediately prior to adjustment of the Purchase Price by the Purchase Price in effect immediately after adjustment of the Purchase Price. The Company shall make a public announcement of its election to adjust the number of Rights, indicating the record date for the adjustment, and, if known at the time, the amount of the adjustment to be made. This record date may be the date on which the 31
Purchase Price is adjusted or any day thereafter, but, if the Right Certificates have been issued, shall be at least 10 days later than the date of the public announcement. If Right Certificates have been issued, upon each adjustment of the number of Rights pursuant to this Section 11(i), the Company shall, as promptly as practicable, cause to be distributed to holders of record of Right Certificates on such record date Right Certificates evidencing, subject to Section 14 hereof, the additional Rights to which such holders shall be entitled as a result of such adjustment, or, at the option of the Company, shall cause to be distributed to such holders of record in substitution and replacement for the Right Certificates held by such holders prior to the date of adjustment, and upon surrender thereof, if required by the Company, new Right Certificates evidencing all the Rights to which such holders shall be entitled after such adjustment. Right Certificates so to be distributed shall be issued, executed and countersigned in the manner provided for herein and shall be registered in the names of the holders of record of Right Certificates on the record date specified in the public announcement. (j) Irrespective of any adjustment or change in the Purchase Price or the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock issuable upon the exercise of the Rights, the Right Certificates theretofore and thereafter issued may continue to express the Purchase Price and the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock which were expressed in the initial Right Certificates issued hereunder. (k) Before taking any action that would cause an adjustment reducing the Purchase Price below one-hundredth of the then par value, if any, of the Preferred Stock issuable upon exercise of the Rights, the Company shall take any corporate action which may, in the opinion of its counsel, be necessary in order that the Company may 32
validly and legally issue fully paid and nonassessable Preferred Stock at such adjusted Purchase Price. (l) In any case in which this Section 11 shall require that an adjustment in the Purchase Price be made effective as of a record date for a specified event, the Company may elect to defer until the occurrence of such event the issuing to the holder of any Right exercised after such record date of the Preferred Stock and other capital stock or securities of the Company, if any, issuable upon such exercise over and above the Preferred Stock and other capital stock or securities of the Company, if any, issuable upon such exercise on the basis of the Purchase Price in effect prior to such adjustment; provided, however, that the Company shall deliver to such holder a due bill or other appropriate instrument evidencing such holder's right to receive such additional shares upon the occurrence of the event requiring such adjustment. (m) Anything in this Section 11 to the contrary notwithstanding, the Company shall be entitled to make such reductions in the Purchase Price, in addition to those adjustments expressly required by this Section 11, as and to the extent that it in its sole discretion shall determine to be advisable in order that any consolidation or subdivision of the Preferred Stock, issuance wholly for cash of any shares of Preferred Stock at less than the current market price, issuance wholly for cash of shares of Preferred Stock or securities which by their terms are convertible into or exchangeable for Preferred Stock, dividends on Preferred Stock payable in Preferred Stock or issuance of rights, options or warrants referred to hereinabove in Section 11(b), hereafter made by the Company to holders of its Preferred Stock shall not be taxable to such shareholders. 33
(n) The Company shall not, at any time after the Distribution Date, (i) consolidate with any other Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction which complies with Section 11(o) hereof), (ii) merge with or into any other Person (other than a Subsidiary of the Company in a transaction which complies with Section 11(o) hereof) or (iii) sell or transfer (or permit any Subsidiary to sell or transfer), in one transaction, or a series of related transactions, assets or earning power aggregating more than 50% of the assets or earning power of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taken as a whole) to any other Person or Persons (other than the Company and/or any of its Subsidiaries in one or more transactions each of which complies with Section 11(o) hereof), if (x) at the time of or immediately after such consolidation, merger or sale there are any rights, warrants or other instruments or securities outstanding or agreements in effect which would substantially diminish or otherwise eliminate the benefits intended to be afforded by the Rights or (y) prior to, simultaneously with or immediately after such consolidation, merger or sale, the shareholders of the Person who constitutes, or would constitute, the "Principal Party" for purposes of Section 13(a) hereof shall have received a distribution of Rights previously owned by such Person or any of its Affiliates and Associates. (o) Except as permitted by Section 23, Section 24 or Section 27 hereof, the Company shall not take (or permit any Subsidiary to take) after the Distribution Date any action if at the time such action is taken it is reasonably foreseeable that such action will diminish substantially or otherwise eliminate the benefits intended to be afforded by the Rights. 34
(p) In the event that at any time after the date of this Agreement and prior to the Distribution Date, the Company shall (i) declare or pay any dividend on the Common Stock payable in Common Stock or (ii) effect a subdivision, combination or consolidation of the Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise than by payment of dividends in Common Stock) into a greater or lesser number of Common Stock, then in any such case (i) the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock purchasable after such event upon proper exercise of each Right shall be determined by multiplying the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock so purchasable immediately prior to such event by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately before such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event, and (ii) each share of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event shall have issued with respect to it that number of Rights which each share of Common Stock outstanding immediately prior to such event had issued with respect to it. The adjustments provided for in this Section 11(n) shall be made successively whenever such a dividend is declared or paid or such a subdivision, combination or consolidation is effected. (q) So long as the shares issuable upon the exercise of the Rights may be listed on any national securities exchange, the Company shall use its best efforts to cause, from and after such time as the Rights become exercisable, all shares reserved for such issuance to be listed on such exchange upon official notice of issuance upon such exercise. 35
(r) The Company shall use its best efforts to (i) file, as soon as practicable following the first occurrence of a Triggering Event, a registration statement under the Securities Act with respect to the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights on an appropriate form, (ii) cause such registration statement to become effective as soon as practicable after such filing, and (iii) cause such registration statement to remain effective (with a prospectus at all times meeting the requirements of the Securities Act) until the date of the expiration of the Rights. The Company will also take such action as may be appropriate under the blue sky laws of the various states. The Company may temporarily suspend, for a period of time not to exceed 90 days following the first occurrence of a Triggering Event, the exercisability of the Rights in order to prepare and file such registration statement or in order to comply with such blue sky laws. In addition, if the Company shall determine that a registration statement is required following the Distribution Date, the Company may temporarily suspend the exercisability of the Rights until such time as a registration statement has been declared effective. Upon any such suspension, the Company shall issue a public announcement stating that the exercisability of the Rights has been temporarily suspended, as well as a public announcement at such time as the suspension is no longer in effect. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, the Rights shall not be exercisable and shall be null and void so long as held by a holder in any jurisdiction where the requisite qualification to the issuance to such holder, or the exercise by such holder, of the Rights in such jurisdiction shall not have been obtained or be obtainable, or the exercise thereof shall not be permitted under applicable law or a registration statement shall not have been declared effective. 36
Section 12. CERTIFICATE OF ADJUSTED PURCHASE PRICE OR NUMBER OF SHARES. Whenever an adjustment is made or any event affecting Rights or their exercisability (including, without limitation, an event which causes Rights to become null and void) occurs as provided in Section 11 or 13 hereof, the Company shall promptly (a) prepare a certificate setting forth such adjustment, and a brief statement of the facts accounting for such adjustment, (b) file with the Rights Agent and with each transfer agent for the Common Stock or the Preferred Stock a copy of such certificate and (c) mail a brief summary thereof to each holder of a Right Certificate in accordance with Section 25 hereof. The Rights Agent shall be fully protected in relying on any such certificate and on any adjustment therein contained and may assume that no adjustment has been made unless and until it shall have received such certificate. Section 13. CONSOLIDATION, MERGER OR SALE OR TRANSFER OF ASSETS OR EARNING POWER. (a) If after the Stock Acquisition Date, directly or indirectly, (x) the Company shall consolidate with, or merge with and into, any other Person, (y) any Person shall consolidate with the Company, or merge with and into the Company and the Company shall be the continuing or surviving corporation of such consolidation or merger and, in connection with such consolidation or merger, all or part of the Common Stock shall be changed into or exchanged for stock or other securities of any other Person (or the Company) or cash or any other property, or (z) the Company shall sell or otherwise transfer (or one or more of its Subsidiaries shall sell or otherwise transfer), in one or more transactions, assets or earning power aggregating 50% or more of the assets or earning power of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taken as a whole) to any Person or Persons other than the Company or one or more of its wholly-owned Subsidiaries, then, and in each such case, proper provision shall be made so that (i) each holder of a Right (except as otherwise provided herein) shall thereafter have the right to receive, upon the exercise 37
thereof at a price equal to the then current Purchase Price multiplied by the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right is then exercisable, in accordance with the terms of this Agreement and in lieu of shares of Preferred Stock, such number of validly authorized and issued, fully paid, non-assessable and freely tradable shares of Common Stock of the Principal Party (as hereinafter defined), free and clear of all liens, rights of call or first refusal, encumbrances or other adverse claims, as shall equal the result obtained by (A) multiplying the then current Purchase Price by the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock for which a Right is then exercisable (or, if such Right is not then exercisable for a number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock, the number of such fractional shares for which it was exercisable immediately prior to an event described under Section 11(a)(ii) hereof) and dividing that product by (B) [50%] of the then current per share market price of the Common Stock of such Principal Party (determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) on the date of consummation of such consolidation, merger, sale or transfer; (ii) such Principal Party shall thereafter be liable for, and shall assume, by virtue of such consolidation, merger, sale or transfer, or otherwise, all the obligations and duties of the Company pursuant to this Agreement; (iii) the term "Company" shall thereafter be deemed to refer to such Principal Party; (iv) such Principal Party shall take such steps (including, but not limited to, the reservation of a sufficient number of its shares of Common Stock in accordance with Section 9 hereof) in connection with such consummation as may be necessary to assure that the provisions hereof shall thereafter be applicable, as nearly as reasonably may be, in relation to its shares of Common Stock thereafter deliverable upon the exercise of the Rights; and (v) the provisions of Section 11(a)(ii) hereof shall be of no effect following the first occurrence of any consolidation, merger, sale, or transfer. (b) "Principal Party" shall mean: 38
(i) In the case of any transaction described in (x) or (y) of the first sentence of Section 13(a), the Person that is the issuer of any securities into which shares of Common Stock of the Company are converted in such merger or consolidation, or, if there is more than one such issuer, the issuer of Common Stock that has the highest aggregate current market price (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) and if no securities or other equity interests are so issued, the Person that is the surviving entity of such merger or consolidation (including the Company if applicable); and (ii) in the case of any transaction described in (z) of the first sentence in Section 13(a), the Person that is the party receiving the greatest portion of the assets or earning power transferred pursuant to such transaction or transactions; provided, however, that in any such case described in clauses (b)(i) and (b)(ii): (1) if the Common Stock of such Person is not at such time and has not been continuously registered under Section 12 of the Exchange Act over the preceding 12-month period, and such Person is a direct or indirect Subsidiary of another Person the Common Stock of which is and has been so registered, "Principal Party" shall refer to such other Person; (2) if the Common Stock of such Person is not and has not been so registered and such Person is a Subsidiary, directly or indirectly, or more than one Person, the Common Stock of two or more of which are and have been so registered, "Principal Party" shall refer to whichever of such Persons is the issuer of the Common Stock having the greatest aggregate market value; and (3) if the Common Stock of such Person is not and has not been so registered and such Person is owned, directly or indirectly, by a joint venture formed by two or more Persons that are not owned, directly or 39
indirectly, by the same Person, the rules set forth in (1) and (2) shall apply to each of the chains of ownership having an interest in such joint venture as if such party were a "Subsidiary" of both or all of such joint venturers and the Principal Parties in each such chain shall bear the obligations set forth in this Section 13 in the same ratio as their direct or indirect interests in such Person bear to the total of such interests. (c) The Company shall not consummate any such consolidation, merger, sale or transfer unless the Principal Party shall have sufficient number of authorized shares of Common Stock which have not been issued or reserved for issuance to permit the full exercise of the Rights and prior thereto the Company and such Principal Party shall have executed and delivered to the Rights Agent a supplemental agreement providing for the terms set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section 13 and further providing that, as soon as practicable after the date of any consolidation, merger or sale of assets mentioned in paragraph (a) of this Section 13, the Principal Party will: (i) prepare and file a registration statement under the Securities Act, with respect to the Rights and the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights on an appropriate form, and will use its best efforts to cause such registration statement to (A) become effective as soon as practicable after such filing and (B) remain effective (with a prospectus at all times meeting the requirements of the Securities Act) until the Expiration Date; (ii) deliver to holders of the Rights historical financial statements for the Principal Party and each of its Affiliates which comply in all respects with the requirements for registration on Form 10 under the Exchange Act; and 40
(iii) use its best efforts to obtain any necessary regulatory approvals in respect of the securities purchasable upon exercise of outstanding Rights; and (iv) use its best efforts, if such Common Stock of the Principal Party shall be listed or admitted to trading on the NYSE or on another national securities exchange or (for so long as it is not a national securities exchange) on the NASDAQ, to list or admit to trading (or continue the listing of) the Rights and the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights on the NYSE or on such securities exchange or (for so long as it is not a national securities exchange) on the NASDAQ, or if the securities of the Principal Party purchasable upon exercise of the Rights shall not be listed or admitted to trading on the NYSE or a national securities exchange or (for so long as it is not a national securities exchange) on the NASDAQ, to cause the Rights and the securities purchasable upon exercise of the Rights to be reported by such other system then in use. (d) In case the Principal Party that is to be a party to a transaction referred to in this Section 13 has at the time of such transaction, or immediately following such transaction shall have, a provision in any of its authorized securities or in its certificate or articles of incorporation or by-laws or other instrument governing its affairs, or any other agreements or arrangements, which provision would have the effect of (i) causing such Principal Party to issue, in connection with, or as a consequence of, the consummation of a transaction referred to in this Section 13, shares of Common Stock of such Principal Party at less than the then current market price per share (as determined pursuant to Section 11(d) hereof) or securities exercisable for, or convertible into, 41
Common Stock of such Principal Party at less than such then current market price (other than to holders of Rights pursuant to this Section 13), (ii) providing for any special payment, tax, charge or similar provisions in connection with the issuance of the Common Stock of such Principal Party pursuant to the provisions of this Section 13 or (iii) otherwise eliminating or substantially diminishing the benefits intended to be afforded by the Rights in connection with, or as a consequence of, the consummation of a transaction referred to in this Section 13, then, in such event, the Company shall not consummate any such transaction unless prior thereto the Company and such Principal Party shall have executed and delivered to the Rights Agent a supplemental agreement providing that the provision in question of such Principal Party shall have been cancelled, waived or amended, or that the authorized securities shall be redeemed, so that the applicable provision shall have no effect in connection with, or as a consequence of, the consummation of such transaction. (e) The provisions of this Section 13 shall similarly apply to successive mergers or consolidations or sales or other transfers. In the event that one of the transactions described in Section 13(a) shall occur at any time after the occurrence of a transaction described in Section 11(a)(ii) hereof, the Rights which have not theretofore been exercised shall thereafter become exercisable in the manner described in Section 13(a). Section 14. FRACTIONAL RIGHTS AND FRACTIONAL SHARES. (a) The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of Rights or to distribute Right Certificates which evidence fractional Rights. In lieu of such fractional Rights, there may be paid to the registered holders of the Right Certificates with regard to which such fractional Rights would otherwise be issuable, an amount 42
in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of a whole Right. For the purposes of this Section 14(a), the current market value of a whole Right shall be the closing price of the Rights for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date on which such fractional Rights would have been otherwise issuable. The closing price for any day shall be the last sale price, regular way, or, in case no such sale takes place on such day, the average of the closing bid and asked prices, regular way, in either case as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed or admitted to trading on the NYSE or, if the Rights are not listed or admitted to trading on the NYSE, as reported in the principal consolidated transaction reporting system with respect to securities listed on the principal national securities exchange on which the Rights are listed or admitted to trading or, if the Rights are not listed or admitted to trading on any national securities exchange, the last quoted price or, if not so quoted, the average of the high bid and low asked prices in the over-the-counter market, as reported by NASDAQ or such other system then in use or, if on any such date the Rights are not quoted by any such organization, the average of the closing bid and asked prices as furnished by a professional market maker making a market in the Rights selected by the Board of Directors. If on any such date no such market maker is making a market in the Rights, the fair value of the Rights on such date as determined by the Board of Directors shall be used. (b) The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of a share of Preferred Stock (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one-hundredth of a share of Preferred Stock) upon exercise of the Rights or to distribute certificates which evidence fractional shares of Preferred Stock (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one-hundredth of a share of Preferred Stock). Fractions of a share of Preferred Stock in integral multiples of one-hundredth of a share of Preferred Stock may, 43
at the election of the Company, be evidenced by depositary receipts, pursuant to an appropriate agreement between the Company and a depositary selected by it; provided, that such agreement shall provide that the holders of such depositary receipts shall have all the rights, privileges and preferences to which they are entitled as beneficial owners of the Preferred Stock represented by such depositary receipts. In lieu of fractional shares of Preferred Stock that are not integral multiples of one-hundredth of a share of Preferred Stock, the Company may pay to the registered holders of Right Certificates at the time such Rights are exercised as herein provided an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of one-hundredth of a share of Preferred Stock. For the purposes of this Section 14(b), the current market value of one-hundredth of a share of Preferred Stock shall be [one-hundredth] of the closing price of a share of Preferred Stock (as determined pursuant to the second sentence of Section 11(d)(i) hereof) for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of such exercise. (c) Following the occurrence of a Triggering Event, the Company shall not be required to issue fractions of a share of Common Stock upon exercise of the Rights or to distribute certificates which evidence fractional shares of Common Stock. In lieu of fractional shares of Common Stock, the Company may pay to the registered holders of Right Certificates at the time such Rights are exercised as herein provided an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of one share of Common Stock. For purposes of this Section 14(c), the current market value of one share of Common Stock shall be the closing price of one share of Common Stock (as determined pursuant to the second sentence of Section 11(d)(i) hereof) for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of such exercise. 44
(d) The holder of a Right by the acceptance of the Right expressly waives his right to receive any fractional Rights or any fractional shares upon exercise of a Right (except as provided above). Section 15. RIGHTS OF ACTION. All rights of action in respect of this Agreement, excepting the rights of action given to the Rights Agent under Section 18 hereof, are vested in the respective registered holders of the Right Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the registered holders of the Common Stock); and any registered holder of any Right Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, of the Common Stock), without the consent of the Rights Agent or of the holder of any other Right Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, of the Common Stock), may, in his own behalf and for his own benefit, enforce, and may institute and maintain any suit, action or proceeding against the Company to enforce, or otherwise act in respect of, his right to exercise the Rights evidenced by such Right Certificate in the manner provided in such Right Certificate and in this Agreement. Without limiting the foregoing or any remedies available to the holders of Rights, it is specifically acknowledged that the holders of Rights would not have an adequate remedy at law for any breach of this Agreement and will be entitled to specific performance of the obligations under, and injunctive relief against actual or threatened violations of the obligations of any Person subject to this Agreement. Section 16. AGREEMENT OF RIGHT HOLDERS. Every holder of a Right, by accepting the same, consents and agrees with the Company and the Rights Agent and with every other holder of a Right that: (a) prior to the Distribution Date, the Rights will be transferable only in connection with the transfer of Common Stock; 45
(b) after the Distribution Date, the Right Certificates are transferable only on the registry books of the Rights Agent if surrendered at the office of the Rights Agent designated for such purposes, duly endorsed or accompanied by a proper instrument of transfer and with appropriate forms and certificates fully executed; (c) the Company and the Rights Agent may deem and treat the person in whose name the Right Certificate (or, prior to the Distribution Date, the associated Common Stock certificate) is registered as the absolute owner thereof and of the Rights evidenced thereby (notwithstanding any notations of ownership or writing on the Right Certificates or the associated Common Stock Certificate made by anyone other than the Company or the Rights Agent) for all purposes whatsoever, and neither the Company nor the Rights Agent shall be affected by any notice to the contrary; and (d) notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, neither the Company nor the Rights Agent shall have any liability to any holder of a Right or any other Person as a result of its inability to perform any of its obligations under this Agreement by reason of any preliminary or permanent injunction or other order, decree or ruling issued by a court of competent jurisdiction or by a governmental, regulatory or administrative agency or commission, or any statute, rule, regulation or executive order promulgated or enacted by any governmental authority prohibiting or otherwise restraining performance of such obligation. Section 17. RIGHT CERTIFICATE HOLDER NOT DEEMED A SHAREHOLDER. No holder, as such, of any Right Certificate shall be entitled to vote, receive dividends or be deemed for any purpose the holder of the number of one-hundredths of a share of Preferred Stock or any other securities of the Company which may at any time be issuable on the exercise of the Rights represented 46
thereby, nor shall anything contained herein or in any Right Certificate be construed to confer upon the holder of any Right Certificate, as such, any of the rights of a shareholder of the Company or any right to vote for the election of directors or upon any matter submitted to shareholders at any meeting thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any corporate action, or to receive notice of meetings or other actions affecting shareholders (except as provided in Section 25 hereof), or to receive dividends or subscription rights, or otherwise, until the Right or Rights evidenced by such Right Certificate shall have been exercised in accordance with the provisions hereof. Section 18. CONCERNING THE RIGHTS AGENT. The Company agrees to pay to the Rights Agent, if other than the Secretary of the Company, reasonable compensation for all services rendered by it hereunder, and, from time to time, on demand of the Rights Agent, its reasonable expenses and counsel fees and other disbursements (including any taxes other than income taxes) incurred in the administration and execution of this Agreement and the exercise and performance of his, her or its duties hereunder. The Company also agrees to indemnify the Rights Agent for, and to hold him, her or it harmless against, any loss, liability, or expense, incurred without gross negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct (which gross negligence, bad faith, or willful misconduct must be determined by a final, non-appealable order, judgment, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction) on the part of the Rights Agent, for anything done or omitted by the Rights Agent in connection with the acceptance and administration of this Agreement, including the costs and expenses of defending against any claim of liability arising, directly or indirectly, therefrom. The indemnity provided for hereunder shall survive the expiration of the Rights and the termination of this Agreement. 47
The Rights Agent shall be protected and shall incur no liability for or in respect of any action taken, suffered or omitted by him, her or it in connection with its administration of this Agreement in reliance upon any Right Certificate or certificate for the Preferred Stock or Common Stock or for other securities of the Company, instrument of assignment or transfer, power of attorney, endorsement, affidavit, letter, notice, direction, consent, certificate, statement, or other paper or document believed by it to be genuine and to be signed, executed and, where necessary, verified or acknowledged, by the proper person or persons, or otherwise upon the advice of counsel as set forth in Section 20 hereof. Section 19. MERGER OR CONSOLIDATION OR CHANGE OF NAME OF RIGHTS AGENT. For the purposes of this section, if the Rights Agent is not the Company's Secretary, any Person into which the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent may be merged or with which it may be consolidated, or any Person resulting from any merger or consolidation to which the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent shall be a party, or any Person succeeding to the stock transfer or corporate trust business of the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent, shall be the successor to the Rights Agent under this Agreement without the execution or filing of any paper or any further act on the party of any of the parties hereto; provided, that such Person would be eligible for appointment as a successor Rights Agent under the provisions of Section 21 hereof. In case at the time such successor Rights Agent shall succeed to the agency created by this Agreement, any of the Right Certificates shall have been countersigned but not delivered; any such successor Rights Agent may adopt the countersignature of the predecessor Rights Agent and deliver such Right Certificates so countersigned, and in case at that time any of the Right Certificates shall not have been countersigned, any successor Rights Agent may countersign such Right Certificates either in the name of the predecessor Rights Agent or in the 48
name of the successor Rights Agent; and in all such cases such Right Certificates shall have the full force provided in the Right Certificates and in this Agreement. In case at any time the name of the Rights Agent shall be changed and at such time any of the Right Certificates shall have been countersigned but not delivered, the Rights Agent may adopt the countersignature under its prior name and deliver Right Certificates so countersigned; and in case at that time any of the Right Certificates shall not have been countersigned, the Rights Agent may countersign such Right Certificates either in its prior name or in its changed name; and in all such cases such Right Certificates shall have the full force provided in the Right Certificates and in the Agreement. Section 20. DUTIES OF RIGHTS AGENT. The Rights Agent undertakes only the duties and obligations imposed by this Agreement upon the following terms and conditions, by all of which the Company and the holders of Right Certificates, by their acceptance thereof, shall be bound: (a) The Rights Agent may consult with legal counsel satisfactory to it (who may be legal counsel for the Company), and the opinion of such counsel shall be full and complete authorization and protection to the Rights Agent and the Rights Agent shall incur no liability or responsibility to the Company or to any holder of any Right Certificate in respect of any action taken or omitted by it in accordance with such opinion. (b) Whenever in the performance of his, her or its duties under this Agreement the Rights Agent shall deem it necessary or desirable that any fact or matter be proved or established by the Company prior to taking or suffering or omitting action hereunder, such fact or matter (unless other evidence in respect thereof be herein specifically prescribed) may be deemed to be conclusively proved and established by a 49
certificate signed by any one of the Chairman of the Board, the Chief Executive Officer, any Vice Chairman, the President, any Vice President, the Treasurer or the Secretary (unless the Secretary is the Rights Agent) of the Company and delivered to the Rights Agent; and such certificate shall be full authorization to the Rights Agent for any action taken or suffered by it under the provisions of this Agreement in reliance upon such certificate. (c) For the purposes of this subsection, if the Rights Agent is not the Company's Secretary, the Rights Agent shall be liable hereunder to the Company and any other Person only for its own gross negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct (which gross negligence, bad faith or willful misconduct must be determined by a final, non-appealable order, judgment, decree or ruling of a court of competent jurisdiction). Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, in no event shall the Rights Agent be liable for special, punitive, indirect, consequential or incidental loss or damage of any kind whatsoever (including but not limited to lost profits), even if the Rights Agent has been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage. Any liability of the Rights Agent under this Agreement will be limited to the amount of annual fees paid by the Company to the Rights Agent. (d) The Rights Agent shall not be liable for or by reason of any of the statements of fact or recitals contained in this Agreement or in the Right Certificates (except its countersignature thereof) or be required to verify the same, but all such statements and recitals are and shall be deemed to have been made by the Company only. (e) The Rights Agent shall not be under any responsibility in respect of the validity of any provision of this Agreement or the execution and delivery hereof 50
(except the due execution hereof by the Rights Agent) or in respect of the validity or execution of any Right Certificate (except the Rights Agent's countersignature thereof); nor shall the Rights Agent be responsible for any breach by the Company of any covenant or condition contained in this Agreement or in any Right Certificate; nor shall the Rights Agent be responsible for any change in the exercisability of the Rights (including the Rights becoming void pursuant to Section 7(e) hereof) or any adjustment in the terms of the Rights (including the manner, method or amount thereof) provided for in Section 3, 11, 13, 23 or 24, or the ascertaining of the existence of facts that would require any such change or adjustment (except with respect to the exercise of Rights evidenced by Right Certificates after receipt of a certificate furnished pursuant to Section 12 describing a change or adjustment); nor shall the Rights Agent by any act hereunder be deemed to make any representation or warranty as to the authorization or reservation of any shares of Preferred Stock or Common Stock to be issued pursuant to this Agreement or any Right Certificate or as to whether any shares of Preferred Stock or Common Stock will, when issued, be validly authorized and issued, fully paid and nonassessable. (f) The Company agrees that it will perform, execute, acknowledge and deliver or cause to be performed, executed, acknowledged and delivered all such further and other acts, instruments and assurances as may reasonably be required by the Rights Agent for the carrying out or performing by the Rights Agent of the provisions of this Agreement. (g) The Rights Agent is hereby authorized and directed to accept instructions with respect to the performance of the Rights Agent's duties hereunder from 51
any one of the Chairman of the Board, the Chief Executive Officer, any Vice Chairman, the President, any Vice President, the Secretary (unless the Secretary is the Rights Agent) or the Treasurer of the Company, and to apply to such officers for advice or instructions in connection with its duties, and the Rights Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or suffered by the Rights Agent in accordance with instructions of any such officer or for any delay in acting while waiting for those instructions. Any application by the Rights Agent for written instructions from the Company may, at the option of the Rights Agent, set forth in writing any action proposed to be taken or omitted by the Rights Agent under this Agreement and the date on and/or after which such action shall be taken or such omission shall be effective. The Rights Agent shall not be liable for any action taken by, or omission of, the Rights Agent in accordance with a proposal included in any such application on or after the date specified in such application (which date shall not be less than five Business Days after the date such application is given, unless any such officer shall have consented in writing to an earlier date) unless, prior to taking any such action (or the effective date in the case of an omission), the Rights Agent shall have received written instructions in response to such application specifying the action to be taken or omitted. (h) The Rights Agent and any stockholder, director, officer or employee of the Rights Agent may buy, sell or deal in any of the Rights or other securities of the Company or its Subsidiaries or become pecuniarily interested in any transaction in which the Company or its Subsidiaries may be interested, or contract with or lend money to the Company or its Subsidiaries or otherwise act as fully and freely as though the Rights Agent were not Rights Agent under this Agreement. Nothing herein 52
shall preclude the Rights Agent from acting in any other capacity for the Company or its Subsidiaries or for any other legal entity. (i) The Rights Agent may execute and exercise any of the rights or powers hereby vested in the Rights Agent or perform any duty hereunder either individually or by or through the Rights Agent's attorneys or agents, and the Rights Agent shall not be answerable or accountable for any act, default, neglect or misconduct of any such attorneys or agents or for any loss to the Company resulting from any such act, default, neglect or misconduct, provided reasonable care was exercised in the selection and continued employment thereof. (j) If, with respect to any Rights Certificate surrendered to the Rights Agent for exercise, transfer, split-up, combination or exchange, the certificate attached to the form of assignment or form of election to purchase, as the case may be, has either not been completed or indicates an affirmative response to clause 1 and/or 2 thereof, the Rights Agent shall not take any further action with respect to such requested exercise, transfer, split-up, combination or exchange without first consulting with the Company. (k) The Rights Agent shall not be under any duty or responsibility to ensure compliance with any applicable federal or state securities laws in connection with the issuance, transfer or exchange of Right Certificates. (l) The Rights Agent shall be under no obligation to institute any action, suit or legal proceeding or to take any other action likely to involve expense unless the Company or one or more holders of Right Certificates shall furnish the Rights Agent with security and indemnity to Rights Agent's satisfaction for any costs and expenses which may be incurred. 53
(m) In addition to the foregoing, the Rights Agent shall be protected and shall incur no liability for, or in respect of, any action taken or omitted by it in connection with its administration of this Agreement if such acts or omissions are in reliance upon (i) the proper execution of the certification concerning beneficial ownership appended to the form of assignment and the form of election to purchase attached to the Rights Certificate unless the Rights Agent shall have actual knowledge that, as executed, such certification is untrue, or (ii) the non-execution of such certification including, without limitation, any refusal to honor any otherwise permissible assignment or election by reason of such non-execution. (n) The Rights Agent shall not be liable for failure to perform any duties except as specifically set forth herein and no implied covenants or obligations shall be read into this Agreement against the Rights Agent whose duties and obligations are ministerial and shall be determined solely by the express provisions hereof. Section 21. CHANGE OF RIGHTS AGENT. The Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent may resign and be discharged from his, her or its duties under this Agreement upon 30 days' notice in writing mailed to the Company [and to each transfer agent of the Common Stock or Preferred Stock by registered or certified mail, and to the holders of the Right Certificates by first-class mail]. The Company may remove the Rights Agent or any successor Rights Agent upon 30 days' notice in writing, mailed to the Rights Agent or successor Rights Agent, as the case may be, and to each transfer agent of the Common Stock or Preferred Stock by registered or certified mail, and to the holders of the Right Certificates by first-class mail. If the Rights Agent shall resign or be removed or shall otherwise become incapable of acting, the Company shall appoint a successor to the Rights Agent. If the Company shall fail to make such appointment 54
within a period of 30 days after giving notice of such removal or after it has been notified in writing of such resignation or incapacity by the resigning or incapacitated Rights Agent or, if the Rights Agent is an individual, the Company has obtained actual knowledge of such resignation or incapacity, or by the holder of a Right Certificate (who shall, with such notice, submit his Right Certificate for inspection by the Company), then the registered holder of any Right Certificate may, at the expense of the Company, apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a new Rights Agent. Any successor Rights Agent, whether appointed by the Company or by such a court, may either be the Corporate Secretary, an Assistant Secretary, or other appropriate officer of the Company, or shall be a corporation or bank organized and doing business under the laws of the United States or of any other state of the United States, which is authorized under such laws to exercise corporate trust or stock transfer powers and is subject to supervision or examination by federal or state authority and which has at the time of its appointment as Rights Agent a combined capital and surplus of at least $100 million. After appointment, the successor Rights Agent shall be vested with the same powers, rights, duties and responsibilities as if it had been originally named as Rights Agent without further act or deed; but the predecessor Rights Agent shall deliver and transfer to the successor Rights Agent any property at the time held by it hereunder, and execute and deliver any further assurance, conveyance, act or deed necessary for the purpose. Not later than the effective date of any such appointment the Company shall file notice thereof in writing with the predecessor Rights Agent and each transfer agent of the Common Stock or Preferred Stock, and mail a notice thereof in writing to the registered holders of the Right Certificates. Failure to give any notice provided for in this Section 21, however, or any defect therein, shall not affect the legality or validity of the 55
resignation or removal of the Rights Agent or the appointment of the successor Rights Agent, as the case may be. Section 22. ISSUANCE OF NEW RIGHT CERTIFICATES. Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this Agreement or of the Rights to the contrary, the Company may, at its option, issue new Right Certificates evidencing Rights in such form as may be approved by its Board of Directors to reflect any adjustment or change in the Purchase Price and the number or kind or class of shares or other securities or property purchasable under the Right Certificates made in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement. In addition, in connection with the issuance or sale of shares of Common Stock following the Distribution Date (other than upon exercise of a Right) and prior to the redemption or expiration of the Rights, the Company (a) shall, with respect to shares of Common Stock so issued or sold pursuant to the exercise of stock options or under any employee plan or arrangement, or upon the exercise, conversion or exchange of securities hereinafter issued by the Company, and (b) may, in any other case, if deemed necessary or appropriate by the Board of Directors, issue Rights Certificates representing the appropriate number of Rights in connection with such issuance or sale; provided, however, that (i) no such Rights Certificate shall be issued if, and to the extent that, the Company shall be advised by counsel that such issuance would create a significant risk of material adverse tax consequences to the Company or the Person to whom such Rights Certificates would be issued, and (ii) no such Rights Certificates shall be issued if, and to the extent that, appropriate adjustment shall otherwise have been made in lieu of the issuance thereof. Section 23. REDEMPTION. (a) The Board of Directors may, at its option, at any time during the period commencing on the Rights Dividend Declaration Date and ending on the earlier of 56
(i) the Close of Business on the tenth day following the Stock Acquisition Date (or, if the Stock Acquisition Date shall have occurred prior to the Record Date, the Close of Business on the tenth day following the Record Date), or (ii) the Close of Business on the Final Expiration Date (the "Redemption Period"), cause the Company to redeem all but not less than all the then outstanding Rights at a redemption price of $0.005 per Right, appropriately adjusted to reflect any stock split, stock dividend or similar transaction occurring after the date hereof (such redemption price being hereinafter referred to as the "Redemption Price"). Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, the Rights shall not be exercisable after the first occurrence of a Triggering Event until such time as the Company's right of redemption hereunder has expired. The redemption of the Rights by the Board of Directors may be made effective at such time on such basis and with such conditions as the Board of Directors in its sole discretion may establish. If redemption of the Rights is to be effective as of a future date, the Rights shall continue to be exercisable, subject to Section 7 hereof, until the effective date of the redemption, provided that nothing contained herein shall preclude the Board of Directors from subsequently causing the Rights to be redeemed at a date earlier than the previously scheduled effective date of the redemption. The Company may, at its option, pay the Redemption Price in cash, Common Stock (based on the current per share market price of the Common Stock at the time of redemption) or any other form of consideration deemed appropriate by the Board of Directors. (b) Immediately upon the action of the Board of Directors ordering the redemption of the Rights (or at the effective time of such redemption established by the Board of Directors pursuant to paragraph (a) of this Section 23), and without any further 57
action and without any notice, the right to exercise the Rights will terminate and the only right thereafter of the holders of Rights shall be to receive the Redemption Price. The Company shall promptly give public notice of any such redemption; provided, however, that the failure to give, or any defect in, any such notice shall not affect the validity of such redemption. Within 10 days after such action of the Board of Directors ordering the redemption of the Rights or, if later, the effectiveness of the redemption of the Rights pursuant to the last sentence of paragraph (a), the Company shall mail a notice of redemption to all the holders of the then outstanding Rights at their last addresses as they appear upon the registry books of the Rights Agent or, prior to the Distribution Date, on the registry books of the transfer agent for the Common Stock. Any notice which is mailed in the manner herein provided shall be deemed given, whether or not the holder receives the notice. Each such notice of redemption will state the method by which the payment of the Redemption Price will be made. The Company may, at its option, discharge all of its obligations with respect to the Rights by (i) issuing a press release announcing the manner of redemption of the Rights, (ii) depositing with a bank or trust company having a capital and surplus of at least $100 million funds necessary for such redemption, in trust, to be applied to the redemption of the Rights so called for redemption and (iii) arranging for the mailing of the Redemption Price to the registered holders of the Rights; then, and upon such action, all outstanding Rights Certificates shall be null and void without further action by the Company. Neither the Company nor any of its Affiliates or Associates may redeem, acquire or purchase for value any Rights at any time in any manner other than that specifically set forth in this Section 23, in Section 58
24 hereof, or in connection with the purchase of Common Stock prior to the Distribution Date. Section 24. EXCHANGE. (a) The Board of Directors may, at its option, at any time after a Triggering Event, exchange all or part of the then outstanding and exercisable Rights (which shall not include Rights that have become void pursuant to the provisions of Section 7(e) hereof) for Common Stock at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock per Right, appropriately adjusted to reflect any stock split, stock dividend or similar transaction occurring after the date hereof (such exchange ratio being hereinafter referred to as the "Exchange Ratio"). Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Board of Directors shall not be empowered to effect such exchange at any time after any Person (other than the Company, any Affiliate of the Company, any employee benefit plan of the Company or any such Affiliate, or any entity holding Common Stock for or pursuant to the terms of any such plan), together with all Affiliates and Associates of such Person, becomes the Beneficial Owner of 50% or more of the shares of Common Stock then outstanding. (b) Immediately upon the action of the Board of Directors ordering the exchange of any Rights pursuant to paragraph (a) of this Section 24 and without any further action and without any notice, the right to exercise such Rights shall terminate and the only right thereafter of a holder of such Rights shall be to receive that number of shares of Common Stock equal to the number of such Rights held by such holder multiplied by the Exchange Ratio. The Company shall promptly give public notice of any such exchange; provided, however, that the failure to give, or any defect in, such notice shall not affect the validity of such exchange. The Company promptly shall mail a notice of any such exchange to all of the holders of such Rights at their last addresses as 59
they appear upon the registry books of the Rights Agent. Any notice which is mailed in the manner herein provided shall be deemed given, whether or not the holder receives the notice. Each such notice of exchange will state the method by which the exchange of the Common Stock for Rights will be effected and, in the event of any partial exchange, the number of Rights which will be exchanged. Any partial exchange shall be effected pro rata based on the number of Rights (other than Rights which have become void pursuant to the provisions of Section 7(e) hereof) held by each holder of Rights. (c) In any exchange pursuant to this Section 24, the Company, at its option, may substitute Preferred Stock (or equivalent preferred shares, as such term is defined in Section 11(b) hereof) for Common Stock exchangeable for Rights, at the initial rate of one-hundredth of a share of Preferred Stock (or equivalent preferred share) for each share of Common Stock, as appropriately adjusted to reflect adjustments in the voting rights of the Preferred Stock pursuant to the terms thereof, so that the fraction of a share of Preferred Stock delivered in lieu of each share of Common Stock shall have the same voting rights as one share of Common Stock. (d) In the event that there shall not be sufficient shares of Common Stock or Preferred Shares issued but not outstanding or authorized but unissued to permit any exchange of Rights as contemplated in accordance with this Section 24, the Company shall take all such action as may be necessary to authorize additional shares of Common Stock or Preferred Stock for issuance upon exchange of the Rights. (e) The Company shall not be required to issue fractions of shares of Common Stock or to distribute certificates which evidence fractional shares of Common Stock. In lieu of such fractional shares of Common Stock, the Company shall pay to the 60
registered holders of the Right Certificates with regard to which such fractional shares of Common Stock would otherwise be issuable an amount in cash equal to the same fraction of the current market value of a whole share of Common Stock. For the purposes of this paragraph (e), the current market value of a whole share of Common Stock shall be the closing price of a share of Common Stock (as determined pursuant to the second sentence of Section 11(d)(i) hereof) for the Trading Day immediately prior to the date of exchange pursuant to this Section 24. Section 25. NOTICE OF CERTAIN EVENTS. (a) In case the Company shall propose at any time after the Distribution Date (i) to pay any dividend payable in stock of any class to the holders of its Preferred Stock or to make any other distribution to the holders of its Preferred Stock (other than a regular quarterly cash dividend), (ii) to offer to the holders of its Preferred Stock rights or warrants to subscribe for or to purchase any additional Preferred Stock or shares of stock of any class or any other securities, rights or options, (iii) to effect any reclassification of its Preferred Stock (other than a reclassification involving only the subdivision of outstanding Preferred Stock), (iv) to effect any consolidation or merger into or with, or to effect any sale or other transfer (or to permit one or more of its Subsidiaries to effect any sale or other transfer), in one or more transactions, of 50% or more of the assets or earning power of the Company and its Subsidiaries (taken as a whole) to, any other Person, (v) to effect the liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Company, or (vi) to declare or pay any dividend on the Common Stock payable in Common Stock or to effect a subdivision, combination or consolidation of the Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise than by payment of dividends in Common Stock), 61
then, in each such case, the Company shall give to each holder of a Right Certificate, in accordance with Section 26 hereof, a notice of such proposed action, which shall specify the record date for the purposes of such stock dividend, or distribution of rights or warrants, or the date on which such reclassification, consolidation, merger, sale, transfer, liquidation, dissolution, or winding up is to take place and the date of participation therein by the holders of the Common Stock and/or Preferred Stock, if any such date is to be fixed, and such notice shall be so given in the case of any action covered by clause (i) or (ii) above at least 20 days prior to the record date for determining holders of the Preferred Stock for purposes of such action, and in the case of any such other action, at least 20 days prior to the date of the taking of such proposed action or the date of participation therein by the holders of the Common Stock and/or Preferred Stock, whichever shall be the earlier. (b) In case any of the events set forth in Section 11(a)(ii) hereof shall occur, then the Company shall as soon as practicable thereafter give to each holder of a Right Certificate, in accordance with Section 26 hereof, a notice of the occurrence of such event, which notice shall describe such event and the consequences of such event to holders of Rights under Section 11(a)(ii) hereof. Section 26. NOTICES. Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Rights Agent or by the holder of any Right Certificate to or on the Company shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Rights Agent) as follows: ALLETE, Inc. 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802 Attention: Corporate Secretary 62
Subject to the provisions of Section 21 hereof, any notice or demand authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or by the holder of any Right Certificate to or on the Rights Agent shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed (until another address is filed in writing with the Company) as follows: ALLETE, Inc. 30 West Superior Street Duluth, Minnesota 55802 Attention: Corporate Secretary Notices or demands authorized by this Agreement to be given or made by the Company or the Rights Agent to the holder of any Right Certificate shall be sufficiently given or made if sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, addressed to such holder at the address of such holder as shown on the registry books of the Company. Notices or demands sent by mail shall be deemed given or made three business days after the date they are sent. Section 27. SUPPLEMENTS AND AMENDMENTS. Except as provided in the penultimate sentence of this Section 27, for so long as the Rights are then redeemable, the Company may in its sole and absolute discretion, and the Rights Agent shall if the Company so directs, supplement or amend any provision of this Agreement in any respect without the approval of any holders of the Rights. At any time when the Rights are no longer redeemable, except as provided in the penultimate sentence of this Section 27, the Company may, and the Rights Agent shall, if the Company so directs, supplement or amend this Agreement without the approval of any holders of Rights; provided, however, that no such supplement or amendment may (a) adversely affect the interests of the holders of Rights as such (other than an Acquiring Person or any Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person), or (b) cause the Rights again to become redeemable. Notwithstanding anything contained in this Agreement to the contrary, no supplement or amendment shall be made which changes the Redemption Price. Upon the 63
delivery of a certificate from an appropriate officer of the Company which states that the supplement or amendment is in compliance with the terms of this Section 27, and if requested by the Rights Agent, an opinion of counsel, that states that the proposed supplement or amendment complied with this Section 27, the Rights Agent shall execute such supplement or amendment. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, the Rights Agent may, but shall not be obligated to, enter into any supplement or amendment that affects the Rights Agent's own rights, duties, obligations or immunities under this Agreement. Section 28. SUCCESSORS. All the covenants and provisions of this Agreement by or for the benefit of the Company or the Rights Agent shall bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors and assigns hereunder. Section 29. BENEFITS OF THIS AGREEMENT. Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to give to any person or corporation other than the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Right Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the registered holders of the Common Stock) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under this Agreement; but this Agreement shall be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the Company, the Rights Agent and the registered holders of the Right Certificates (and, prior to the Distribution Date, the registered holders of the Common Stock). Section 30. SEVERABILITY. If any term, provision, covenant or restriction of this Agreement is held by a court of competent jurisdiction or other authority to be invalid, void or unenforceable, the remainder of the terms, provisions, covenants and restrictions of this Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall in no way be affected, impaired or invalidated. 64
Section 31. GOVERNING LAW. This Agreement and each Right Certificate issued hereunder shall be deemed to be a contract made under the laws of the State of Minnesota and for all purposes shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of such State applicable to contracts to be made and performed entirely within such State. Section 32. COUNTERPARTS. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and each of such counterparts shall for all purposes be deemed to be an original, and all such counterparts shall together constitute but one and the same instrument. Section 33. DESCRIPTIVE HEADINGS. Descriptive headings of the several Sections of this Agreement are inserted for convenience only and shall not control or affect the meaning or construction of any of the provisions hereof. Section 34. DETERMINATIONS AND ACTIONS BY THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS. (a) The Board of Directors shall have the exclusive power and authority to administer this Agreement and to exercise all rights and powers specifically granted to the Board of Directors or the Company or as may be necessary or advisable in the administration of this Agreement, including, without limitation, the right and power to (i) interpret the provisions of this Agreement, and (ii) make all determinations deemed necessary or advisable for the administration of this Agreement (including a determination to redeem or not redeem the Rights or to amend the Agreement). All such actions, interpretations and determinations (including, for purposes of clause (ii) below, all omissions with respect to the foregoing) which are done or made by the Board of Directors, shall (i) be final, conclusive and binding on the Company, the Rights Agent, the holders of the Right Certificates and all other parties, and (ii) not subject the Board of Directors to any liability to the holders of the Right Certificates. Unless otherwise notified, the Rights Agent shall always be 65
entitled to assume that the Board of Directors acted in good faith and the Rights Agent shall be fully protected and shall incur no liability in reliance thereon. (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, it is understood that the IDE Committee (as hereinafter defined) of the Board of Directors shall meet not less than once every year to review the terms and conditions of this Agreement, including whether the termination or modification of this Agreement is in the best interest of the Company and its shareholders, and to make a recommendation based on such review to the Board of Directors. The first meeting of the IDE Committee shall take place no later than July 12, 2007. The IDE Committee, when reviewing the terms and conditions of this Agreement, shall have the power to set its own agenda and to retain at the expense of the Company such legal counsel, investment bankers and other advisors as such Committee deems appropriate in carrying out its foregoing responsibilities under this Agreement. The IDE Committee, when reviewing the terms and conditions of this Agreement, shall have the authority to review all information of the Company and to consider any and all factors it deems relevant to any such review. The "IDE Committee" shall be comprised of all members of the Board of Directors who are "Independent Directors" as that term is defined in the NYSE Listed Company Manual. 66
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed and attested, all as of the day and year first above written. Attest: ALLETE, INC. By: /s/ Claudia R. Scott Welty By: /s/ Donald J. Shippar ------------------------------- ---------------------------------- Title: Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer [RIGHTS AGENT] Witness: Corporate Secretary ALLETE, INC. By: /s/ Dawn LaPointe Garbo By: /s/ Deborah A. Amberg ------------------------------- ----------------------------------- Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary 67
EXHIBIT A FORM OF CERTIFICATE OF RESOLUTION FIXING TERMS OF JUNIOR SERIAL PREFERRED STOCK A of MINNESOTA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY We, Edwin L. Russell, Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, and Philip R. Halverson, Corporate Secretary of Minnesota Power & Light Company, a corporation organized and existing under the Minnesota Business Corporation Act (the "Company"), in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 302A thereof, DO HEREBY CERTIFY: That pursuant to the authority conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Restated Articles of Incorporation of the Company, the Board of Directors on July 24, 1996 adopted the following resolution creating a series of 1,000,000 shares of Serial Preferred Stock A designated as Junior Serial Preferred Stock A: RESOLVED, that pursuant to the authority vested in the Board of Directors of the Company in accordance with the provisions of the Company's Restated Articles of Incorporation, a series of Serial Preferred Stock A, without par value, of the Company, consisting of 1,000,000 shares is hereby created, and the voting rights, preferences and relative rights, and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions thereof, are as follows: Section 1. DESIGNATION AND AMOUNT. There shall be a series of Serial Preferred Stock A, without par value, of the Company which shall be designated as "Junior Serial Preferred Stock A," (hereinafter called "Junior Serial Preferred Stock A"), and the number of shares constituting such series shall be 1,000,000. Such number of shares may be increased or decreased by resolution of the Board of Directors and by the filing of a certificate pursuant to the provisions of the Minnesota Business Corporation Act stating that such increase or reduction has been so authorized; provided, however, that no decrease shall reduce the number of shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A to a number less than that of the shares then outstanding plus the number of shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A issuable upon exercise of outstanding rights, options or warrants or upon conversion of outstanding securities issued by the Company. Section 2. DIVIDENDS AND DISTRIBUTIONS. (A) The holders of shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A shall be entitled to receive, when, as and if declared by the Board of Directors out of funds legally available for the purpose, quarterly dividends payable in cash to holders of record on the first business day of March, June, September and December in each year (each such date being referred to herein as a "Quarterly Dividend Payment Date"), commencing on the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date after the first issuance of a share or fraction of a share of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A, in an amount per share (rounded to the nearest cent) equal to the greater of (a) $51 or (b) subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth, 100 times the aggregate per share amount of all cash dividends, and 100 times the aggregate per share amount (payable in kind) A-1
of all non-cash dividends or other distributions other than a dividend payable in shares of Common Stock (hereinafter defined) or a subdivision of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (by reclassification or otherwise), declared on the Common Stock, without par value, of the Company (the "Common Stock") since the immediately preceding Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, or, with respect to the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, since the first issuance of any share or fraction of a share of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A. In the event the Company shall at any time following July 24, 1996 (i) declare any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock or (iii) combine the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the amount to which holders of shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A were entitled immediately prior to such event under clause (b) of the preceding sentence shall be adjusted by multiplying each such amount by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event. (B) The Company shall declare a dividend or distribution on the Junior Serial Preferred Stock A as provided in paragraph (A) above at the time it declares a dividend or distribution on the Common Stock (other than a dividend payable in shares of Common Stock). (C) No dividend or distribution (other than a dividend payable in shares of Common Stock) shall be paid or payable to the holders of shares of Common Stock unless, at the same time as such payment is made with respect to the Common Stock or prior thereto, all accrued but unpaid dividends to the date of such dividend or distribution shall have been paid to the holders of shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A. (D) Dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative on outstanding shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A from the Quarterly Dividend Payment Date next preceding the date of issue of such shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A, unless the date of issue of such shares is prior to the record date for the first Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, in which case dividends on such shares shall begin to accrue from the date of issue of such shares, or unless the date of issue is a Quarterly Dividend Payment Date or is a date after the record date for the determination of holders of shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A entitled to receive a quarterly dividend and before such Quarterly Dividend Payment Date, in either of which events such dividends shall begin to accrue and be cumulative from such Quarterly Dividend Payment Date. Accrued but unpaid dividends shall not bear interest. Dividends paid on the shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A in an amount less than the total amount of such dividends at the time accrued and payable on such shares shall be allocated pro rata on a share-by-share basis among all such shares at the time outstanding. The Board of Directors may fix a record date for the determination of holders of shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A entitled to receive payment of a dividend or distribution declared thereon, which record date shall be no more than 30 days prior to the date fixed for the payment thereof. Section 3. VOTING RIGHTS. The holders of shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A shall have the voting rights provided for in the Restated Articles of Incorporation of the Company. A-2
Section 4. CERTAIN RESTRICTIONS. (A) Whenever quarterly dividends or other dividends or distributions payable on the Junior Serial Preferred Stock A as provided in Section 2 are in arrears, thereafter and until all accrued and unpaid dividends and distributions, whether or not declared, on shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A outstanding shall have been paid in full, the Company shall not: (i) declare or pay dividends on, make any other distributions on, or redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Junior Serial Preferred Stock A; (ii) declare or pay dividends on or make any other distributions on any shares of stock ranking on a parity (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) with the Junior Serial Preferred Stock A, except dividends paid ratably on the Junior Serial Preferred Stock A and all such parity stock on which dividends are payable or in arrears in proportion to the total amounts to which the holders of all such shares are then entitled; (iii) redeem or purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration shares of any stock ranking on a parity (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) with the Junior Serial Preferred Stock A, provided that the Company may at any time redeem, purchase or otherwise acquire shares of any such parity stock in exchange for shares of any stock of the Company ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon dissolution, liquidation or winding up) to the Junior Serial Preferred Stock A; or (iv) purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A, except in accordance with a purchase offer made in writing or by publication (as determined by the Board of Directors) to all holders of such shares upon such terms as the Board of Directors, after consideration of the respective annual dividend rates and other relative rights and preferences of the respective series and classes, shall determine in good faith will result in fair and equitable treatment among the respective series or classes. (B) The Company shall not permit any subsidiary of the Company to purchase or otherwise acquire for consideration any shares of stock of the Company unless the Company could, under paragraph (A) of this Section, purchase or otherwise acquire such shares at such time and in such manner. Section 5. LIQUIDATION, DISSOLUTION OR WINDING UP. (A) Upon any voluntary or involuntary liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the Company, no distribution shall be made to the holders of shares of stock ranking junior (either as to dividends or upon liquidation, dissolution or winding up) to the Junior Serial Preferred Stock A unless, prior thereto, the holders of whole shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A shall have received $100.00 per share, plus an amount equal to accrued and unpaid A-3
dividends and distributions thereon, whether or not declared, to the date of such payment (the "Junior Serial A Liquidation Preference"). (B) In the event, however, that there are not sufficient assets available to permit payment in full of the Junior Serial A Liquidation Preference and the liquidation preferences of all other series of preferred stock, if any, which rank on a parity with the Junior Serial Preferred Stock A, then such remaining assets shall be distributed ratably to the holders of such parity shares in proportion to their respective liquidation preferences. Section 6. CONSOLIDATION, MERGER, ETC. In case the Company shall enter into any consolidation, merger, combination or other transaction in which the shares of Common Stock are exchanged for or converted into other stock or securities, cash and/or any other property, then in any such case the shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A shall at the same time be similarly exchanged or converted in an amount per share (subject to the provision for adjustment hereinafter set forth) equal to 100 times the aggregate amount of stock, securities, cash and/or any other property (payable in kind), as the case may be, into which or for which each share of Common Stock is converted or exchanged. In the event the Company shall at any time (i) declare any dividend on Common Stock payable in shares of Common Stock, (ii) subdivide the outstanding Common Stock or (iii) combine the outstanding Common Stock into a smaller number of shares, then in each such case the amount set forth in the preceding sentence with respect to the exchange or conversion of shares of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A shall be adjusted by multiplying such amount by a fraction the numerator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock outstanding immediately after such event and the denominator of which is the number of shares of Common Stock that were outstanding immediately prior to such event. Section 7. REDEMPTION. The shares of a Junior Serial Preferred Stock A shall not be redeemable by the Company. The preceding sentence shall not limit the ability of the Company to purchase or otherwise deal in such shares of stock to the extent permitted by law. Section 8. FRACTIONAL SHARES. Junior Serial Preferred Stock A may be issued in fractions of a share which shall entitle the holder, in proportion to such holder's fractional shares, to exercise voting rights, receive dividends, participate in distributions and to have the benefit of all other rights of holders of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, Minnesota Power & Light Company has caused its corporate seal to be hereunto affixed and this Certificate to be signed by Edwin L. Russell, its Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, and the same to be attested by Philip R. Halverson, its Corporate Secretary, this 24th day of July, 1996. MINNESOTA POWER & LIGHT COMPANY By: ---------------------------------------- Edwin L. Russell Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer A-4
(SEAL) Attest: By: ---------------------------- Philip R. Halverson Corporate Secretary A-5
EXHIBIT B [Form of Right Certificate] CERTIFICATE NO. R- RIGHTS ------------- NOT EXERCISABLE AFTER [_____, 200_] OR EARLIER IF THE RIGHTS EXPIRE UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES OR ARE REDEEMED BY THE COMPANY. THE RIGHTS ARE SUBJECT TO REDEMPTION, AT THE OPTION OF THE COMPANY, AT $0.005 PER RIGHT ON THE TERMS SET FORTH IN THE AMENDED AND RESTATED RIGHTS AGREEMENT. UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES, RIGHTS BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY AN ACQUIRING PERSON (AS SUCH TERM IS DEFINED IN THE AMENDED AND RESTATED RIGHTS AGREEMENT) AND ANY SUBSEQUENT HOLDER OF SUCH RIGHTS MAY BECOME NULL AND VOID. THE RIGHTS SHALL NOT BE EXERCISABLE, AND SHALL BE VOID SO LONG AS HELD, BY A HOLDER IN ANY JURISDICTION WHERE THE REQUISITE QUALIFICATION TO THE ISSUANCE TO SUCH HOLDER, OR THE EXERCISE BY SUCH HOLDER, OF THE RIGHTS IN SUCH JURISDICTION SHALL NOT HAVE BEEN OBTAINED OR BE OBTAINABLE. [THE RIGHTS REPRESENTED BY THIS CERTIFICATE ARE OR WERE BENEFICIALLY OWNED BY A PERSON WHO WAS OR BECAME AN ACQUIRING PERSON OR AN AFFILIATE OR ASSOCIATE OF AN ACQUIRING PERSON (AS SUCH TERMS ARE DEFINED IN THE AMENDED AND RESTATED RIGHTS AGREEMENT). ACCORDINGLY, THIS RIGHT CERTIFICATE AND THE RIGHTS REPRESENTED HEREBY MAY BECOME VOID IN THE CIRCUMSTANCES SPECIFIED IN SECTION 7(e) OF SUCH AGREEMENT.]* Right Certificate ALLETE, Inc. This certifies that _______________________________, or registered assigns, is the registered owner of the number of Rights set forth above, each of which entitles the owner thereof, subject to the terms, provisions and conditions of the Amended and Restated Rights Agreement, dated as of July 12, 2006 (the "Amended Rights Agreement"), between ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the "Company"), and the Corporate Secretary of the Company (the "Rights Agent"), to purchase from the Company at any time after the Distribution Date (as such term is defined in the Amended Rights Agreement) and prior to 5:00 p.m. (Duluth time) on [___________], or notice of redemption or exchange at the office of the Rights Agent (or its successors as Rights Agent) designated for such purpose, one and one-half one-hundredths (three two-hundredths) of a fully paid non-assessable share of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A, without par value (the "Preferred Stock") of the Company at a purchase price of $90.00 per one-hundredth of a share (the "Purchase Price") upon presentation and surrender of this Right Certificate with the appropriate Form of Election to Purchase and related Certificate duly executed. The number of Rights evidenced by this Right Certificate (and the number of shares which may be purchased upon exercise thereof) set forth above, and the Purchase Price per share - --------------------- * The portion of the legend in brackets shall be inserted only if applicable and shall replace the preceding sentence. B-1
set forth above, are the number and Purchase Price as of [___________], based on the Preferred Stock as constituted at such date. Capitalized terms not defined in this Right Certificate that are defined in the Amended Rights Agreement shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Amended Rights Agreement. Upon the occurrence of a Triggering Event, if the Rights evidenced by this Right Certificate are beneficially owned by (i) an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Acquiring Person (as such terms are defined in the Amended Rights Agreement), (ii) under certain circumstances specified in the Amended Rights Agreement, a transferee of any such Acquiring Person, Associate or Affiliate, or (iii) under certain circumstances specified in the Amended Rights Agreement, a transferee of a person who, after such transfer, became an Acquiring Person, or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person, such Rights shall become null and void and no holder hereof shall have any right with respect to such Rights from and after the occurrence of any such Triggering Event. As provided in the Amended Rights Agreement, the Purchase Price and the number and kind of Preferred Stock or other securities, which may be purchased upon the exercise of the Rights evidenced by this Right Certificate are subject to modification and adjustment upon the happening of certain events. The Rights evidenced by this Rights Certificate shall not be exercisable, and shall be void so long as held, by a holder in any jurisdiction where the requisite qualification to the issuance to such holder, or the exercise by such holder, of the Rights in such jurisdiction shall not have been obtained or be obtainable. This Right Certificate is subject to all of the terms, provisions and conditions of the Amended Rights Agreement, which terms, provisions and conditions are hereby incorporated herein by reference and made a part hereof and to which Amended Rights Agreement reference is hereby made for a full description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities hereunder of the Rights Agent, the Company and the holders of the Right Certificates, which limitations of rights include the temporary suspension of the exercisability of such Rights under certain circumstances specified in such Amended Rights Agreement. Copies of the Amended Rights Agreement are on file at the above-mentioned office of the Rights Agent and are also available upon written request to the Rights Agent. This Right Certificate, with or without other Right Certificates, upon surrender at the principal corporate trust office of the Rights Agent, may be exchanged for another Right Certificate or Right Certificates of like tenor and date evidencing Rights entitling the holder to purchase a like aggregate number of shares of Preferred Stock as the Rights evidenced by the Right Certificate or Right Certificates surrendered shall have entitled such holder to purchase. If this Right Certificate shall be exercised in part, the holder shall be entitled to receive upon surrender hereof another Right Certificate or Right Certificates for the number of whole Rights not exercised. Subject to the provisions of the Amended Rights Agreement, the Rights evidenced by this Certificate may be redeemed by the Company at its option at a redemption price of $0.005 per Right at any time prior to such time as any Person becomes an Acquiring Person. B-2
No fractional shares of Preferred Stock will be issued upon the exercise of any Right or Rights evidenced hereby (other than fractions which are integral multiples of one-hundredth of a share of Preferred Stock, which may at the election of the Company be evidenced by depository receipts), but in lieu thereof a cash payment will be made, as provided in the Amended Rights Agreement. No holder of this Right Certificate, as such, shall be entitled to vote or receive dividends or be deemed for any purpose the holder of shares of Preferred Stock or of any other securities of the Company which may at any time be issuable on the exercise hereof, nor shall anything contained in the Amended Rights Agreement or herein be construed to confer upon the holder hereof, as such, any of the rights of a shareholder of the Company or any right to vote for the election of directors or upon any matter submitted to shareholders at any meeting thereof, or to give or withhold consent to any corporate action, or, to receive notice of meetings or other actions affecting shareholders (except as provided in the Amended Rights Agreement), or to receive dividends or subscription rights, or otherwise, until the Right or Rights evidenced by this Right Certificate shall have been exercised as provided in the Amended Rights Agreement. This Right Certificate shall not be valid or obligatory for any purpose until it shall have been countersigned by the Rights Agent. WITNESS the facsimile signature of the proper officers of the Company and its corporate seal. Dated as of ____________ __, 2006 ATTEST: (SEAL) ALLETE, INC. By: - ---------------------------------- ---------------------------------- Name: Name: Title: Title Countersigned: - ---------------------------------- By: ------------------------------- Authorized Signature B-3
FORM OF ELECTION TO PURCHASE ---------------------------- (To be executed if holder desires to exercise Rights represented by the Right Certificate.) TO: ALLETE, INC. The undersigned hereby irrevocably elects to exercise __________ Rights represented by this Right Certificate to purchase the shares of Preferred Stock issuable upon the exercise of the Rights (or such other securities of the Company or of any other person which may be issuable upon the exercise of the Rights) and requests that certificates for such shares be issued in the name of: Please insert social security or other identifying number: --------------------------------------------------- - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Please print name and address) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- If such number of Rights shall not be all the Rights evidenced by this Right Certificate, a new Right Certificate for the balance of such Rights shall be registered in the name of and delivered to: Please insert social security or other identifying number: --------------------------------------------------- - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Please print name and address) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Dated: , 20 --------------- ---- ------------------------------------- Signature Signature Guaranteed: B-4
CERTIFICATE The undersigned hereby certifies by checking the appropriate boxes that: (1) the Rights evidenced by this Right Certificate [ ] are [ ] are not being exercised by or on behalf of a Person who is or was an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Acquiring Person (as such terms are defined pursuant to the Amended and Restated Rights Agreement); (2) after due inquiry and to the best knowledge of the undersigned, it [ ] did [ ] did not acquire the Rights evidenced by this Right Certificate from any Person who is, was or became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person. Dated: , 20 --------------- ---- ------------------------------------- Signature NOTICE ------ The signature to the foregoing Election to Purchase and Certificate must correspond to the name as written upon the face of this Right Certificate in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever. NOTICE ------ The signature to the foregoing Assignment and Certificate must correspond to the name as written upon the face of this Right Certificate in every particular, without alteration or enlargement or any change whatsoever. B-5
[Form of Reverse Side of Right Certificate] FORM OF ASSIGNMENT ------------------ (To be executed by the registered holder if such holder desires to transfer the Right Certificate.) FOR VALUE RECEIVED ------------------------------------------------------------- hereby sells, assigns and transfers unto ---------------------------------------- - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Please print name and address of transferee) - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- this Right Certificate, together with all right, title and interest therein, and does hereby irrevocably constitute and appoint _________________________ Attorney, to transfer the within Right Certificate on the books of the within-named Company, with full power of substitution. Dated: , 20 --------------- ---- ------------------------------------- Signature Signature Guaranteed: CERTIFICATE ----------- The undersigned hereby certifies by checking the appropriate boxes that: (1) this Right Certificate [ ] is [ ] is not being sold, assigned and transferred by or on behalf of a Person who is or was an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of any such Acquiring Person (as such terms are defined pursuant to the Amended and Restated Rights Agreement) (2) after due inquiry and to the best knowledge of the undersigned, it [ ] did [ ] did not acquire the Rights evidenced by this Right Certificate from any Person who is, was or subsequently became an Acquiring Person or an Affiliate or Associate of an Acquiring Person. Dated: , 20 --------------- ---- ------------------------------------- Signature B-6
EXHIBIT C UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES, AS SET FORTH IN THE AMENDED AND RESTATED RIGHTS AGREEMENT, RIGHTS OWNED BY OR TRANSFERRED TO ANY PERSON WHO IS OR BECOMES AN ACQUIRING PERSON (AS DEFINED IN THE AMENDED AND RESTATED RIGHTS AGREEMENT) AND CERTAIN TRANSFEREES THEREOF WILL BECOME NULL AND VOID AND WILL NO LONGER BE TRANSFERABLE SUMMARY OF AMENDED AND RESTATED RIGHTS AGREEMENT ------------------------------------------------ On July 12, 2006, the Board of Directors of ALLETE, Inc. (the "Company") amended the terms of the Rights Agreement dated July 24, 1996 between the Company and the Secretary of the Company (the "Original Rights Agreement"). The Original Rights Agreement provided for a dividend distribution of one Right for each outstanding share of common stock, without par value (the "Common Stock"), of the Company to shareholders of record at the close of business on July 24, 1996 (the "Record Date") and authorized the issuance of one Right with respect to each share of Common Stock that becomes outstanding between the Record Date and July 23, 2006, or such earlier time as the Rights are redeemed. Except as described below, each Right, when exercisable, entitles the registered holder to purchase from the Company one and one-half one-hundredths (three two-hundredths) of a share of Junior Serial Preferred Stock A, without par value (the "Preferred Stock"), at a price of $90.00 per one-hundredth of a share (the "Purchase Price"), subject to adjustment. The terms of the Rights are set forth in the Amended and Restated Rights Agreement (the "Amended Rights Agreement"), dated July 12, 2006 between the Company and the Secretary of the Company, currently Deborah A. Amberg, as Rights Agent. The Rights initially attached to all Common Stock certificates representing shares then outstanding, and no separate Right Certificates were distributed. The Rights will continue to be evidenced by the Common Stock certificates together with this copy of the Summary of Amended and Restated Rights Agreement and not by separate certificates until the earlier to occur of (i) 10 days following a public announcement that a person or group of affiliated or associated persons (an "Acquiring Person") has acquired, or obtained the right to acquire, beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding shares of Common Stock (the "Stock Acquisition Date") or (ii) 15 business days (or such later date as may be determined by action of the Board of Directors (the "Board of Directors") prior to the time that any person becomes an Acquiring Person) following the commencement of (or a public announcement of an intention to make) a tender or exchange offer if, upon consummation thereof, such person or group would be the beneficial owner of 15% or more of such outstanding shares of Common Stock (the earlier of such dates being called the "Distribution Date"). Until the Distribution Date, the Rights will be transferred with and only with the Common Stock. Until the Distribution Date (or earlier redemption, expiration or termination of the Rights), the transfer of any certificates for Common Stock, with or without a copy of this Summary of Amended Rights Agreement, will also constitute the transfer of the Rights associated with the Common Stock represented by such certificates. As soon as practicable C-1
following the Distribution Date, separate certificates evidencing the Rights ("Right Certificates") will be mailed to holders of record of the Common Stock as of the close of business on the Distribution Date and, thereafter, such separate Right Certificates alone will evidence the Rights. The Rights are not exercisable until the Distribution Date and will expire at the earliest of (i) July 23, 2009 (the "Final Expiration Date"), (ii) the redemption of the Rights by the Company as described below, or (iii) the exchange of all Rights for Common Stock as described below. In the event that any person (other than the Company, its affiliates or any person receiving newly-issued shares of Common Stock directly from the Company) becomes the beneficial owner of 15% or more of the then outstanding shares of Common Stock, each holder of a Right will thereafter have a right to receive, upon exercise at the then current exercise price of the Right, Common Stock (or, in certain circumstances, cash, property or other securities of the Company) having a value equal to two times the exercise price of the Right. The Amended Rights Agreement contains an exemption for any issuance of Common Stock by the Company directly to any person (for example, in a private placement or an acquisition by the Company in which Common Stock is used as consideration), even if that person would become the beneficial owner of 15% or more of the Common Stock, provided that such person does not acquire any additional shares of Common Stock. In the event that, at any time following the Stock Acquisition Date, the Company is acquired in a merger or other business combination transaction or 50% or more of the Company's assets or earning power are sold, proper provision will be made so that each holder of a Right will thereafter have the right to receive, upon exercise at the then current exercise price of the Right, common stock of the acquiring or surviving company having a value equal to two times the exercise price of the Right. Notwithstanding the foregoing, following the occurrence of any of the events set forth in the preceding two paragraphs (the "Triggering Events"), any Rights that are, or (under certain circumstances specified in the Amended Rights Agreement) were, beneficially owned by an Acquiring Person will immediately become null and void. The Purchase Price payable, and the number of shares of Preferred Stock or other securities or property issuable, upon exercise of the Rights, are subject to adjustment from time to time to prevent dilution, among other circumstances, in the event of a stock dividend on, or a subdivision, split, combination, consolidation or reclassification of, the Preferred Stock or the Common Stock, or a reverse split of the outstanding shares of Preferred Stock or the Common Stock. With certain exceptions, no adjustment in the Purchase Price will be required until cumulative adjustments require an adjustment of at least 1% in the Purchase Price. The Company will not be required to issue fractional shares of Preferred Stock or Common Stock (other than fractions in multiples of one-hundredth of a share of Preferred Stock) and, in lieu thereof, an adjustment in cash may be made based on the market price of the Preferred Stock or Common Stock on the last trading date prior to the date of exercise. C-2
At any time after the acquisition by a person or group of affiliated or associated persons of beneficial ownership of 15% or more of the outstanding Common Stock and prior to the acquisition by such person or group of 50% or more of the outstanding Common Stock, the Board of Directors may exchange the Rights (other than Rights owned by such person or group, which have become void), in whole or in part, at an exchange ratio of one share of Common Stock per Right (subject to adjustment). At any time after the date of the Amended Rights Agreement until the time that a person becomes an Acquiring Person, the Board of Directors may redeem the Rights in whole, but not in part, at a price of $0.005 per Right (the "Redemption Price"), which may (at the option of the Company) be paid in cash, shares of Common Stock or other consideration deemed appropriate by the Board of Directors. Upon the effectiveness of any action of the Board of Directors ordering redemption of the Rights, the Rights will terminate and the only right of the holders of Rights will be to receive the Redemption Price. Issuance of Preferred Stock or Common Stock upon exercise of the Rights will be subject to any necessary regulatory approvals. Until a Right is exercised, the holder thereof, as such, will have no rights as a shareholder of the Company, including, without limitation, the right to vote or to receive dividends. The provisions of the Amended Rights Agreement may be amended by the Company, except that any amendment adopted after the time that a person becomes an Acquiring Person may not adversely affect the interests of holders of Rights. As of May 15, 2006, there were 30,273,848 shares of ALLETE, Inc. Common Stock outstanding. Each share of Common Stock outstanding on and after July 24, 1996 received one Right. One million shares of Preferred Stock have been reserved for issuance in the event of exercise of the Rights. Until a Right is exercised, the holder thereof, as such, will have no rights as a shareholder of the Company, including, without limitation, the right to vote or to receive dividends. While the distribution of the Rights will not be subject to federal taxation to shareholders or to the Company, shareholders may, depending upon the circumstances, recognize taxable income in the event that the Rights become exercisable for Common Stock (or other consideration) of the Company or for common stock of the acquiring company as set forth above. The Rights have certain anti-takeover effects. The Rights will cause substantial dilution to a person or group that attempts to acquire the Company without conditioning the offer on the Rights being redeemed or a substantial number of Rights being acquired, and under certain circumstances the Rights beneficially owned by such a person or group may become void. The Rights should not interfere with any merger or other business combination approved by the Board of Directors because, if the Rights would become exercisable as a result of such merger or business combination, the Board of Directors may, at its option, at any time prior to the time that any Person becomes an Acquiring Person, redeem all (but not less than all) of the then outstanding Rights at the Redemption Price. C-3
A special committee of the Board of Directors known as the IDE Committee, comprising all of the independent directors of the Company, will conduct an annual review of the terms and conditions of the Amended Rights Agreement, including whether termination or modification of such Plan is in the best interests of the Company and its shareholders. The IDE Committee will make recommendations to the Board of Directors based on such review. A copy of the Amended Rights Agreement is being filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission as an exhibit to an amended Registration Statement on Form 8-A/A. This summary description of the Rights does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Amended Rights Agreement. C-4



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060720154516.txt.gz
TIME:20060720154516
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - JULY 19, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 5 - CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT ITEM 5.02 DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR PRINCIPAL OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF PRINCIPAL OFFICERS Effective July 19, 2006, Kathleen A. Brekken was elected to serve on ALLETE, Inc.'s (ALLETE) Board of Directors and appointed to serve on the Executive Compensation Committee. Ms. Brekken, 57, is retired president and chief executive officer of Midwest of Cannon Falls in Minnesota, serves on the board of the Cannon Falls Medical Center - Mayo Health System and is a member of the St. Olaf College Board of Regents. Ms. Brekken served on the ALLETE Board of Directors from 1997 to 2003. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 20, 2006 1
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. July 20, 2006 Mark A. Schober ------------------------------------------------- Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 20, 2006



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060814173001.txt.gz
TIME:20060814173001
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - AUGUST 9, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 1 - REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS ITEM 1.01 ENTRY INTO A MATERIAL DEFINITIVE AGREEMENT. On August 9, 2006, the Board of Directors of ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) approved amendments to the following executive compensation plans: - ALLETE and Affiliated Companies Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan (SERP); - Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Executive Investment Plan I; - Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Executive Investment Plan II; and - ALLETE Director Compensation Deferral Plan. The SERP was amended to reflect amendments to the Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Plan A and the Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan. (See Item 8.01.) In addition, the SERP was amended to replace the fixed crediting rate with a market-based stable value fixed income fund crediting rate, to reduce to 7.5 percent the "executive deferral account" payment annuity rate effective January 1, 2007, and to remove the change in control supplemental tax benefit. The Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Executive Investment Plan I and the Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Executive Investment Plan II were amended to remove the change in control supplemental tax benefit. The ALLETE Director Compensation Deferral Plan was amended to replace the fixed crediting rate with a market-based stable value fixed income fund crediting rate, and to reduce to 7.5 percent the "executive deferral account" payment annuity rate effective January 1, 2007. SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS. On August 9, 2006, ALLETE's Board of Directors also approved amendments to the following qualified employee plans: - Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Plan A (Retirement Plan A); and - Minnesota Power and Affiliated Companies Retirement Savings and Stock Ownership Plan (RSOP). Retirement Plan A was amended to suspend further crediting service pursuant to the plan, effective as of September 30, 2006, and to close Retirement Plan A to new participants. In conjunction with this change, employees will receive additional benefits under the RSOP. Funding of RSOP benefits comes from unallocated shares of ALLETE common stock held by the RSOP, the value of which has grown significantly and has exceeded the Company's forecast creating additional value. Because there are limitations on how the RSOP's value can be used, the Company reviewed the retirement program design and how best to deliver retirement benefits to the Company's employees. The Company will not record a curtailment of Retirement Plan A as a result of the amendment. ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 14, 2006 1
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. August 14, 2006 Mark A. Schober ------------------------------------------------- Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 14, 2006 2



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20060918113333.txt.gz
TIME:20060918113333
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - SEPTEMBER 13, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION ITEM 2.03 CREATION OF A DIRECT FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OR AN OBLIGATION UNDER AN OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENT OF A REGISTRANT On September 13, 2006, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) accepted an offer from certain institutional buyers in the private placement market to purchase $60 million of ALLETE first mortgage bonds. When issued, on or about February 1, 2007, the bonds will carry an interest rate of 5.99% and will have a term of 20 years. ALLETE intends to use the proceeds from the bonds to retire $60 million in principal amount of First Mortgage Bonds, 7% Series due February 15, 2007. ------------------------------ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 18, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements, which are difficult to predict, contain uncertainties, are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those contained in forward-looking statements: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters and pandemic diseases; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - ALLETE's ability to obtain viable real estate for development purposes; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - the effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - competition for economic expansion or development opportunities; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I, Item 1A of ALLETE's 2005 Form 10-K and Part II, Item 1A of ALLETE's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for 2006. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in its other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 18, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. September 18, 2006 Mark A. Schober ------------------------------------------------- Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated September 18, 2006 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20061215160431.txt.gz
TIME:20061215160431
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - DECEMBER 12, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS. Reference is made to ALLETE, Inc.'s (ALLETE or Company) Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 (2005 Form 10-K), for background information on the following update. Ref. Page 8 - Contract Status for Minnesota Power Large Power Customers On December 12, 2006, Minnesota Power, an operating division of ALLETE, announced it has reached an agreement with PolyMet Mining, Inc. (PolyMet) to provide all of its electric service needs through 2018 at its proposed copper, nickel and precious metals mining operation located in northeastern Minnesota. PolyMet plans to begin commercial operations at its mine and process plant complex near Hoyt Lakes, Minnesota, by late 2008, pending completion of financing arrangements and receipt of regulatory approvals. Once fully operational, it is anticipated that PolyMet will require approximately 70 megawatts of electric power, becoming one of Minnesota Power's larger industrial customers. The PolyMet electric service agreement will require the approval of the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission. PolyMet is based in Hoyt Lakes, Minnesota and is a wholly-owned subsidiary of PolyMet Mining Corp., an investor-owned Canadian mining company whose principal assets are the NorthMet polymetallic deposit, one of the world's largest non-ferrous deposits, and the nearby Erie processing plant. ------------------------------ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 15, 2006 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters and pandemic diseases; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I, Item 1A of ALLETE's 2005 Form 10-K and Part II, Item 1A of ALLETE's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2006. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in its other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 15, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. December 15, 2006 Mark A. Schober ------------------------------------------------- Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 15, 2006 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20061221153837.txt.gz
TIME:20061221153837
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - DECEMBER 19, 2006 ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer incorporation or organization) Identification No.) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS. Reference is made to ALLETE, Inc.'s (ALLETE or Company) Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2005 (2005 Form 10-K), for background information on the following updates. Ref. Page 10 - Third Full Paragraph, Eighth and Ninth Full Paragraphs Ref. Page 42 - Seventh and Eight Paragraphs Ref. Page 43 - First Paragraph Ref. Page 77 - Third and Fourth Paragraphs Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006, Page 16 - Fifth and Sixth Paragraphs Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006, Page 25 - Fifth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2006, Page 33 - First Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2006, Page 19 - Fifth and Sixth Paragraphs Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2006, Page 33 - Fourth Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2006, Page 20 - Fifth and Sixth Paragraphs Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2006, Page 34 - Second Full Paragraph On December 20, 2006, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission (MPUC) issued an order which allows Minnesota Power, an operating division of ALLETE, to continue recovering Midwest Independent Transmission System Operation, Inc. (MISO) Day 2 charges through the Company's Minnesota retail automatic fuel adjustment recovery mechanism (fuel clause) except for MISO Day 2 administrative charges. The order grants deferred accounting treatment for three MISO charge types that were determined to be administrative charges and therefore not currently recoverable through the fuel clause. Over the next 12 months, Minnesota Power will adjust customer bills to recognize approximately $2 million of administrative charges previously collected through the fuel clause between April 1, 2005, and December 31, 2006, and record these administrative charges as a regulatory asset. Minnesota Power is permitted to continue accumulating MISO Day 2 administrative charges after December 31, 2006, as a regulatory asset until it files its next rate case, at which time recovery for such charges will be determined. There will be no impact on earnings as a result of this ruling. The MISO Day 2 energy market is the market through which Minnesota Power engages in wholesale energy transactions in MISO's day-ahead and real-time markets. The MISO Day 2 market began operations on April 1, 2005. Minnesota Power had been recovering all MISO Day 2 charges through its fuel clause subject to two interim orders from the MPUC that had allowed such collection subject to refund. This order removes the subject to refund requirement of the two interim orders, and includes extensive fuel clause reporting requirements that will be reviewed in Minnesota Power's monthly and annual fuel clause filing to the MPUC. As a result of the MPUC's order allowing recovery of nearly all MISO Day 2 charges through the fuel clause, Minnesota Power will revoke its December 2005 Letter of Intent to Withdraw from MISO. Ref. Page 16 - Fifth Full Paragraph Ref. Page 46 - Second Paragraph Ref. Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2006, Page 35 - Fifth Paragraph On December 19, 2006, ALLETE Properties, Inc. (ALLETE Properties), a wholly-owned subsidiary of ALLETE, received development order approval from the City of Ormond Beach for its 6,000-acre Ormond Crossings project (Ormond Crossings). This development order is a key approval necessary to develop up to 3,700 residential units and 5 million commercial square feet within Ormond Crossings. Most of Ormond Crossings is located in the City of Ormond Beach in Volusia County; the remainder of the development is an adjacent piece of unincorporated land in neighboring Flagler County. A development order from Flagler County is under review by the Flagler County Commission. If approved, Ormond Crossings would receive entitlements for up to 700 additional residential units. 1 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 21, 2006
ITEM 8.01 OTHER EVENTS. (CONTINUED) After an agreement has been finalized with the Florida Department of Transportation concerning traffic impact mitigation, ALLETE Properties' management will determine the best economic build-out of the project. Targeted build-out of Ormond Crossings will consider market demand as well as infrastructure and mitigation costs. The agreement is expected to be finalized during the first half of 2007. Sale of property within Ormond Crossings is expected to commence in 2009. ------------------------------------- READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 3 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 21, 2006 2
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause ALLETE's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement its strategic objectives; - ALLETE's ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies and regulatory actions, including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), and zoning and permitting of land held for resale; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with environmental and safety laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters and pandemic diseases; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I, Item 1A of ALLETE's 2005 Form 10-K and Part II, Item 1A of ALLETE's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2006. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and ALLETE undertakes no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in its other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 3 ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 21, 2006
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. December 21, 2006 Mark A. Schober ------------------------------------------------- Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 21, 2006 4



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20070607154549.txt.gz
TIME:20070607154549
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - JUNE 7, 2007 (JUNE 1, 2007) ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION ITEM 2.03 CREATION OF A DIRECT FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OR AN OBLIGATION UNDER AN OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENT OF A REGISTRANT On June 1, 2007, ALLETE, Inc. (the "Company") accepted an offer to purchase $50 million of senior unsecured notes (the "Notes") in the private placement market. When issued on or about June 8, 2007, the Notes will carry an interest rate of 5.99% and will mature on June 1, 2017. The Company has the option to prepay all or a portion of the Notes at its discretion, subject to a make-whole provision. The Notes are subject to additional terms and conditions which are customary for this type of transaction. The Company intends to use the proceeds from the sale of the Notes to fund corporate growth opportunities and for general corporate purposes. ------------------------------ Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETE's disclosures under the heading: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" located on page 2 of this Form 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 7, 2007 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically: - our ability to successfully implement our strategic objectives; - our ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies, regulatory actions, and legislation including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the FERC, the MPUC, the PSCW, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), zoning and permitting of land held for resale and environmental regulation; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters and pandemic diseases; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - changes in the real estate market; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - availability of construction materials and skilled construction labor for capital projects; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - our ability to access capital markets and bank financing; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - our ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I of our 2006 Form 10-K and Part II, Item 1A of ALLETE's Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q for the quarterly period ended March 31, 2007. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 7, 2007
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. June 7, 2007 Mark A. Schober ------------------------------------------------- Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 7, 2007 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20070723162741.txt.gz
TIME:20070723162741
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION WASHINGTON, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) - JULY 23, 2007 (JULY 18, 2007) ALLETE, INC. (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) MINNESOTA 1-3548 41-0418150 (State or other (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer jurisdiction of Identification No.) incorporation or organization) 30 WEST SUPERIOR STREET DULUTH, MINNESOTA 55802-2093 (Address of principal executive offices, including zip code) (218) 279-5000 (Registrant's telephone number, including area code) Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions: / / Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425) / / Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b)) / / Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
SECTION 5 - CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT ITEM 5.02 DEPARTURE OF DIRECTORS OR PRINCIPAL OFFICERS; ELECTION OF DIRECTORS; APPOINTMENT OF PRINCIPAL OFFICERS On July 18, 2007, Douglas C. Neve was elected to serve on ALLETE, Inc.'s (ALLETE) Board of Directors and is expected to serve on the Audit Committee. Mr. Neve, 51, former Chief Financial Officer of Minneapolis-based Ceridian Corporation, serves on the Audit Committee of Luther College, serves as a board member for Tyndale House Publishers, and is a past board member of the Special Olympics of Minnesota and International Students, Inc. ------------------------------------ READERS ARE CAUTIONED THAT FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS SHOULD BE READ IN CONJUNCTION WITH ALLETE'S DISCLOSURES UNDER THE HEADING: "SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995" LOCATED ON PAGE 2 OF THIS FORM 8-K. ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 23, 2007 1
SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, ALLETE is hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause it's actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as "anticipates," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "projects," "will likely result," "will continue," "could," "may," "potential," "target," "outlook" or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking. Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond ALLETE's control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically: - ALLETE's ability to successfully implement it's strategic objectives; - our ability to manage expansion and integrate acquisitions; - prevailing governmental policies, regulatory actions, and legislation including those of the United States Congress, state legislatures, the Federal Energy Resource Commission, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin, and various local and county regulators, and city administrators, about allowed rates of return, financings, industry and rate structure, acquisition and disposal of assets and facilities, real estate development, operation and construction of plant facilities, recovery of purchased power and capital investments, present or prospective wholesale and retail competition (including but not limited to transmission costs), zoning and permitting of land held for resale and environmental regulation; - effects of restructuring initiatives in the electric industry; - economic and geographic factors, including political and economic risks; - changes in and compliance with laws and policies; - weather conditions; - natural disasters and pandemic diseases; - war and acts of terrorism; - wholesale power market conditions; - population growth rates and demographic patterns; - effects of competition, including competition for retail and wholesale customers; - changes in the real estate market; - pricing and transportation of commodities; - changes in tax rates or policies or in rates of inflation; - unanticipated project delays or changes in project costs; - availability of construction materials and skilled construction labor for capital projects; - unanticipated changes in operating expenses and capital expenditures; - global and domestic economic conditions; - ALLETE's ability to access capital markets and bank financing; - changes in interest rates and the performance of the financial markets; - ALLETE's ability to replace a mature workforce, and retain qualified, skilled and experienced personnel; and - the outcome of legal and administrative proceedings (whether civil or criminal) and settlements that affect the business and profitability of ALLETE. Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause ALLETE's results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I of ALLETE's 2006 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by ALLETE in this Form 8-K and in ALLETE's other reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect ALLETE's business. 2 ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 23, 2007
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized. ALLETE, Inc. July 23, 2007 Mark A. Schober --------------------------------------------------- Mark A. Schober Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 23, 2007 3



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20071207084106.txt.gz
TIME:20071207084106
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On December 7, 2007, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release reiterating earnings guidance for 2007 and announcing 2008 earnings guidance within the range of $2.70 to $2.90 per share. A copy of the press release, which the Company is filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, is attached as Exhibit 99 and incorporated by reference herein.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Number
99 -ALLETE News Release dated December 7, 2007 reiterating earnings guidance for 2007 and announcing 2008 earnings guidance.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
2
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors in Part I of our 2006 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
3
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
4

 
 
DULUTH, Minn.ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE:ALE) today announced it expects 2008 earnings to be within a range of $2.70 to $2.90 per share. The companys expectation for 2007 remains unchanged at $3.00 to $3.05 per share.
 
Our outlook for 2008 assumes electric rate case filings, rate base asset growth from a significant capital expenditure program, and continuation of the very difficult Florida real estate market, said Don Shippar, ALLETE Chairman, President and CEO.
 
Several factors affect the 2008 outlook for ALLETEs Energy business, including:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Regarding the 2008 outlook for ALLETEs Real Estate business, Shippar said the company sees no sign of improvement in the Florida real estate market. We expect earnings from this business will be less in 2008 than the $16 to $18 million we foresee in 2007, he said. Lower real estate income is the primary reason for the anticipated change in total company earnings in 2008 compared to 2007, Shippar noted.
 
Shippar emphasized that the long-term outlook for ALLETEs core businesses remains sound. He said Minnesota Power intends to maintain a low-cost position as rate-base assets more than double by 2011. Several potential new industrial energy customers are in various stages of planning and permitting and new final electric rates are expected to be in place in 2009.
 
ALLETE Properties will continue to be an important contributor to the companys earnings stream. This business has about 10 years worth of already entitled, mixed-use land inventory in a region of Florida where demographic growth indicators remain strong. ALLETEs Florida land inventory has a very low book basis and ALLETE Properties has very little debt, Shippar said.
 
ALLETEs long-term earnings growth potential is solid. Our goal is to earn a financial return that will allow us to provide dividend increases while funding our capital expenditure program, said Shippar.
 
ALLETEs corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. ALLETE provides energy services in the upper Midwest and has significant real estate holdings in Florida. More information about the company is available on ALLETEs Web site at .
www.allete.com
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20071231093234.txt.gz
TIME:20071231093234
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
Minnesota Power, an operating division of ALLETE, Inc., submitted a filing with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission on Friday, December 28, 2007, seeking to increase electric rates for its wholesale customers.  This request applies only to Minnesota Powers 16 wholesale municipal customers and two private utilities in Wisconsin, including Superior Water, Light & Power (SWL&P), a wholly-owned subsidiary of ALLETE, Inc.  The filing seeks a 10% rate increase for wholesale municipal customers, a 12.5% increase for SWL&P and an overall return on equity of 11.25%. On an annualized basis, the filing would generate approximately $7.5 million in additional revenue.
A copy of Minnesota Powers December 31, 2007, press release announcing the rate increase is being furnished with the Securities and Exchange Commission as exhibit 99. 
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Number
99 -Minnesota Power News Release dated December 31, 2007, stating Minnesota Power filed a wholesale rate adjustment request with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
    
2
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors in Part I of our 2006 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
         
3
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
      
4

DULUTH, Minn. On December 28, 2007 Minnesota Power, an ALLETE company (NYSE: ALE), filed a rate adjustment request with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) seeking an increase in the electric rates of its wholesale customers. Minnesota Power has not asked for a wholesale rate adjustment since 1995.
This request applies only to Minnesota Powers 16 municipal customers and two private utilities in Wisconsin, including Superior Water, Light & Power Company. The requested increase is approximately 10% for municipal customers and approximately 12.5% for Superior Water, Light & Power Company.
Minnesota Power anticipates the rate adjustment will result in an annual revenue increase of approximately $7.5 million. Minnesota Power has asked FERC for interim rates to take effect by March 1, 2008 and expects FERC approval of final rates by late 2008 or early 2009.
This rate adjustment would acknowledge our increased costs of providing service to wholesale customers, including general operation and maintenance expenses, while integrating environmental compliance, renewable generation, and transmission asset additions, said Don Shippar, ALLETE Chairman, President and CEO.
Wholesale customers are the communities within the Minnesota Power service area who distribute electric service to their residents, and the Wisconsin private utilities. Retail customers of Minnesota Power who receive their bill directly from the company are not included in this rate request.
The rates paid for Minnesota Power electric serviceby both wholesale and retail customershave historically been among the lowest in the United States, Shippar added. We do not anticipate this changing as a result of this proposed rate adjustment.
Minnesota Power provides electricity in a 26,000-square-mile electric service territory located in northeastern Minnesota. Minnesota Power supplies retail electric service to 141,000 customers, wholesale electric service to 16 municipalities, and some of the largest industrial customers in the United States. More information can be found at: www.mnpower.com.
 
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20080115174417.txt.gz
TIME:20080115174417
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 2  FINANCIAL INFORMATION
On January 11, 2008, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) accepted an offer from certain institutional buyers in the private placement market to purchase $60 million of ALLETE First Mortgage Bonds (the Bonds). When issued, on or before March 3, 2008, the Bonds will carry an interest rate of 4.86% and will have a term of 5 years. The Company has the option to prepay all or a portion of the Bonds at its discretion, subject to a make-whole provision. The Bonds are subject to additional terms and conditions which are customary for this type of transaction. The Company intends to use the proceeds from the sale of the Bonds to fund utility capital expenditures and for general corporate purposes.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors in Part I of our 2006 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20080212083412.txt.gz
TIME:20080212083412
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On February 8, 2008, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) approved Minnesota Powers request to increase electric rates for our wholesale customers. Minnesota Power is an operating division of ALLETE, Inc. The increase applies only to Minnesota Powers 16 wholesale municipal customers and two private utilities in Wisconsin, including Superior Water, Light & Power (SWL&P), a wholly-owned subsidiary of ALLETE, Inc. Effective March 1, 2008, the increase is expected to result in an annual revenue increase to Minnesota Power of $7.5 million.
A copy of Minnesota Powers February 12, 2008, press release announcing the rate increase is being furnished with the Securities and Exchange Commission as Exhibit 99. 
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Number
99 -Minnesota Power News Release dated February 12, 2008, stating the FERC approved Minnesota Powers wholesale rate adjustment request.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
      
    2
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 24 of our 2006 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
      
3
   
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
            
4

DULUTH, Minn.Minnesota Power, an ALLETE company (NYSE: ALE) announced today that the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approved an increase to the electric rates of Minnesota Powers wholesale customers. The rate increase applies only to Minnesota Powers 16 municipal customers and two private utilities in Wisconsin, including Superior Water, Light & Power Company. Effective March 1, the increase is expected to result in an annual revenue increase to Minnesota Power of approximately $7.5 million.
Minnesota Power said the increase will offset rising costs of providing service to wholesale customers, including operating and maintenance expenses. In addition, Minnesota Power indicated that the increase is needed for environmental projects, wind generation and transmission asset additions. This is the first wholesale rate adjustment that the company has asked for since 1995.
Wholesale customers are the communities within the Minnesota Power service area who distribute electric service to their residents, and two Wisconsin private utilities. Retail customers of Minnesota Power who receive their bill directly from the company are not included in this rate adjustment.
Minnesota Power provides retail electric service within a 26,000-square-mile area in northeastern Minnesota to 141,000 customers and wholesale electric service to 16 municipalities. More information can be found at: www.mnpower.com.
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
    5


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20080219080056.txt.gz
TIME:20080219080056
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On February 19, 2008, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) entered into a Distribution Agreement with KCCI, Inc. with respect to the issuance and sale of up to 2,500,000 shares of the Companys common stock, without par value, together with the preferred share purchase rights attached thereto (the Shares).  The Shares may be offered for sale, from time to time, in accordance with the terms of the Agreement, which terminates on June 30, 2009.  The offering of the Shares will be made pursuant to the Companys Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-147965), which became effective on December 10, 2007, and pursuant to a Prospectus Supplement, dated February 19, 2008, and base Prospectus, dated December 10, 2007, to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b)(2) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
The Distribution Agreement is attached as Exhibit 1 hereto.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Number
1  Distribution Agreement between ALLETE, Inc. and KCCI, Inc. dated February 19, 2008.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K KCCI Distribution Agreement February 19, 2008
1
 
 
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2007 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K KCCI Distribution Agreement February 19, 2008
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K KCCI Distribution Agreement February 19, 2008
3 
 
 

Exhibit 1
 
 
February 19, 2008
KCCI Inc.
80 Maiden Lane
Suite 2201
New York, New York 10038
Attention:  Mark Nauman
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the ), confirms its agreement with KCCI Inc., as agent ( or ), with respect to the issuance and sale from time to time by the Company, in the manner and subject to the terms and conditions described below, of up to an aggregate of 2,500,000 shares (the ) of common stock, without par value (the ), including the preferred share purchase rights attached thereto (), of the Company.  Such 2,500,000 shares, including the attached Rights, are hereinafter collectively referred to as the . The Shares are described in the Prospectus referred to below.
Company
you
KCCI
Maximum Number of Shares
Common Stock
Rights
Shares
 
The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ) a registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-147965) (the ) for the registration of an unspecified amount of securities, including Common Stock and Rights, under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the ).  Except where the context otherwise requires, , as used herein, means the registration statement, as amended at the time of such registration statements effectiveness for purposes of Section 11 of the Act, as such section applies to KCCI, including (1) all documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein and (2) any information contained or incorporated by reference in a prospectus filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act, to the extent such information is deemed, pursuant to Rule 430B under the Act, to be part of the registration statement at the effective time.  Except where the context otherwise requires, , as used herein, means the prospectus filed as part of the Registration Statement, together with any amendments or supplements thereto as of the date of this Agreement.  Except where the context otherwise requires, , as used herein, means the prospectus supplement, dated February 19, 2008, relating to the Shares, filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act on or before the second business day after the date hereof (or such earlier time as may be required under the Act), in the form furnished by the Company to KCCI in connection with the offering of the Shares.  Except where the context otherwise requires, , as used herein, means the Prospectus Supplement together with the Basic Prospectus attached to or used with the Prospectus Supplement.  , as used herein, means any other documents that the parties hereto shall hereafter expressly agree in writing to distribute in connection with the offering of the Shares.  Any reference herein to the registration statement, the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents, if any, incorporated by reference, or deemed to be incorporated by reference, therein (the ).  Any reference herein to the terms ,  or  with respect to the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any document filed with the Commission under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (collectively, the ) on or after the initial effective date of the Registration Statement, or the date of such Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or such Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, as the case may be, and deemed to be incorporated therein by reference.
Commission
registration statement
Act
Registration Statement
Basic Prospectus
Prospectus Supplement
Prospectus
Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses
Incorporated Documents
amend
amendment
supplement
Exchange Act
 
The Company and KCCI agree as follows:
 
1.           
Issuance and Sale.
 
 
 
 
 
 
2.           
Transaction Notices
.
 
 
(i)           the Exchange Business Day on which the Shares subject to such Transaction are to be sold (the );
Purchase Date
 
(ii)           the number of Shares that the Company agrees to sell (the ) on such Purchase Date, which shall be no more than twenty percent (20%) of the average daily trading volume in the Common Stock on the Exchange for the ninety (90) Exchange Business Days preceding the date of delivery of the Transaction Notice; and
Specified Number of Shares
 
(iii)           the lowest price (if any) at which the Company shall be obligated to sell Shares in such Transaction (a ).
Floor Price
 
A Transaction Notice shall not set forth a Specified Number of Shares that, when added to the aggregate number of Shares previously purchased and to be purchased pursuant to pending Transaction Notices (if any) hereunder, results in a total that exceeds the Maximum Number of Shares.  The Company shall have responsibility for maintaining records with respect to the aggregate dollar amount of Shares sold, or for otherwise monitoring the availability of Shares for sale under the Registration Statement.  A Transaction Notice conforming to the foregoing requirements, once accepted by KCCI, shall be irrevocable, and the Company shall be obligated to sell the Specified Number of Shares and KCCI shall be obligated, subject to the terms of, and satisfaction of, the conditions set forth in this Agreement and such Transaction Notice, including, but not limited to, Section 1(e) above and Section 2(e) below, to use its commercially reasonable efforts to obtain performance from each Purchaser providing offers for the Shares.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the terms of any Transaction contemplate that Shares shall be sold on more than one Purchase Date, then the Company and KCCI shall mutually agree to such additional terms and conditions as they deem necessary in respect of such multiple Purchase Dates, and such additional terms and conditions shall be set forth in the relevant Transaction Notice and be binding to the same extent as any other terms contained therein.
 
 
 
 
 
3.           
Representations and Warranties of the Company.
 
The Company represents and warrants to KCCI, on and as of (i) the date hereof, (ii) each Notice Time, and (iii) each Closing Date that:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
4.           
Certain Covenants of the Company
.
 
The Company hereby agrees with KCCI:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
5.           
Execution of Agreement
.
 
KCCIs obligation to execute this Agreement shall be subject to the delivery by the Company of the following documents in connection with and on the intended date of the execution of this Agreement:
 
 
 
 
 
6.           
Additional Covenants of the Company
.
 
The Company further covenants and agrees with KCCI as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
7.           
Conditions of KCCIs Obligation to Execute Sales
.
 
KCCIs obligation to execute any sale of Shares pursuant to a Transaction Notice that has been accepted by KCCI shall be subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions at the time of acceptance of the Transaction Notice, the time of the commencement of trading on the Exchange on the Purchase Date and at the time of closing on the Closing Date:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
8.           
Termination by KCCI
.
 
This Agreement and the obligations of KCCI hereunder may be terminated, in the sole and absolute discretion of KCCI, if at any time (i) any of the covenants or conditions specified in Section 6 shall not have been performed or satisfied when and as required by this Agreement to be fulfilled, (ii) there has been since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, any change in the business, properties or assets or the results of operations, condition (financial or otherwise), business or operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, that would have, or reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect, (iii) there has since the date hereof occurred an outbreak or escalation of hostilities, any material adverse change in the financial markets or any other national or international calamity or crisis the effect of which on the financial markets of the United States is such as to make it, in the reasonable judgment of KCCI, impracticable or inadvisable to market or deliver the Shares on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus or enforce contracts for the sale of the Shares, or (iv) trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended by the Commission or by the Exchange or if trading generally on the Exchange has been suspended, or limitations on prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices for securities have been required, by such Exchange or the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. or by order of the Commission or any other governmental authority, or (v) a banking moratorium has been declared by federal or New York authorities.
 
If KCCI elects to terminate this Agreement as provided in this Section 8, KCCI shall promptly notify the Company of such termination by telephone, promptly confirmed by facsimile stating in reasonable detail the basis therefore.  If a Transaction Notice is pending at the time of termination, KCCI may declare such Transaction Notice void or may require the Company to complete the sale of Shares as specified in the Transaction Notice, at KCCIs sole discretion (to the extent doing so is permitted under applicable law and regulation).
 
If the sale of Shares, as contemplated by this Agreement, is not carried out by KCCI for any reason permitted under this Agreement or if such sale is not carried out because the Company shall be unable to comply in all material respects with any of the terms of this Agreement, the Company shall not be under any obligation or liability under this Agreement (except to the extent provided in Sections 4(n) and 10 hereof) and KCCI shall be under no obligation or liability to the Company under this Agreement (except to the extent provided in Section 10 hereof) or to one another hereunder.
 
KCCI may terminate this Agreement for any reason upon giving ten (10) Exchange Business Days prior notice to the Company.  Any such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of Sections 4(n) and 10 hereof shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding such termination.
 
9.           
Termination by Company
.
 
The Company may terminate this Agreement in its sole discretion upon ten (10) Exchange Business Days prior written notice to KCCI.
 
10.           
Indemnity and Contribution
.
 
 
 
 
 
 
11.           
Notices
.
 
All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted and confirmed by any standard form of communication, and if to KCCI, shall be sufficient in all respects if delivered to KCCI Inc., 80 Maiden Lane, Suite 2201, New York, New York 10038, and if to the Company, shall be sufficient in all respects if delivered or sent to the Company at the offices of the Company at ALLETE, Inc., 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802, Attn: Treasurer.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, Transaction Notices shall be delivered to KCCI, and acceptance of Transaction Notices by the Company, shall be by facsimile and receipt confirmed by telephone at such numbers as shall be agreed upon by KCCI and the Company in writing from time to time.
 
12.           
No Fiduciary Relationship
.
 
The Company acknowledges and agrees that KCCI is acting solely in the capacity of an arms length contractual counterparty to the Company with respect to the offering of Shares contemplated hereby (including in connection with determining the terms of the offering) and not as a financial advisor or a fiduciary to the Company or any other person.  Additionally, KCCI is not advising the Company or any other person as to any legal, tax, investment, accounting or regulatory matters in any jurisdiction.  The Company shall consult with its own advisors concerning such matters and shall be responsible for making its own independent investigation and appraisal of the transactions contemplated hereby, and KCCI shall have no responsibility or liability to the Company with respect thereto except as set forth herein.  Any review by KCCI of the Company, the transactions contemplated hereby or other matters relating to such transactions will be performed solely for the benefit of KCCI and shall not be on behalf of the Company.
 
13.           
Adjustments for Stock Splits
.
 
The parties acknowledge and agree that all share related numbers related to the Shares contained in this Agreement and any Transaction Notice shall be adjusted to take into account any stock split effected with respect to the Common Stock.
 
14.           
Governing Law; Construction
.
 
THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, INTERPRETED UNDER AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO AGREEMENTS MADE AND TO BE PERFORMED WITHIN THE STATE OF NEW YORK WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAWS THEREOF.The Section headings in this Agreement have been inserted as a matter of convenience of reference and are not a part of this Agreement.
 
 
15.           
Parties in Interest
.
 
The Agreement herein set forth has been and is made solely for the benefit of KCCI and the Company and to the extent provided in Section 10 hereof the controlling persons, directors and officers referred to in such section, and their respective successors, assigns, heirs, personal representatives and executors and administrators.  No other person, partnership, association or corporation (including a purchaser, as such purchaser, from KCCI) shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement.
 
16.           
Counterparts
.
 
This Agreement may be signed in counterparts (which may include counterparts delivered by any standard form of telecommunication), each of which shall be an original and all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
 
17.           
Successors and Assigns
.
 
This Agreement shall be binding upon KCCI and the Company and their successors and assigns and any successor or assign of any substantial portion of the Companys and KCCIs respective businesses and/or assets.
 
18.           
Survival
.
 
The respective indemnities, rights of contribution, representations, warranties and agreements of the Company and KCCI contained in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of the Company or KCCI pursuant to this Agreement or any certificate delivered pursuant hereto shall survive the delivery of and payment for the Shares and shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any termination of this Agreement or any investigation made by or on behalf of the Company or KCCI.
 
19.           
Amendments or Waivers
.
 
No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement, nor any consent or approval to any departure therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
 
 
 
 
If the foregoing correctly sets forth the understanding among the Company and KCCI, please so indicate in the space provided below for the purpose, whereupon this letter and your acceptance shall constitute a binding agreement between the Company and KCCI.
 
Very truly yours,
ALLETE, Inc.
By:              
/s/
A. Schober     
Mark
   
   
   
   
   
   
                                                
 Mark A. Schober
   
 
 Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
   
 
 
Accepted and agreed to as of the
date first above written:
KCCI Inc.
By:                                                               
 /s/ Mark Nauman    
   
   
   
 Mark Nauman
   
 President
   
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20080324161859.txt.gz
TIME:20080324161859
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 2  FINANCIAL INFORMATION
On March 20, 2008, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) accepted an offer from certain institutional buyers in the private placement market to purchase $75 million of ALLETE First Mortgage Bonds (the Bonds). When issued, on or before May 14, 2008, the Bonds will carry an interest rate of 6.02% and will have a term of 15 years. The Company has the option to prepay all or a portion of the Bonds at its discretion, subject to a make-whole provision. The Bonds are subject to additional terms and conditions which are customary for this type of transaction. The Company intends to use the proceeds from the sale of the Bonds to fund utility capital expenditures and for general corporate purposes.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
disclosures
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Dated March 24, 2008
1 
 
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors in Part I of our 2007 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Dated March 24, 2008
2
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Dated March 24, 2008
3 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20080513090402.txt.gz
TIME:20080513090402
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On May 13, 2008, the Company announced a long term project to accelerate wind energy and cut back carbon. The Company proposes to purchase a major transmission line from North Dakota, phase out a long-term contract to buy coal-based electricity, and add several hundred megawatts of wind generation.  The proposed project is subject to the execution of definitive agreements and applicable regulatory approval.
A copy of Minnesota Powers May 13, 2008, press release announcing the proposed project is being furnished with the Securities and Exchange Commission as Exhibit 99. 
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Number
99 - -Minnesota Power News Release dated May 13, 2008, stating Minnesota Power announces long term project to accelerate wind energy and cut back carbon.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Minnesota Power Long Term Project May 13, 2008
 
1
 
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors in Part I of our 2007 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Minnesota Power Long Term Project May 13, 2008
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Minnesota Power Long Term Project May 13, 2008
 
3
 

Exhibit 99
 
 
 
In a major move to accelerate its strategy of reducing carbon emissions and expanding renewable wind energy development, Minnesota Power proposes to purchase a major transmission line from North Dakota, phase out a long-term contract to buy coal-based electricity, and add several hundred megawatts of wind generation.
 
The key element of this strategic project is Minnesota Powers purchase of a direct current (DC) transmission line that extends from the wind-rich plains of central North Dakota to the Arrowhead Substation in Hermantown, Minn.
 
The proposal calls for the DC line, now owned by Square Butte Electric Cooperative, to be sold to Minnesota Power for approximately $80 million in early 2009. It is now used to transmit electricity generated at the Milton R. Young Generating Station in Center, N.D. 465 miles eastward for purchase by Minnesota Power.
 
Direct current is a more economical way to transmit power over long distances than the standard AC, or alternating current, transmission line. The DC line being purchased by Minnesota Power is a strategic and valuable transmission link between the vast wind resource in North Dakota and electric consumers eager to increase their reliance on renewable energy.
 
Three decades ago, the DC line was built to move low-cost coal-based electricity from North Dakota to power the growing taconite industry in northeast Minnesotas Iron Range, said Don Shippar, ALLETE CEO. Back then, it was described as a way to transport coal by wire. Now we will use the line to transmit wind by wire.
 
Electricity generated at the Young Station is presently shared by Minnesota Power and Minnkota Power Cooperative, an affiliate of the Square Butte Cooperative. Over the next several years, Minnesota Power will phase out its generation rights at Young Unit 2. Minnkota will pursue new options for delivering power from the Young Station to its primary customers in the Red River Valley.
 
Minnesota Power plans to add several hundred megawatts of new wind generation near Center, N.D., where the wind resources are considered among the best in the nation. This wind-generated power will be transmitted over the DC line. The additional wind generation will partially make up for the lost Young 2 power. It will also help Minnesota Power achieve its carbon reduction goals and help meet the state of Minnesota 25 percent renewable mandate.
 
The project benefits Minnkota Power because the cooperative will be able to use the electricity now purchased by Minnesota Power and delay the need for Minnkota to construct additional generation facilities.
 
 
 
 
"Our power requirements projections indicate a need for additional baseload generation, and the Young 2 addition would satisfy a large part of that need," said David Loer, Minnkota President & CEO. "Minnesota Power and Minnkota have been partners since 1977, and we expect to continue working together on future strategic issues."
 
This multi-year project responds to the increasing value of renewable energy and the growing concern about carbon emissions, Shippar added. Our geographical position allows us to use this DC transmission line for a new purpose -- moving renewable energy to serve our customers.  The project does not materially change the five-year capital expenditure forecast disclosed previously by Minnesota Power.
 
We value our long-term partnership with Minnkota, which enables us to reconfigure the assets to better meet our respective long-term needs, Shippar said. We look forward to informing regulators and other stakeholders about this project and engaging them in a dialogue that will lead to its timely implementation.
 
The project is subject to the execution of definitive agreements and applicable regulatory approvals.
 
Minnesota Power, an ALLETE company, supplies electric service to 141,000 retail customers, 16 municipalities and some of the largest industrial customers in the United States.
 
 
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20080516144547.txt.gz
TIME:20080516144547
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
On May 13, 2008, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or Company) named Robert J. Adams it's Vice President  Business Development and Chief Risk Officer. As Chief Risk Officer, Mr. Adams will assume responsibility for identifying and assessing risk broadly across the Companys operations. Mr. Adams, 45, was named Minnesota Power CFO and Vice President - Business Development in 2002, and ALLETE Vice President - Utility Business Development in 2004.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Adams May 16, 2008
1
 
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors in Part I of our 2007 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Adams May 16, 2008
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Adams May 16, 2008
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20080829080421.txt.gz
TIME:20080829080421
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On August 8, 2008, Minnesota Power received a Notice of Violation (NOV) from the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) asserting violations of the New Source Review (NSR) requirements of the Clean Air Act at the Boswell Energy Center Units 1-4 and Laskin Energy Center. The NOV also asserts that the Boswell Energy Center Unit 4 Title V permit was violated. The NOV asserts that seven (7) projects undertaken at these coal-fired plants between 1981-2000 should have been reviewed under the NSR requirement. Minnesota Power believes the projects were in full compliance with the Clean Air Act and NSR requirement.
The EPA has been conducting a nation-wide enforcement initiative since 1999 relating to NSR requirements. In 2000, 2001, and 2002 Minnesota Power received requests from the EPA for information pursuant to Section 114(a) of the Clean Air Act seeking information regarding capital expenditures with respect to the Boswell and Laskin Energy Centers. Minnesota Power responded to these requests; however, we have had no further communications from the EPA regarding the information provided until receipt of the NOV.
We will engage in discussions with the EPA regarding resolution of these matters, but we are unable to predict the outcome of these discussions. Since 2006, Minnesota Power has significantly reduced and continues to reduce emissions at the Boswell and Laskin Energy Centers. The resolution could result in civil penalties and the installation of control technology, some of which is already planned or completed for other regulatory requirements. Any costs of installing pollution control technology would likely be eligible for recovery in rates over time subject to Minnesota Public Utilities Commission and Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approval in a rate proceeding. We are unable to predict the ultimate financial impact or the resolution of these matters at this time, but no impact on our earnings guidance for 2008 is expected.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Minnesota Power NOV August 29, 2008
1
 
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors in Part I of our 2007 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Minnesota Power NOV August 29, 2008
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Minnesota Power NOV August 29, 2008
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20081112094347.txt.gz
TIME:20081112094347
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 2  FINANCIAL INFORMATION
On November 7, 2008, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) accepted an offer from certain institutional buyers in the private placement market to purchase $80 million of ALLETE First Mortgage Bonds (the Bonds). The Bonds will be issued in three series as follows:
                       
The Company has the option to prepay all or a portion of the Bonds at its discretion, subject to a make-whole provision. The Bonds are subject to additional terms and conditions which are customary for these types of transactions. The Company intends to use the proceeds from the sale of the Bonds to fund utility capital expenditures and for general corporate purposes.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Dated November 12, 2008
1
 
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors in Part I of our 2007 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
 
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Dated November 12, 2008
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Dated November 12, 2008
 
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20081205081118.txt.gz
TIME:20081205081118
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On December 5, 2008, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) issued a press release announcing 2009 earnings guidance within the range of $2.10 to $2.35 per share. The Company expects an order on its retail rate case now before the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission to be issued in April 2009, with new rates anticipated to be in effect mid-2009. The Company has asked for a $40 million annual increase, and is currently collecting interim rates amounting to $35 million on an annualized basis. While the Company cannot determine what the final rates will be, for the purpose of providing 2009 earnings guidance it has included rates equivalent to the current interim rates for the entire year. However, once the case has been completed, the Company will adjust its earnings outlook to include the impact of final approved rates, which may be higher or lower than interim rates now being collected. A copy of the press release, which the Company is filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, is attached as Exhibit 99 and incorporated by reference herein.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Number
99 - -ALLETE News Release dated December 5, 2008, announcing 2009 earnings guidance.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
 ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K 2009 Earnings Guidance December 5, 2008
2
 
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected in forward-looking statements (as such term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, in response to questions or otherwise. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to expectations, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, or future events or performance (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or similar expressions) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
Forward-looking statements involve estimates, assumptions, risks and uncertainties, which are beyond our control and may cause actual results or outcomes to differ materially from those that may be projected. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors in Part I of our 2007 Form 10-K and under Risk Factors in Part II, Item 1A of our Third Quarter 2008 Form 10-Q. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K 2009 Earnings Guidance December 5, 2008
3
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K 2009 Earnings Guidance December 5, 2008
4
 

Exhibit 99
DULUTH, Minn.-ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE:ALE) today announced it expects 2009 earnings per share to be within a range of $2.10 to $2.35 from net income of between $67 to $75 million, and identified the major assumptions used in its forecast.
 
The Company expects an order on its retail rate case now before the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission to be issued in April, with new rates anticipated to be in effect mid-2009. Minnesota Power has asked for a $40 million annual increase, and is currently collecting interim rates amounting to $35 million on an annualized basis.
 
While the Company cannot determine what the final rates will be, for the purpose of providing 2009 earnings guidance it has included rates equivalent to the current interim rates for the entire year. However, once the case has been completed, the Company will adjust its earnings outlook to include the impact of final approved rates, which may be higher or lower than interim rates now being collected.
 
Minnesota Power expects a decline in taconite production on Minnesotas Iron Range in 2009 from 2008 levels, resulting in lower electricity usage by its industrial customers. The Company intends to remarket available power to other power suppliers in an effort to mitigate the earnings impact of lower retail sales. The profitability of these efforts will be dependent on energy market and economic conditions at that time. Minnesota Power also expects to sell electricity to a new industrial customer, Mesabi Nugget, which is anticipated to begin operations in the second half of 2009. Mesabi Nugget has signed a 15MW contract with Minnesota Power.
 
The Company is basing its 2009 earnings guidance on other assumptions, including:
 
 
 
ALLETE will finance its capital expenditure program through a combination of internally generated cash, debt and equity issuances. The mix will be determined based on financial market conditions and the timing of funding needs during the year.  Well begin 2009 in a favorable financial condition; we have good liquidity and a relatively low debt to capital ratio on our balance sheet, said Chairman and CEO Don Shippar.
 
After 2009, we expect strong annual earnings growth for a number of years due to continuing investments in utility rate base, Shippar said. Well maintain our focus on earning a financial return that rewards our shareholders and sustains growth prospects. Additionally, we expect to increase our dividend when the Board of Directors meets in January 2009.
 
ALLETEs corporate headquarters are located in Duluth, Minnesota. More information about the Company is available on ALLETEs Web site at .
www.allete.com
 
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20090217075606.txt.gz
TIME:20090217075606
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On February 17, 2009, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) entered into an amended and restated Distribution Agreement with KCCI, Inc. with respect to the issuance and sale of up to 5,000,000 shares of the Companys common stock, without par value, together with the preferred share purchase rights attached thereto (the Shares). The Shares may be offered for sale, from time to time, in accordance with the terms of the Agreement. The offering of the Shares will be made pursuant to the Companys Registration Statement on Form S-3 (Registration No. 333-147965), which became effective on December 10, 2007, a base Prospectus, dated December 10, 2007, and pursuant to a Prospectus Supplement to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b)(2) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
The amended and restated Distribution Agreement is attached as Exhibit 1 hereto.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Number
1  First Amended and Restated Distribution Agreement between ALLETE, Inc. and KCCI, Inc. dated February 17, 2009.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K KCCI Distribution Amended and Restated Agreement February 17, 2009
 
1
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely results, will continue,  could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K KCCI Distribution Amended and Restated Agreement February 17, 2009
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K KCCI Distribution Amended and Restated Agreement February 17, 2009
 
3
 

Exhibit 1
 
 
 
February 17, 2009
KCCI Inc.
80 Maiden Lane
Suite 2201
New York, New York 10038
Attention:  Mark Nauman
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
Reference is hereby made to that certain Distribution Agreement, dated February 19, 2008, between the parties hereto and thereto (the ).  Such parties desire that the Prior Distribution Agreement be amended and restated in its entirety, all on the terms and conditions contained herein.  Accordingly, in consideration of the premises and the agreements, provisions and covenants contained herein, the Prior Distribution Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to be and to read as follows:
Prior Distribution Agreement
 
ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the ), confirms its agreement with KCCI Inc., as agent ( or ), with respect to the issuance and sale from time to time by the Company, in the manner and subject to the terms and conditions described below, of up to an aggregate of 6,556,200 shares (the ) of common stock, without par value (the ), including the preferred share purchase rights attached thereto, if any (the ), of the Company (the ).  The Company and KCCI agree that as of the date of this First Amended and Restated Distribution Agreement (the ), the Company has issued and sold 1,556,200 Shares pursuant to the Prior Distribution Agreement, the Basic Prospectus (as defined below) and a prospectus supplement dated February 19, 2008 (the ), and that 5,000,000 Shares remain available for issuance and sale from time to time by the Company (the ) pursuant to this Agreement and the Prospectus (as defined below).
Company
you
KCCI
Maximum Number of Shares
Common Stock
Rights
Shares
Agreement
Prior Prospectus
Remaining Shares
 
The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the ) a registration statement on Form S-3 (No. 333-147965) (the ) for the registration of an unspecified amount of securities, including Common Stock and Rights, under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the ).  Except where the context otherwise requires, , as used herein, means the registration statement, as amended at the time of such registration statements effectiveness for purposes of Section 11 of the Act, as such section applies to KCCI, including (i) all documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein and (ii) any information contained or incorporated by reference in a prospectus filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act, to the extent such information is deemed, pursuant to Rule 430B under the Act, to be part of the registration statement at the effective time.  Except where the context otherwise requires, , as used herein, means the prospectus filed as part of the Registration Statement, together with any amendments or supplements thereto as of the date of this Agreement.  Except where the context otherwise requires, , as used herein, means the prospectus supplement, dated February 17, 2009, relating to the Remaining Shares, filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act on or before the second business day after the date hereof (or such earlier time as may be required under the Act), in the form furnished by the Company to KCCI in connection with the offering of the Remaining Shares.  Except where the context otherwise requires, , as used herein, means the Prospectus Supplement together with the Basic Prospectus attached to or used with the Prospectus Supplement.  , as used herein, means any other documents that the parties hereto shall hereafter expressly agree in writing to distribute in connection with the offering of the Remaining Shares.  Any reference herein to the registration statement, the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents, if any, incorporated by reference, or deemed to be incorporated by reference, therein (the ).  Any reference herein to the terms ,  or  with respect to the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any document filed with the Commission under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (collectively, the ) on or after the initial effective date of the Registration Statement, or the date of such Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or such Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, as the case may be, and deemed to be incorporated therein by reference.
Commission
registration statement
Act
Registration Statement
Basic Prospectus
Prospectus Supplement
Prospectus
Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses
Incorporated Documents
amend
amendment
supplement
Exchange Act
 
The Company and KCCI agree as follows:
 
1.
 
Issuance and Sale.
 
 
 
 
 
 
2.
 
Transaction Notices.
 
 
(i)
 
the Exchange Business Day on which the Remaining Shares subject to such Transaction are to be sold (the );
Purchase Date
 
(ii)
 
the number of Remaining Shares that the Company agrees to sell (the ) on such Purchase Date, which shall not exceed the greater of (i) twenty percent (20%) of the trading volume in the Common Stock on the Exchange on the Purchase Date, or (ii) twenty percent (20%) of the average daily trading volume in the Common Stock on the Exchange for the ninety (90) Exchange Business Days preceding the Purchase Date; and
Specified Number of Shares
 
(iii)
 
the lowest price (if any) at which the Company shall be obligated to sell Remaining Shares in such Transaction (a ).
Floor Price
 
A Transaction Notice shall not set forth a Specified Number of Shares that, when added to the aggregate number of Shares previously purchased and to be purchased pursuant to pending Transaction Notices (if any) hereunder and under the Prior Distribution Agreement, results in a total that exceeds the Maximum Number of Shares.  The Company shall have responsibility for maintaining records with respect to the aggregate number of Shares sold, or for otherwise monitoring the availability of Remaining Shares for sale under the Registration Statement.  A Transaction Notice conforming to the foregoing requirements, once accepted by KCCI, shall be irrevocable, and the Company shall be obligated to sell the Specified Number of Shares and KCCI shall be obligated, subject to the terms of, and satisfaction of, the conditions set forth in this Agreement and such Transaction Notice, including, but not limited to, Section 1(e) above and Section 2(e) below, to use its commercially reasonable efforts to obtain performance from each Purchaser providing offers for the Remaining Shares.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the terms of any Transaction contemplate that Remaining Shares shall be sold on more than one Purchase Date, then the Company and KCCI shall mutually agree to such additional terms and conditions as they deem necessary in respect of such multiple Purchase Dates, and such additional terms and conditions shall be set forth in the relevant Transaction Notice and be binding to the same extent as any other terms contained therein.
 
 
 
 
 
3.
 
Representations and Warranties of the Company.
 
The Company represents and warrants to KCCI, on and as of (i) the date hereof, (ii) each Notice Time, and (iii) each Closing Date that:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
4.
 
Certain Covenants of the Company.
 
The Company hereby agrees with KCCI:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
5.
 
Execution of Agreement.
 
KCCIs obligation to execute this Agreement shall be subject to the delivery by the Company of the following documents in connection with and on the intended date of the execution of this Agreement:
 
 
 
 
 
6.
 
Additional Covenants of the Company.
 
The Company further covenants and agrees with KCCI as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
7.
 
Conditions of KCCIs Obligation to Execute Sales.
 
KCCIs obligation to execute any sale of Remaining Shares pursuant to a Transaction Notice that has been accepted by KCCI shall be subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions at the time of acceptance of the Transaction Notice, the time of the commencement of trading on the Exchange on the Purchase Date and at the time of closing on the Closing Date:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
8.
 
Termination by KCCI.
 
This Agreement and the obligations of KCCI hereunder may be terminated, in the sole and absolute discretion of KCCI, if at any time (i) any of the covenants or conditions specified in Section 6 shall not have been performed or satisfied when and as required by this Agreement to be fulfilled, (ii) there has been since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, any change in the business, properties or assets or the results of operations, condition (financial or otherwise), business or operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, that would have, or reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect, (iii) there has occurred since the date hereof an outbreak or escalation of hostilities, any material adverse change in the financial markets or any other national or international calamity or crisis the effect of which on the financial markets of the United States is such as to make it, in the reasonable judgment of KCCI, impracticable or inadvisable to market or deliver the Remaining Shares on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus or enforce contracts for the sale of the Remaining Shares, or (iv) trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended by the Commission or by the Exchange or if trading generally on the Exchange has been suspended, or limitations on prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices for securities have been required, by such Exchange or the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. or by order of the Commission or any other governmental authority, or (v) a banking moratorium has been declared by federal or New York authorities.
 
If KCCI elects to terminate this Agreement as provided in this Section 8, KCCI shall promptly notify the Company of such termination by telephone, promptly confirmed by facsimile stating in reasonable detail the basis therefore.  If a Transaction Notice is pending at the time of termination, KCCI may declare such Transaction Notice void or may require the Company to complete the sale of Remaining Shares as specified in the Transaction Notice, at KCCIs sole discretion (to the extent doing so is permitted under applicable law and regulation).
 
If the sale of Remaining Shares, as contemplated by this Agreement, is not carried out by KCCI for any reason permitted under this Agreement or if such sale is not carried out because the Company shall be unable to comply in all material respects with any of the terms of this Agreement, the Company shall not be under any obligation or liability under this Agreement (except to the extent provided in Sections 4(n) and 10 hereof) and KCCI shall be under no obligation or liability to the Company under this Agreement (except to the extent provided in Section 10 hereof) or to one another hereunder.
 
KCCI may terminate this Agreement for any reason upon giving ten (10) Exchange Business Days prior notice to the Company.  Any such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of Sections 4(n) and 10 hereof shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding such termination.
 
9.
 
Termination by Company.
 
The Company may terminate this Agreement in its sole discretion upon ten (10) Exchange Business Days prior written notice to KCCI.  Any such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of Sections 4(n) and 10 hereof shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding such termination.
 
10.
 
Indemnity and Contribution.
 
 
 
 
 
 
11.
 
Notices.
 
All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted and confirmed by any standard form of communication, and if to KCCI, shall be sufficient in all respects if delivered to KCCI Inc., 80 Maiden Lane, Suite 2201, New York, New York 10038, and if to the Company, shall be sufficient in all respects if delivered or sent to the Company at the offices of the Company at ALLETE, Inc., 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802, Attn: Treasurer.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, Transaction Notices shall be delivered to KCCI, and acceptance of Transaction Notices by KCCI shall be delivered to the Company, by facsimile and receipt confirmed by telephone at such numbers as shall be agreed upon by KCCI and the Company in writing from time to time.
 
12.
 
No Fiduciary Relationship.
 
The Company acknowledges and agrees that KCCI is acting solely in the capacity of an arms length contractual counterparty to the Company with respect to the offering of Shares contemplated hereby (including in connection with determining the terms of the offering) and not as a financial advisor or a fiduciary to the Company or any other person.  Additionally, KCCI is not advising the Company or any other person as to any legal, tax, investment, accounting or regulatory matters in any jurisdiction.  The Company shall consult with its own advisors concerning such matters and shall be responsible for making its own independent investigation and appraisal of the transactions contemplated hereby, and KCCI shall have no responsibility or liability to the Company with respect thereto except as set forth herein.  Any review by KCCI of the Company, the transactions contemplated hereby or other matters relating to such transactions will be performed solely for the benefit of KCCI and shall not be on behalf of the Company.
 
13.
 
Adjustments for Stock Splits.
 
The parties acknowledge and agree that all share-related numbers related to the Shares contained in this Agreement and any Transaction Notice shall be adjusted to take into account any stock split effected with respect to the Common Stock.
 
14.
 
Governing Law; Construction.
 
THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, INTERPRETED UNDER AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO AGREEMENTS MADE AND TO BE PERFORMED WITHIN THE STATE OF NEW YORK WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAWS THEREOF.The Section headings in this Agreement have been inserted as a matter of convenience of reference and are not a part of this Agreement.
 
 
15.
 
Parties in Interest.
 
The Agreement herein set forth has been and is made solely for the benefit of KCCI and the Company and to the extent provided in Section 10 hereof the controlling persons, directors and officers referred to in such section, and their respective successors, assigns, heirs, personal representatives and executors and administrators.  No other person, partnership, association or corporation (including a purchaser, as such purchaser, from KCCI) shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement.
 
16.
 
Counterparts.
 
This Agreement may be signed in counterparts (which may include counterparts delivered by any standard form of telecommunication), each of which shall be an original and all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
 
17.
 
Successors and Assigns.
 
This Agreement shall be binding upon KCCI and the Company and their successors and assigns and any successor or assign of any substantial portion of the Companys and KCCIs respective businesses and/or assets.
 
18.
 
Survival.
 
The respective indemnities, rights of contribution, representations, warranties and agreements of the Company and KCCI contained in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of the Company or KCCI pursuant to this Agreement or any certificate delivered pursuant hereto shall survive the delivery of and payment for the Shares and shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any termination of this Agreement or any investigation made by or on behalf of the Company or KCCI.
 
19.
 
Amendments or Waivers.
 
No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement, nor any consent or approval to any departure therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
 
 
 
 
If the foregoing correctly sets forth the understanding among the Company and KCCI, please so indicate in the space provided below for the purpose, whereupon this letter and your acceptance shall constitute a binding agreement between the Company and KCCI.
 
Very truly yours,
ALLETE, Inc.
By:                                                                 
/s/ Mark A. Schober
Name:  Mark A. Schober
Title:Sr. Vice President & CFO
Accepted and agreed to as of the
date first above written:
KCCI Inc.
By:                                                                
/s/ Mark Nauman
Name:                    Mark Nauman
Title:                      President
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20090305075810.txt.gz
TIME:20090305075810
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
As previously disclosed in our Annual Report on Form 10-K, we expected 2009 demand nominations for power from Minnesota Powers taconite customers to be at least 25 percent lower than 2008 levels. Based on their most recent demand nominations, the company now expects total 2009 demand nominations will be approximately 40 percent lower than 2008. We have been actively remarketing the excess power resulting from the reduced demand nominations and to-date we have successfully mitigated approximately 85 percent of the expected annual earnings impact.  In addition to our ongoing remarketing efforts, we are also taking steps to reduce our operating expenses with the goal of offsetting any remaining earnings exposure related to the reduced power loads.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
 
1
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20090407141017.txt.gz
TIME:20090407141017
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
Minnesota Power estimates that the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission (MPUC) will order an overall retail electric rate increase of approximately $21 million when it issues a formal written order on or before May 4, 2009. Minnesota Power announced its rate increase estimate today following an April 3, 2009, deliberation and vote by the MPUC, which considered and decided upon more than 60 different issues contained in the companys rate increase request. The MPUC approved a 10.74 percent return on common equity and a 54.79 percent equity ratio.
 
Minnesota Power will continue to collect interim rates from its customers until the new rates go into effect, which will be after the reconsideration period has expired and after all compliance filings are completed and accepted. Reconsideration of the order could affect the final rate increase estimate. The company expects to inform its customers of the new final rates, which will differ by customer class, later this summer.
 
Minnesota Powers $40 million rate increase request cited rising operational and maintenance costs and government-mandated renewable energy facilities and environmental retrofits. The company has been collecting interim rates equivalent to a $35 million annualized increase since August 1, 2008.
 
ALLETE will record in its first quarter financial results the difference between the interim rates now being collected and the estimated final rates through March 31, 2009.
 
Minnesota Power, a division of ALLETE, supplies electric service to 142,000 retail customers, 16 municipalities and some of the largest industrial customers in the United States.
 
 
Exhibit Number
 
99 - -Minnesota Power News Release dated April 7, 2009, announcing the MPUC rate case estimate.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Rate Case Estimate April 7, 2009
 
1
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Rate Case Estimate April 7, 2009
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Rate Case Estimate April 7, 2009
 
3
 

Exhibit 99
DULUTH, Minn. - Minnesota Power estimates that the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission (MPUC) will order an overall retail electric rate increase of approximately $21 million when it issues a formal written order on or before May 4, 2009.
 
Minnesota Power announced its rate increase estimate today following an April 3 deliberation and vote by the MPUC, which considered and decided upon more than 60 different issues contained in the companys rate increase request. The MPUC approved a 10.74 percent return on common equity and a 54.79 percent equity ratio.
 
Minnesota Power will continue to collect interim rates from its customers until the new rates go into effect, which will be after the reconsideration period has expired and after all compliance filings are completed and accepted. Reconsideration of the order could affect the final rate increase estimate. The company expects to inform its customers of the new final rates, which will differ by customer class, later this summer.
 
Minnesota Powers $40 million rate increase request cited rising operational and maintenance costs and government-mandated renewable energy facilities and environmental retrofits. The company has been collecting interim rates equivalent to a $35 million annualized increase since August 1, 2008.
 
ALLETE (NYSE:ALE) will record in its first quarter financial results the difference between the interim rates now being collected and the estimated final rates through March 31.
 
Minnesota Power, a division of ALLETE, supplies electric service to 142,000 retail customers, 16 municipalities and some of the largest industrial customers in the United States.
 
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
This exhibit has been furnished and shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20090513123429.txt.gz
TIME:20090513123429
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
On May 12, 2009, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE or the Company) announced that Alan R. Hodnik will be the Companys President. See the attached press release for further details regarding this announcement.
 
Exhibit Number
99 - ALLETE News Release dated May 12, 2009, announcing Alan R. Hodnik as President of ALLETE.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                                          
1
 
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 13, 2009 
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                                          
2
 
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 13, 2009 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3                                         
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 13, 2009  
 
 

 
 
Duluth, Minn.  ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE:ALE) today announced that its Board of Directors has named Alan R. Hodnik President of ALLETE. Hodnik, 49, will also be joining the companys Board. Donald J. Shippar, 60, remains Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer of ALLETE.
 
Al has significant strategic, leadership and operational expertise, said Shippar. He is well suited to help me guide ALLETE, and will play a key role during this period of significant capital growth as we strive to meet environmental and renewable energy mandates and prepare for future greenhouse gas initiatives.
 
Hodnik, a graduate of the University of Minnesota, joined Minnesota Power in 1978 and in 2007 was named Minnesota Powers Chief Operating Officer with responsibilities for transmission, distribution, generation and engineering functions as well as Superior, Water, Light & Power and BNI Coal. His previous positions include Senior Vice President of Minnesota Power Operations, Vice President - Generation Operations, and Leader of ALLETEs Organizational Development Team. He is also a member of the Edison Electric Institutes Energy Supply Executive Advisory Committee.
 
Besides maintaining strong working relationships with business, organized labor, political and education leaders in northeastern Minnesota, Hodnik has served on various state and regional task forces throughout his career. A native of Aurora, Minnesota, he served as its mayor from 1988-1997.
 
It is humbling and exciting to have the opportunity to help lead ALLETE during this period in the companys history, Hodnik said. ALLETE has a talented team of employees, and is well positioned both strategically and financially. I look forward to working closely with Chairman and CEO Don Shippar and our leadership team to drive long-term growth and shareholder value while maintaining the outstanding service our customers have come to expect.
 
Based in Duluth, Minn., ALLETE provides regulated energy services in Minnesota and Wisconsin, has an equity investment in the American Transmission Company, and owns BNI Coal in North Dakota and ALLETE Properties in Florida. More information about the company is available at www.allete.com.
 
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20090514170827.txt.gz
TIME:20090514170827
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K/A filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
This Current Report on Form 8-K/A constitutes Amendment No. 1 (the Amendment) to ALLETE, Inc.s Current Report on Form 8-K which was originally filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 13, 2009.  This Amendment is being filed solely to submit additional information regarding Alan R. Hodniks promotion and background at the Company. 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
 
(c) On May 11, 2009, the Board of Directors of ALLETE, Inc. (the "Company") appointed the current chief operating officer of Minnesota Power, a division of ALLETE, Alan R. Hodnik, as President of the Company, effective May 12, 2009. A copy of the press release relating to Mr. Hodniks appointment was previously filed with the Companys Form 8-K on May 13, 2009.
 
 
Mr. Hodnik, 49, joined the Company in 1978 and has held positions of increasing responsibility in organizational development and business operations. He was Manager  Laskin Energy Center from 1995 to 2000, when he was named General Manager-Thermal Operations, and also became responsible for Boswell Energy Center. He became Vice President  MP Generation in 2005 and was named Senior Vice President of Minnesota Power Operations in 2006, when he gained the added responsibilities of transmission and distribution operations and engineering services. Mr. Hodnik has served as the Chief Operating Officer of Minnesota Power since 2007.
 
 
Effective May 1, 2009, Mr. Hodniks annual base salary is $300,000, and his 2009 target annual incentive award opportunity is 40% of his base salary. His 2009 long-term incentive opportunity was increased by 2,107 restricted stock units and 4,278 performance shares, which brings his total 2009 long-term incentive opportunity to $250,000. Actual incentive awards generally range from 0% and 200% of the target levels, depending on demonstrated company performance relative to the established goals and objectives.
 
 
(d) Concurrent with the actions referred to in Item 5.02(c) above, the Board of Directors elected Mr. Alan R. Hodnik to the Board of Directors, effective May 12, 2009.
 
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K/A.
                         
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K/A Alan Hodnik Promotion May 14, 2009, Amendment No. 1
2
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K/A, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K/A and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K/A Alan Hodnik Promotion May 14, 2009, Amendment No. 1
3
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
                          
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K/A Alan Hodnik Promotion May 14, 2009, Amendment No. 1
4
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20090715173016.txt.gz
TIME:20090715173016
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On July 25, 1996, ALLETE adopted a shareholder rights plan, which was amended and restated on July 12, 2006 (collectively, the Rights Plan).  The amendment to the Rights Plan, among other things, extended the final expiration date of the Rights Plan to July 11, 2009.  The Rights Plan expired according to its terms at 5:00 p.m., Central Standard Time, on July 11, 2009.    As a result, ALLETEs preferred share purchase rights issued in accordance with the Rights Plan are no longer outstanding.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                
1
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Expiration of Shareholder Rights Plan dated July 15, 2009 
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
           
2
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Expiration of Shareholder Rights Plan dated July 15, 2009 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
 
ALLETE, Inc. Form 8-K Expiration of Shareholder Rights Plan dated July 15, 2009 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20090727161620.txt.gz
TIME:20090727161620
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
On July 21, 2009, Kathryn W. Dindo was elected to serve on ALLETE, Inc.s (ALLETE) Board of Directors and was appointed to serve on the Audit Committee. Ms. Dindo, 60, former Vice President and Chief Risk Officer of FirstEnergy Corporation, serves as a director and chair of the Audit Committee of J.M. Smucker Company.
 
Also on July 21, 2009, Leonard C. Rodman was named to serve on the Audit Committee. Mr. Rodman is the President, Chairman, and Chief Executive Officer of and has an ownership interest in Black & Veatch. ALLETE purchased engineering and related services from Black & Veatch totaling $862,537.48 in 2008, which was significantly less than 2% of Black and Veatchs annual gross revenues. Due to the extremely small amount of said transactions relative to Black and Veatchs annual gross revenues, the Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee has determined that the transactions do not limit Mr. Rodmans independence, and that his service on the Audit Committee is consistent with the regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the listing standards of the New York Stock Exchange.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                                       
   
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 27, 2009
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                                        
  
2
 
ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 27, 2009 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
                                       
3 
 
 
ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 27, 2009
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20091023171337.txt.gz
TIME:20091023171337
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
On October 21, 2009, the ALLETE Board of Directors elected James S. Haines, Jr. to serve on the Board. Mr. Haines, 63, is the Clark Distinguished Professor of Business at Washburn University in Topeka, Kansas, since 2007. From 2002 to 2007, Mr. Haines served as CEO and Director of Westar Energy, Inc. (NYSE: WR). Westar Energy, the largest electric energy provider in Kansas, serves more than 680,000 customers. The Board has appointed Mr. Haines to serve on the Executive Compensation Committee.
Claudia Scott Welty, Senior Vice President, Business Support and Chief Administrative Officer, will retire as an employee, effective December 31, 2009. Ms. Welty has been with the Company for over 30 years and has served in a number of positions during her tenure. An orderly transition process is underway.
 
 
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                                
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 23, 2009
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                                
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 23, 2009
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
3                                
ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 23, 2009
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20091030080113.txt.gz
TIME:20091030080113
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 2  FINANCIAL INFORMATION
 
On October 30, 2009, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) issued a press release announcing earnings for the third quarter of 2009, which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K and furnished as Exhibit 99.
 
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
 
 
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                                
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 30, 2009
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                                
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 30, 2009
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3                                
ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 30, 2009
 
 

 
 
 
DULUTH, Minn.  ALLETE (NYSE: ALE) today reported third quarter 2009 earnings of 49 cents per share, compared with 85 cents in the same period a year ago.
 
Net income in the third quarter of 2009 was $16.0 million on operating revenue of $178.8 million, compared with net income of $24.7 million and revenue of $201.7 million in the third quarter of 2008. Last years results were boosted by a $4.9 million, or 15 cents per share, non-recurring item.
 
Net income from ALLETEs Regulated Operations segment was $16.6 million compared to $19.2 million in the third quarter 2008. Total kilowatt-hour sales declined approximately 10 percent from year-ago levels due to economic conditions that impacted all classes of retail electric customers. The lower retail sales were partially offset by sales to other power suppliers. In addition, currently authorized interim electric rates are lower compared with the third quarter of 2008, resulting in reduced revenue year-over-year.
 
The first eight months of the year have been difficult for our taconite customers, said Chairman and CEO Don Shippar. However, we are encouraged that they have begun to increase their production.
 
ALLETEs Investments and Other segment reported a loss of $600,000 in the third quarter of 2009, compared to net income of $5.5 million in the comparable period a year ago. The difference is mainly due to the aforementioned non-recurring item: a positive resolution of two outstanding tax issues in the third quarter of 2008. Also included this quarter was a $1.5 million net loss at ALLETE Properties. The company now anticipates recording a net loss for ALLETE Properties for the entire year.
 
Also affecting the quarterly comparison from 2008 to 2009 was the 6 cents per share dilutive impact of a higher common share balance than a year ago. ALLETE has issued equity over the past year to fund significant capital investments in its regulated operations.
 
Because of lowered expectations for ALLETE Properties, the company now expects its 2009 earnings will fall within a range of $1.95 to $2.05, excluding rate refunds related to 2008 that were recorded earlier this year.
 
ALLETE provides regulated energy services in Minnesota and Wisconsin, owns BNI Coal in North Dakota and maintains investments in the American Transmission Company and Florida real estate. More information about the company is available at www.allete.com.
 
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This exhibit has been furnished and shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20091102171015.txt.gz
TIME:20091102171015
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
On November 2, 2009, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) issued a press release announcing that Minnesota Power, an operating division of ALLETE, Inc., submitted a filing with the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission, seeking to increase retail electric rates.  The press release is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K and furnished as Exhibit 99.
 
 
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
  
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 2, 2009
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 2, 2009
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated November 2, 2009
 
 

 
Duluth, Minn.To support a stronger electric system and a healthier environment for its customers in Northeastern Minnesota, today Minnesota Power asked for an $81 million net increase in electric retail rates. New rates approved by the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission are expected to go into effect in 2011. The company has requested that interim rates be implemented in early 2010.
 
Minnesota Power, an ALLETE (NYSE:ALE) company announced earlier this fall its intent to file for additional revenues to recover the costs of significant investments to ensure current and future system reliability, enhance environmental performance and bring new renewable energy to Northeastern Minnesota.
 
If the request is approved, Minnesota Power estimates that an average residential customer, using 755 kilowatt-hours, would see an increase of $13 on their monthly bill.  The new rate request also includes shifting $14 million in line items currently reflected on customers bills into base rates. That shift would result in no net increase or decrease on customers bills.
 
Weve worked hard to keep our customers costs low by negotiating competitive fuel contracts, company-wide discretionary spending reductions, and pay freezes, said ALLETE Chairman and CEO Don Shippar.  At the same time, our customers and policymakers expect us to deliver reliable power and increase our generation from renewable energy sources. The ongoing investment in our system reflects our commitment to maintaining a robust, reliable system and providing cleaner energy that results in long-term benefits for our customers and the region.
 
The new rates help to pay for a series of upgrades at the companys Boswell Energy Centers four generating units in Cohasset that directly benefit Minnesotas environment. A three year project at the facilitys second largest unit is scheduled to be completed this month and is expected to reduce emissions by 80 to 90 percent.
 
The acquisition of a large DC transmission line between North Dakota and Minnesota is also part of the request. That acquisition is currently pending state and federal regulatory approval. The 465 mile existing line will ultimately be used to deliver wind energy to customers in Minnesota, including from the companys Bison 1 energy center. Site development for the 75 megawatt project is currently underway near New Salem, North Dakota.
 
While we continue to build our wind, water and biomass resources, we also know that our customers want and need the competitively priced power that is produced at our existing generating units. Our upgrades will result in cleaner, more efficient, state-of-the-art operations at these facilities, said Shippar.
 
Overall, due to lower fuel costs, customers bills have remained relatively flat and their electric rates have remained competitive in the region even with last years interim rate increase.  Final rates for the companys May 2008 request will go into effect with this months bills.
 
Through its program, Minnesota Power offers customers a number of rebates, tools and programs to help conserve energy and save on their monthly bill. Go to www.mnpower.com for more details.
Power of One
 
For more information regarding Minnesota Powers rate request go to www.straightenergyanswers.com. The public will have the chance to provide input regarding the rate request at upcoming public hearings. Those dates will be set by the administrative law judge that will be assigned to Minnesota Powers rate case proceeding.
 
Minnesota Power provides retail electric service within a 26,000-square-mile area in northeastern Minnesota to 144,000 customers and wholesale electric service to 16 municipalities. More information can be found at: www.mnpower.com.
 
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
This exhibit has been furnished and shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20091203171012.txt.gz
TIME:20091203171012
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Nominations from Minnesota Powers industrial customers for the first four month period of 2010 were received December 1, 2009. The nominations were consistent with the expectations stated in ALLETEs 2010 earnings guidance provided on November 2, 2009, and as reflected in Minnesota Powers November 2, 2009, retail rate case filing. As expected, these nominations represent a 5.5 percent increase from the September through December 2009 nominating period.
ALLETE has received key regulatory approvals for the purchase of a 250 kV DC transmission line and related facilities from Square Butte Electric Cooperative. On December 2, 2009, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission met and approved the purchase by the Company, to be effective upon the issuance of the Commissions written order. In addition, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission issued written orders on November 24, 2009, authorizing the acquisition of the transmission facilities, and conditionally accepting the proposed tariff revisions, interconnection agreement and other related agreements. The transaction is expected to close by year-end.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 3, 2009
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 3, 2009
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 3, 2009
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20091209171855.txt.gz
TIME:20091209171855
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 2  FINANCIAL INFORMATION
On December 9, 2009, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) agreed to sell $80 million of ALLETE First Mortgage Bonds (the Bonds) to certain institutional buyers in the private placement market. The Bonds will be issued in three series as follows:
                       
The Company has the option to prepay all or a portion of the Bonds at its discretion, subject to a make-whole provision. The Bonds are subject to additional terms and conditions which are customary for these types of transactions. The Company intends to use the proceeds from the sale of the Bonds to refinance debt, fund utility capital expenditures or for general corporate purposes. The Bonds were sold in reliance on an exemption from registration under Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, to institutional accredited investors.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 9, 2009
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 9, 2009
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 9, 2009
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20091216131127.txt.gz
TIME:20091216131127
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On December 15, 2009, The Minnesota Public Utilities Commission (MPUC) considered Minnesota Powers application to increase electric service rates. In its filing, the company requested an interim revenue increase of $73 million. During the hearing, the MPUC accepted the filing and set the interim rate increase at $48.5 million effective January 1, 2010.
The company is awaiting receipt of a formal written order, and is also weighing various potential financial, operational and legal actions that may be available.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                              
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 16, 2009
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                              
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 16, 2009
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3                            
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 16, 2009
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20100104171511.txt.gz
TIME:20100104171511
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 2  FINANCIAL INFORMATION
On December 29, 2009, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) drew $65 million of its $150 million syndicated revolving credit facility with Bank of America as Agent (the Line), to temporarily fund the purchase of the 250 kV DC transmission line from Square Butte Electric Cooperative. The Line matures on January 11, 2012. On December 9, 2009, ALLETE agreed to sell $80 million of ALLETE First Mortgage Bonds to certain institutional investors on or about February 17, 2010. ALLETE expects to use proceeds from the First Mortgage Bonds to repay the amount drawn on the Line.
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
On December 31, 2009, ALLETE completed the purchase of the 250 kV DC transmission line and related facilities from Square Butte Electric Cooperative for approximately $70 million. The Minnesota Public Utilities Commission and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission had previously approved the acquisition.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                                
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 4, 2010
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 4, 2010
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 4, 2010
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20100107164025.txt.gz
TIME:20100107164025
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 7  REGULATION FD
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure
A copy of the letter from Minnesota Power described under Item 8.01 is furnished as Exhibit 99 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and may be viewed on the corporate website at . Information on the website is not a part of this Form 8-K.
www.allete.com
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On December 30, 2009, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission (MPUC) issued an interim rate order authorizing $48.5 million of Minnesota Powers November 1, 2009, interim rate increase request of $73 million. Minnesota Power implemented the authorized amount on customer billings starting January 4, 2010 (for service on and after January 1, 2010).
On January 6, 2010, Minnesota Power sent a letter to the MPUC expressing its concerns about the Commissions order.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                                 
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 7, 2010
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                                 
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 7, 2010
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3                                 
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 7, 2010
 
 

Exhibit 99
January 6, 2010
Burl W. Haar
Executive Secretary
Minnesota Public Utilities Commission
121 7 Place East, Suite 350
th
St. Paul, MN 55101
Docket No. E015/GR-09-1151
Dear Dr. Haar:
This letter addresses the Commission's December 30, 2009 Order Setting Interim Rates ("Order"), which reduced Minnesota Power's interim rates by $24.8 million.  Minnesota Power is aware that state law prevents the Company from seeking reconsideration of the decision until the Commission has issued a final order on general rates.  Accordingly, this letter is not a motion for reconsideration; rather it is intended to express the Company's concerns with the Order.  The Commission can, however, reconsider the decision on its own motion and we believe that it should do so.
In the Order, the Commission found the timing and magnitude of the rate case and the poor economy to be exigent circumstances justifying a reduction of interim rates.  But these do not qualify as exigent circumstances under the interim rate statute.   Instead, denying $24.8 million of the Company's interim rate request violates:  (1) due process of law because it prejudges the merits of the Company's rate request before any evidentiary hearing has occurred; (2) the interim rate statute because it relies on factors that are irrelevant to the rate making formula and is thus confiscatory; and (3) environmental policy directions from Minnesota's Governor and the Legislature because it denies a mechanism to fully recover capital expenditures that are mandated by statute.  The basis for our belief that the Commissions Order violates fundamental policy objectives and legal requirements is detailed in the attached memorandum.
 
 
 
The Company recognizes that the Commission is apprehensive about the impact a rate increase may have on ratepayers given the difficult economic situation in northeastern Minnesota.  Minnesota Power shares this apprehension and understands that there is never a good time for a rate increase of any size, but those factors do not override the need to recover the millions of dollars of mandated infrastructure investments.  Over half of the Company's rate increase relates to monies already spent or committed to be spent in 2010 on infrastructure that will improve the environmental performance of the Company's largest generating station.  Another 15% of the increase is for incurred or committed costs for reliability and renewable energy infrastructure.  These investments will allow the Company to continue to provide low-cost energy for decades to come by extending the reliability of generating units and reducing the risks the Company and our ratepayers face from current and future environmental regulations.
Capital investments in infrastructure that are mandated or necessary for system reliability and environmental compliance require hundreds of millions of dollars of investment in projects that may take years to complete.  The magnitude of this rate case is simply the product of such accumulated capital investments over several years.  The Commission has stated its general preference that utilities recover for such investments in a rate case when the facilities are in service instead of through a rider.  In effect, the Commission's Order penalizes the Company for investing in its system, as required by law, and then complying with all statutory and Commission filing requirements to timely recover that investment.
Finally, the Commissions use of past rate case results to calculate a reduction in interim rates before examining the merits of this case, is arbitrary and a prejudgment of the Companys rate case in violation of due process.  Awarding 60% of the Companys rate request based on amounts awarded in three prior cases disregards the fact that this case is predominantly based on capital spending and rate base growth, whereas the prior three  cases were related mainly to changes in operating revenues and costs.  In fact, the more comparable cases involving significant capital investment in 1977 and 1980, resulted in final rates that were 69% and 93% of the Companys request.
Failing to address these issues raised by the Order sooner rather than later has negative ramifications for both ratepayers and the Company.  While a future remedy is possible, it may be more difficult for customers than implementing full interim rates from the beginning.  And a post-rate case remedy would be too late to restore a year of lost investor confidence that will negatively affect the Company's ability to raise capital at a reasonable cost, to the ratepayers' detriment.
We hope that the Commission will reconsider its decision and grant the full interim rate request.  In any case, the Commission should make clear that it has not prejudged the merits of our rate case and spell out how the Company can recover the lost interim rate revenue.  Absent this, Minnesota Power will be irretrievably harmed by the Commission's interim rate decision.
Sincerely,
 
/s/ David J. McMillan
 
David J. McMillan
c:           Attached Service List
 
 
 
 
 
The Commission's December 30, 2009 Order Setting Interim Rates ("Order")  reduced Minnesota Power's interim rates by $24.8 million.  The Order based the reduction on a finding of "exigent circumstance" and calculated the amount based on the percentage of rate increase requests allowed in three prior rate cases.  But denying $24.8 million of the interim rate request is a violation of (1) due process because it prejudges the merits of the Companys rate request before any evidentiary hearing occurs; (2) the interim rate statute which prohibits ratemaking decisions that are confiscatory; and (3) the environmental policy directions of the Governor and the Legislature which mandate many of the capital investments that drive this rate case.
 
1.
 
The Decision Violates Due Process
 
The regulatory compact balances the rights of utilities and its customers.  In exchange for the exclusive right to provide service in its designated territory, the utility is obligated to serve all customers, including those that it would not otherwise be economical to serve.  In exchange for the inability to set its own rates, the utility is assured that the procedure for seeking approval of its rates will comport with due process  decisions on rates will be based on specific evidence relevant to the ratemaking formula, determined after a full evidentiary hearing.
1
 
The Order is not based on any evidence presented in the rate filing, and no evidentiary hearing has yet been provided.  The Order nevertheless concludes that the Commission can reduce the Companys interim rate request to a level the Commission implies it will likely approve for Minnesota Powers final rates in this case based on prior history.  Specifically, the only "evidence" cited by the Order in support of the calculation of the reduction in interim rates is the historical relationship between the amount of Minnesota Power's rate requests and the rates actually approved in three prior cases.  Basing its interim rate decision on a prejudgment of the level of final rates it will eventually approve in this case is a violation of due process.  Minn. Stat.  216B.16, subds. 5 and 6 (the Commission may only modify a utilitys proposed change in rates , and the modification must be based on consideration of the utilitys need to meet the costs of furnishing service and earn a fair and reasonable return on its investments).  Because each of those prior cases involved different test years with different rate bases, revenues and expenses they cannot legitimately be used as a proxy to determine the level of just and reasonable rates for the 2010 test year.
after a hearing
 
Further, the Order only considers three Minnesota Power cases  1987, 1994, and 2008. But those cases primarily involved increases in operating expenses.  The more relevant cases are 1977 and 1980 where, like the present case, the increases were largely driven by capital investments (Boswell 4 and Square Butte).  The final rates allowed in those two cases were 69% and 93% of the amounts requested.
 
 
           Rates are to be set to produce revenues that will recover reasonable expenses and provide a fair rate of return on rate base.  Minn. Stat.  216B.16, subd. 6.
1
 
 
 
 
2.
 
The Decision Is Not Authorized By the Statute
 
Because the Commission made no specific adjustments to Minnesota Power's proposed rate base, revenues, and expenses, the unprecedented $24.8 million across-the-board interim rate reduction violates the interim rate statute, Minn. Stat. Section 216B.16, subd. 3.  As the Order acknowledges, the principles governing interim rates are clear: interim rates are calculated using existing rate design and the last authorized rate of return on common equity, but otherwise reflecting the proposed test year cost of capital, rate base and expenses.  The courts have recognized that interim rates must be calculated to allow Minnesota Power the opportunity to earn its authorized rate of return the results of the rate case:  "The purpose of the interim period is to prevent the 'potentially confiscatory effect of regulatory delay.'"  ., 435 N.W.2d 550, 556 (Minn. Ct. App. 1989).
pending
In re Petition of Minnesota Power & Light Co
 
The Commission's reliance on the "exigent circumstance" exception is misplaced.  Although a significant economic downturn is a concern to everyone, it is not a "circumstance" that would authorize reductions to what are reasonable and necessary interim rates.  A "circumstance" that triggers the exception must be one that is relevant to the ratemaking formula in the statute, i.e. one that impacts the Company's cost of capital, rate base, revenues, or expenses.  To base a reduction of interim rates on a circumstance wholly collateral to that formula is unlawful as confiscatory.  , 262 U.S. 679, 690 (1923) ("Rates which are not sufficient to yield a reasonable return on the value of the property used, at the time it is being used to render service, are unjust, unreasonable, and confiscatory, and their enforcement deprives the public utility company of its property in violation of the Fourteenth Amendment.").  Thus consideration of the general financial impact on customers of interim rates that are presumptively fair and reasonable, because they meet the requirements of the interim rate statute, is a circumstance collateral to the statutory ratemaking formula and not an "exigent circumstance" that would permit an across-the-board reduction of interim rates.
Bluefield Waterworks Improvement Co. v. Public Serv. Commission
 
Similarly, a circumstance cannot be "exigent" if it is affirmatively permitted by the statute.  The proximity between this 2009 rate case filing and the Company's 2008 rate case cannot constitute an "exigent circumstance" because the statute expressly permits a utility to file successive rate cases so long as each case is filed at least 12 months after its previous rate case.  Minn. Stat. Section 216B.16, subd. 3(e)(2).  As Commissioner Reha noted, in the late 1970s and early 1980s nearly annual rate filings were made because then, as now, utilities were increasing their rate bases at significant annual levels.  Because the Legislature specifically authorized these successive rate filings, it is clear that the Legislature did not consider successive filings to be an exigency.
 
Furthermore, the Order makes an invalid comparison related to the timing of the 2010 rate case.  The Order compares the of the 2009 case with the of the new rates from the 2008 case.  This ignores the more than 16 months consumed by the administrative process for the 2008 case.  A valid comparison would be the of the 2009 case on November 2, 2009, with the of the 2008 case on May 2, 2008  a gap of 17 months.  Further, the Order mistakenly states that the 2009 case was filed "one day after the approved in the last rate case went into effect."  Actually, the "increase" from the 2008 case went into effect on August 1, 2008, based on the 2008 Interim Rate Order, and the final rates that went into effect November 1, 2009, were a from those interim rates.
filing
implementation
filing
filing
increase
decrease
 
 
 
 
Finally, the sheer magnitude of a rate request cannot be an exigent circumstance under the interim rate statute.  The size of the rate request is a product of the statutory provisions that govern the timing of rate recovery.  Here, the bulk of the rate request is related to capital investments that began in 2006 and will continue until 2012.  There was some consideration by the Commission that the Company could use rate riders to mitigate the interim rate reduction. Commission policy has long favored placing completed capital projects into ratebase in a rate proceeding. Recent Commission policy has also favored rate cases as the more appropriate vehicle for ratebase additions in place of rate riders. The possible availability of rate riders to recover disallowed interim rate costs ignores two fundamental issues: the delay inherent in the Company recovering no earlier than mid-year the legitimate costs of rate base additions placed into service prior to January 1, 2010, and the fact that not all of the capital additions are rider eligible under existing statute.  Also, because the interim rate reduction was across the board, it would not now be possible to separate out some of the investments for rider treatment.
 
3.
 
The Decision Is Not Good Public Policy
 
No business likes to raise its prices and Minnesota Power is no exception.  Accordingly, Minnesota Power would not be seeking a rate increase at this time or of this magnitude if the long term benefits to our ratepayers did not outweigh the short term costs.  In this context, the Commission's decision will have significant adverse consequences for those who rely on Minnesota Power's system for environmentally sound, reliable, and competitively priced electricity.  It will also likely have adverse consequences for the Commission's future ratemaking proceedings for other utilities.
 
Well over half of the rate increase requested by Minnesota Power is necessary to recover money that has already been spent or is committed to be spent in 2010 on infrastructure that will improve the environmental performance of the Company's largest generating station.  These infrastructure upgrades will provide benefits to northeastern Minnesota, to ratepayers, and to the communities served for years to come.  Another 15% of the increase is related to the costs for reliability and renewable energy infrastructure that have already been incurred or are committed to be incurred in 2010.  In making these investments, the Company was (a) following the environmental policy directions of the Legislature and Governor Pawlenty, and (b) expecting to recover these capital expenditures through rates as authorized by statute.
 
Minnesota Power does not believe that the Commission intended to signal that the Company should not proactively pursue these policy directives.  Similarly, the Company does not believe that the Commission intended to create doubts as to whether a utility can rely on the regulatory compact to obtain fair cost recovery of investments that were prudently made to achieve reliability, add renewable resources, or make environmental improvements.  Unfortunately the financial community may assume otherwise.  Without certainty that expended capital can be recovered, the investment community will have less confidence in the Company's ability in the future to recover the costs of long-term investments that are necessary to provide customers with the low cost, reliable, and environmentally responsible electricity.  Such lack of confidence makes the Company's future access to debt and equity more costly and potentially more difficult to obtain.  In fact, the Commission's December 15 deliberations led to an immediate drop in the value of the Company's existing shares because it meant that current shareholders will receive inadequate returns during the 2010 test year in compensation for the capital they provided.
 
 
 
 
The Company realizes that the Commission is faced with a very difficult situation as it balances state policy mandates with the affordability of those mandates.  Unfortunately, the Commission's December 30 Order could be viewed as having effectively prejudged the merits of the Company's case, even though no examination of that case has yet been made.  The Company cannot take back the capital that it began deploying more than three years ago to retrofit Boswell 3.  Nor can it undo the commitments it has made to replace the 30 year old turbine at Boswell 4 or to reduce emissions at Boswell 1, 2 and 4.  The Commission can, however, make clear that it has not yet evaluated the merits of the Company's case and that such evaluation will only occur after all parties have had the opportunity to develop a record on which the Commission can make an informed decision considering all interests, including legislative objectives to reduce emissions and increase renewable energy resources, and ratepayers' need for reliable and affordable service.
 
Finally, the Company is concerned that the decision risks turning every interim rate decision into a mini-contested case proceeding, which would inject uncertainty into the process and impose additional work-load burdens on utilities, Commission staff, the OES, and all other participants.  The goal of the interim rate statute was to avoid this very burden by allowing the utility to recover its increased costs according to a well-defined and time-tested formula, subject to refund with interest, while the Commission evaluated the appropriateness of its rate change request.
 
Minnesota Power has implemented, effective January 2, 2010, the Commission's interim rate decision that the Company collect $48.5 million in interim rates.  But absent reconsideration of the Order by the Commission, the Company will have no mechanism to collect during the 2010 test year the additional $24.8 million justified under the interim rate statute.  In the meantime, the failure to recover that amount will mean that the Companys revenues will not be sufficient to provide a fair rate of return on investment, investor confidence will decline, and the Companys cost of capital will increase.  That cost will have long term adverse impacts on ratepayers.  It is not unprecedented for the Commission, on its own motion, to revisit an issue if it has concerns that should be addressed.  Minnesota Power believes that the Commission should revisit the interim rate decision in this case.
 
 
This exhibit has been furnished and shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20100125160323.txt.gz
TIME:20100125160323
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                             
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 25, 2010
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                               
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 25, 2010
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3                                
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 25, 2010
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20100211171818.txt.gz
TIME:20100211171818
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
Mr. Hodnik, 50, joined the Company in 1982 and has held positions of increasing responsibility in organizational development and business operations. He became Vice President  MP Generation in 2005 and was named Senior Vice President of Minnesota Power Operations in 2006. In 2007, Mr. Hodnik served as the Chief Operating Officer of Minnesota Power when he gained the added responsibilities of transmission and distribution operations and engineering services for all aspects of the Company, including Superior, Water, Light and Power Company and BNI Coal, Ltd. He was appointed President of the Company and elected to the Board of Directors in May 2009.
 
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                                
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 11, 2010
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 20 of our 2008 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                                
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 11, 2010
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3                                
ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 11, 2010
 
 

 
 
Duluth, Minn.  ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE:ALE) announced today that after 33 years with the company, ALLETE Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Don Shippar will retire effective April 30, 2010. The companys board of directors today selected Alan R. Hodnik, current president of ALLETE, to succeed Shippar as the companys CEO, effective May 1, 2010.  Shippar will continue as chairman of ALLETEs board of directors.
Shippars retirement culminates a successful career highlighted by key accomplishments and strong leadership.  As CEO, Shippar oversaw an aggressive utility capital investment program that supported significant emission reduction projects at Minnesota Powers generation centers in northeastern Minnesota along with renewable wind projects in North Dakota and Minnesota.  Shippar also led the successful acquisition of a strategic direct current interstate transmission line to transport additional wind energy to the region and a significant investment in the American Transmission Company (ATC).
Hodnik, 50, brings 28 years of utility experience to his new role as ALLETE CEO. A graduate of the University of Minnesota, Hodnik joined Minnesota Power in 1982 and moved up in the ranks to take on leadership positions within the company, including Leader of ALLETEs Organizational Development Team, Vice President of Generation Operations and Senior Vice President of Minnesota Power Operations.
In 2007, Hodnik was named Minnesota Powers Chief Operating Officer and led transmission, distribution, generation and engineering for all aspects of the company as well as for Superior Water Light and Power and BNI Coal. He was promoted to ALLETE President and elected to the board of directors in May of 2009. Hodnik serves on the Lignite Energy Council and the Edison Electric Institutes Energy Supply Advisory Committee. He also serves on the Boards of Directors of SMDC Health System and the Area Partnership for Economic Expansion (APEX). A native of Aurora, Minn., Hodnik served as its mayor from 1988 to 1997. He has been a member of state and regional task forces throughout his career while maintaining strong working relationships with business, organized labor, political and education leaders in northeastern Minnesota.
Don has been an exemplary leader, said Bruce Stender, lead director of the ALLETE board His forward looking strategic vision and creation of a senior leadership development program has set the stage for continued success and growth for ALLETE. The board has been actively engaged in succession planning and has worked closely with Don over the past 18 months to ensure a seamless leadership transition. Als utility experience and expertise in operational, organizational and strategic planning make him a natural choice as successor to the position.
.
 
Shippar, 60, began his career with ALLETEs regulated utility, Minnesota Power, in 1976 in the Telecommunications Department. During the next 20 years he held increasingly responsible leadership roles in Human Resources and Transmission & Distribution before being appointed Chief Operating Officer of Minnesota Power in 2000.
 
In 2002, his role expanded to that of Minnesota Power President and COO. In 2004, Shippar was named President and CEO of ALLETE and became chairman of the board in 2006.
Shippar has been actively involved in professional organizations serving leadership roles in the Edison Electric Institute, the Association of Edisons Illuminating Companies and the Lignite Energy Council.  His civic involvement includes the Minnesota Power Foundation, St. Lukes Foundation, and the College of St. Scholastica Board of Trustees, the University of Wisconsin-Superior Foundation and United Way.
Over the past 30 years Ive seen the electric industry undergo a dynamic transformation and witnessed major milestones in our own companys history, including the celebration of Minnesota Powers centennial, Shippar said. Im proud of the contributions Ive been a part of representing our company within our communities, region and industry. Im proud of our employees and their commitment to meeting challenges and adapting to a new energy landscape. I have had the privilege to work with a dedicated management team as well as a talented and very supportive board of directors.
ALLETE, its stakeholders and our industry have benefited enormously from Don Shippars vision, values and principle-centered leadership style, said Hodnik. While he will be greatly missed, he leaves a considerable legacy and an organization prepared for future growth and committed to delivering successful results.
ALLETE has a rich history, a long-standing commitment to excellence and long-term growth prospects. It is truly an honor to work closely with our board of directors and lead this company into the future, said Hodnik. Energy is our business and through the experience and innovation of our talented employees we will tap into the opportunities afforded by these transformational times to the mutual benefit of customers, communities and shareholders.
With his strong leadership style, ability to connect with people, and strategic and operations expertise, I have every confidence that Al and his management team will successfully lead this company and continue to deliver long-term value to our customers and shareholders, said Shippar.
Shippar and his wife Pat make their home in Superior, Wisconsin.
Hodnik and his wife Erika reside in Hermantown, Minnesota.
 
Based in Duluth, Minn.,  ALLETE (NYSE:ALE) provides regulated energy services in Minnesota and Wisconsin, has an equity investment in the American Transmission Company, and owns BNI Coal in North Dakota and ALLETE Properties in Florida. More information about the company is available at www.allete.com
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 
This exhibit has been furnished and shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20100302172524.txt.gz
TIME:20100302172524
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Other Events
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 7  REGULATION FD
Reference is made to Item 8.01 of this Form 8-K for a discussion of the receipt of demand nominations from Minnesota Power's industrial customers for the months of May through August 2010. Our earnings guidance for 2010 provides for a range of potential outcomes and remains at $2.05 to $2.35 per share on projected net income of $73 million to $83 million.
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Demand nominations from Minnesota Powers industrial customers for the months of May through August 2010, were received on March 1, 2010. Total demand nominations are 69 percent higher than the same period in 2009, and 17 percent higher than the January through April 2010 nominating period. As previously disclosed in our 2009 Annual Report on Form 10-K, we expected an increase in taconite production in 2010 compared to 2009, although less than previous years levels. Raw steel production in the United States is now estimated to run at approximately 70 percent of capacity in 2010.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                                   
1
 
ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 2, 2010
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 23 of our 2009 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                                   
2
 
ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 2, 2010
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3                                   
ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 2, 2010
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20100406162903.txt.gz
TIME:20100406162903
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Other Events
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 7  REGULATION FD
 
Our earnings guidance for 2010 provides for a range of potential outcomes and remains at $2.05 to $2.35 per share on projected net income of $73 million to $83 million, excluding the expected first quarter charge resulting from the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (H.R. 3590) as referenced in Item 8.01 of this Form 8-K.
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
On March 23, 2010, the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (H.R. 3590), which was subsequently amended on March 30, 2010, was signed into law by the President. The law includes provisions to generate tax revenue to help offset the cost of the new legislation. One of the provisions changes the tax treatment for retiree prescription drug expenses by eliminating the tax deduction for expenses that are reimbursed under Medicare Part D, beginning January 1, 2013. Based on this provision, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) is subject to additional taxes in the future and is required to reverse previously recorded tax benefits in the period of enactment.
Consequently, the elimination of the previously recorded tax benefit is expected to result in a non-recurring charge to ALLETEs net income in the first quarter of 2010 of approximately $4 million, or approximately $0.12 per share. We plan to address the impacts of this legislation with our regulators in the near future.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                                     
1
 
ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 6, 2010
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, 1; will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 23 of our 2009 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                                     
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 6, 2010
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3                                     
ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 6, 2010
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20100426161202.txt.gz
TIME:20100426161202
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
On April 20, 2010, pursuant to the recommendation of its Executive Compensation Committee, the Board of Directors of the Company amended the Director Stock Plan, effective May 1, 2010, to provide the Board Chairman an annual stock retainer equal to $90,000. On April 20, 2010, the Board of Directors also approved, effective May 1, 2010, an annual cash retainer of $85,000 to the Board Chairman.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                                   
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 26, 2010
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, 1; will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 23 of our 2009 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                                
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 26, 2010
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3  
ALLETE Form 8-K dated April 26, 2010
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20100514160517.txt.gz
TIME:20100514160517
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) held its 2010 annual meeting of shareholders on May 11, 2010. Each matter voted upon at the meeting and the final results of the voting on each such matter are presented below. For a complete description of the matters voted upon at the annual meeting, see the Companys definitive proxy statement, dated March 23, 2010.
All directors listed above were elected.
The selection of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP as the Companys independent registered public accounting firm for 2010 was ratified.
The amendment to the Companys Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation to change the vote required for the election of directors and a corresponding amendment to the Companys Bylaws was approved.
 
2
 
The material terms of the performance goals under the ALLETE Executive Long-Term Incentive Compensation Plan were re-approved.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
3(a)           Articles of Amendment, as approved by the shareholders on May 11, 2010.
3(b)           Bylaws, as amended effective May 11, 2010.
 
3
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
4
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
 
Section 1.
 
The annual meeting of the shareholders of this Corporation for the election of Directors and the transaction of such other corporate business as may properly come before such meeting shall be held at a time and place anywhere within or without the State of Minnesota as may be designated by the Board of Directors on the second Tuesday of May in each year after the year 1923, unless such day is a legal holiday, in which case such meeting shall be held on the next day thereafter which is not a legal holiday or a Sunday.
 
Section 2.
 
Special meetings of the shareholders of this Corporation may be called for any purpose or purposes at any time by the Chairman of the Board, by the President, by the Board of Directors or any two or more members thereof, the Executive Committee, or, in the manner hereinafter provided, by one or more shareholders as permitted under Minnesota law. The place of such special meetings shall be at the registered office of this Corporation in Duluth, Minnesota, or at such other place in Duluth as the Directors may determine.
 
Upon request in writing, by registered mail or delivered in person to the Chairman of the Board, the President, a Vice-President or Secretary, by any person or persons entitled to call a meeting of shareholders, it shall be the duty of such officer forthwith to cause notice to be given to the shareholders entitled to vote of a meeting to be held at such time as such officer may fix, not less than ninety (90) days after the receipt of such request. If such notice shall not be given within sixty (60) days after delivery or the date of mailing of such request, the person or persons requesting the meeting may fix the time of meeting and give notice in the manner hereinafter provided.
 
Notice of special meetings shall state the time, place and purpose thereof.
 
Section 3.
 
Notice of every meeting of shareholders shall be mailed Secretary or the officer or other person performing the Secretary's duties, not more than sixty (60) days and not less than ten (10) days before the meeting, to each shareholder of record entitled to vote, at his or her post office address as shown by this Corporation's records; provided, however, that if a shareholder waives notice thereof before, at, or after the meeting, notice of the meeting to such
by the
 
 
2
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
shareholder is unnecessary. It shall not be necessary to publish notice of any meeting of shareholders.
 
No business may be transacted at an annual meeting of shareholders, other than business that is either (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or any supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors (or any duly authorized committee thereof)(b)otherwise properly brought before the annual meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors (or any duly authorized committee thereof), or (c) otherwise properly brought before the annual meeting by any shareholder of the Corporation (i) who is a shareholder of record on the date of the giving of the notice provided for in this Section 3 and on the record date for the determination of shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at such annual mee ting and (ii) who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 3.
,
 
 
Except as provided by Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 14a-8, and in addition to any other applicable requirements, for business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a shareholder, such shareholder must have given timely notice thereof in proper written form to the Secretary of the Corporation.
 
To be timely, a shareholder's notice to the Secretary must be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not less than ninety (90) days nor more than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting of shareholders; provided, however, that in the event that the annual meeting is called for a date that is not within twenty-five (25) days before or after such anniversary date, notice by the shareholder in order to be timely must be so received not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which such notice of the date of the annual meeting was mailed or such public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, whichever first occurs.
 
To be in proper written form, a shareholder's notice to the Secretary must set forth as to each matter such shareholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (ii) the name and record address of such shareholder, (iii)
 
 
3
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
the class or series and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation which are owned beneficially or of record by such shareholder, (iv) a description of all arrangements or understandings between such shareholder and any other person or persons (including their names) in connection with the proposal of such business by such shareholder and any material interest of such shareholder in such business and (v) a representation that such shareholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the annual meeting to bring such business before the meeting.
 
No business shall be conducted at the annual meeting of shareholders except business brought before the annual meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 3; provided, however, that, once business has been properly brought before the annual meeting in accordance with such procedures, nothing in this Section 3 shall be deemed to preclude discussion by any shareholder of any such business. If the Chairman of an annual meeting determines that business was not properly brought before the annual meeting in accordance with the foregoing procedures, the Chairman shall declare to the meeting that the business was not properly brought before the meeting and such business shall not be transacted.
 
Section 4.
 
The presence in person or by proxy of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote at any meeting shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In the absence of a quorum, any meeting may be adjourned from time to time.
 
Section 5.
 
Meetings of the shareholders shall be presided over by the Chairman of the Board, if there be a Chairman of the Board present, otherwise by the President, or, if the President is not present, by a Vice-President, or if neither the President nor a Vice-President is present, by a Chairman to be elected at the meeting. The Secretary of this Corporation shall act as Secretary of such meetings, if present.
 
Section 6.
 
Subject to the provisions of Article III of the Articles of Incorporation as amended, each shareholder entitled to vote shall be entitled to one vote for each share of voting stock held by the shareholder and may vote and otherwise act in person or by proxy at each meeting of shareholders.
 
 
4
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
Section 7.
 
Any unissued stock of this Corporation, not or hereafter authorized, may be issued and disposed of by the Board of Directors at any time and from time to time, to such persons, firms, corporations or associations, upon such terms and for such consideration as the Board of Directors may, in its discretion, determine, except as may be limited by law or by the Articles of Incorporation of this Corporation. Shares of the Corporation's stock may be certificated or uncertificated, as provided under Minnesota law. Certificates of stock shall be of such form and device as the Board of Directors may elect, and shall be signed by the Chairman of the Board or the President or a Vice-President and the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasu rer or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of this Corporation, but when a certificate is signed by a Transfer Agent or Registrar the signature of any such corporate officer and the corporate seal, if any, upon such certificate may be facsimiles, engraved or printed.
 
Section 8.
 
The stock of this Corporation shall be transferable or assignable on the books of this Corporation by the holders in person or by attorney, and in the case of stock represented by a certificate on surrender of the certificates therefor. The Board of Directors may appoint one or more transfer agents and registrars of the stock. The Board of Directors may fix a time not exceeding sixty (60) days and not less than ten (10) days preceding the date of any meeting of shareholders as the record date for the determination of the shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at such meeting, and in such case only shareholders of record on the date so fixed or their legal representatives shall be entitled to notice of and to vote at such meeting, notwithstanding any transfer of any shares on the books of the Corporation after any record date so fixed. The Board of Directors may close the books of the Corporation against transfer of shares during the whole or any part of such period.
 
Section 9.
 
Subject to the provisions of Article III of the Articles of Incorporation of this Corporation, (1) the management of this Corporation shall be vested in a Board of Directors, the number of which shall be fixed from time to time exclusively by the Board of Directors pursuant to a resolution adopted by affirmative vote of the majority of the Disinterested Directors, as defined in Article VII of the Articles of Incorporation, but the number of Directors shall be no less than nine (9) and no greater than fifteen (15), but no decrease shall have the effect of shortening the term of any incumbent Director. Directors shall be elected annually by the shareholders by ballot, to hold office until their successors are elected and qu alify; (2) subject
 
 
5
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
to any rights then existing by applicable law with respect to cumulative voting, the shareholders at any meeting by a majority vote of all the outstanding stock entitled to vote, at an election of Directors, may remove any Director and fill the vacancy; (3) subject to the rights of the holders of any class or series of the then outstanding shares of voting capital stock of this Corporation, newly created directorships resulting from an increase in the authorized number of Directors or any vacancies in the Board of Directors resulting from death, resignation, retirement, disqualification, removal from office or other cause may be filled only by the shareholders or by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Disinterested Directors then in office, although less than a quorum. Directors so elected shall hold office for a term expiring at the time of t he next annual election of Directors by the shareholders and until their successors are duly elected and qualify.
 
The Board of Directors, as soon as may be after the election in each year, shall elect from their number a Chairman of the Board and shall elect one of their number President of the Corporation, one of whom shall be designated the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, and shall also elect one or more Vice-President, a Secretary and Treasurer and shall from time to time appoint such other officers as they may deem proper. The same person may hold more than one office, except those of President and Vice-President. The Board of Directors also may designate, from time to time, former Directors of this Corporation as Directors Emeritus, in recognition of their long and faithful service to this Corporation. Directors Emeritus shall have no duties or responsibilities in connection with the management of the Corporation.
 
The officers of the Corporation shall have such powers and duties, except as modified by the Board of Directors, as generally pertain to their offices respectively, as well as such powers and duties as from time to time may be conferred upon them by the Board of Directors.
 
The Board of Directors may, by unanimous affirmative action of the entire Board, designate two or more of their number to constitute an Executive Committee which, to the extent determined by unanimous affirmative action of the entire Board, shall have and exercise the authority of the Board in the management of the business of the Corporation, except the power to fill vacancies in the Board and the power to change the membership of or fill vacancies in said Committee. Any such Executive Committee shall act only in the interval between meetings of the Board, and shall be subject at all times to control and direction of the Board. By unanimous
 
 
6
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
vote, the Board shall have the power at any time to change the membership of such Committee and to fill vacancies in it. The Executive Committee may make such rules for the conduct of its business and may appoint such Chairman and committees and assistants as it may deem necessary. A majority of the members of said Committee shall constitute a quorum.
 
Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the following procedures shall be eligible for election as directors of the Corporation, except as may be otherwise provided in the Articles of Incorporation with respect to the right of holders of preferred stock of the Corporation to nominate and elect a specified number of directors in certain circumstances. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at any annual meeting of shareholders, or at any special meeting of shareholders called for the purpose of electing directors, (a) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors (or any duly authorized committee thereof) or (b) by any shareholder of the Corporation (i) who is a shareholder of record on the date of the giving of the notice provided for in this Section 9 and on the record date for the determi nation of shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at such meeting and (ii) who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section 9.
 
In addition to any other applicable requirements, for a nomination to be made by a shareholder, such shareholder must have given timely notice thereof in proper written form to the Secretary of the Corporation.
 
To be timely, a shareholder's notice to the Secretary must be delivered to or mailed and received at the principal executive offices of the Corporation (a) in the case of an annual meeting, not less than ninety (90) days nor more than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the anniversary date of the immediately preceding annual meeting of shareholders; ,, that in the event that the annual meeting is called for a date that is not within twenty-five (25) days before or after such anniversary date, notice by the shareholder in order to be timely must be so received not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the date on which such notice of the date of the annual meetin g was mailed or such public disclosure of the date of the annual meeting was made, whichever first occurs; and (b) in the case of a special meeting of shareholders called for the purpose of electing directors, not later than the close of business on the tenth (10th) day following the day on which notice of the date of the
provided
however
 
 
7
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
special meeting was mailed or public disclosure of the date of the special meeting was made, whichever first occurs.
 
To be in proper written form, a shareholder's notice to the Secretary must set forth (a) as to each person whom the shareholder proposes to nominate for election as a director (i) the name, age, business address and residence address of the person, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of the person, (iii) the class or series and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation which are owned beneficially or of record by the person and (iv) any other information relating to the person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors pursuant to Section 14 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act"), and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder; and (b) as to the shareholder g iving the notice (i) the name and record address of such shareholder, (ii) the class or series and number of shares of capital stock of the Corporation which are owned beneficially or of record by such shareholder, (iii) a description of all arrangements or understandings between such shareholder and each proposed nominee and any other person or persons (including their names) pursuant to which the nomination(s) are to be made by such shareholder, (iv) a representation that such shareholder intends to appear in person or by proxy at the meeting to nominate the persons named in its notice and (v) any other information relating to such shareholder that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. Such notice must be accompanied by a written consent of each proposed nominee to being named as a nominee and to serve as a director if elected.
 
No person shall be eligible for election as a director of the Corporation unless nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section 9. If the Chairman of the meeting determines that a nomination was not made in accordance with the foregoing procedures, the Chairman shall declare to the meeting that the nomination was defective and such defective nomination shall be disregarded.
 
 
8
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
Section 10.
 
Meetings of the Board of Directors shall be held at the times fixed by resolution of the Board, or upon call of the Chairman of the Board, the President, or a Vice-President, or any two Directors. The Secretary or officer performing his or her duties shall give two days' notice of all meetings of Directors, provided that a meeting may be held without notice immediately after the annual election, and notice need not be given of regular meetings held at times fixed by resolution of the Board. Meetings may be held at any time without notice if all of the Directors are present, or if those not present waive notice, either before or after the meeting. Notice by mailing to the usual business or residence address of the Directo r not less than the time above specified before the meeting shall be sufficient. A majority of the Board shall constitute a quorum. Less than such a quorum shall have power to adjourn any meeting from time to time without notice.
 
Section 11.
 
Any and all officers of this Corporation may be required at any time to give bonds for the faithful discharge of their duties in such sum, or sums, and with such sureties, as the Board of Directors may determine.
 
Section 12.
 
The term of office of all officers shall be until the next election of Directors and until their respective successors are chosen and qualify, but any officer may be removed from office at any time by the Board of Directors, unless otherwise agreed by agreement in writing duly authorized by the Board of Directors; and no agreement for the employment of any officer for a longer period than one year shall be so authorized.
 
Section 13.
 
The officers of this Corporation shall have such powers and duties as generally pertain to their offices, respectively, as well as such powers and duties as from time to time shall be conferred upon them by the Board of Directors or the Executive Committee.
 
In case any officer of the Corporation who shall have signed any bonds or certificates of stock heretofore or hereafter issued by the Corporation, or attested the seal thereon, or whose facsimile signature appears on any bond coupon or stock certificates shall cease to be such officer of the Corporation before the bonds or stock certificates so signed or sealed shall have been authenticated, delivered or issued, such bonds or stock certificates nevertheless may be authenticated, delivered or issued with the same force and effect as though the person or persons
 
 
9
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
who had signed same or attested the seal thereon, or whose facsimile signature appears thereon, had not ceased to be such officer of the Corporation.
 
The Corporation shall reimburse or indemnify each present and future Director and officer of the Corporation (and his or her heirs, executors and administrators) for or against all expenses reasonably incurred by such Director or officer in connection with or arising out of any action, suit or proceeding in which such Director or officer may be involved by reason of being or having been a Director or officer of the Corporation. Such indemnification for reasonable expenses is to be to the fullest extent permitted by the Minnesota Business Corporation Act, Minnesota Statutes Chapter 302A. By affirmative vote of the Board of Directors or with written approval of the Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, such indemnification may be extended to include agents and employees who are not Directors or officers of the Corporation, but who would ot herwise be indemnified for acts and omissions under Chapter 302A of the Minnesota Business Corporation Act, if such agent or employee were an officer of the Corporation.
 
Reasonable expenses may include reimbursement of attorneys' fees and disbursements, including those incurred by a person in connection with an appearance as a witness.
 
Upon written request to the Corporation and approval by the Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, an agent or employee for whom indemnification has been extended, or an officer or Director may receive an advance for reasonable expenses if such agent, employee, officer or Director is made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding involving a matter for which indemnification is believed to be available under Minnesota Statutes Chapter 302A.
 
The foregoing rights shall not be exclusive of other rights to which any Director or officer may otherwise be entitled and shall be available whether or not the Director or officer continues to be a Director or officer at the time of incurring such expenses and liabilities.
 
Section 14.
 
A Director of this Corporation shall not be disqualified by his or her office from dealing or contracting with this Corporation, either as vendor, purchaser or otherwise, nor shall any transaction or contract of this Corporation be void or voidable by reason of the fact that any Director, or any firm of which any Director is a member, or any corporation of which any Director is a shareholder or director, is in any way interested in such transaction or contract,
 
 
10
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
provided that such transaction or contract is or shall be authorized, ratified or approved either (1) by vote of a majority of a quorum of the Board of Directors or of the Executive Committee, without counting in such majority of quorum any Director so interested, or being a member of a firm so interested, or shareholder or a director of a corporation so interested, or (2) by vote at a shareholders' meeting of the holders of a majority of all the outstanding shares of the stock of this Corporation entitled to vote, or by a writing or writings signed by a majority of such holders, nor shall any Director be liable to account to this Corporation for any profit realized by the Director from or through any transaction or contract of this Corporation, authorized, ratified or approved as aforesaid, by reason of the fact that the Director, or any firm of wh ich the Director is a member, or any corporation of which the Director is a shareholder or director, was interested in such transaction or contract; provided however, that this Corporation shall not lend any of its assets to any of its officers or Directors, nor to any of its shareholders on the security of its own shares. Nothing herein contained shall create any liability in the events above described or prevent the authorization, ratification or approval of such contracts or transactions in any other manner provided by law.
 
Section 15.
 
The Board of Directors is authorized to select such depository or depositories as they shall deem proper for the funds of this Corporation.  All checks and drafts against such deposited funds shall be signed by persons to be specified by the Chairman of the Board, by the President or a Vice-President of the Corporation with the concurrence of its Treasurer.
 
Section 16.
 
The Board of Directors shall have power to authorize the payment of compensation to the Directors for services to this Corporation, including fees for attendance at meetings of the Board of Directors, and to determine the amount of such compensation and fees.
 
Section 17.
 
The corporate seal of this Corporation shall be in such formasthe Board of Directors shall prescribe.
 
 
 
Section 18.
 
The shareholders may alter or amend these Bylaws by a majority vote of all the outstanding stock of this Corporation entitled to vote at any meeting duly held as above provided, the notice of which includes notice of the proposed alteration or amendment. The Board of Directors may also alter or amend these Bylaws at any time by affirmative vote of a
 
 
11
 
As Amended Effective May 11, 2010
 
majority of the Board of Directors given at a duly convened meeting of the Board of Directors, the notice of which includes notice of the proposed alteration or amendment, subject to the power of the shareholders to change or repeal such Bylaws; provided that the Board of Directors shall not make or alter any Bylaws fixing their number, qualifications, classifications, or term of office, or changing the number of shares required to constitute a quorum for a shareholders' meeting.
 
______________________________________________________________________________
 
The undersigned, Secretary of ALLETE, Inc., does hereby certify that the foregoing is a correct and complete copy of the Bylaws of ALLETE, Inc. effective as of May 11, 2010.
 
    
/s/ Deborah A. Amberg
    Deborah A. Amberg
Secretary
 
 
 
12
 

 
 
1.      Subject to the provisions of Article III hereof, (1) the management of this Corporation shall be vested in a Board of Directors, the number of which shall be fixed from time to time exclusively by the Board of Directors pursuant to a resolution adopted by affirmative vote of the majority of the Disinterested Directors, as defined in Article VII, but the number of Directors shall be no less than nine (9) and no greater than fifteen (15), but no decrease shall have the effect of shortening the term of any incumbent Director.  Subject to the rights, if any, of the holders of one or more series of preferred stock, voting separately by a series to elect directors in accordance with the terms of such preferred stock:
  
 
(a)      Each director shall be elected by the vote of a majority of the votes cast with respect to the director at a meeting of shareholders called for such purpose at which a quorum is present. For purposes of this paragraph, "a majority of the votes cast" means that the number of votes cast "for" a director must exceed the number of votes "against" the election of that director.
 
(b)      Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this Article VI, at any such meeting for which the number of nominees (other than nominees withdrawn on or before the sixtieth (60th) day before the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual shareholder meeting) exceeds the number of directors to be elected, directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes present and entitled to vote on the election of directors.
 
(2) subject to any rights then existing by applicable law with respect to cumulative voting, the stockholders at any meeting by a majority vote of all the outstanding stock entitled to vote, at an election of directors, may remove any director and fill the vacancy; (3) subject to the rights of the holders of any class or series of the then outstanding shares of voting capital stock of this Corporation, newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of Directors or any vacancies in the Board of Directors resulting from death, resignation, retirement, disqualification, removal from office or other cause may be filled only by the shareholders or by the affirmative vote of a majority of the Disinterested Directors then in office, although less than a quorum. Directors so elected shall hold office for a t erm expiring at the time of the next annual election of Directors by the stockholders and until their successors are duly elected and qualify.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20100621164514.txt.gz
TIME:20100621164514
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 7  REGULATION FD
Item 7.01                      Regulation FD Disclosure
On June 10, 2010, ALLETE, Inc. accepted offers from certain institutional buyers in the private placement market to purchase $75 million of ALLETE First Mortgage Bonds (the Bonds). Subject to due diligence and execution of the Bond Purchase Agreement, the Bonds will be issued in two series as follows:
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
   1                                
ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 21, 2010
 
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, 1; will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 23 of our 2009 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2                                   
ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 21, 2010
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3                                   
ALLETE Form 8-K dated June 21, 2010
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20101001120504.txt.gz
TIME:20101001120504
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01                       Other Events
On September 29, 2010, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission (MPUC) considered and decided upon over 50 different issues contained in Minnesota Powers 2009 retail rate increase request. ALLETE, Inc. estimates that the MPUC will order an overall retail electric rate increase of approximately $54 million when it issues a formal written order on or before November 2, 2010. The MPUC approved a 10.38 percent return on common equity and a 54.29 percent equity ratio.
Minnesota Power will continue to collect interim rates from its customers until the new rates go into effect, which will be after the reconsideration period has expired and after all compliance filings are completed and accepted. Reconsideration of the order could affect the final rate increase amount.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 1, 2010
 
1
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, 1; will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 23 of our 2009 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 1, 2010
 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated October 1, 2010
 
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20101103160902.txt.gz
TIME:20101103160902
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01      Other Events
On November 2, 2010, Minnesota Power received a written order from the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission approving a retail electric rate increase of approximately $54 million, subject to reconsideration.
A final order, after reconsideration, is expected in the first quarter of 2011.
Minnesota Power will continue to collect interim rates from its customers until the new rates go into effect, which will be after the reconsideration period has expired and after all compliance filings are completed and accepted. Reconsideration of the written order, or modifications during the compliance period, could affect the final rate increase amount. At this time, we expect little or no interim rate refunds will be issued. An appeal, if any, could follow a decision on reconsideration by the Commission.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
                               
1
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, 1; will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 23 of our 2009 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
                               
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
                               
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20101209103422.txt.gz
TIME:20101209103422
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 7  REGULATION FD
Item 7.01                      Regulation FD Disclosure
ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) expects to earn between $2.35 and $2.55 per share in 2011.
Significant assumptions impacting ALLETEs 2011 earnings guidance include:
 
ALLETE remains committed to providing its shareholders with an attractive dividend while at the same time funding its growth initiatives.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements reflected in ALLETEs earnings guidance for 2011 should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
   
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 9, 2010
1
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, 1; will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 23 of our 2009 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 9, 2010 
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 9, 2010 
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20110124163713.txt.gz
TIME:20110124163713
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
On January 19, 2011 the ALLETE Board of Directors amended the ALLETE and Affiliated Companies Change in Control Severance Plan (Severance Pay Plan), the ALLETE Executive Annual Incentive Plan (AIP), the ALLETE Executive Long-Term Compensation Plan (LTIP), the ALLETE and Affiliate Companies Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan (SERP I), and the ALLETE and Affiliate Companies Supplemental Executive Retirement Plan II  (SERP II), to conform the plans to the requirements of the  Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act,  and in response to executive compensation trends.
The Severance Pay Plan was amended effective January 19, 2011 to eliminate the excise tax gross-up feature, to eliminate certain benefit continuation payments, and to establish a modified severance payment cap whereby the severance payment would be reduced to a level below the safe harbor amount if the executive would receive a higher after-tax benefit than if the executive were to pay the applicable excise tax on the full payment amount.
The AIP was amended effective January 1, 2011 to provide that in the event of a Change in Control (as defined by the AIP), any award earned pursuant to the AIP will be prorated based on the number of months in the performance year which had elapsed as of the date of a Change in Control. The AIP was also amended to incorporate the Companys compensation recovery policy.
The LTIP was amended effective January 1, 2011 to prohibit re-pricing and cash buyouts of stock options and stock appreciation rights unless approved by ALLETE shareholders.  The LTIP was also amended to provide that in connection with a Change in Control (as defined in the LTIP), restrictions in restricted stock grants will be deemed to have expired upon the Change in Control, unless the restricted stock grant is fully assumed by the successor corporation or parent thereof.  In such case, any restrictions shall be deemed to have expired upon a participants termination of employment by the Company for reasons other than cause within 18 months of the Change in Control.  The LTIP was also amended to incorporate the Companys compensation recovery policy.
SERP I and SERP II were amended effective January 1, 2011 to provide that the vested retirement benefits and any unpaid make up benefit, if applicable, is forfeited in the event a participant engaged in Misconduct (as defined in SERP I and SERP II).  SERP I and SERP II were also amended to incorporate the Companys compensation recovery policy.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 24, 2011
1
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, 1; will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 23 of our 2009 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 24, 2011
2
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated January 24, 2011
3
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20110512165318.txt.gz
TIME:20110512165318
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders	Regulation FD Disclosure	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) held its 2011 annual meeting of shareholders on May 10, 2011. Each matter voted upon at the meeting and the final results of the voting on each such matter are presented below. For a complete description of the matters voted upon at the annual meeting, see the Companys definitive proxy statement, dated March 22, 2011.
All nominees for director were elected by the following votes.
Item 2  Approval of advisory resolution on executive compensation.
The advisory vote on executive compensation was approved.
Item 3  Advisory vote on frequency of future advisory votes on executive compensation.
The advisory vote on the one year frequency of advisory votes on executive compensation was approved.
The selection of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP as the Companys independent registered public accounting firm for 2011 was ratified.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 12, 2011
 
2
 
SECTION 7  REGULATION FD
On May 11, 2011, the Company issued a press release attached as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K, which is here incorporated by reference. In the press release, the Company announced the appointment of Alan R. Hodnik as Chair of the ALLETE Board of Directors. The information disclosed under this Item 7.01 and the Exhibit are furnished to, and not filed with, the Securities and Exchange Commission.
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
On May 10, 2011, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) named President and Chief Executive Officer, Alan R. Hodnik, to succeed Donald J. Shippar as Chair of the ALLETE Board of Directors. Mr. Shippar will continue to serve on ALLETEs Board of Directors.
Mr. Hodnik, 51, joined the Company in 1982 and has held varied leadership positions within the company in organizational development and business operations. He became Vice President  MP Generation in 2005 and was named Senior Vice President of Minnesota Power Operations in 2006. In 2007, Mr. Hodnik served as the Chief Operating Officer of Minnesota Power when he gained the added responsibilities of transmission and distribution operations and engineering services for all aspects of the Company, including Superior, Water, Light and Power Company and BNI Coal, Ltd. He was appointed President of the Company and elected to the Board of Directors in May 2009, and named Chief Executive Officer in May 2010.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 4 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 12, 2011
 
3
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 12, 2011
 
4
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 12, 2011
 
5
 

 
Duluth, Minn.ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE:ALE) has named President and Chief Executive Officer Alan R. Hodnik to succeed Don Shippar as Chair of the ALLETE Board of Directors effective May 10, 2011.
 
Hodnik, 51, who became President in 2009 and CEO in May 2010, now assumes additional responsibilities as Chair of the Board of Directors. Since assuming the CEO role, Hodnik has overseen strong earnings growth, two successful rate cases, construction of renewable wind projects and large-scale efficiency and environmental upgrades at the companys utility facilities.
 
Al has provided exemplary leadership this past year, said Lead Director, Bruce Stender. This move completes a planned transition and reflects the boards continued confidence in Al and his senior team during a time when the nations energy landscape is changing. Al has demonstrated a keen ability to seize new opportunities in the energy markets and navigate regulatory unknowns while providing value to our customers and shareholders.
 
Hodnik succeeds Don Shippar who served as CEO and President of ALLETE from 2004 to 2010 when he retired. Shippar will continue to serve on the ALLETE Board.
 
The Company is indebted to Don for his leadership during the past decade, said Stender. He brought a strong vision and managed a smooth leadership transition in an atmosphere that formed a corporate culture which has benefitted all stakeholders.
 
A University of Minnesota graduate who joined the Company in 1982, Hodnik has held varied leadership positions within the company including Organizational Development Consultant, Co-Leader and Leader from 1989 to 1994. He also managed Laskin, Boswell and Taconite Harbor generating facilities from 1995 through 2004 and was named Vice President of Generation Operations in 2005, Senior Vice President  Minnesota Power Operations in 2006, and was promoted to Chief Operating Officer, with added responsibilities for Superior Water Light & Power and BNI Coal in 2007.
 
 
ALLETE's corporate headquarters are in Duluth, Minnesota. In addition to its electric utilities, Minnesota Power in northeast Minnesota and Superior, Water, Light & Power Co. in northwest Wisconsin, ALLETE owns BNI Coal in Center, N. D. and has an eight percent equity interest in American Transmission Co. More information about the company is available on ALLETE's Web site at .
www.allete.com
 
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20110525171122.txt.gz
TIME:20110525171122
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 7  REGULATION FD
Item 7.01
A copy of the press release dated May 24, 2011, for the long-term power purchase agreement described under Item 8.01 is furnished as Exhibit 99 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01                      Other Events
On May 24, 2011, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commissions (MPUC) issued its Order authorizing Minnesota Power (the Company) to implement final rates in its 2010 rate case. By the terms of the Order, the Companys $53.5 million annual rate increase is effective June 1, 2011, with the MPUC approving the Companys compliance filing regarding the class revenue apportionment, rate design and rate structures on a prorated basis for service rendered on and after June 1, 2011.
2010 Rate Case.
On May 24, 2011, the MPUC also issued an order approving the Companys request to defer a portion of the $4.0 million non-recurring tax charge taken in 2010 resulting from PPACA. As a result, the Company will be able to defer $2.9 million (after-tax) and seek recovery in its next rate case.
Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010 (PPACA).
On May 19, 2011, Minnesota Power and Manitoba Hydro-Electric Board (Manitoba Hydro) signed a long-term power purchase agreement (Agreement). The Agreement, subject to regulatory approval, calls for Manitoba Hydro to sell 250 megawatts of electricity to Minnesota Power for 15 years beginning in 2020.
Power Purchase Agreement.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01                      Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 25, 2011
 
2
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 25, 2011
 
3
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 25, 2011
 
4
 

 
Duluth, Minn.Minnesota Power and Manitoba Hydro have signed a long-term power purchase agreement that will reduce carbon emissions for the utility division of ALLETE (NYSE: ALE), provide the lowest-cost energy resource for consumers and introduce a unique way to store premier wind energy generated in North Dakota through hydroelectric reserves.
 
Manitoba Hydro, a Canadian Crown Corporation owned by the Province of Manitoba and based in Winnipeg, produces most of its power from hydroelectric stations in the northern reaches of the province.  For Minnesota Power, the purchase fits the Duluth-based utilitys strategy of lessening its dependence on carbon-based generation. Buying hydroelectric power from Manitoba Hydro is the lowest-cost option for meeting the electric demands of its customers in the 2020 timeframe.
 
The agreement, subject to regulatory approval, calls for Manitoba Hydro to sell 250 megawatts (MW) of electricity to Minnesota Power for 15 years beginning in 2020.  A unique aspect of the power purchase agreement is the inclusion of a wind storage provision that entitles Minnesota Power to transmit electric energy northward from its wind farms in North Dakota when wind production is high or electric loads are low.
 
When Minnesota Power transmits power northward, Manitoba Hydro will absorb it into its system  in essence storing the wind power, using the Manitoba system as a rechargeable battery. This wind storage provision will allow Minnesota Power to balance its energy position and maximize the value of its wind resources. The company, which will complete the second phase of its 82MW Bison 1 Wind Energy Center this fall, recently announced its intent to build Bison II, an additional 105MW, $170 million wind farm in North Dakota.
 
This innovative agreement aligns well with our long-term resource strategy to provide our customers with a flexible and diverse energy supply at the lowest cost possible, said ALLETE President and CEO Alan R. Hodnik. Our partnership with Manitoba Hydro is an example of two organizations reaching across geographic boundaries to bolster transmission system capacity while further transforming North Americas energy landscape.
 
The agreement provides for construction of additional transmission capacity between Manitoba and the U.S. Investing in transmission infrastructure is a key strategic element for ALLETE, which has an eight percent ownership interest in the American Transmission Company and is actively involved in the CapX2020 transmission initiative in the Upper Midwest.
 
The Canada-U.S. transmission addition will provide a vital link to renewable resources in both countries, Hodnik said, and increase the value of wind and hydro power in an innovative way.
 
As part of the overall arrangement, Minnesota Power has primary rights to new transmission with Manitoba Hydro for the delivery of the capacity and energy under the purchase agreement.  Discussions on various transmission configurations are underway between the two utilities and the Midwest Independent System Operator (MISO).
 
International energy cooperation between Minnesota Power and Manitoba Hydro is nothing new. Since the 1970s, the two energy providers have capitalized on joint projects involving energy, capacity and electric transmission. In 2006, the two utilities began discussing the next stage of hydroelectric development on the Nelson River in northern Manitoba, the carbon-free capacity it represents, and the options for moving new energy southward to the U.S.
 
Manitoba Hydro plans to construct two new hydroelectric stations on the upper Nelson River near Hudson Bay:  the Keeyask and the Conawapa installations. These new hydropower facilities would add another 1,930MW of electricity to the Manitoba Hydro system.
 
ALLETE is an energy company and its principal operating division Minnesota Power provides retail electric service within a 26,000-square-mile area in northeastern Minnesota to 144,000 customers and wholesale electric service to 16 municipalities. More information can be found at .
www.mnpower.com
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20110527160450.txt.gz
TIME:20110527160450
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 1  REGISTRANTS BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS
SECTION 2  FINANCIAL INFORMATION
On May 25, 2011, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) entered into a new $250 million credit agreement with JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as Administrative Agent, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC as Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Book Runner, and the several lenders party thereto (Credit Agreement). Effective July 1, 2011, the Credit Agreement will replace ALLETEs $150 million credit facility dated as of January 11, 2006, among ALLETE, Inc., Bank of America Corporation (formerly LaSalle Bank National Association), as Agent, and the several lenders party thereto. Originally scheduled to expire on January 11, 2012, this facility will now terminate on July 1, 2011. As of May 25, 2011, the Company had availability under this facility of $150 million.
The Credit Agreement is unsecured and has a maturity date of June 30, 2015. At ALLETEs request and subject to certain conditions, the Credit Agreement may be increased by up to $100 million and extended for a one-year period. Advances may be used by ALLETE for general corporate purposes, to provide liquidity in support of ALLETE's commercial paper program and to issue up to $40 million in letters of credit.
ALLETE has the option to borrow funds under the Credit Agreement at an interest rate equal to the Eurodollar rate plus a margin of 0.85% to 1.75%, or an alternate base rate. In addition, ALLETE will pay annual facility fees ranging from 0.15% to 0.25%. Such interest rates and annual fees are based on ALLETEs then-current senior unsecured credit ratings.
The Credit Agreement contains customary conditions of borrowing, customary events of default and customary affirmative and negative covenants. The Credit Agreement includes only one financial covenant to maintain a ratio of Total Indebtedness to Total Capitalization (as defined in the Credit Agreement) equal to or less than 65%. Indebtedness under the Credit Agreement may be accelerated upon the occurrence of an event of default, including cross-default to other indebtedness in excess of $35 million.
A copy of the Credit Agreement is filed as Exhibit 99 hereto and is incorporated by reference herein. The description of the Credit Agreement above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Credit Agreement.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 27, 2011
 
2
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 27, 2011
 
3
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 27, 2011
 
4
 

 
Exhibit 99
 
EXECUTION COPY
 
 
 
 
Page
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
 
(i)
 
 
Page
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
 
(ii)
SCHEDULES:
EXHIBITS:
ALLETE Credit Agreement
 
(iii)
THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT (this ) dated as of May 25, 2011, is among ALLETE, INC., the Lenders party hereto and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
Agreement
 
The parties hereto agree as follows:
 
ARTICLE 1.
 
 
Section 1.1.
 
.  As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.  For the avoidance of doubt, a Loan that bears interest at a rate determined pursuant to of the definition of Alternate Base Rate shall, for all purposes of this Agreement, be deemed to be an ABR Loan and not a Eurodollar Loan.
ABR
clause (c)
 
 means PricewaterhouseCoopers, L.L.P. or another registered public accounting firm of recognized national standing.
Accountants
 
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
per annum
 
multiplied by
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder, and any successor in such capacity.
Administrative Agent
 
 means an administrative questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
 
 means, for any day, a rate equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus 1/2 of 1%, and (c) the Adjusted LIBO Rate for a one month Interest Period on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) 1% (provided that, for the avoidance of doubt, the Adjusted LIBO Rate for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on the Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page 1 (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service)at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day).  Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
per annum
plus
per annum
 
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Anniversary Date
Section 2.8
 
 means a rate determined pursuant to .
Applicable Margin
per annum
Schedule 1
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
 
 means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Commitments represented by such Lenders Commitment; provided that in the case of when a Defaulting Lender shall exist, Applicable Percentage shall mean the percentage of the total Commitments (disregarding any Defaulting Lenders Commitments) represented by such Lenders Commitments.  If the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments and to any Lenders status as a Defaulting Lender at the time of such determination.
Applicable Percentage
Section 2.11
 
 means, with respect to any Lender that is a fund that invests in commercial loans, any other fund that invests in commercial loans and is managed or advised by the same investment advisor as such Lender or by an Affiliate of such investment advisor.
Approved Fund
 
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an Eligible Assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by ), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, substantially in the form of or in such other form as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
Section 10.4
Exhibit A
 
 means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Maturity Date and, if different, the date of termination of the Commitments.
Availability Period
 
 means, with respect to any Person, such Person becomes the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee, administrator, custodian, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with the reorganization or liquidation of its business appointed for it, or, in the good faith determination of the Administrative Agent, has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of, or acquiescence in, any such proceeding or appointment, that a Bankruptcy Event shall not result solely by virtue of any ownership interest, or the acquisition of any ownership interest, in such Person by a Governmental Authority or instrumentality thereof, , , that such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Person with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Person (or such Governmental Authority or instrumentality) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made by such Person.
Bankruptcy Event
provided
provided
further
 
 means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
 
 means ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation.
Borrower
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Borrower Financial Statements
Section 4.4(a)
 
 means Loans of the same Type made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect.
Borrowing
 
 means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed, that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term Business Day shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
provided
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
2
 means with respect to any Person, obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP, provided that no power purchase agreement shall constitute a Capital Lease Obligation.
Capital Lease Obligations
 
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (a) the consummation of any transaction the result of which is that any person or group (within the meaning of Section 13(d)(3) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 but excluding any employee benefit plan of the Borrower or its Subsidiaries, and any person or entity acting in its capacity as trustee, agent or other fiduciary or administrator of any such plan) becomes the beneficial owner (as such term is defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) of more than 30% of the total voting power in the aggregate of all classes of the Voting Securities of the Borrower then outstanding, (b) during any period of two consecutive calendar years, individuals who at the beginning of such period constituted the board of directors of the Borrower cease for any reason to constitute a majority of the directors of the Borrower then in office unless (i) such new directors were elected or nominated by a majority of the directors of the Borrower who constituted the board of directors of the Borrower at the beginning of such period or (ii) the reason for such directors failing to constitute a majority is a result of retirement by directors due to age, death or disability or (c) any event or condition relating to a change of control of the Borrower shall occur which requires or permits the holder or holders of indebtedness of the Borrower in an aggregate principal amount of $35,000,000 or more, or any agent or trustee for such holders, to require payment, purchase, redemption or defeasance of such indebtedness prior to its expressed maturity.
Change in Control
 
 means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the Signing Date, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the Signing Date or (c) compliance by any Credit Party (or, for purposes of , by any lending office of such Credit Party or by such Credit Partys holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the Signing Date; that, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or any United States regulatory authority pursuant to Basel III shall, in each case referred to in the foregoing and , be deemed to be a Change in Law, regardless of the date enacted, adopted, promulgated or issued.
Change in Law
Section 3.5(b)
provided
clauses (i)
(ii)
 
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit hereunder in an aggregate outstanding amount not exceeding the amount of such Lenders Commitment as set forth on , the amount of any increase set forth in each Increase Supplement executed and delivered by such Lender, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Commitment in accordance with , as applicable, as such Commitment may be adjusted from time to time pursuant to or pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to .  The initial aggregate amount of the Commitments is $250,000,000.
Commitment
Schedule 2.1
plus
Section 10.4(b)
Section 2.5
Section 10.4
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
3
 means a certificate, substantially in the form of .
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit D
 
 means the total amount of assets shown on the consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, determined in accordance with GAAP and prepared as of the end of the fiscal quarter then most recently ended for which financial statements have been filed with the SEC.
Consolidated Assets
 
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise.  The terms Controlling and Controlled have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Credit Event
Section 5.2
 
 means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of such Lenders Loans and its LC Exposure at such time.
Credit Exposure
 
 means the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders.
Credit Parties
 
 means a Credit Request, substantially in the form of , or in such other form as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
Credit Request
Exhibit B
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Declining Lender
Section 2.8
 
 means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
 means any Lender, as determined by the Administrative Agent (or if the Administrative Agent is the Defaulting Lender, by the Required Lenders), that (a) has failed, within three (3) Business Days of the date required to be funded or paid, to (i) fund any portion of its Loans, (ii) fund any portion of its participations in Letters of Credit or (iii) pay over to any Credit Party any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder, unless, in the case of clause (i) above, such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent in writing that such failure is the result of such Lenders good faith determination that a condition precedent to funding (specifically identified and including the particular default, if any)has not been satisfied, (b) has notified the Borrower or any Credit Party in writing, or has made a public statement to the effect, that it does not intend or expect to comply with any of its funding obligations under this Agreement) or generally under other agreements in which it commits to extend credit, (c) has failed, within three (3) Business Days after request by a Credit Party (based on the reasonable belief that it may not fulfill its funding obligation), acting in good faith, to provide a certification in writing from an authorized officer of such Lender that it will comply with its obligations (and is financially able to meet such obligations) to fund prospective Loans and participations in then outstanding Letters of Credit under this Agreement, that such Lender shall cease to be a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this upon such Credit Partys receipt of such certification in form and substance satisfactory to it and the Administrative Agent, or (d) has become the subject of a Bankruptcy Event.
Defaulting Lender
provided
clause (c)
 
 means the actions, suits, proceedings and environmental matters disclosed in (a) , (b) the current and periodic reports filed by the Borrower from time to time with the SEC pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the
Disclosed Matters
Schedule 4.5/4.6
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
4
rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, or (c) disclosed by the Borrower to the Lenders (either directly or indirectly through the Administrative Agent) in writing.
 
 means any Equity Interest that, by its terms (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable at the option of the holder thereof), or upon the happening of any event, matures (excluding any maturity as a result of an optional redemption by the issuer thereof) or is mandatorily redeemable, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, or is redeemable at the unconditional sole option of the holder thereof (other than solely for Equity Interests that do not constitute Disqualified Stock), in whole or in part, on or prior to the date that is 180 days after the Maturity Date.
Disqualified Stock
 
 or  refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
 
 means July 1, 2011.
Effective Date
 
 means any of the following (a) any commercial banks, finance companies, insurance companies and other financial institutions and funds (whether a corporation, partnership or other entity) engaged generally in making, purchasing or otherwise investing in commercial loans in the ordinary course of its business, that unless such entity is a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender, such entity has been approved by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and, unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of assignment to such entity, the Borrower (each such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed), and , , that any such entity shall be entitled, as of the date such entity becomes a Lender, to receive payments under its Note without deduction or withholding with respect to United States federal income tax, (b) each of the Lenders and (c) any Affiliate or Approved Fund of a Lender, and each is an Eligible Assignee.
Eligible Assignees
provided
provided
 
further
 
 means ambient air, surface water and groundwater (including potable water, navigable water and wetlands), the land surface or subsurface strata, the workplace or as otherwise defined in any Environmental Law.
Environment
 
 means any written accusation, allegation, notice of violation, claim, demand, order, directive, cost recovery action or other cause of action by, or on behalf of, any Governmental Authority or any Person for damages, injunctive or equitable relief, personal injury (including sickness, disease or death), Remedial Action costs, tangible or intangible property damage, natural resource damages, nuisance, pollution, any adverse effect on the environment caused by any Hazardous Material, or for fines, penalties or restrictions, resulting from or based upon (a) the existence, or the continuation of the existence, of a Release (including sudden or non-sudden, accidental or non-accidental Releases), (b) exposure to any Hazardous Material, (c) the presence, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Material or (d) the violation or alleged violation of any Environmental Law or Environmental Permit.
Environmental Claim
 
 means any and all applicable present and future treaties, laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by or with any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the presence, management, Release or threatened Release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Environmental Law
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
5
 means any permit, approval, authorization, certificate, license, variance, filing or permission required by or from any Governmental Authority pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Environmental Permit
 
 means (a) shares of corporate stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membership interests, and any other interest that confers on a Person the right to receive a share of the profits and losses of, or distribution of assets of, the issuing Person, and (b) all warrants, options or other rights to acquire any Equity Interest set forth in the foregoing .
Equity Interest
clause (a)
 
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
ERISA
 
 means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Borrower or any Subsidiary, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
 
 means (a) any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30 day notice period is waived), (b) any failure to satisfy the minimum funding standards of Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA with respect to any Plan, whether or not waived, (c) the incurrence by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan, (d) the receipt by  the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan, (e) the incurrence by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan or (f) the receipt by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.  For the avoidance of doubt, a Loan that bears interest at a rate determined pursuant to of the definition of Alternate Base Rate shall, for all purposes of this Agreement, be deemed to be an ABR Loan and not a Eurodollar Loan.
Eurodollar
clause (c)
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Event of Default
Article 8
 
 means the Fourth Amended and Restated Committed Facility Letter dated January 11, 2006 among the Borrower, certain lenders and the agent named therein.
Existing Credit Agreement
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Extension Request
Section 2.8(d)
 
 means, for any day, a rate (expressed as a decimal, rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next higher 1/100 of 1%) equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by federal funds brokers on such day, as published for such day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, that (a) if the day for which such rate is to be determined is not a Business
Federal Funds Effective Rate
per annum
provided
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
6
Day, the Federal Funds Effective Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Business Day and (b) if such rate is not so published for any day, the Federal Funds Effective Rate for such day shall be the average of the quotations for such day on such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal Funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
 
 means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of the Borrower.
Financial Officer
 
 means Fitch Ratings, or any successor thereto.
Fitch
 
 means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is located.  For purposes of this definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
 
 means generally accepted accounting principles set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and in the statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statement by such other entity as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession, which are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied; that in the event Borrower converts to use the International Financial Reporting Standards by the International Accounting Standards Board or other method of accounting, as may hereafter be required or permitted by the SEC, then the term GAAP as used in this Agreement shall be deemed to mean and refer to such International Financial Reporting Standards or such other method of accounting instead, which are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied.
GAAP
provided
 
 means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, commission, exchange, association, board, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
 
 of or by any Person (the ) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the ) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation, that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.  The term Guaranteed has a meaning correlative thereto.  The amount of any Guarantee of a Person shall be deemed to be an amount equal to the stated or determinable amount of the primary obligation in respect of which such Guarantee is made (or, if less, the maximum amount of such primary obligation for which such Person may be liable pursuant to the
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
7
 
terms of the instrument evidencing such Guarantee) or, if not stated or determinable, the maximum reasonably anticipated liability in respect thereof as determined by such Person in good faith, that, notwithstanding anything in this definition to the contrary, the amount of any Guarantee of a Person in respect of any Permitted Hedge Agreement by any other Person with a counterparty shall be deemed to be the maximum reasonably anticipated liability of such other Person, as determined in good faith by such Person, net of any obligation or liability of such counterparty in respect of any Permitted Hedge Agreement with such Person, that the obligations of such other Person under such Permitted Hedge Agreement with such counterparty shall be terminable at the election of such other Person in the event of a default by such counterparty in its obligations to such other Person.
provided
provided
further
 
 means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
 
 means any interest rate protection agreement, foreign currency exchange agreement, commodity price protection agreement or other interest rate, currency exchange rate or commodity price hedge, future, forward, swap, option, cap, floor, collar or similar agreement or arrangement (including both physical and financial settlement transactions).
Hedge Agreement
 
 means a Subsidiary that (a) has consolidated total assets with a book value not exceeding 5% of Consolidated Assets as of the end of the most recent fiscal quarter for which financial statements have been filed with the SEC and (b) had total revenues not exceeding 5% of the Borrowers consolidated total revenues for the period ending on the last day of such fiscal quarter.
Immaterial Subsidiary
 
 means any transaction or event described in or of so long as, after giving effect to such transaction or event, all Subsidiaries that have become subject to such transactions or events during the 12-month period ending on the date of such transaction or event (a) had consolidated total assets with a fair market value not exceeding 5% of Consolidated Assets as of the end of the most recent fiscal quarter for which financial statements have been filed with the SEC and (b) had total revenues not exceeding 5% of the Borrowers consolidated total revenues for the period ending on the last day of such fiscal quarter.
Immaterial Transaction
paragraph (i)
(j)
Article 8
 
 means an increase supplement in the form of .
Increase Supplement
Exhibit E
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Increasing Lender
Section 2.5(d)
 
 means as to any Person, at a particular time, all items which constitute, without duplication, (a) indebtedness for borrowed money or the deferred purchase price of property (excluding trade payables incurred in the ordinary course of business and excluding any such obligations payable solely through the Borrowers issuance of Equity Interests (other than the Disqualified Stock and Equity Interests convertible into Disqualified Stock)), (b) indebtedness evidenced by notes, bonds, debentures or similar instruments, (c) obligations with respect to any conditional sale or title retention agreement, (d) indebtedness arising under acceptance facilities and the amount available to be drawn under all letters of credit issued for the account of such Person and, without duplication, all drafts drawn thereunder to the extent such Person shall not have reimbursed the issuer in respect of the issuers payment of such drafts, (e) all liabilities secured by any Lien on any property owned by such Person even though such Person has not assumed or otherwise become
Indebtedness
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
8
liable for the payment thereof, that the amount of such liabilities included for purposes of this definition will be the amount equal to the lesser of the fair market value of such property and the amount of the liabilities so secured, (f) indebtedness in respect of Disqualified Stock valued at the greater of its voluntary or involuntary maximum fixed repurchase price plus accrued dividends, (g) liabilities in respect of any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to purchase, redeem, retire, acquire or make any other payment in respect of any shares of equity securities or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any shares of equity securities, (h) obligations under Capital Lease Obligations, (i) Guarantees of such Person in respect of Indebtedness of others, and (i) to the extent not otherwise included, all net obligations of such Person under Permitted Hedge Agreements.
provided
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Indemnitee
Section 10.3(b)
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Information
Section 10.15
 
 means all copyrights, trademarks, servicemarks, patents, trade names and service names.
Intellectual Property
 
 means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with .
Interest Election Request
Section 3.2
 
 means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan, the last day of each March, June, September and December, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Eurodollar Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Loan with an Interest Period of more than three months duration, the three-month anniversary of the first day of such interest period and (c) with respect to all Loans, (i) on the date of any prepayment or (ii) on the Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
 
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months thereafter, as the Borrower may elect, that (a) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day, and (b) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period.  For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
provided
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Investment Grade Rating
Section 7.2.
 
 means each of JPMorgan Chase and any other Lender approved by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), in each case in its capacity as an issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder.
Issuing Bank
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
JPMorgan Chase
 
 means a payment made by an Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
9
 means, at any time, (a) with respect to all of the Lenders, the sum, without duplication, of (i) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time (ii) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time and (b) with respect to each Lender, its Applicable Percentage of the amount determined under .
LC Exposure
plus
clause (a)
 
 means the Persons listed on and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption or an Increase Supplement other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption.
Lenders
Schedule 2.1
 
 means any standby letter of credit (and any successive renewals thereof) issued pursuant to this Agreement.
Letter of Credit
 
 means with respect to any Issuing Bank, the commitment of such Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit hereunder in a maximum amount separately agreed in writing between the Borrower and such Issuing Bank (it being understood that the Letter of Credit Commitments of all Issuing Banks may, but the amount of all Letters of Credit issued by all Issuing Banks may not, exceed the maximum amount of Letters of Credit permitted to be issued pursuant to ).
Letter of Credit Commitment
Section 2.9(a)
 
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Market Service (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period.  In the event that such rate does not appear on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Market Service (or on any such successor or substitute page, or any successor to or substitute for such Service) at such time for any reason, then the LIBO Rate with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate of interest , as reported by JPMorgan Chase to the Administrative Agent, quoted by JPMorgan Chase to leading banks in the interbank eurodollar market as the rate at which JPMorgan Chase is offering Dollar deposits in an amount equal approximately to the Eurodollar Loan of JPMorgan Chase to which such Interest Period shall apply for a period equal to such Interest Period, as quoted at approximately 11:00 a.m. two Business Days prior to the first day of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
per annum
 
 means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien (statutory or other), assignment, deposit arrangement, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance or preference, priority, charge or other security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
 
 means a loan referred to in and made pursuant to .
Loan
Section 2.1
Section 2.4
 
 means this Agreement, each Note issued pursuant to and each Letter of Credit and the related documentation.
Loan Documents
Section 2.6
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
10
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Regulation U.
Margin Stock
 
 means a material adverse change in (a) the financial condition, operations, business or property of (ii) the Borrower or (ii) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, (b) the ability of the Borrower to perform its obligations under the Loan Documents or (c) the ability of the Credit Parties to enforce their rights and remedies under the Loan Documents.
Material Adverse Change
 
 means a material adverse effect on (a) the financial condition, operations, business or property of (i) the Borrower or (ii) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, (b) the ability of the Borrower to perform its obligations under the Loan Documents, or (c) the ability of the Credit Parties to enforce their rights and remedies under the Loan Documents.
Material Adverse Effect
 
 means as of any date, Indebtedness (other than Indebtedness under the Loan Documents) or operating leases of any one or more of the Borrower or any Subsidiary or, in the case of the Borrower only, any Guarantee, in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $35,000,000.  For purposes of determining Material Obligations, the principal amount of Indebtedness, operating leases or Guarantees at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, would be required to pay if such Indebtedness, operating leases or Guarantees became due and payable on such day.
Material Obligations
 
 means June 30, 2015.
Maturity Date
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereto.
Moodys
 
 means the Mortgage and Deed of Trust, dated as of September 1, 1945, among the Borrower, The Bank of New York Mellon (formerly Irving Trust Company) and Ming Ryan (successor to Richard H. West), Trustees.
Mortgage
 
 means the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
MPUC
 
 means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
New Lender
Section 2.5(d)
 
 means a promissory note substantially in the form of issued at the request of a Lender pursuant to to evidence its Loans.
Note
Exhibit C
Section 2.6(e)
 
 means (a) the due and punctual payment of (i) principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise, and (b) all other monetary obligations, including reimbursement obligations in respect of LC Disbursements, fees, commissions, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar
Obligations
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
11
proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Borrower to the Lenders, or that are otherwise payable to any Credit Party, in each case under the Loan Documents and (c) the due and punctual performance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Borrower under or pursuant to the Loan Documents.
 
 means any and all current or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made hereunder or from the execution or delivery of, or performance under, or otherwise with respect to, the Loan Documents.
Other Taxes
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Participant
Section 10.4(d)
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Patriot Act
Section 10.14
 
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA.
PBGC
 
 means:
Permitted Encumbrances
 
(a)
 
Liens imposed by law for taxes, assessments or similar charges incurred in the ordinary course of business that are not yet due or are being contested in compliance with , that enforcement of such Liens is stayed pending such contest;
Section 6.4
provided
 
(b)
 
landlords, vendors, carriers, warehousemens, mechanics, materialmens, contractors, repairmens and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations which are not delinquent or are being contested, that enforcement of such Liens is stayed pending such contest;
provided
 
(c)
 
pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations (but not ERISA);
 
(d)
 
pledges and deposits to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, purchase agreements, government contracts, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business, and other than promissory notes and contracts for the repayment of borrowed money;
 
(e)
 
Liens (including contractual security interests) in favor of a financial institution (including securities firms) encumbering deposit accounts or checks or instruments for collection, commodity accounts or securities accounts (including the right of set-off) at or held by such financial institution in the ordinary course of its commercial business and which secure only liabilities owed to such financial institution arising out of or resulting from its maintenance of such account or otherwise are within the general parameters customary in the financial industry;
 
(f)
 
judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under of ;
paragraph (k)
Article 8
 
(g)
 
any interest of a lessor or licensor in property under an operating lease under which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is lessee or licensee, and any restriction or encumbrance to which the interest of such lessor or licensor is subject;
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
12
(h)
 
Liens arising from filed UCC-1 financing statements relating solely to leases not prohibited by this Agreement;
 
(i)
 
leases or subleases granted to others that do not materially interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries;
 
(j)
 
licenses of Intellectual Property granted by the Borrower or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business and not materially interfering with the ordinary conduct of the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries;
 
(k)
 
easements, servitudes (contractual and legal), zoning restrictions, rights of way, encroachments, minor defects and irregularities in title and other similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not render title to such property unmarketable or materially interfere with the ability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, as the case may be, to utilize their respective properties for their intended purposes;
 
(l)
 
Liens securing obligations, neither assumed by the Borrower or any Subsidiary nor on account of which the Borrower or any Subsidiary customarily pays interest, upon real estate on which the Borrower or any Subsidiary has a right-of-way, easement, franchise or other servitude or of which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is the lessee, for the purpose of locating transmission and distribution lines and related support structures, pipe lines, substations, measuring stations, tanks, pumping or delivery equipment or similar equipment, or service buildings incidental to any of the foregoing;
 
(m)
 
with respect to properties involved in the production of oil, gas and other minerals, unitization and pooling agreements and orders, operating agreements, royalties, reversionary interests, preferential purchase rights, farmout agreements, gas balancing agreements and other agreements, in each case that are customary in the oil, gas and mineral production business in the general area of such property and that are entered into in the ordinary course of business;
 
(n)
 
Liens in favor of Governmental Authorities encumbering assets acquired in connection with a government grant program, and the right reserved to, or vested in, any Governmental Authority by the terms of any right, power, franchise, grant, license, or permit, or by any provision of law, to purchase, condemn, recapture or designate a purchaser of any property;
 
(o)
 
Liens on Margin Stock to the extent that a prohibition on such Liens would violate Regulation U;
 
(p)
 
Liens on any cash collateral for Letters of Credit issued under this Agreement or for a Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure;
 
(q)
 
customary Liens for the fees and expenses of trustees and escrow agents pursuant to any indenture, escrow agreement or similar agreement establishing a trust or escrow arrangement;
 
(r)
 
agreements for and obligations (other than repayment of borrowed money) relating to the joint or common ownership, operation, and use of property, including Liens under joint venture or similar agreements securing obligations incurred in the conduct of operations or
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
13
consisting of a purchase option, call or right of first refusal with respect to the Equity Interests in such jointly owned Person; and
 
(s)
 
Liens granted on cash or invested funds constituting proceeds of any sale or disposition of property deposited into escrow accounts to secure indemnification, adjustment of purchase price or similar obligations incurred in connection with such sale or disposition, in an amount not to exceed the amount of gross proceeds received from such sale or disposition.
 
 means any Hedge Agreement engaged in by a Person as part of its normal business operations with the purpose and effect of hedging and protecting such Person against fluctuations or adverse changes in the prices of electricity, gas, fuel or other commodities, interest rates or currency exchange rates, which Hedge Agreement is part of a risk management strategy and not for purposes of speculation and not intended primarily as a borrowing of funds.
Permitted Hedge Agreement
 
 means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
 
 means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an employer as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
 
  means the rate of interest publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase as its prime rate at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate being effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.  The Prime Rate is not intended to be lowest rate of interest charged by JPMorgan Chase in connection with extensions of credit to borrowers.
Prime Rate
per annum
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Properties
Section 4.6(a)
 
 means Fitch, Moodys and S&P (or, if any of the foregoing ceases to provide Senior Debt Ratings as contemplated hereby, such other nationally recognized rating agency as shall be agreed by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent).
Rating Agencies
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Register
Section 10.4(c)
 
 means Regulation D of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation D
 
 means Regulation T of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation T
 
 means Regulation U of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation U
 
 means Regulation X of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation X
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
14
 means, with respect to any specified Person, such Persons Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Persons Affiliates.
Related Parties
 
 means (a) remedial action as such term is defined in CERCLA, 42 U.S.C. Section 9601(24), and (b) all other actions required by any Governmental Authority or voluntarily undertaken to: (i) clean up, remove, treat, abate or in any other way address any Hazardous Material in the environment; (ii) prevent the Release or threat of Release, or minimize the further Release of any Hazardous Material so it does not migrate or endanger or threaten to endanger public health, welfare or the environment; or (iii) perform studies and investigations in connection with, or as a precondition to, or above.
Remedial Action
clause (i)
(ii)
 
 means in the event that as a result of the deposit of cash collateral with the Administrative Agent pursuant to the Borrower (a) is not required to grant a security interest in such cash collateral to any other Person, an amount equal to the LC Exposure on the date on which cash collateral is required to be deposited, or (b) is required to grant a security interest in such cash collateral to any other Person, an amount equal to the LC Exposure on the date on which cash collateral is required to be deposited multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the sum of the LC Exposure the principal amount of all other obligations to be secured by such cash collateral and the denominator of which is the amount of such LC Exposure.
Required Deposit Amount
Section 2.8(i)
plus
 
 means, at any time, Lenders having unused Commitments, LC Exposure and outstanding Loans representing more than 50% of the sum of the unused Commitments, LC Exposure and outstanding Loans of all Lenders.
Required Lenders
 
 means, as to any Person, (a) any dividend or other distribution by such Person (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests of such Person, (b) any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancellation or termination of any such Equity Interests in such Person and (c) any payment of principal or interest or any purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition or defeasance with respect to any Indebtedness of such Person that is subordinated to the payment of Obligations.
Restricted Payment
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Group, a Standard & Poors Financial Services LLC business, or any successor thereto.
S&P
 
 means the Securities and Exchange Commission or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
SEC
 
 means, at any date, the credit rating identified by a Rating Agency as the credit rating that (i) it has assigned to long term unsecured senior debt of the Borrower or (ii) would assign to long term unsecured senior debt of the Borrower were the Borrower to issue or have outstanding any long term unsecured senior debt on such date.
Senior Debt Rating
 
 means the date on which the Administrative Agent has received signature pages hereto signed by all of the Borrower and each Lender.
Signing Date
 
 means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages, if any, (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental
Statutory Reserve Rate
minus
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
15
reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which member banks of the United States Federal Reserve System in New York City with deposits exceeding $250,000,000 are subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as  in Regulation D).  Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to Regulation D.  Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under Regulation D or any comparable regulation.  The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Eurocurrency liabilities
 
 means, as to any Person, any corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture or other business entity of which such Person or any Subsidiary of such Person, directly or indirectly, either (i) in respect of a corporation, owns or controls more than 50% of the outstanding Equity Interests having ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or similar managing body, irrespective of whether a class or classes shall or might have voting power by reason of the happening of any contingency, or (ii) in respect of an association, partnership, joint venture or other business entity, is entitled to share in more than 50% of the profits and losses, however determined.  Unless the context otherwise requires, any reference to a Subsidiary shall be deemed to refer to a Subsidiary of the Borrower.
Subsidiary
 
 means any present or future tax, levy, assessment, impost, duty, charge, fee, deduction or withholding of any nature, and whatever called, by a Governmental Authority, on whomsoever and wherever imposed, levied, collected, withheld or assessed.
Tax
 
 means, as to any Person, a Tax imposed by the jurisdiction in which that Persons principal office (and/or, in the case of a Lender, its lending office in the United States of America designated in its Administrative Questionnaire or such other office as such Lender may designate in writing to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower) is located, or by any political subdivision or taxing authority thereof, or in which that Person is deemed to be doing business, except to the extent such Person is doing business solely as a result of negotiation, execution, delivery or performance of the Transactions contemplated by this Agreement, imposed on (or measured by) all or part of the net income, profits or gains of that Person (whether worldwide, or only insofar as such income, profits or gains are considered to arise in or to relate to a particular jurisdiction, or otherwise).
Tax on the Overall Net Income
 
 means, at any time, the difference between (a) the sum of each of the following at such time with respect to the Borrower and the Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP: (i) preferred Equity Interests, (ii) common Equity Interests and any premium on Equity Interests thereon (as such term is used in the Borrower Financial Statements), excluding accumulated other comprehensive income or loss, (iii) retained earnings, (iv) Total Indebtedness, and (b) (i) stock of the Borrower acquired by the Borrower and (ii) stock of a Subsidiary acquired by such Subsidiary, in each case at such time, as applicable, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Total Capitalization
plus
plus
plus
 
 means at any time, all Indebtedness (net of unamortized premium and discount (as such term is used in the Financial Statements)) at such time of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Total Indebtedness
 
 means (a) the execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of each Loan Document to which it is a party, (b) the borrowing of the Loans and the issuance of the Letters of Credit and (c) the use of the proceeds of the Loans and the Letters of Credit.
Transactions
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
16
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to (a) the Adjusted LIBO Rate or (b) the Alternate Base Rate.  For the avoidance of doubt, a Loan that bears interest at a rate determined pursuant to of the definition of Alternate Base Rate shall, for all purposes of this Agreement, be deemed to be an ABR Loan and not a Eurodollar Loan.
Type
clause (c)
 
 means a security which ordinarily has voting power for the election of the board of directors (or other governing body), whether at all times or only so long as no senior class of Equity Interests has such voting power by reason of any contingency.
Voting Security
 
  means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
 means the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
WPS
 
 
Section 1.2.
 
.  For purposes of this Agreement, (a) Loans may be classified and referred to by Type (, a ) and (b) Borrowings may also be classified and referred to by Type (, a ).
Classification of Loans and Borrowings
e.g.
Eurodollar Loan
e.g.
Eurodollar Borrowing
 
Section 1.3.
 
.  The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined.  Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms.  The words include, includes and including shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase without limitation.  The word will shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word shall.  Unless the context requires otherwise, (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, (b) any definition of or reference to any law shall be construed as referring to such law as from time to time amended and any successor thereto and the rules and regulations promulgated from time to time thereunder, (c) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Persons successors and assigns, (d) the words herein, hereof and hereunder, and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (e) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement, (f) the words asset and property shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights, and (g) any reference to a fiscal quarter or fiscal year means a fiscal quarter or fiscal year of the Borrower.
Terms Generally
 
Section 1.4.
 
.  Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, as used in the Loan Documents and in any certificate, opinion or other document made or delivered pursuant thereto, accounting terms not defined in , and accounting terms partly defined in , to the extent not defined, shall have the respective meanings given to them under GAAP.  If at any time any change in GAAP (including any change to the International Financial Reporting Standards by the International Accounting Standards Board or other method of accounting, as may hereafter be required or permitted by the SEC) would affect the computation of any financial requirement set forth in this Agreement, the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Borrower shall
Accounting Terms; GAAP
Section 1.1
Section 1.1
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
17
negotiate in good faith to amend such requirement to reflect such change in GAAP (subject to the approval of the Required Lenders), that, until so amended, (a) such requirement shall continue to be computed in accordance with GAAP prior to such change therein and (b) the Borrower shall provide to the Credit Parties financial statements and other documents required under this Agreement or as reasonably requested hereunder setting forth a reconciliation between calculations of such requirement made before and after giving effect to such change in GAAP.
provided
 
Section 1.5.
 
.  Any financial ratios required to be maintained by the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement shall be calculated by dividing the appropriate component by the other component, carrying the result to one place more than the number of places by which such ratio is expressed herein and rounding the result up or down to the nearest number (with a rounding-up if there is no nearest number).
Rounding
 
 
 
Section 2.1.
 
.  Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, each Lender severally agrees to make Loans to the Borrower in dollars from time to time during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in such Lenders Credit Exposure exceeding such Lenders Commitment.  Within the foregoing limits, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Loans.
Commitments
 
Section 2.2.
 
.
Loans and Borrowings
 
(a)
 
Each Loan shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments.  The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder, that the Commitments of the Lenders are several, and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lenders failure to make any Loan as required.
provided
 
(b)
 
Subject to , each Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans, as applicable, in each case as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith.  Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan (and any ABR Loan, the interest on which is determined pursuant to of the definition of Alternate Base Rate) by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan, that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
Section 3.4
clause (c)
provided
 
(c)
 
At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is $5,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of $1,000,000.  At the time that each ABR Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is $5,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of $1,000,000, that an ABR Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the total Commitments or in an aggregate amount that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by .  Borrowings of more than one Type may be outstanding at the same time, that there shall not at any time be more than a total of ten Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
provided
Section 2.8(e)
provided
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
18
(d)
 
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
 
Section 2.3.
 
.
Requests for Borrowings
 
(a)
 
To request a Borrowing, the Borrower shall deliver a Credit Request to the Administrative Agent by hand or facsimile (or transmit by electronic communication, pursuant to arrangements for doing so approved by the Administrative Agent) or notify the Administrative Agent by telephone, in each case to be promptly confirmed by the delivery to the Administrative Agent of a signed Credit Request (i) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 12:30 p.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (ii) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 12:30 p.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing.  Each such Credit Request (including each such telephonic request) shall be irrevocable (except as otherwise provided in ) and shall specify the following information in compliance with :
Section 3.4
Section 2.2
 
(i)
 
the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing;
 
(ii)
 
the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)
 
whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
 
(iv)
 
in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period; and
 
(v)
 
the location and number of the Borrowers account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of .
Section 2.4
 
(b)
 
If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing.  If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration.  Promptly following receipt of a Credit Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lenders Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
 
Section 2.4.
 
.
Funding of Borrowings
 
(a)
 
Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 2:00 p.m., New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders.  Subject to , the Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower by promptly crediting or otherwise transferring the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Borrower designated by the Borrower in the applicable Credit Request, that ABR Loans made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the applicable Issuing Bank.
Section 5.2
provided
Section 2.9(e)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
19
(b)
 
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lenders share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with or and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower or the applicable Issuing Bank, as applicable, a corresponding amount.  In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower (and, if applicable, the applicable Issuing Bank) severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower or such Issuing Bank, as applicable, to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender or an Issuing Bank, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate that would be otherwise applicable to such Borrowing.  Any payment by the Borrower or an Issuing Bank, however, shall be without prejudice to its rights against the applicable Lender.  If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lenders Loan included in such Borrowing.
Section 2.4(a)
Section 2.9(e)
 
Section 2.5.
 
.
Termination, Reduction and Increase of Commitments
 
(a)
 
Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Maturity Date.
 
(b)
 
The Borrower may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Commitments, that (i) the Borrower shall not terminate or reduce the Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment or repayment of the Loans in accordance with , the sum of the Credit Exposures would exceed the total Commitments and (ii) each such reduction of the Commitments shall be in the amount of $5,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of $1,000,000.
provided
Section 2.7
 
(c)
 
The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof.  Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable, that a notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Borrower may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied.  Each reduction, and any termination, of the Commitments shall be permanent and each reduction of the Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
paragraph (b)
provided
 
(d)
 
The Borrower may at any time and from time to time prior to the Maturity Date, at its sole cost, expense and effort, request any one or more of the Lenders to increase its Commitment (the decision to increase the Commitment of a Lender to be within the sole and absolute discretion of such Lender), or any other Person reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks to provide a new Commitment, by submitting to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks an Increase Supplement duly executed by the Borrower and each such Lender or other Person, as the case may be, together with such other documentation and deliveries as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably require (which may include copies of resolutions authorizing
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
20
such increase and/or opinion of counsel).  If such Increase Supplement is in all respects reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks, the Administrative Agent shall execute such Increase Supplement and the Administrative Agent shall deliver a copy thereof to the Borrower and each such Lender or other Person, as the case may be.  Upon execution and delivery of such Increase Supplement by the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks, (i) in the case of each such Lender (an ), its Commitment shall be increased to the amount set forth in such Increase Supplement, (ii) in the case of each such other Person (a ), such New Lender shall become a party hereto and have the rights and obligations of a Lender under the Loan Documents and its Commitment shall be as set forth in such Increase Supplement; that:
Increasing Lender
New Lender
provided
 
(A)
 
immediately after giving effect thereto, the sum of all increases (other than any increase in any Lenders Commitment in order to replace another Lender pursuant to ) in the aggregate Commitments made pursuant to this shall not exceed the sum of (x) $100,000,000 plus (y) the amount of the Commitment of each Lender that becomes a Defaulting Lender;
Section 3.8(b)
Section 2.5(d)
 
(B)
 
each such increase of the aggregate Commitments shall be in an amount not less than $10,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of $5,000,000;
 
(C)
 
if Loans would be outstanding immediately after giving effect to any such increase, then simultaneously with such increase (1) each such Increasing Lender, each New Lender and each other Lender shall be deemed to have entered into an Assignment and Assumption, pursuant to which each such other Lender shall have assigned to each such Increasing Lender and each such New Lender a portion of its Commitment, Loans and LC Exposure necessary to reflect proportionately the Commitments as adjusted in accordance with this , and (2) in connection with such assignment, each such Increasing Lender and each such New Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of each such other Lender, such amount as shall be necessary to reflect the assignment to it of Loans, and in connection with such master assignment each such other Lender may treat the assignment of Eurodollar Borrowings as a prepayment of such Eurodollar Borrowings for purposes of ;
clause (d)
Section 3.6
 
(D)
 
each such other Person shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower all forms, if any, that are required to be delivered by such other Person pursuant to ; and
Section 3.7
 
(E)
 
the Borrower shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent with sufficient copies for each Lender a certificate of a Financial Officer demonstrating pro forma compliance with the terms of this Agreement through the Maturity Date and the Administrative Agent shall have received such certificates and other items as it shall reasonably request in connection with such increase.
 
Section 2.6.
 
.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
 
(a)
 
The Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Loan on the Maturity Date.
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
21
(b)
 
Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the debt of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
 
(c)
 
The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Type thereof and the Interest Period, if any, applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lenders share thereof.
 
(d)
 
The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to or of this Section shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein, that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
paragraph (b)
(c)
provided
 
(e)
 
Any Lender may request that its Loans be evidenced by a Note.  In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a Note payable to the order of such Lender.  Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such Note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after any assignment pursuant to ) be represented by a Note payable to the order of the payee named therein or any Eligible Assignee pursuant to , except to the extent that any such Lender or Eligible Assignee subsequently returns any such Note for cancellation and requests that such Loans once again be evidenced as described in and above.
Section 10.4
Section 10.4
paragraphs (b)
(c)
 
Section 2.7.
 
.
Prepayment of Loans
 
(a)
 
.  The Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to the requirements of this Section.
Voluntary Prepayments
 
(b)
 
.  In the event of any partial reduction or termination of the Commitments, then (i) at or prior to the date of such reduction or termination, the Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the sum of the Credit Exposures after giving effect thereto and (ii) if such sum would exceed the total Commitments after giving effect to such reduction or termination, then the Borrower shall, on the date of such reduction or termination, prepay Borrowings in an amount sufficient to eliminate such excess.
Prepayments Resulting from the Reduction of the Total Commitments
 
(c)
 
.  The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of any prepayment hereunder, (i) in the case of a prepayment of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:30 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment or (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:30 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the prepayment.  Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid, that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Commitments as contemplated by , then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with .  Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing under shall, when added to the amount of each concurrent reduction of
Notice of Prepayment; Application of Prepayments
provided
Section 2.5
Section 2.5
Section 2.7(a)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
22
the Commitments and prepayment of Borrowings under such Sections, be in an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 (or, if the outstanding principal balance of the Revolving Loans is less than such minimum amount, then such lesser outstanding principal balance, as the case may be).  Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing.  Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by .  Notwithstanding any provision of this to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the provisions of shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender.
Section 3.1
Section 2.7(c)
Section 2.11
 
Section 2.8.
 
.
Extension of Maturity Date
 
The Borrower may, on one occasion during the term of this Agreement, request an extension of the Maturity Date for up to one additional one-year period by submitting a request for extension to the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly advise each Lender) (an ) not more than 75 days nor less than 30 days prior to any anniversary of the date of the Effective Date (each an ).  In response to such request, each Lender shall, not later than 20 days prior to the applicable Anniversary Date, notify the Administrative Agent whether it is willing (in its sole and complete discretion) to extend the scheduled Maturity Date for an additional year (and any Lender that fails to give such notice to the Agent shall be deemed to have elected not to extend the scheduled Maturity Date).  The Administrative Agent will notify the Borrower of the Lenders decisions no later than 15 days prior to such Anniversary Date.  If Lenders holding more than 50% of the Commitments elect to extend the scheduled Maturity Date, then on such Anniversary Date the Commitments of such Lenders shall be extended for an additional year; that (i) no Default exists on such Anniversary Date and (ii) all representations and warranties are true and correct on such Anniversary Date, as though made as of such Anniversary Date (or, if any such representation or warranty is expressly stated to have been made as of a specific date, as of such specific date).  No Lender shall be required to consent to any Extension Request and any Lender that elects, or is deemed to have elected, not to extend the scheduled Maturity Date (a ) will have its Commitment terminated on the then existing scheduled Maturity Date (without regard to any extension by other Lenders).  The Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to any Declining Lender and the Administrative Agent, require any Declining Lender to assign and delegate its rights and obligations under this Agreement to an Eligible Assignee selected by the Borrower and willing to accept such assignment (in accordance with, and subject to, the restrictions and consents otherwise required for assignments generally).
Extension Request
Anniversary Date
provided
Declining Lender
Section 2.9.
 
.
Letters of Credit
 
(a)
 
.  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may request the issuance of Letters of Credit denominated in dollars for its own account, in a form acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank, at any time and from time to time during the period from the Effective Date to the tenth Business Day preceding the last day of the Availability Period; that (i) the aggregate amount of the Credit Exposure of all Lenders shall not exceed the total Commitments and (ii) the aggregate amount of all LC Exposure shall not at any time exceed $40,000,000.  In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrower to, or entered into by the Borrower with, an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
General
provided
 
(b)
 
.  To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an
Notice of Issuance; Amendment; Renewal; Extension; Certain Conditions
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
23
outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower shall hand deliver or facsimile (or transmit by electronic communication, pursuant to arrangements for doing so approved by the applicable Issuing Bank) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (not later than three Business Days before the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a CreditRequest requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit.  If requested by an Issuing Bank, the Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on such Issuing Banks standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit.  A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and, upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension, (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $40,000,000 and (ii) the total Credit Exposures shall not exceed the total Commitments.
 
paragraph (c)
 
(c)
 
.  Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date that is one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension), and (ii) the date that is ten Business Days prior to the Maturity Date, that any Letter of Credit may provide for the automatic renewal thereof for any period (unless the applicable Issuing Bank elects not to extend) so long as such period ends (x) at least ten Business Days prior to the Maturity Date or (y) if the Borrower shall have deposited cash collateral with the Administrative Agent to the extent required by for such Letter of Credit, not later than the first anniversary of the Maturity Date.
Expiration Date
provided
Section 2.9(i)
 
(d)
 
.  By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the applicable  Issuing Bank or the Lenders, such Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Lender and each Lender hereby acquires from such Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lenders Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit.  In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each such Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of such Issuing Bank, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by such Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrower on the date due as provided in of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason.  Each such Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever; that no Lender shall be obligated to make any payment to the Administrative Agent for any wrongful LC Disbursement made by an Issuing Bank as a result of acts or omissions constituting willful misconduct or gross negligence on the part of such Issuing Bank.
Participations
paragraph (e)
provided
 
(e)
 
.  If any Issuing Bank shall make an LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, then such Issuing Bank shall either (i) notify the Borrower to reimburse such Issuing Bank therefor, in which case the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement and any accrued interest thereon not later than 2:00 p.m. on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the
Reimbursement
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
24
Borrower shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 11:00 a.m. on such date, or if such notice has not been received by the Borrower prior to such time on such date, then not later than 2:00 p.m. on the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower receives such notice, that, if the LC Disbursement is equal to or greater than $1,000,000, the Borrower may, subject to the conditions of borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with or this that such payment be financed with an ABR Borrowing in an equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrowers obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Borrowing, and/or (ii) notify the Administrative Agent that such Issuing Bank is requesting that the Lenders make an ABR Borrowing in an amount equal to such LC Disbursement and any accrued interest thereon, in which case (A) the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lenders Loan to be made as part of such ABR Borrowing, and (B) each Lender shall, whether or not any Default shall have occurred and be continuing, any representation or warranty shall be accurate, any condition to the making of any Loan hereunder shall have been fulfilled, or any other matter whatsoever, make the Loan to be made by it under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders on (1) the Business Day that such Lender receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the day of receipt or (2) the Business Day immediately following the day that such Lender receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt.  Such Loans shall, for all purposes hereof, be deemed to be an ABR Borrowing referred to in and made pursuant to , and the Lenders obligations to make such Loans shall be absolute and unconditional.  The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the applicable Issuing Bank by promptly crediting or otherwise transferring the amounts so received, in like funds, to such Issuing Bank for the purpose of repaying in full the LC Disbursement and all accrued interest thereon.
provided
Section 2.3
Section 2.9
Section 2.2(a)
Section 2.3
 
(f)
 
.  The Borrowers obligations to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or any Loan Document, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent, insufficient or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by any Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, (iv) any amendment or waiver of or any consent to departure from all or any of the provisions of any Letter of Credit or any Loan Document, (v) the existence of any claim, set-off, defense or other right that the Borrower, any other party guaranteeing, or otherwise obligated with, such Borrower, any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof or any other Person may at any time have against the beneficiary under any Letter of Credit, any Credit Party or any other Person, whether in connection with this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other related or unrelated agreement or transaction, or (vi) any other act or omission to act or delay of any kind of any Credit Party or any other Person or any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of set-off against, the Borrowers obligations hereunder.  Neither any Credit Party nor any of their respective Related Parties shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation
Obligations Absolute
paragraph (e)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
25
of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of any Issuing Bank; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse an Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrower to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrower to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrower that are caused by any Issuing Banks failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof.  The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of any Issuing Bank (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), such Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination.  In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, any Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
provided
 
(g)
 
.  Each Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit.  Each Issuing Bank shall promptly notify (which may include telephonic notice, promptly confirmed by facsimile) the Administrative Agent and the Borrower of such demand for payment and whether the Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures
provided
 
(h)
 
.  If any Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate then applicable to ABR Loans; that, if the Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to of this Section, then shall apply.  Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the applicable Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to of this Section to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
Interim Interest
per annum
provided
paragraph (e)
Section 3.1(b)
paragraph (e)
 
(i)
 
.  In the event that (i) an Event of Default shall occur and be continuing or (ii) any Letter of Credit has an expiry date on or after the tenth Business Day prior to the Maturity Date (or any LC Disbursements remain unreimbursed on or after such date), the Borrower shall deposit with the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds on the Business Day on which it receives notice from the Administrative Agent or Required Lenders demanding the deposit of cash collateral in the case of , or on or before the tenth Business Day prior to the Maturity Date or such earlier date as shall be requested by the applicable Issuing Bank in the case of , an amount equal to the Required Deposit Amount, which amount shall be held by the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders as cash collateral pursuant to a cash collateral agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Banks to secure the Borrowers reimbursement obligations with respect to LC Disbursements; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default described in or of .  Such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Borrower
Cash Collateral
clause (i)
clause (ii)
provided
paragraph (i)
(j)
Article 8
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
26
under this Agreement.  The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account.  Such deposit shall not bear interest, nor shall the Administrative Agent be under any obligation whatsoever to invest the same, that, at the request of the Borrower, such deposit shall be invested by the Administrative Agent in direct short term obligations of, or short term obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America, in each case maturing no later than the expiry date of the Letter of Credit giving rise to the relevant LC Exposure.  Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account.  Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrower for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of Required Lenders), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement.  If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.  If the Borrower is required to provide cash collateral hereunder as a result of of the first sentence of this paragraph, the amount thereof (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower when the LC Exposure is zero and all applicable Letters of Credit shall have been returned to the applicable Issuing Banks and shall have been cancelled.
provided
clause (ii)
 
(j)
 
Notwithstanding any provision of this to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the provisions of shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender.
Section 2.9
Section 2.11
 
Section 2.10.
 
.
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs
 
(a)
 
The Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder or under any other Loan Document (whether of principal of Loans, LC Disbursements, interest or fees, or of amounts payable under , , or , or otherwise) prior to 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim.  Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon.  All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its office at 10 S. Dearborn, Chicago, Illinois, or such other office as to which the Administrative Agent may notify the other parties hereto, except that payments pursuant to (with respect to the fronting fee and other amounts payable to the Issuing Banks), , , , and shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto.  The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof.  If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension.  All payments hereunder shall be made in dollars.
Sections 3.5
3.6
3.7
10.3
Sections 3.3(b)
3.3(c)
3.5
3.6
3.7
10.3
 
(b)
 
Each Borrowing, each payment or prepayment of principal of any Borrowing, each payment of interest on the Loans, each payment of fees, each reduction of the Commitments and each conversion of any Borrowing to or continuation of any Borrowing as a Borrowing of any Type shall be allocated pro rata among the Lenders in accordance with their respective applicable Commitments (or, if such Commitments shall have expired or been terminated, in accordance with the respective principal amounts of their outstanding Loans).  Each Lender agrees that in computing such
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
27
Lenders portion of any Borrowing to be made hereunder, the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion, round each Lenders percentage of such Borrowing to the next higher or lower whole dollar amount.  If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal of Loans, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest, fees and commissions then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest, fees and commissions then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest, fees and commissions then due to such parties and (ii) second, towards payment of principal of Loans and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal of Loans and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
 
(c)
 
If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of, or interest on, any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans and participations in LC Disbursements of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of, and accrued interest on, their respective Loans and participations in LC Disbursements, that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply).  The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
 
(d)
 
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the applicable Credit Parties hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to such Credit Parties the amount due.  In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each such Credit Party severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Credit Party with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
 
(e)
 
If any Credit Party shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to or , then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), (i) apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Credit Party to satisfy such Credit Partys obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid and (ii) hold any such amounts
Section 2.4(b)
2.10(d)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
28
in a segregated account as cash collateral for, and application to, any future funding obligations of such Lender under such Sections; in the case of each of (i) and (ii) above, in any order as determined by the Administrative Agent in its discretion.  Notwithstanding any provision of this to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the provisions of shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender.
Section 2.10
Section 2.11
 
Section 2.11.
 
.  Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
Defaulting Lenders
 
(a)
 
Fees pursuant to shall cease to accrue on the unfunded portion of the Commitment of such Defaulting Lender.
Section 3.3(a)
 
(b)
 
If any LC Exposure exists at the time a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender then:
 
(i)
 
All or any part of such LC Exposure shall be reallocated among the non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages but only to the extent (x) the sum of all non-Defaulting Lenders Credit Exposures plus such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure does not exceed the total of all non-Defaulting Lenders Commitments and (y) the conditions set forth in are satisfied at such time;
Section 5.2
 
(ii)
 
If the reallocation described in above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Borrower shall within two (2) Business Days following notice by the Administrative Agent cash collateralize such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure (after giving effect to any partial reallocation pursuant to above) in accordance with the procedures set forth in for so long as such LC Exposure is outstanding;
clause (i)
clause (i)
Section 2.9(i)
 
(iii)
 
If the Borrower cash collateralizes any portion of such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure pursuant to this , the Borrower shall not be required to pay any fees to such Defaulting Lender pursuant to with respect to such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure during the period such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure is cash collateralized;
Section 2.11(b)
Section 3.3(b)
 
(iv)
 
If the LC Exposure of the non-Defaulting Lenders is reallocated pursuant to this , then the fees payable to the Lenders pursuant to and shall be adjusted in accordance with such non-Defaulting Lenders Applicable Percentages;
Section 2.11(b)
Sections 3.3(a)
3.3(b)
 
(v)
 
If any Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure is neither cash collateralized nor reallocated pursuant to this , then, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the Issuing Banks or any Lender hereunder, all letter of credit fees payable under with respect to such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure shall be payable to the applicable Issuing Banks until such LC Exposure is cash collateralized and/or reallocated; and
Section 2.11(b)
Section 3.3(b)
 
(vi)
 
If and so long as any Lender is a Defaulting Lender, no Issuing Bank shall be required to issue, amend or increase any Letter of Credit, unless it is satisfied
ALLETE Credit Agreement
29
 
that the related exposure will be 100% covered by the Commitments of the non-Defaulting Lenders or cash collateral will be provided by the Borrower in accordance with this , and participating interests in any such newly issued or increased Letter of Credit shall be allocated among non-Defaulting Lenders in a manner consistent with (and Defaulting Lenders shall not participate therein).
Section 2.11(b)
Section 2.11(b)(i)
 
(c)
 
The Commitments and Credit Exposure of such Defaulting Lender shall not be included in determining whether all Lenders or the Required Lenders have voted or taken or may take any action hereunder (including any consent to any amendment, modification or waiver pursuant to ); that (i) any waiver, amendment or modification requiring the consent of all Lenders or each affected Lender which affects such Defaulting Lender differently than other affected Lenders shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender and (ii) any amendment or modification that increases, or extends the maturity of, such Defaulting Lenders Commitment or reduces the principal amount of, or rate of interest on, any Loan made by such Defaulting Lender, shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender.
Section 10.2
provided
 
(d)
 
In the event that the Administrative Agent, the Borrower and each Issuing Bank agree that a Defaulting Lender has adequately remedied all matters that caused such Lender to be a Defaulting Lender, then the LC Exposure of the Lenders shall be readjusted to reflect the inclusion of such Lenders Commitments and on such date such Lender shall purchase at par such of the Loans of the other Lenders as the Administrative Agent shall determine may be necessary in order for such Lender to hold such Loans in accordance with its Applicable Percentage, and all cash collateral and accrued interest thereon held by the Administrative Agent or the applicable Issuing Banks shall be returned to the Borrower forthwith.
 
 
 
Section 3.1.
 
.
Interest
 
(a)
 
The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate the Applicable Margin.  The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing the Applicable Margin.
plus
plus
 
(b)
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan, any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraph of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% the rate applicable to ABR Borrowings as provided in the preceding paragraph of this Section.
per annum
plus
plus
 
(c)
 
Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan, that (i) interest accrued pursuant to of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan, accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such
provided
paragraph (b)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
30
repayment or prepayment, and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
 
(d)
 
All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).  The applicable Alternate Base Rate, Adjusted LIBO Rate or LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent clearly demonstrable error.  The Administrative Agent shall, as soon as practicable, notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the effective date and the amount of each change in the Prime Rate or ABR, but any failure to so notify shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to pay interest on the Loans in the amounts and on the dates required.
 
Section 3.2.
 
.
Interest Elections Relating to Borrowings
 
(a)
 
Each Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Credit Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Credit Request.  Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section.  The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing.
 
(b)
 
To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a signed Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent (or notify the Administrative Agent by telephone, to be promptly confirmed by delivery to the Administrative Agent of a signed Interest Election Request) by the time that a Credit Request would be required under if the Borrower were requesting a Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election.
Section 2.3
 
(c)
 
Each such telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable (except as otherwise provided in ) and shall specify the following information:
Section 3.4
 
(i)
 
the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to and of this paragraph shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
clauses (iii)
(iv)
 
(ii)
 
the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)
 
whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
31
(iv)
 
if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period.
 
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration.
 
(d)
 
Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lenders portion of each resulting Borrowing.
 
(e)
 
If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period, such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing.  Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing, (i) no outstanding Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
 
Section 3.3.
 
.
Fees
 
(a)
 
The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender, a facility fee, which shall accrue at a rate equal to the Applicable Margin on the daily amount of the Commitment of such Lender (regardless of usage) during the period from and including the date on which this Agreement becomes effective pursuant to to but excluding the date on which such Commitment terminates; that, if such Lender continues to have any Credit Exposure after its Commitment terminates, then such facility fee shall continue to accrue on the daily amount of such Lenders Credit Exposure from and including the date on which such Lenders Commitment terminates to but excluding the date on which such Lender ceases to have any Credit Exposure.  Accrued facility fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year, each date on which the Commitments are permanently reduced and on the date on which the Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date, that all unpaid facility fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and that facility fees which accrue after the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand.  All facility fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
per annum
Section 10.6
provided
provided
provided
further
 
(b)
 
The Borrower agrees to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at a rate equal to the Applicable Margin on the average daily amount of such Lenders LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lenders Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure and (ii) to each Issuing Bank for its own account a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate or rates separately agreed upon between the Borrower and each Issuing Bank on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC
per annum
per annum
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
32
Exposure, as well as each Issuing Banks standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder.  Accrued participation fees and fronting fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand.  Any other fees payable to any Issuing Bank pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within ten days after demand.  All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
provided
 
(c)
 
The Borrower agrees to pay to each Credit Party, for its own account, fees and other amounts payable in the amounts and at the times separately agreed upon in writing between the Borrower and such Credit Party.
 
(d)
 
All fees and other amounts payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds.  Fees and other amounts paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances other than clearly demonstrable error.
 
Section 3.4.
 
.  If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest
 
(a)
 
the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period; or
 
(b)
 
the Administrative Agent is advised by Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
 
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) or facsimile as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing to, or continuation of any Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective, and (ii) if any Credit Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Borrower shall have submitted a Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing and the Administrative Agent shall have notified the Borrower in accordance with the preceding sentence that such Borrowing will be made as an ABR Borrowing, the Borrower shall have the right, prior to the time by which it would have had to submit a Request for an ABR Borrowing to be made on the same date, to withdraw such Request.
 
Section 3.5.
 
.
Increased Costs; Illegality
 
(a)
 
If any Change in Law shall:
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
33
(i)
 
impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Credit Party (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate);
 
(ii)
 
subject any Lender or any Issuing Bank to any Tax of any kind whatsoever with respect to this Agreement, any Letter of Credit, any participation in a Letter of Credit or any Eurodollar Loan made by it, or change the basis of taxation of payments to such Lender or the Issuing Bank in respect thereof (except for indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes covered by Section 3.7 and the imposition of, or any change in the rate of, any Tax on the Overall Net Income payable by such Lender or the Issuing Bank); or
 
(iii)
 
impose on any Credit Party or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement, any Eurodollar Loans made by such Credit Party or any participation therein or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Credit Party of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan or the cost to such Credit Party of issuing, participating in or maintaining any Letter of Credit hereunder or to increase the cost to such Credit Party or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Credit Party hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Borrower will pay to such Credit Party such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Credit Party for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
 
(b)
 
If any Credit Party determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Credit Partys capital or on the capital of such Credit Partys holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made, the Letters of Credit issued or the participations therein held, by such Credit Party to a level below that which such Credit Party or such Credit Partys holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Credit Partys policies and the policies of such Credit Partys holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Credit Party such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Credit Party or such Credit Partys holding company for any such reduction suffered.
 
(c)
 
A certificate of a Credit Party setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Credit Party or its holding company, as applicable, as specified in or of this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive and binding upon all parties hereto absent manifest error.  The Borrower shall pay such Credit Party the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 Business Days after receipt thereof.
paragraph (a)
(b)
 
(d)
 
Failure or delay on the part of any Credit Party to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Credit Partys right to demand such compensation; that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Credit Party pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 180 days prior to the date that such Credit Party notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Credit Partys intention to claim compensation therefor; and that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 180 day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof but not to exceed a period of 365 days.
provided
provided
further
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
34
(e)
 
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, if, after the Signing Date, any Change in Law shall make it unlawful for any Lender to make or maintain any Eurodollar Loan or to give effect to its obligations as contemplated hereby with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, then, by written notice to the Borrower and to the Administrative Agent:
 
(i)
 
such Lender may declare that Eurodollar Loans will not thereafter (for the duration of such unlawfulness) be made by such Lender hereunder (or be continued for additional Interest Periods) and ABR Loans will not thereafter (for such duration) be converted into Eurodollar Loans, whereupon any request for a Eurodollar Borrowing or to convert an ABR Borrowing to a Eurodollar Borrowing or to continue a Eurodollar Borrowing, as applicable, for an additional Interest Period shall, as to such Lender only, be deemed a request for an ABR Loan (or a request to continue an ABR Loan as such for an additional Interest Period or to convert a Eurodollar Loan into an ABR Loan, as applicable), unless such declaration shall be subsequently withdrawn; and
 
(ii)
 
such Lender may require that all outstanding Eurodollar Loans made by it be converted to ABR Loans, in which event all such Eurodollar Loans shall be automatically converted to ABR Loans, as of the effective date of such notice as provided in the last sentence of this paragraph.
 
In the event any Lender shall exercise its rights under or of this paragraph, all payments and prepayments of principal that would otherwise have been applied to repay the Eurodollar Loans that would have been made by such Lender or the converted Eurodollar Loans of such Lender shall instead be applied to repay the ABR Loans made by such Lender in lieu of, or resulting from the conversion of, such Eurodollar Loans, as applicable.  For purposes of this paragraph, a notice to the Borrower by any Lender shall be effective as to each Eurodollar Loan made by such Lender, if lawful, on the last day of the Interest Period currently applicable to such Eurodollar Loan; in all other cases such notice shall be effective on the date of receipt by the Borrower.
clause (i)
(ii)
 
Section 3.6.
 
.  In the event of (a) the payment or prepayment (voluntary or otherwise) of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Eurodollar Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period or maturity date applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to , then, in any such event, the Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event.  In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest that would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate that such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the eurodollar market.  A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall
Break Funding Payments
Section 2.7(c)
Section 3.8
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
35
be conclusive absent manifest error.  The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 Business Days after receipt thereof.
 
Section 3.7.
 
.
Taxes
 
(a)
 
.  Provided that all documentation, if any, then required to be delivered by any Lender or the Administrative Agent pursuant to has been delivered, all sums payable by the Borrower under the Loan Documents shall be paid free and clear of and (except to the extent required by law) without any deduction or withholding on account of any Tax (other than a Tax on the Overall Net Income of any Lender (for which payment need not be free and clear, but no deduction or withholding shall be made unless then required by applicable law)) imposed, levied, collected, withheld or assessed by or within the United States or any political subdivision in or of the United States or any other jurisdiction from or to which a payment is made by or on behalf of the Borrower or by any federation or organization of which the United States or any such jurisdiction is a member at the time of payment.
Payments to be Free and Clear
Section 3.7(c)
 
(b)
 
.  If the Borrower or any other Person is required by law to make any deduction or withholding on account of any such Tax from any sum paid or payable by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent or any Lender under any of the Loan Documents:
Grossing up of Payments
 
(i)
 
the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent and such Lender of any such requirement or any change in any such requirement as soon as the Borrower becomes aware of it;
 
(ii)
 
the Borrower shall pay any such Tax before the date on which penalties attach thereto, such payment to be made (if the liability to pay is imposed on the Borrower) for its own account or (if that liability is imposed on the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be) on behalf of and in the name of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be;
 
(iii)
 
the sum payable by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent or a Lender in respect of which the relevant deduction, withholding or payment is required shall be increased to the extent necessary to ensure that, after the making of that deduction, withholding or payment, the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be, receives on the due date therefor a net sum equal to what it would have received had no such deduction, withholding or payment been required or made, that no amount shall be required to be paid to any Foreign Lender for any Tax imposed as a result of such Foreign Lenders failure to comply with the reporting requirements as set forth in Sections 1471 and 1472 of the Code (or regulation or administrative guidance promulgated thereunder) except to the extent that such compliance would cause a Foreign Lender to be in violation of any applicable law;
provided
 
(iv)
 
within 30 days after paying any sum from which it is required by law to make any deduction or withholding, and within 30 days after the due date of payment of any Tax which it is required by above to pay, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender evidence satisfactory to the other affected parties of such deduction, withholding or payment and of the remittance thereof to the relevant Governmental Authority; and
clause (ii)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
36
(v)
 
that no additional amount shall be required to be paid to any Lender under above except to the extent that any change after the Signing Date (in the case of each Lender listed on the signature pages hereof) or after the date of the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender became a Lender (in the case of each other Lender) if any such requirement for a deduction, withholding or payment as is mentioned therein shall result in an increase in the rate of such deduction, withholding or payment from that in effect at the date of this Agreement or at the date of such Assignment and Assumption, as the case may be, in respect of payments to such Lender, and further that any Lender claiming any additional amounts payable pursuant to this shall use reasonable efforts (consistent with its internal policy and legal and regulatory restrictions) to change the jurisdiction of its applicable lending office or take other appropriate action if the making of such a change or the taking of such action, as the case may be, would avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, any such additional amounts that may thereafter accrue and would not, in the reasonable judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender.
provided
clause (iii)
provided
Section 3.7
 
(c)
 
.  Each Foreign Lender listed on the signature pages hereof shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), on or prior to the Effective Date (in the case of each Foreign Lender listed on the signature pages hereof) or on the effective date of the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which it becomes a Lender (in the case of each other Foreign Lender), and at such other times as may be necessary in the determination of the Borrower or the Administrative Agent (each in the reasonable exercise of its discretion), including upon the occurrence of any event requiring a change in the most recent counterpart of any form set forth below previously delivered by such Foreign Lender to the Borrower, such certificates, documents or other evidence, properly completed and duly executed by such Foreign Lender including (i) two accurate and complete original signed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W8-BEN or Form W8-ECI, or successor applicable form and (ii) an Internal Revenue Service Form W-8 or W-9 (or any other certificate or statement of exemption required by Treasury Regulations Section 1.1441 4(a) or Section 1.1441 6(c) or any successor thereto) to establish that such Foreign Lender is not subject to deduction or withholding of United States federal income tax under Section 1441 or 1442 of the Code or otherwise (or under any comparable provisions of any successor statute) with respect to any payments to such Foreign Lender of principal, interest, fees or other amounts payable under any of the Loan Documents.  The Borrower shall not be required to pay any additional amount to any such Foreign Lender under if such Foreign Lender shall have failed to satisfy the requirements of the immediately preceding sentence; that if such Foreign Lender shall have satisfied such requirements on the Effective Date (in the case of each Foreign Lender listed on the signature pages hereof) or on the effective date of the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which it becomes a Lender (in the case of each other Foreign Lender), nothing in this Section shall relieve the Borrower of its obligation to pay any additional amounts pursuant to in the event that, as a result of any change in applicable law, such Foreign Lender is no longer properly entitled to deliver certificates, documents or other evidence at a subsequent date establishing the fact that such Foreign Lender is not subject to withholding as described in the immediately preceding sentence.
Tax Certificates
Section 3.7(b)(iii)
provided
Section 3.7(b)(iii)
 
(d)
 
.
Other Taxes
 
(i)
 
The Borrower shall pay Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law; and
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
37
(ii)
 
the Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent and each Lender within 10 Business Days after written demand thereof, for the full amount of any Taxes (other than Taxes on the Overall Net Income) or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder (including Taxes, other than Taxes on the Overall Net Income, or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and (unless caused by the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such party) any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes, other than Taxes on the Overall Net Income, or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Government Authority. A certificate as to the amount such of payment or liability delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
(e)
 
.  If the Administrative Agent or Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this , it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest, or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders agrees to cooperate with any reasonable request made by the Borrower in respect of a claim of a refund in respect of any Taxes paid by the Borrower or by such Lender for an on account of the Borrower if (i) the Borrower has agreed in writing to pay all of the Administrative Agents or the Issuing Banks or such Lenders reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses relating to such claim, (ii) the Administrative Agent or such Issuing Bank or such Lender determines, in its good faith judgment, that it would not be disadvantaged, unduly burdened or prejudiced as a result of such claim, and (iii) the Borrower furnishes, upon request of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender, an opinion of tax counsel (such opinion, which can be reasoned, and such counsel to be reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender) that the Borrower is likely to receive a refund or credit.  This Section shall not be construed to require any Lender to make available its Tax returns (or any other information relating to its Taxes which it deems confidential) to either the Borrower or any other Person.
Tax Refunds
Section 3.7
Section 3.7
provided
 
Section 3.8.
 
.
Mitigation Obligations
 
(a)
 
.In the event that the Borrower becomes obligated to pay additional amounts to any Lender (or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender) pursuant to , or , then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to , or , as the case may be, in the future, and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be
Designation of a Different Lending Office
 
Section
3
.5
Section 3.6
Section 3.7
Section 3.5
Section 3.6
Section 3.7
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
38
disadvantageous to such Lender.  The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
 
(b)
 
. In the event that (i) the Borrower becomes obligated to pay additional amounts to any Lender (or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender) pursuant to , or , (ii) any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, or (iii) if any Lender has failed to consent to a proposed amendment, waiver, discharge or termination that under requires the consent of all the Lenders and with respect to which the Required Lenders shall have granted their consent, then the Borrower may, at its sole cost and expense, within 60 days of the demand by such Lender for such additional amounts or the relevant default or action by such Lender, as the case may be, and subject to and in accordance with the provisions of (with the Borrower obligated to pay any applicable processing and recordation fee), designate an Eligible Assignee (acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks) to purchase and assume all of such Lenders interests, rights and obligations under the Loan Documents, without recourse to or warranty by or expense to, such Lender, for a purchase price equal to the outstanding principal amount of such Lenders Loans plus any accrued but unpaid interest thereon and accrued but unpaid facility fees and letter of credit fees in respect of such Lenders Commitment and any other amounts payable to such Lender hereunder, and to assume all the obligations of such Lender hereunder, and, upon such purchase, such Lender shall no longer be a party hereto or have any rights hereunder (except those that survive full repayment hereunder) and shall be relieved from all obligations to the Borrower hereunder, and the Eligible Assignee shall succeed to the rights and obligations of such Lender hereunder.  No replacement of a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this shall be deemed to be a waiver of any right that the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or any other Lender may have against such Defaulting Lender.  The Borrower shall execute and deliver to such Eligible Assignee a Note.  Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, in the event that a Lender is replaced pursuant to this as a result of the Borrower becoming obligated to pay additional amounts to such Lender (or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender)pursuant to , or , such Lender shall be entitled to receive such additional amounts as if it had not been so replaced, except as otherwise provided in if such Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender.
Replacement of Lenders
Section
3
.5
Section 3.6
Section 3.7
Section 10.2
Section 10.4
Section 3.8
Section 3.8
 
Section 3.5
Section 3.6
Section 3.7
Section 2.10
 
 
 
The Borrower represents and warrants to the Credit Parties that:
 
Section 4.1.
 
.  Each of the Borrower and each Subsidiary is duly organized or formed, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization or formation, has all requisite corporate power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Organization; Powers
 
Section 4.2.
 
.  The Transactions are within the corporate powers of the Borrower and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, equity holder action.  Each Loan Document has been duly executed and delivered by the Borrower and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation thereof, enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting creditors rights generally and general principles of equity.
Authorization; Enforceability
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
39
Section 4.3.
 
.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts
 
(a)
 
The execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of the Loan Documents and the borrowing of the Loans and the issuance of the Letters of Credit do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except for (i) information filings to be made in the ordinary course of business, which filings are not a condition to the Borrowers performance under the Loan Documents and (ii) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect and not subject to any appeals period.
 
(b)
 
The Transactions will not (i) violate the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Borrower, (ii) violate any applicable law or regulation or any order of any Governmental Authority, (iii) violate or result in a default under any material indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon the Borrower or its assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Borrower, and (iv) result in or require the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Borrower.
 
Section 4.4.
 
.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change
 
(a)
 
The Borrower has previously delivered to the Credit Parties copies of  (i) its Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, containing the audited consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and the related audited consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, changes in stockholders equity and cash flows for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2010 (including with the applicable related notes and schedules, the ), and (ii) the unaudited consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and the related unaudited consolidated statements of income, equity and cash flows for the fiscal quarter ended March 31, 2011.  All such financial statements have been prepared in accordance with GAAP and fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial condition and results of the operations of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as of the dates and for the periods indicated therein (subject, in the case of unaudited financial statements, to the absence of footnotes and to normal, year end audit adjustments).
Borrower Financial Statements
 
(b)
 
Since December 31, 2010, there has been no Material Adverse Change.
 
Section 4.5.
 
.
Litigation
 
(a)
 
There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened in writing against or affecting the Borrower or any Subsidiary (a) that, if adversely determined (and provided that there exists a reasonable possibility of such adverse determination), would reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect, except for any Disclosed Matters, and except that the commencement by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any Governmental Authority of a rate proceeding, fuel adjustment clause audit or earnings review before such Governmental Authority shall not constitute such a pending or threatened action, suit or proceeding unless and until such Governmental Authority has made a final determination thereunder that would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or (b) that involve any Loan Document or the Transactions.
 
Section 4.6.
 
.  Except for the Disclosed Matters, the Borrower and its Subsidiaries (a) are in compliance with Environmental Law, (b) have received all permits, licenses or other approvals required of them under applicable Environmental Law to conduct their respective
Environmental Matters
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
40
businesses and (c) are in compliance with all terms and conditions of any such permit, license, or approval, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Section 4.7.
 
.  Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is an investment company or a company controlled by an investment company as defined in, or is otherwise subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Investment Company Status
 
Section 4.8.
 
.  Each of the Borrower and each of its ERISA Affiliates is in compliance in all material respects with the applicable provisions of ERISA and the Code and the regulations and published interpretations thereunder except for any such failure that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
ERISA
 
Section 4.9.
 
.  None of the reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary to any Credit Party in connection with the negotiation of, or delivered under any Loan Document when taken as a whole (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished, including the information contained in the Borrowers most recent annual report on Form 10-K and in Borrowers reports filed with the SEC under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not materially misleading, provided that, to the extent any such reports, financial statements, certificates or other information was based upon or constitutes a forecast or a projection (including statements concerning future financial performance, ongoing business strategies or prospects or possible future actions, and other forward-looking statements), the Borrower represents only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
Disclosure
 
Section 4.10.
 
. As of the Signing Date, the Borrower has only the Subsidiaries set forth on .   sets forth with respect to each Subsidiary, the identity of each Person that owns Equity Interests in such Subsidiary and the percentage of the issued and outstanding Equity Interests owned by each such Person.  The shares of each Subsidiary (excluding any Immaterial Subsidiary) are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and non assessable and are owned free and clear of any Liens, other than Liens permitted pursuant to .
Subsidiaries
Schedule 4.10
Schedule 4.10
Section 7.1
 
Section 4.11.
 
.
Use of Proceeds; Federal Reserve Regulations
 
(a)
 
The proceeds of the Loans and the Letters of Credit will be used for general corporate purposes not inconsistent with the terms hereof, including liquidity support for the Borrowers commercial paper program.
 
(b)
 
Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is engaged principally, or as one of their important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of buying or carrying Margin Stock.  Immediately before and after giving effect to the making of each Loan and the issuance of each Letter of Credit, Margin Stock will constitute less than 25% of the Borrowers assets as determined in accordance with Regulation U.
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
41
(c)
 
No part of the proceeds of any Loan or any Letter of Credit will be used, whether directly or indirectly, and whether immediately, incidentally or ultimately, (i) to purchase, acquire or carry any Margin Stock (other than any purchase of Equity Interests in the Borrower so long as such Equity Interests are retired immediately upon the purchase thereof) or for any purpose that entails a violation of, or that is inconsistent with, the provisions of the regulations of the Board, including Regulation T, U or X or (ii) to fund a personal loan to or for the benefit of a director or executive officer of the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
 
 
 
Section 5.1.
 
.  The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit hereunder are subject the satisfaction (or waived in accordance with ) of the following conditions precedent:
Effectiveness
Section 10.2
 
(a)
 
.  The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include facsimile transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement.
Credit Agreement
 
(b)
 
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received any Note requested by a Lender pursuant to payable to the order of such requesting Lender.
Notes
Section 2.6
 
(c)
 
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received favorable written opinions (addressed to the Credit Parties and dated on or prior to the Effective Date) from Deborah A. Amberg, Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of the Borrower, and Cohen Tauber Spievack & Wagner P.C., special counsel to the Borrower, covering such matters relating to the Borrower, the Loan Documents and the Transactions as the Required Lenders may reasonably request.  The Borrower hereby requests such counsel to deliver such opinion.
Legal Opinion
 
(d)
 
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to (i) the organization, existence and good standing of the Borrower (including (x) a certificate of incorporation of the Borrower, certified as of a recent date by the Secretary of State of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, and (y) certificates of good standing (or comparable certificates) for the Borrower, certified as of a recent date prior to the Effective Date, by the Secretaries of State (or comparable official) of the jurisdiction of its incorporation and each other jurisdiction in which it is qualified to do business, (ii) the authorization of the Transactions, (iii) the incumbency of its officer or officers who may sign the Loan Documents, including therein a signature specimen of such officer or officers, and (iv) any other legal matters relating to the Borrower, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
Organizational Documents, etc
 
(e)
 
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, dated on or prior to the Effective Date and signed by the chief executive officer or the chief financial officer of the Borrower (or other Financial Officer acceptable to the Administrative Agent), confirming (i) the representations
Officers Certificate
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
42
and warranties of the Borrower set forth in the Loan Documents are true and correct and (ii) no Default exists.
 
(f)
 
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate of a Financial Officer, in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrate Agent, dated the Effective Date, to the effect that since December 31, 2010, no Material Adverse Change has occurred.
No Material Adverse Change
 
(g)
 
.  Evidence that the Borrower has paid all outstanding amounts under the Existing Credit Agreement.
Existing Loan Documents
 
(h)
 
.  Such other documents as any Lender or its counsel may have reasonably requested.
Miscellaneous
 
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Credit Parties when the conditions set forth above have been satisfied or waived, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.
 
Section 5.2.
 
.  The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of the Issuing Banks to issue, increase, amend, renew or extend a Letter of Credit, (each such event being called a ) is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event
Credit Event
 
(a)
 
The representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in the Loan Documents (other than the representations and warranties in , and of this Agreement) shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of such issuance, increase, amendment, renewal or extension, as applicable, except to the extent such representations and warranties specifically relate to an earlier date, in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct on and as of such earlier date.
Section 4.4(b)
Section 4.5
Section 4.6
 
(b)
 
At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or such issuance, increase, amendment, renewal or extension, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
(c)
 
The Administrative Agent shall have received a Credit Request and such other documentation and assurances as shall be reasonably required by it in connection herewith.
 
(d)
 
Such Loan or Letter of Credit shall not be prohibited by any applicable law, rule or regulation.
 
Each Borrowing and each issuance, increase, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrower on the date thereof as to the matters specified in and of this Section.
paragraphs (a)
(b)
 
 
AFFIRMATIVE COVENANTS
 
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees and other amounts payable under the Loan Documents shall have been paid in
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
43
full and all Letters of Credit have expired and all LC Disbursements have been reimbursed, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Credit Parties that:
 
Section 6.1.
 
.  The Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements and Other Information
 
(a)
 
As soon as available, but in any event within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year, (i) a copy of the Borrowers Annual Report on Form 10-K in respect of such fiscal year required to be filed by the Borrower with the SEC, together with the financial statements attached thereto, and (ii) the Borrowers audited consolidated balance sheet and related consolidated statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on by the Accountants (without a going concern or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial conditions and results of operations of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied during such fiscal year;
 
(b)
 
As soon as available, but in any event within 60 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year, (i) a copy of the Borrowers Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q in respect of such fiscal quarter required to be filed by the Borrower with the SEC, together with the financial statements attached thereto, and (ii) the Borrowers unaudited consolidated balance sheet and related consolidated statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by a duly authorized Financial Officer as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial conditions and results of operations of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
(c)
 
Within 60 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters and within 120 days after the end of the last fiscal quarter, a Compliance Certificate, signed by a Financial Officer (or such other officer as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent) as to the Borrowers compliance, as of such fiscal quarter ending date, with , and as to the absence of any Default as of such fiscal quarter ending date and the date of such certificate (or if a Default existed or exists, the nature thereof); and
Section 7.5
 
(d)
 
promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of the Loan Documents, as any Credit Party may reasonably request.
 
Section 6.2.
 
.  The Borrower will furnish the following to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Notices of Material Events
 
(a)
 
prompt written notice of the occurrence of any Default, specifying the nature thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto;
 
(b)
 
promptly upon becoming available, copies of all (i) regular, periodic or special reports, schedules and other material which the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries may be required to file with or deliver to any securities exchange or the SEC, or any other Governmental
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
44
 
Authority succeeding to the functions thereof, and (ii) upon the written request of the Administrative Agent, reports that the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries sends to or files with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the WPS, the MPUC or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof, or any similar state or local Governmental Authority;
 
(c)
 
prompt written notice of (i) any material citation, summons, subpoena, order, notice, claim or proceeding received by, or brought against, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, with respect to (x) any proceeding before any Governmental
Authority (other than proceedings in the ordinary course of business before the WPS or the MPUC), or (y) any real property under any Environmental Law, and (ii) any lapse or other termination of, or refusal to renew or extend, any material franchise or other authorization issued to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries by any Governmental Authority (other than in the ordinary course of business), that any of the foregoing set forth in this paragraph would, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and
provided
 
(d)
 
prompt written notice of any change by any Rating Agency in a Senior Debt Rating.
 
Each notice delivered under or shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Borrower setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
Section 6.2(a)
(c)
 
Documents required to be delivered pursuant to or or or (to the extent any such documents are included in materials otherwise filed with the SEC) may be delivered electronically and if so delivered, shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date (a) on which the Borrower posts such documents, or provides a link thereto, on the Borrowers website on the Internet at the website address listed in ; or (b) on which such documents are posted on the Borrowers behalf on an Internet or intranet website, if any, to which each Lender and the Administrative have access (whether a commercial, third-party website or whether sponsored by the Administrative Agent), that: (i) the Borrower shall deliver paper copies of such documents to the Administrative Agent or any Lender that requests the Borrower to deliver such paper copies until a written request to cease delivering paper copies is given by the Administrative Agent or such Lender and (ii) the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender (by facsimile or electronic mail) of the posting of any such documents and provide to the Administrative Agent by electronic mail electronic versions (, soft copies) of such documents.  Except for such Compliance Certificates, the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to request the delivery or to maintain copies of the documents referred to above, and in any event shall have no responsibility to monitor compliance by the Borrower with any such request for delivery, and each Lender shall be solely responsible for requesting delivery to it or maintaining its copies of such documents.
Section 6.1(a)
(b)
Section 6.2(b)
(c)
Section 10.1
provided
i.e.
 
Section 6.3.
 
.  Except as permitted under , the Borrower shall maintain its legal existence in good standing in the jurisdiction of its organization or formation and in each other jurisdiction in which the failure so to do would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and cause each of the Subsidiaries to maintain its qualification to do business and good standing in each jurisdiction in which the failure so to do would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect (it being understood that the foregoing shall not prohibit the Borrower from dissolving or terminating the existence of any Subsidiary that is inactive or whose preservation otherwise is no longer desirable in the conduct of the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries considered as a whole).
Legal Existence
Section 7.2
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
45
Section 6.4.
 
.  The Borrower shall pay and discharge when due, and cause each of the Subsidiaries so to do, all Taxes imposed upon it or upon its property, which if unpaid would, individually or collectively, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or become a Lien on the property of the Borrower or such Subsidiary (other than a Lien described in of the definition of Permitted Encumbrances), as the case may be, unless and to the extent only that such Taxes shall be contested in good faith and by appropriate proceedings diligently conducted by the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be.
Taxes
clause (a)
 
Section 6.5.
 
.  The Borrower shall maintain, and cause each of its Subsidiaries to maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies insurance on all its property in at least such amounts and against at least such risks as are usually insured against in the same general area by companies engaged in the same or a similar business, that the Borrower and its Subsidiaries may self-insure to the same extent as other companies engaged in similar businesses and owning similar properties in the same general areas in which the Borrower or such Subsidiary operates and to the extent consistent with prudent business practice.  The Borrower shall furnish to the Administrative Agent, upon written request of the Administrative Agent or any Lender, full information as to the insurance carried.
Insurance
provided
 
Section 6.6.
 
.  The Borrower shall at all times maintain, protect and keep in good repair, working order and condition in all material respects (ordinary wear and tear excepted), and cause each of its Subsidiaries so to do, all material property necessary to the operation of the Borrowers or such Subsidiarys, as the case may be, material businesses, that nothing shall prevent the Borrower or its Subsidiaries, as appropriate, from discontinuing the maintenance or operation of any property if such discontinuance is, in the judgment of the Borrower or such Subsidiary, desirable in the conduct of the business of the Borrower or such Subsidiary.  It is understood that this covenant relates only to working order and condition of such property in accordance with prudent industry practices and shall not be construed as a covenant not to dispose of property.
Condition of Property
provided
 
Section 6.7.
 
.  The Borrower shall observe and comply in all material respects, and cause each of its Subsidiaries so to do, with all laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority which now or at any time hereafter may be applicable to it, including ERISA and all Environmental Laws, a violation of which would individually or collectively reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, except such thereof as shall be contested in good faith and, if applicable, by appropriate proceedings diligently conducted by it.
Observance of Legal Requirements
 
Section 6.8.
 
.  The Borrower shall keep proper books of record and account in conformity with GAAP and all requirements of law.  The Borrower shall permit representatives of the Administrative Agent and any Lender to visit its offices, to inspect any of its property (subject to reasonable procedures relating to safety and security) and examine and make copies or abstracts from any of its books and records at any reasonable time and as often as may reasonably be desired, and to discuss the business, operations, prospects, property and financial condition of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries with the officers thereof and the Accountants; that none of the Administrative Agent, its agents, its representatives or the Lenders shall be entitled to examine or make copies or abstracts of, or otherwise obtain information with respect to, the Borrowers records relating to pending or threatened litigation if any such disclosure by the Borrower would reasonably be expected (i) to give rise to a waiver of any attorney/client privilege of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries relating to such information or (ii) to be otherwise materially disadvantageous to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries in the defense of such litigation; and that in the case of any discussion with the Accountants, the Borrower shall have been
Inspection of Property; Books and Records; Discussions
provided
provided further
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
46
given the opportunity to participate in such discussion and, unless a Default exists, the Lender or Lenders requesting such discussion shall pay any fees and expenses of the Accountant in connection therewith.
 
 
 
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees and other amounts payable under the Loan Documents shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired and all LC Disbursements have been reimbursed, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Credit Parties that:
 
Section 7.1.
 
.  The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or suffer to exist any Lien upon any of its property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired by it, except:
Liens
 
(a)
 
Liens now existing or hereafter arising in favor of the Administrative Agent or the Lenders under the Loan Documents;
 
(b)
 
Permitted Encumbrances;
 
(c)
 
any Lien existing on any property prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or existing on any property of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary or that is merged with or into or consolidated with the Borrower or any Subsidiary prior to such merger or consolidation, that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary or such merger or consolidation, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations and liabilities that it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary of the Borrower or such merger or consolidation, as the case may be;
provided
 
(d)
 
Liens (including precautionary Liens in connection with Capital Lease Obligations) on fixed or capital assets and other property (including any natural gas, oil or other mineral assets, pollution control facilities, electrical generating plants, equipment and machinery, and related accounts, financial assets, contracts and general intangibles) acquired, constructed, explored, drilled, developed, improved, repaired or serviced (including in connection with the financing of working capital and ongoing maintenance) by the Borrower or any Subsidiary, that (i) such security interests and the obligations and liabilities secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 270 days after the acquisition of the relevant asset or the completion of the relevant construction, exploration, drilling, development, improvement, repair or servicing (including the relevant financing of working capital and ongoing maintenance), as the case may be, (ii) the obligations and liabilities secured thereby do not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing, exploring, drilling, developing, improving, repairing or servicing (including the financing of working capital and ongoing maintenance in respect of) the relevant assets, and (iii) such security interests shall not apply to any other property beyond the relevant property set forth in this (and in the case of construction or improvement, any theretofore unimproved real property on which the property so constructed or the improvement is located) and , as applicable, of the Borrower or any Subsidiary;
provided
paragraph (d)
paragraph (f)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
47
(e)
 
Liens created under or in connection with the Mortgage;
 
(f)
 
Liens on any Equity Interest owned or otherwise held by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in any Person created as a special purpose, bankruptcy-remote Person for the sole and exclusive purpose of engaging in activities in connection with the owning and operating of property in connection with any project financing permitted to be secured under ;
paragraph (d)
 
(g)
 
Liens created to secure Indebtedness of any Subsidiary to the Borrower or to any other Subsidiary;
 
(h)
 
rights reserved to or vested in others to take or receive any part of any coal, ore, gas, oil and other minerals, any timber and/or any electric capacity or energy, gas, water, steam and any other product developed, produced, manufactured, generated, purchased or otherwise acquired by the Borrower or by others on property of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, that no Lien described in this paragraph shall secure Indebtedness;
provided
 
(i)
 
Liens created for the sole purpose of extending, renewing or replacing in whole or in part Indebtedness secured by any lien, mortgage or security interest referred to in the foregoing through , that the principal amount of Indebtedness secured thereby shall not exceed the principal amount of Indebtedness so secured at the time of such extension, renewal or replacement and that such extension, renewal or replacement, as the case may be, shall be limited to all or a part of the property or indebtedness that secured the lien or mortgage so extended, renewed or replaced (and any improvements on such property);
paragraphs (a)
(h)
provided
 
(j)
 
Liens on cash or invested funds used to make a defeasance, covenant defeasance or in substance defeasance of any Indebtedness pursuant to an express contractual provision in the agreement governing such Indebtedness, that immediately before and immediately after giving effect to the making of such defeasance, no Default shall exist; and
provided
 
(k)
 
any Lien, in addition to those described in the foregoing through , securing obligations that, together with all other obligations secured pursuant to this , do not exceed 10% of Consolidated Assets at the time of the incurrence thereof.
paragraphs (a)
(j)
paragraph (k)
 
Section 7.2.
 
.  The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary to consolidate with or merge into any other Person (other than a merger of a Subsidiary into, or a consolidation of a Subsidiary with, the Borrower or another Subsidiary), unless:
Merger; Consolidation
 
(a)           immediately before and after giving effect thereto no Default shall exist;
 
(b)           immediately before and after giving effect thereto, all of the representations and warranties contained in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct except as the context thereof otherwise requires and except for those representations and warranties which by their terms or by necessary implication are expressly limited to a state of facts existing at a time prior to such merger, consolidation or acquisition, as the case may be, or such other matters relating thereto as are identified in a writing to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and are satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders; and
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
48
(c)           in the case of a transaction involving the Borrower, either (i) the Borrower shall be the surviving entity thereof, or in the event the Borrower shall not be the surviving entity thereof, each of the following conditions shall be satisfied: (A) such surviving entity shall have been incorporated or otherwise formed in a State of the United States with substantially all of its assets and business located and conducted in the United States, (B) such surviving entity shall, immediately after giving effect to such transaction, have an Investment Grade Rating and (C) such surviving entity shall have expressly assumed the obligations of the Borrower under the Loan Documents pursuant to a writing in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; and (ii) the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall have received a certificate signed by a duly authorized officer of the Borrower identifying the Person to be merged with or into, or consolidated with, or acquired by, the Borrower, and certifying as to each of the matters set forth in of this .
clauses (a), (b) and
(c)(i)
Section 7.2
 
For purposes of Clause (c) above,  means a Senior Debt Rating from at least two Rating Agencies equal to (1) for any transaction where the surviving entity has a Senior Debt Rating,  a rating for such surviving entity of BBB- or higher from S&P or Fitch or Baa3 or higher from Moodys and (2) for any transaction where the surviving entity is an indirect or direct holding company for a public utility that does not have a Senior Debt Rating, a rating for such surviving entitys primary utility Subsidiary of BBB- or higher from S&P or Fitch or Baa3 or higher from Moodys.
Investment Grade Rating
 
Section 7.3.
 
.  The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of (including pursuant to a merger) any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire (including pursuant to a merger) any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less materially favorable to the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, than could be obtained on an arms length basis from unrelated third parties, that this Section shall not apply to (i) any transaction that is in compliance with applicable laws and regulations of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the WPS or the MPUC pertaining to affiliate transactions or is authorized by a tariff or rate schedule which has been approved by a Governmental Authority or performed in accordance with its orders, (ii) any transaction that is otherwise permitted under and (iv) transactions pursuant to any contract in effect on the Signing Date, as the same may be amended, extended or replaced from time to time so long as such contract as so amended, extended or replaced is, taken as a whole, not materially less favorable to the Borrower and its Subsidiaries than under those contracts in effect on the Signing Date.
Transactions with Affiliates
provided
Section 7.2
 
Section 7.4.
 
.  The Borrower shall not enter into any Hedge Agreements other than (a) Permitted Hedge Agreements and (b) transactions in futures, floors, collars and similar Hedge Agreements involving the stock price of a Person involved in a merger transaction permitted by .
Permitted Hedge Agreements
Section 7.2
 
Section 7.5.
 
.  The Borrower will not permit Total Indebtedness to be greater than 65% of Total Capitalization as of the end of any fiscal quarter.
Financial Covenant
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
49
 
 
If any of the following events (each an ) shall occur:
Event of Default
 
(a)
 
the Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
 
(b)
 
the Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or on any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement or any fee, commission or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in of this Article) payable under any Loan Document, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of five Business Days;
paragraph (a)
 
(c)
 
any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
 
(d)
 
the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in (with respect to the Borrowers existence), , or ;
Section 6.3
7.2
7.4
7.5
 
(e)
 
the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in or and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of ten days after the Borrower shall have obtained knowledge thereof.
Section 7.1
Section 7.3
 
(f)
 
the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in any Loan Document to which it is a party (other than those specified in , , or of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after the Borrower shall have obtained knowledge thereof;
paragraph (a)
(b)
(d)
(e)
 
(g)
 
the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect to any Material Obligations, when and as the same shall become due and payable and after the expiration of any applicable grace period;
 
(h)
 
any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Obligations becoming due prior to their scheduled maturity or payment date, or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Obligations or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Obligations to become due prior to their scheduled maturity or payment date or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof prior to their scheduled maturity or payment date (in each case after giving effect to any applicable cure period), that this shall not apply to (i) Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of a notice of voluntary prepayment or redemption delivered by the Borrower or a Subsidiary, (ii) secured Indebtedness that becomes due solely as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness, (iii) intercompany indebtedness or (iv) the exercise of any contractual right to cause the prepayment of any Material
provided
paragraph (h)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
50
Obligations (other than the exercise of a remedy for an event of default under the applicable contract or agreement);
 
(i)
 
except for Immaterial Transactions and transactions expressly permitted by with respect to Subsidiaries, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall (i) suspend or discontinue its business, (ii) make an assignment for the benefit of creditors, (iii) generally not pay its debts as such debts become due, (iv) admit in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due, (v) file a voluntary petition in bankruptcy, (vi) become insolvent (however such insolvency shall be evidenced), (vii) file any petition or answer seeking for itself any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment of debt, liquidation or dissolution or similar relief under any present or future statute, law or regulation of any jurisdiction, (viii) petition or apply to any tribunal for any receiver, custodian or any trustee for any substantial part of its property, (ix) be the subject of any such proceeding filed against it which remains undismissed for a period of 45 days, (x) file any answer admitting or not contesting the material allegations of any such petition filed against it or any order, judgment or decree approving such petition in any such proceeding, (xi) seek, approve, consent to, or acquiesce in any such proceeding, or in the appointment of any trustee, receiver, sequestrator, custodian, liquidator, or fiscal agent for it, or any substantial part of its property, or an order is entered appointing any such trustee, receiver, custodian, liquidator or fiscal agent and such order remains in effect for 45 days, or (xii) take any formal action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing or looking to the liquidation or dissolution of the Borrower or any Subsidiary;
Section 6.3
 
(j)
 
except to the extent arising solely out of an Immaterial Transaction, an order for relief is entered under the United States bankruptcy laws or any other decree or order is entered by a court having jurisdiction (i) adjudging the Borrower or any Subsidiary bankrupt or insolvent, (ii) approving as properly filed a petition seeking reorganization, liquidation, arrangement, adjustment or composition of or in respect of Borrower or any Subsidiary under the United States bankruptcy laws or any other applicable Federal or state law, (iii) appointing a receiver, liquidator, assignee, trustee, custodian, sequestrator (or other similar official) of the Borrower or any Subsidiary of any substantial part of the property thereof, or (iv) ordering the winding up or liquidation (other than, in the case of a Subsidiary, voluntary liquidation, not under any bankruptcy, insolvency or similar law) of the affairs of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, and any such decree or order continues unstayed and in effect for a period of 45 days;
 
(k)
 
one or more judgments or decrees against the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or any combination thereof aggregating in excess of $35,000,000, which judgment or decree (i) shall not be fully covered by insurance after taking into account any applicable deductibles and (ii) shall remain unpaid, unstayed on appeal, undischarged, unbonded or undismissed for a period of at least 30 consecutive days;
 
(l)
 
any Loan Document shall cease, for any reason, to be in full force and effect or the Borrower shall so assert in writing or shall disavow any of its obligations thereunder;
 
(m)
 
an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(n)
 
any authorization or approval or other action by any Governmental Authority required for the execution, delivery or performance of any Loan Document shall be terminated, revoked or rescinded or shall otherwise no longer be in full force and effect;
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
51
(o)
 
a Change in Control shall occur; or
 
(p)
 
the Borrower shall fail to own, directly or indirectly, substantially all of the assets of Minnesota Power;
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event described in or of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower, take either or both of the following actions (whether before or after the Effective Date), at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued under the Loan Documents, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; and in case of any event described in or of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate (whether  before or after the Effective Date) and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued under the Loan Documents, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
paragraph (i)
(j)
paragraph (i)
(j)
 
 
Each Credit Party hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
 
The Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such Person and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
 
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (i) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (ii) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Credit Parties as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in ), and (iii) except as expressly set forth herein, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the Person serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity.  The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Credit
Section 10.2
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
52
Parties as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in ) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct.  The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Borrower or a Credit Party (and, promptly after its receipt of any such notice, it shall give each Credit Party and the Borrower notice thereof), and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (a) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (b) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered thereunder or in connection therewith, (c) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth therein, (d) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness thereof or any other agreement, instrument or other document or (e) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in or elsewhere herein, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
Section 10.2
Article 5
 
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person.  The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon.  The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
 
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub agents appointed by the Administrative Agent, that no such delegation shall serve as a release of the Administrative Agent or waiver by the Borrower of any rights hereunder.  The Administrative Agent and any such sub agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties.  The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
provided
 
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Credit Parties and the Borrower.  Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, with the consent of the Borrower (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld and not to be required during the existence of an Event of Default), to appoint a successor, which successor Administrative Agent shall be a commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States or any State thereof and having a combined capital, surplus, and undivided profits of at least $100,000,000. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Credit Parties, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank.  Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder.  The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor.  After the Administrative Agents resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub agents and their
Section 10.3
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
53
respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
 
Each Credit Party acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Credit Party and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.  Each Credit Party also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Credit Party and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon any Loan Document, any related agreement or any document furnished thereunder.
 
Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Book Runner shall have no powers, duties or responsibilities under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents.
 
ARTICLE 10.
 
 
Section 10.1.
 
.
Notices
 
(i)
 
.  Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and except as provided in below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by facsimile (or e-mail in accordance with below) as follows:
Notices Generally
paragraph (b)
Section 10.1(b)
 
(ii)
 
if to the Borrower, to it at 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota, Attention of: Donald W. Stellmaker, Treasurer, Phone: 218-723-3942, Fax: 218-723-3912, Email: dstellmaker@allete.com.
 
(iii)
 
if to the Administrative Agent,
 
(A)           for Loans or Borrowings, to it at its Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 S. Dearborn Street, Floor 07, Chicago, Illinois, Attention of: Teresita Siao, Phone: 312-385-7051, Fax: 888-292-9533, Email: ;
jpm.agency.servicing.4@jpmchase.com
 
(B)           for Letters of Credit, to it at its Letter of Credit Agency Servicing Group, 10 S. Dearborn Street, Floor 07, Chicago, Illinois, Attention of: Susan Moy, Phone: 312-732-9636, Fax: 312-385-7107, Email: ;       
susan.w.moy@jpmchase.com
 
(C)           for credit related matters including compliance requirements pursuant to , to it at its Corporate Client Banking, 10 S. Dearborn Street, Floor 09, Chicago, Illinois, Attention of: John Zur, Phone: 312-732-1754, Fax: 312-732-1762, Email: ; and           
Article 6
john.e.zur@jpmorgan.com
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
54
(iv)
 
 if to any other Credit Party, to it at its address (or facsimile number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
 
Notices sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received; notices sent by facsimile shall be deemed to have been given when sent (except that, if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient).  Notices delivered through electronic communications to the extent provided in below, shall be effective as provided in such .
paragraph (b)
paragraph (b)
 
(b)
 
.  Notices and other communications to the Credit Parties hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communication (including e-mail and Internet or intranet websites) pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent, that the foregoing shall not apply to notices to any Credit Party pursuant to if such Credit Party has notified the Administrative Agent that it is incapable of receiving notices under such Article by electronic communication.  The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it, that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
Electronic Communications
provided
Article 2
provided
 
Unless the Administrative Agent otherwise prescribes, (i) notices and other communications sent to an e-mail address shall be deemed received upon the senders receipt of an acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by the return receipt requested function, as available, return e-mail or other written acknowledgement), that if such notice or other communication is not sent during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been sent at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient, and (ii) notices or communications posted to an Internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its e-mail address as described in the foregoing of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor.
provided
clause (i)
 
For purposes of , the Borrowers website is www.allete.com.
Section 6.2(d)
 
(c)
 
  Any party hereto may change its address or facsimile number or e-mail address for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.
Change of Address, Etc.
 
Section 10.2.
 
.
Waivers; Amendments
 
(a)
 
No failure or delay by any Credit Party in exercising any right or power under any Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  The rights and remedies of the Credit Parties under the Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by the Borrower therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan and/or the issuance, amendment, extension or
paragraph (b)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
55
renewal of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether any Credit Party may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
 
(b)
 
Neither any Loan Document nor any provision thereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Borrower and the Required Lenders or by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent with the consent of the Required Lenders, that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender or increase the Letter of Credit Commitment of any Issuing Bank  without the consent of such Issuing Bank, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation with respect to a LC Disbursement, or reduce the rate of any interest, or reduce any fees, payable under the Loan Documents, without the written consent of each Credit Party affected thereby, (iii) postpone the date of payment at stated maturity of any Loan or the date of payment of any reimbursement obligation with respect to an LC Disbursement, or the date of any interest or any fees payable under the Loan Documents, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the stated termination or expiration of the Commitments without the written consent of each Credit Party affected thereby, (iv) change any provision hereof in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required by or or the pro rata reduction of Commitments required by , without the written consent of each Credit Party affected thereby, and (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of the term Required Lenders or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder, or change the currency in which Loans are to be made, Letters of Credit are to be issued or payment under the Loan Documents is to be made, or add additional borrowers, without the written consent of each Lender, and that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Banks hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent or such Issuing Banks, as applicable.
provided
Section 2.10(b)
2.10(c)
Section 2.5(c)
provided
further
 
Section 10.3.
 
.
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
 
(a)
 
.  The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of each Loan Document or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred by an Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred by any Credit Party, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Credit Party and any consultant or expert witness fees and expenses, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
Cost and Expenses
 
(b)
 
.  The Borrower shall indemnify each Credit Party and each Related Party thereof (each such Person being called an ) against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of any Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated
Indemnification by the Borrower
Indemnitee
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
56
thereby, the performance by the parties to the Loan Documents of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated thereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof including any refusal of an Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto, that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee or a breach in bad faith by such Indemnitee or arising solely from claims between or among one or more Indemnitees.
provided
 
(c)
 
.  To the extent that the Borrower fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent or an Issuing Bank under or of this Section (and without limiting the Borrowers obligation to do so), each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent or such Issuing Bank, as applicable, an amount equal to the product of such unpaid amount a fraction, the numerator of which is the sum of such Lenders unused Commitment the outstanding principal balance of such Lenders Loans and such Lenders LC Exposure and the denominator of which is the sum of the unused Commitments the outstanding principal balance of all Lenders Loans and the LC Exposure of all Lenders (in each case determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought or, in the event that no Lender shall have any unused Commitments, outstanding Loans or LC Exposure at such time, as of the last time at which any Lender had any unused Commitments, outstanding Loans or LC Exposure), that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as applicable, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent or an Issuing Bank, as applicable, in its capacity as such.
Reimbursement by Lenders
paragraph (a)
(b)
multiplied by
plus
plus
provided
 
(d)
 
  To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct and actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, any Loan Document or any agreement, instrument or other document contemplated thereby, the Transactions or any Loan or any Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
Waiver of Consequential Damages, etc.
 
(e)
 
.  All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly but in no event later than ten days after written demand therefor.
Payments
 
Section 10.4.
 
.
Successors and Assigns
 
(a)
 
.  The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, except that the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and each Lender, and no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder except (i) to an Eligible Assignee in accordance with the provisions of of this Section, (ii) by way of participation in accordance with the provisions of of this Section or (iii) by way of
Successors and Assigns Generally
paragraph (b)
paragraph (d)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
57
pledge or assignment of a security interest subject to the restrictions of of this Section (and any other attempted assignment or transfer by any party hereto shall be null and void).  Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, Participants to the extent provided in of this Section and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each Credit Party) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
paragraph (f)
paragraph (d)
 
(b)
 
.  Any Lender may (and if demanded by Borrower pursuant to shall to the extent required thereby) at any time assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitments and the Loans and obligations in respect of its LC Exposure at the time owing to it); that any such assignment shall be subject to the following conditions:
Assignments by Lenders
Section 3.8
provided
 
(i)
 
.
Minimum Amounts
 
(A)
 
In the case of an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lenders Commitments and the Loans and obligations in respect of its LC Exposure at the time owing to it or in the case of an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund, no minimum amount need be assigned; and
 
(B)
 
In any case not described in of this Section, the aggregate amount of the Commitment (which for this purpose includes Loans outstanding thereunder) or, if the Commitment is not then in effect, the principal outstanding balance of the Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent or, if Trade Date is specified in the Assignment and Assumption, as of the Trade Date) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Administrative Agent and, so long as no Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower otherwise consents (each such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed).
paragraph (b)(i)(A)
 
(ii)
 
.  Each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement with respect to the Loan or the Commitment assigned.
Proportionate Amounts
 
(iii)
 
.  For each such assignment:
Required Consents
 
(A)
 
the consent of the Borrower (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) shall be required unless (x) an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of such assignment or (y) such assignment is to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund; that the Borrower shall be deemed to have consented to any such assignment unless it shall object thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within five Business Days after having received notice thereof;
provided
 
(B)
 
the consent of the Administrative Agent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for assignments in respect of an unfunded or revolving facility if such assignment is to an Eligible Assignee that is not
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
58
a Lender with a Commitment in respect of such facility, an Affiliate of such Lender or an Approved Fund with respect to such Lender; and
 
(C)
 
the consent of the applicable Issuing Banks (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for any assignment that increases the obligation of the assignee to participate in exposure under one or more Letters of Credit (whether or not then outstanding).
 
(iv)
 
.  The parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500, and the Eligible Assignee, if it is not a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire.
Assignment and Assumption
 
(v)
 
.  No such assignment shall be made to the Borrower or any of the Borrowers Affiliates or Subsidiaries.
No Assignment to Borrower
 
(vi)
 
.  No such assignment shall be made to a natural person.
No Assignment to Natural Persons
 
Subject to acceptance and recording thereof by the Administrative Agent pursuant to of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption, the Eligible Assignee thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto) but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of , , and with respect to facts and circumstances occurring prior to the effective date of such assignment.  Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this paragraph shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with of this Section.
paragraph (c)
Sections 3.5
3.6
3.7
10.3
paragraph (d)
 
(c)
 
.  The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices in New York, New York a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitments of, and principal amounts of the Loans owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ).  The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary.  The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
Register
 
(d)
 
.  Any Lender may at any time, without the consent of, but with notice to, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent ( that any failure to give such notice shall not impair the effectiveness of such participation except as expressly provided in of this Section), sell participations to any Person (other than a natural person or the Borrower or any of the Borrowers Affiliates or Subsidiaries) (each, a ) in all or a portion of such Lenders
Participations
provided
paragraph (e)
Participant
ALLETE Credit Agreement
59
rights and/or obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and/or the Loans owing to it); that (i) such Lenders obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations, (iii) such Lender shall remain the holder of any Note for all purposes of this Agreement and (iv) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and each Credit Party shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event may a participation be granted to any entity which is not a commercial bank, finance company, insurance company or other financial institution or fund (whether a corporation, partnership or other entity) engaged generally in making, purchasing or otherwise investing in commercial loans in the ordinary course of its business without the express prior written consent of the Borrower.
provided
 
Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver with respect to the following matters described in and of the first proviso in that directly affects such Participant. Subject to of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of , and to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to of this Section but (x) shall not be entitled to recover greater amounts under any such Section than the selling Lender would be entitled to recover and (y) shall be subject to replacement by the Borrower under to the same extent as if it were a Lender; that such replacement Participant shall be a commercial bank, finance company, insurance company or other financial institution or fund (whether a corporation, partnership or other entity) engaged generally in making, purchasing or otherwise investing in commercial loans in the ordinary course of its business. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to as though it were a Lender.
provided
clauses (ii)
(iii)
Section 10.2(b)
paragraph (e)
Sections 3.5
3.6
3.7
paragraph (b)
Section 3.8
provided
Section 10.8
 
Section 2.10(c)
 
Each Lender that sells a participating interest in any Loan or other interest to a Participant shall, as agent of the Borrower solely for the purpose of this ,  record in book entries maintained by such Lender the name and the amount of the participating interest of each Participant entitled to receive payments in respect of such participating interests; that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of such participant register to the Borrower or any other Person (other than the identity of any Participant pursuant to the first paragraph of this , but including any information relating to a Participants interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement) except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that the Loans are in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations.
Section 10.4
provided
clause (d)
 
(e)
 
.  A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under or than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrowers prior written consent.  A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with as though it were a Lender.
Limitations upon Participant Rights
Sections 3.5
3.7
Section 3.7
Section 3.7(c)
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
60
(f)
 
.  Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank; that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
Certain Pledges
provided
 
(g)
 
Notwithstanding any provision in this to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the provisions of shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender.
Section 10.4
Section 2.11
 
Section 10.5.
 
.  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Borrower herein and in the certificates or other instruments prepared or delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of any Loan Document and the making of any Loans and the issuance of any Letter of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that any Credit Party may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any LC Disbursement or any fee or any other amount payable under the Loan Documents is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated.  The provisions of , , , , , and shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans and the LC Disbursements, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the termination of the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Survival
Sections 3.5
3.6
3.7
10.3
10.9
10.10
Article 9
 
Section 10.6.
 
.  This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which, when taken together, shall constitute a single contract.  This Agreement and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to any Credit Party or the syndication of the credit facility established hereunder constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof.  Except as provided in , this Agreement shall become effective as of the date set forth in the preamble to this Agreement when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of this Agreement by facsimile transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
Section 5.1
 
Section 10.7.
 
.  In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Agreement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).  The parties shall endeavor in good faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
Severability
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
61
Section 10.8.
 
.  If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, and the acceleration of the obligations owing in connection with the Loan Documents, or at any time upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default under of , each of the Lenders and their respective Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, to set-off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by it to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against any of and all the obligations of the Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents held by it, irrespective of whether or not it shall have made any demand therefor and although such obligations may be unmatured.  The rights of each of the Lenders and their respective Affiliates under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of set-off) that it may have.  Each Lender agrees promptly to notify the Borrower and the Administrative Agent after any such set off and application made by such Lender, that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such set off and application.
Right of Set-off
paragraph (a)
Article 8
provided
 
Section 10.9.
 
.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process
 
(a)
 
This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
 
(b)
 
The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York City, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State court or, to the extent permitted by applicable law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent or any other Credit Party may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents against the Borrower, or any of its property, in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
(c)
 
The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents in any court referred to in of this Section.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
paragraph (b)
 
(d)
 
The Borrower irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in .  Nothing in this Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
Section 10.1
 
Section 10.10.
 
.  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR RELATING TO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
62
OR ANY OTHER THEORY).  EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS TO WHICH IT IS A PARTY BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
 
Section 10.11.
 
.  Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
 
Section 10.12.
 
.  Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan or LC Disbursement, together with all fees, charges and other amounts that are treated as interest thereon under applicable law (collectively the ), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the ) that may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding an interest in such Loan or LC Disbursement in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan or LC Disbursement hereunder, together with all of the charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and the charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan or LC Disbursement but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated, and the interest and the charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or LC Disbursements or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
Interest Rate Limitation
Charges
Maximum Rate
 
Section 10.13.
 
.  The Borrower hereby authorizes JPMorgan Chase or any Affiliate thereof to publish the name of the Borrower and the amount of the financing evidenced hereby in any tombstone or comparable advertisement that JPMorgan Chase or such Affiliate elects to publish.  In addition, the Borrower agrees that JPMorgan Chase or any Affiliates thereof may provide lending industry trade organizations with information necessary and customary for inclusion in league table measurements after the Signing Date.
Advertisement
 
Section 10.14.
 
.  Each Lender that is subject to the Patriot Act (as hereinafter defined) and the Administrative Agent (for itself and not on behalf of any Lender) hereby notifies the Borrower that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the ), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrower, which information includes the name and address of the Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, to identify the Borrower in accordance with the Patriot Act.
USA Patriot Act Notice
Patriot Act
 
Section 10.15.
 
.  Each Credit Party agrees to use reasonable precautions to keep confidential, in accordance with its customary procedures for handling confidential information of the same nature, all confidential, proprietary or non-public information supplied by the Borrower or any Subsidiary pursuant to this Agreement relating to the Borrower, such Subsidiary or their respective businesses, including, without limitation, any financial statement, financial projections or forecasts, budget, Compliance Certificate, audit report, management letter or accountants certification delivered hereunder (), provided that nothing herein shall limit the disclosure of any information (a) to any of its respective Related Parties that needs to know such
Treatment of Certain Information
Information
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
63
information, (b) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, or requested by any bank regulatory authority, (c) on a confidential basis, to any bona fide or potential assignee or participant in connection with the contemplated assignment or participation of any Loans or any participations therein or by any direct or indirect contractual counterparties (or the professional advisors thereto) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations (provided such assignees, participants, counterparties and advisors are advised of and agree to be bound by either the provisions of this or other provisions at least as restrictive as this ), (d) to auditors, accountants, consultants and advisors, and any analogous counterpart thereof, (e) to any other Credit Party, (f) in connection with any litigation to which any one or more of the Credit Parties is a party, (g) to the extent such information (A) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Agreement, (B) becomes available to any of the Credit Parties on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower or any of its Affiliates or (C) was available to the Credit Parties on a non-confidential basis prior to its disclosure to any of them by the Borrower or any of its Affiliates; and (h) to the extent the Borrower shall have consented to such disclosure in writing.
Section 10.15
Section 10.15
 
Section 10.16.
 
.  The Administrative Agent, each Lender and their Affiliates (collectively, solely for purposes of this paragraph, the Lenders), may have economic interests that conflict with those of the Borrower, their stockholders and/or their affiliates.  The Borrower agrees that nothing in the Loan Documents or otherwise will be deemed to create an advisory, fiduciary or agency relationship or fiduciary or other implied duty between any Lender, on the one hand, and such Borrower, its stockholders or its affiliates, on the other. The Borrower acknowledges and agrees that (i) the transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents (including the exercise of rights and remedies hereunder and thereunder) are arms-length commercial transactions between the Lenders, on the one hand, and the Borrower, on the other, and (ii) in connection therewith and with the process leading thereto, (x) no Lender has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Borrower, its stockholders or its affiliates with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby (or the exercise of rights or remedies with respect thereto) or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether any Lender has advised, is currently advising or will advise the Borrower, its stockholders or its Affiliates on other matters) or any other obligation to the Borrower except the obligations expressly set forth in the Loan Documents and (y) each Lender is acting solely as principal and not as the agent or fiduciary of the Borrower, its management, stockholders, creditors or any other Person. The Borrower acknowledges and agrees that it has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate and that it is responsible for making its own independent judgment with respect to such transactions and the process leading thereto. The Borrower agrees that it will not claim that any Lender has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to the Borrower, in connection with such transaction or the process leading thereto.
No Fiduciary Duty
 
Section 10.17.
 
.  The Borrower and the Lenders that are parties to the Existing Credit Agreement agree that concurrently with the effectiveness hereof on the Effective Date, all Commitments under and as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement shall terminate and the Existing Credit Agreement shall be of no further force or effect (except for provisions thereof that by their terms survive termination thereof).
Termination of Existing Credit Agreement
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
64
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Credit Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
S-1 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
S-2 
 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
S-3 
 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
S-4 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
S-5
 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
S-6 
 
 
The Applicable Margin for Eurodollar Borrowings, ABR Borrowings, Letter of Credit fees and facility fees shall be determined in accordance with the table below based on the the then-current Senior Debt Ratings.  The Senior Debt Ratings in effect on any date for the purposes of this Schedule are those in effect at the close of business on such date.
(a)           If each Rating Agency  issues a Senior Debt Rating, the applicable Senior Debt Rating shall be (i) if two of such Senior Debt Ratings are the same, such Senior Debt Ratings; and (ii) if all such Senior Debt Ratings are different, the middle of such Senior Debt Ratings.
(b)           If only two Rating Agencies issue a Senior Debt Rating, the applicable Senior Debt Rating shall be the higher of such Senior Debt Ratings; that if a split of greater than one ratings category occurs between such Senior Debt Ratings, the applicable Senior Debt Rating shall be the ratings category that is one category below the higher of such Senior Debt Ratings.
provided
(c)           If only one Rating Agency issues a Senior Debt Rating, the applicable Senior Debt Rating shall be such Senior Debt Rating.
(d)           If no Rating Agency issues a Senior Debt Rating, Pricing Level V shall apply.
 
 
 
LIST OF COMMITMENTS
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Schedule 2.1
 
DISCLOSED MATTERS
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Schedule 4.5/4.6
 
 
ALLETE Automotive Services, LLC
ALLETE Capital II
ALLETE Capital III
ALLETE Properties, LLC
ALLETE Commercial, LLC
Cape Coral Holdings, Inc.
Lake Swamp, LLC
Lehigh Acquisition Corporation
Florida Landmark Communities, LLC
Lehigh Corporation
Mardem, LLC
Palm Coast Holdings, Inc.
Port Orange Holdings, LLC
Interlachen Lakes Estates, LLC
Palm Coast Land, LLC
Tomoka Holdings, LLC
ALLETE Water Services, Inc.
Florida Water Services Corporation
Energy Replacement Property, LLC
Georgia Water Services Corporation
Energy Land, Incorporated
Lakeview Financial Corporation I
Lakeview Financial Corporation II
Logistics Coal, LLC
Minnesota Power Enterprises, Inc.
ALLETE Renewable Resources, Inc.
BNI Coal, Ltd.
MP Affiliate Resources, Inc.
Rainy River Energy Corporation
Rainy River Energy Corporation  Wisconsin
Synertec, Incorporated
Upper Minnesota Properties, Inc.
Upper Minnesota Properties - Development, Inc.
Upper Minnesota Properties - Irving, Inc.
Upper Minnesota Properties - Meadowlands, Inc.
MP Investments, Inc.
RendField Land Company, Inc.
Superior Water, Light and Power Company
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Schedule 4.10 
 
 
This Assignment and Assumption (the ) is dated as of the Effective Date set forth below and is entered into by and between [the] [each] Assignor identified in item 1 below ([the][each, an] ) and [the][each] Assignee identified in item 2 below ([the][each, an] ).  [It is understood and agreed that the rights and obligations of [the Assignors][the Assignees] hereunder are several and not joint.]  Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Credit Agreement identified below (as amended, modified or otherwise supplemented from time to time, the ), receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged by [the][each] Assignee.  The standard Terms and Conditions set forth in attached hereto are hereby agreed to and incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Assignment and Assumption as if set forth herein in full.
Assignment and Assumption
1
Assignor
2
Assignee
3
4
Credit Agreement
Annex 1
 
For an agreed consideration, the Assignor hereby irrevocably sells and assigns to the Assignee, and the Assignee hereby irrevocably purchases and assumes from the Assignor, subject to and in accordance with the Standard Terms and Conditions and the Credit Agreement, as of the Effective Date inserted by the Administrative Agent as contemplated below, all of the Assignors rights and obligations in its capacity as a Lender under the Credit Agreement and any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto that represents the amount and percentage interest identified below of all of the Assignors outstanding rights and obligations under the respective facilities identified below (including without limitation any letters of credit included in such facilities and, to the extent permitted to be assigned under applicable law, all claims (including without limitation contract claims, tort claims, malpractice claims, statutory claims and all other claims at law or in equity), suits, causes of action and any other right of the Assignor against any Person whether known or unknown arising under or in connection with the Credit Agreement, any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto or the loan transactions governed thereby) other than claims for indemnification or reimbursement with respect to any period prior to Effective Date (the ).  Such sale and assignment is without recourse to the Assignor and, except as expressly provided in this Assignment and Assumption, without representation or warranty by the Assignor.
Assigned Interest
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
For bracketed language here and elsewhere in this form relating to the Assignor(s), if the assignment is from a single Assignor, choose the first bracketed language.  If the assignment is from multiple Assignors, choose the second bracketed language.
1
For bracketed language here and elsewhere in this form relating to the Assignee(s), if the assignment is to a single Assignee, choose the first bracketed language.  If the assignment is to multiple Assignees, choose the second bracketed language.
2
 
Select as appropriate.
3
Include bracketed language if there are either multiple Assignors or multiple Assignees.
4
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit A-1
 
 
]
Effective Date: ____________________, 20__ [TO BE INSERTED BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND WHICH SHALL BE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF RECORDATION OF TRANSFER BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT.
 
The terms set forth in this Assignment and Assumption are hereby agreed to:
 
ASSIGNOR
NAME OF ASSIGNOR
[
]
By:
Title:
ASSIGNEE
NAME OF ASSIGNEE
[
]
By:
Title:
 
List each Assignor, as appropriate.
5
List each Assignee, as appropriate.
6
 
Amount to be adjusted by the counterparties to take into account any payments or prepayments made between the Trade Date and the Effective Date
7
 
Set forth, to at least 9 decimals, as a percentage of the Commitment/Loans of all Lenders thereunder.
8
Insert if satisfaction of minimum amounts is to be determined as of the Trade Date.
9
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit A-2 
[Consented to and] [a] [A]ccepted:
10
 
 
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent
By:
Title:
 
[Consented to:]
11
[NAME OF RELEVANT PARTY]
By:
Title:
 
 
To be added only if the consent of the Administrative Agent is required by the terms of the Credit Agreement.
10
To be added only if the consent of the Borrower and/or other parties (e.g. LC Issuer) is required by the terms of the Credit Agreement.
11
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit A-3 
 
 
 
1.  .
Representations and Warranties
 
1.1  .  The Assignor (a) represents and warrants that (i) it is the legal and beneficial owner of the Assigned Interest, (ii) the Assigned Interest is free and clear of any lien, encumbrance or other adverse claim and (iii) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby; and (b) assumes no responsibility with respect to (i) any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, (ii) the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of the Loan Documents or any collateral thereunder, (iii) the financial condition of the Borrower, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person obligated in respect of any Loan Document or (iv) the performance or observance by the Borrower, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person of any of their respective obligations under any Loan Document.
Assignor
 
1.2.  .  The Assignee (a) represents and warrants that (i) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and to become a Lender under the Credit Agreement, (ii) it satisfies the requirements specified in the Credit Agreement that are required to be satisfied by it in order to acquire the Assigned Interest and become a Lender, (iii) from and after the Effective Date, it shall be bound by the provisions of the Credit Agreement as a Lender thereunder and, to the extent of the Assigned Interest, shall have the obligations of a Lender thereunder, (iv) it is sophisticated with respect to decisions to acquire assets of the type represented by the Assigned Interest and either it, or the person exercising discretion in making its decision to acquire the Assigned Interest, is experienced in acquiring assets of such type, (v) it has received a copy of the Credit Agreement, together with copies of the most recent financial statements delivered pursuant to thereof, as applicable, and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Assignment and Assumption and to purchase the Assigned Interest on the basis of which it has made such analysis and decision independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent or any other Lender, and (vi) if it is a Foreign Lender, attached to the Assignment and Assumption is any documentation required to be delivered by it pursuant to the terms of the Credit Agreement, duly completed and executed by the Assignee; and (b) agrees that (i) it will, independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent, the Assignor or any other Lender, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Loan Documents, and (ii) it will perform in accordance with their terms all of the obligations which by the terms of the Loan Documents are required to be performed by it as a Lender.
Assignee
Section 6.1
 
2.  .  From and after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments in respect of the Assigned Interest (including payments of principal, interest, fees and other amounts) to the Assignor for amounts which have accrued to but excluding the Effective Date and to the Assignee for amounts which have accrued from and after the Effective Date. The Assignor and Assignee shall make all appropriate adjustments in payments by the Administrative Agent for periods prior to the Effective Date or with respect to the making of this assignment directly between themselves.
Payments
 
3.  .  This Assignment and Assumption shall be binding upon, and inure to the benefit of, the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  This Assignment and Assumption may be executed in any number of counterparts, which together shall constitute one
General Provisions
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit A-4
 
instrument.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Assignment and Assumption by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Assignment and Assumption.  This Assignment and Assumption shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of New York.
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit A-5
 
 
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent
10 S. Dearborn, Floor 07
Chicago, IL 60603
Attention: Teresita Siao
 
Ladies/Gentlemen:
 
Please refer to the Credit Agreement dated as of May 25, 2011 among ALLETE, Inc. (the ), the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (in such capacity, the ) (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ).  Capitalized terms used herein that are defined in the Credit Agreement shall have the meanings therein defined.
Borrower
Administrative Agent
Credit Agreement
 
1.           Pursuant to Section 2.3(a) of the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby gives notice of its intention to borrow Borrowings in an aggregate principal amount of $ ________on ______ __, 200__, which Borrowing(s) shall consist of the following Types:
 
2.           Pursuant to Sections 2.8 and 5.2 of the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby requests that [INSERT NAME OF ISSUING BANK] [issue, amend, renew or extend] Letter(s) of Credit on ______ __, 200_, in accordance with the information annexed hereto (attach additional sheets if necessary).
 
3.           The Borrower hereby certifies that on the date hereof and on the Borrowing Date set forth above, and after giving effect to the Loans and Letters of Credit requested hereby, there exists and shall exist no Default and each of the representations and warranties contained in each Loan Document (other than the representations and warranties in Sections 4.4(b), 4.5 and 4.6 of the Credit Agreement) is and shall be true and correct in all material respects, except to the extent such representations and warranties specifically relate to an earlier date, in which case such representations and warranties were true and correct at such earlier date.
 
4.           The location and number of the Borrowers account to which funds are to be disbursed is as follows:  [INSERT WIRE INSTRUCTIONS]
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit B-1 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Borrower has caused this Credit Request to be executed by its authorized signatory as of the date and year first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit B-2 
 
 
 
____________, 2011
 
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned, ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the ), hereby promises to pay to the order of [INSERT LENDER NAME] (the ) the unpaid principal amount of the Loans made by the Lender to the Borrower, in the amounts and at the times set forth in the Credit Agreement dated as of May 25, 2011 among the Borrower, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ), and to pay interest from the date hereof on the principal balance of such Loans from time to time outstanding at the rate or rates and at the times set forth in the Credit Agreement, in each case at the office of the Administrative Agent located at Ten South Dearborn Street, Chicago, Illinois, or at such other place as the Administrative Agent may specify from time to time, in lawful money of the United States in immediately available funds.  Terms not otherwise defined herein but defined in the Credit Agreement are used herein with the same meanings.
Borrower
Lender
Credit Agreement
 
The Loans evidenced by this Note are prepayable in the amounts, and under the circumstances, and their respective maturities are subject to acceleration upon the terms, set forth in the Credit Agreement.  This Note is subject to, and shall be construed in accordance with, the provisions of the Credit Agreement and is entitled to the benefits and security set forth in the Loan Documents.
 
The Lender is hereby authorized to record on the Schedule annexed hereto, and any continuation sheets which the Lender may attach hereto, (i) the date of each Loan made by the Lender to the Borrower, (ii) the Type and amount thereof, (iii) the interest rate (without regard to the Applicable Margin) and Interest Period applicable to each Eurodollar Loan and (iv) the date and amount of each conversion of, and each payment or prepayment of the principal of, any such Loan.  The entries made on such Schedule shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded thereon, provided that the failure to so record or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement.
 
Except as specifically otherwise provided in the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby waives presentment, demand, notice of dishonor, protest, notice of protest and all other demands, protests and notices in connection with the execution, delivery, performance, collection and enforcement of this Note.
 
Whenever in this Note either party hereto is referred to, such reference shall be deemed to include the successors and assigns of such party.  The Borrower shall not have the right to assign its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein (and any such attempted assignment shall be void), except as expressly permitted by the Loan Documents.  No failure or delay of the Lender in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  Neither this Note nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified, nor shall any departure therefrom be consented to, except pursuant to a written agreement entered into between the Borrower and the Lender with respect to which such waiver, amendment,
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit C-1
 
modification or consent is to apply, subject to any consent required in accordance with Section 10.2 of the Credit Agreement.
 
THIS NOTE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 10.1 of the Credit Agreement.
 
The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York City, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Note or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State court or, to the extent permitted by applicable law, in such Federal court.  The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Note shall affect any right that the Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Note or the other Loan Documents against the Borrower, or any of its property, in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Note or the other Loan Documents in any court referred to in the preceding paragraph hereof.  The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices herein.  Nothing herein will affect the right of the Lender to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
THE BORROWER, AND BY ACCEPTING THIS NOTE, THE LENDER, EACH HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR RELATING TO THIS NOTE.  THE BORROWER (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF THE LENDER HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH LENDER WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT SUCH LENDER HAS BEEN INDUCED TO ACCEPT THIS NOTE AND ENTER INTO THE LOAN DOCUMENTS TO WHICH IT IS A PARTY BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS PARAGRAPH.
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit C-2
 
 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit C-3
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit C-4
 
 
I, ______________, do hereby certify that I am the ______________ of ALLETE, Inc. (the ), and that, as such, I am duly authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on the Borrowers behalf pursuant to Section 6.1(c) of the Credit Agreement dated as of May 25, 2011 among the Borrower, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ).  Capitalized terms used herein which are not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement.
Borrower
Credit Agreement
 
I hereby certify that:
 
1.           To the best of my knowledge, all financial statements delivered herewith have been prepared in accordance with GAAP.  There have been no changes in GAAP pertinent to the Borrower or in the application thereof to Borrower and that affects the computation of any financial covenant set forth in Section 7.5 of the Credit Agreement, since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 4.4(a) of the Credit Agreement,[, except as follows:]
 
 
12
 
2.           There existed no Default on the last day of the fiscal quarter ended _________, 200__, and there exists no Default as of the date hereof [, except as follows]
13
 
3.           Attached are true and correct calculations demonstrating compliance with Section 7.5 of the Credit Agreement as of the fiscal quarter ended _________, 200__ (the ).
Quarter
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have executed this Compliance Certificate on this ___ day of ________________, 200__.
 
 
Specify each such change and the effect thereof on the financial statements accompanying this Compliance Certificate as set forth in Section 1.4 of the Credit Agreement.
12
Specify all such violations, conditions and events, the nature and status thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
13
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit D-1
 
 
 
Each of the computations is based on the Borrower and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
14
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit D-2
 
 
INCREASE SUPPLEMENT, dated as of __________________, 200__ to the Credit Agreement, dated as May 25, 2011, among ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the ), the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (the Administrative Agent) (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ).  Capitalized terms used herein that are defined in the Credit Agreement shall have the meanings therein defined.
Borrower
Credit Agreement
 
1.           Pursuant to Section 2.5(d) of the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby proposes to increase (the ) the aggregate Commitments from $________________ to $________________.
Increase
 
2.           Each of the following Lenders (each an ) has been invited by the Borrower, and has agreed, subject to the terms hereof, to increase its Commitment as follows:
Increasing Lender
 
3.           Each of the following Persons (each a ) has been invited by the Borrower, and has agreed, subject to the terms hereof, to become a Lender under the Credit Agreement with a Commitment in the amount set forth below:
Proposed Lender
 
4.           The Borrower hereby represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent, each Lender and each such Person that immediately before and after giving effect to the Increase, (a) no Default exists or would exist under the Loan Documents and (b) the reps and warranties of the Borrower set forth in the Loan Documents are true and correct on the date hereof except to the extent such reps and warranties specifically relate to an earlier date.
 
5.           Pursuant to Section 2.5(d) of the Credit Agreement, by execution and delivery of this Increase Supplement, together with the satisfaction of all of the requirements set forth in clauses (i) through (v) of such Section 2.5(d) (the date of such satisfaction being the ), (i) each of the Increasing Lenders shall have, on and as of the Increase Effective Date of the Increase, a Commitment equal to the amount set forth above next to its name, and (ii) each such Proposed Lender as of the Increase Effective Date shall be deemed to be a Lender under, and as such term is defined in, the Credit Agreement, and shall have a Commitment equal to the amount set forth above next to its name.
Increase Effective Date
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit E-1
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Increase Supplement to be duly executed and delivered by their proper and duly authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Exhibit E-2
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20110624095556.txt.gz
TIME:20110624095556
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
 
Item 8.01Other Events
   
 
 
On June 22, 2011, Minnesota Power, a division of ALLETE, Inc., issued a press release announcing its plan to build the Bison 3 wind development project. A copy of the press release is filed as Exhibit 99 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
 
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
   
 
(d) Exhibits
 
Exhibit Number
 
 
 
 
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
 
2
 
Safe Harbor Statement
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
 
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
 
 
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
3
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 
4
 

 
 
 
Duluth, Minn.Minnesota Power, an ALLETE company, has accelerated its plans to build a third wind energy project in North Dakota, citing a competitive turbine market, federal production tax credits and regulatory support as factors for moving up its timeline.
 
The Company submitted a plan to the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission this week to build a 105 Megawatt, $157 million, wind farm in Oliver and Morton Counties in central North Dakota. The 35 turbine Bison 3 project will be constructed in the same proximity as the Companys Bison 1 and 2 wind projects.  Coupled with the Companys scheduled biomass and current wind projects, Bison 3 will move the Company further toward its goal of achieving the State of Minnesotas mandate of 25 percent renewable energy by 2025.
 
In approving Minnesota Powers long-term resource plan, the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission in May ordered the Company that it strongly consider adding more wind to its renewable portfolio, before the expiration of federal production tax credits on December 31, 2012.
 
The Company is currently building two other wind developments in North Dakota, where wind resources are considered among the best in the country. The 82MW Bison 1 is halfway complete with the second phase expected to be online at the end of 2011. Bison 2, a 105MW wind development, will be constructed concurrently with Bison 3; both projects are scheduled to be in service in 2012. Bison 2 and 3 will begin construction upon receipt of necessary permits and approvals.  The Bison 3 project will use state of the art direct-drive 3.0MW Siemens turbines like those being used for the second phase of Bison 1 and all of Bison 2.
 
The timing is optimal for expanding our wind initiative in North Dakota, said Al Hodnik, ALLETE Chairman, President and CEO. Building Bison 2 and 3 concurrently will result in construction cost savings, and allow us to leverage existing transmission. Were delivering on our growth strategy while meeting a changing landscape that requires a cleaner, more sustainable energy supply.
 
The energy from all three projects will be delivered to Minnesota Power customers via a direct current large transmission line (the D.C. line) which stretches 465 miles from the Square Butte Substation in Center, N.D. to the companys Arrowhead Substation near Duluth. The addition of Bison 3 will move the company within five percent of achieving the states 25 by 2025 mandate in the year 2020.
 
As we explained with its purchase in 2009, the DC transmission line is a critical element in our overall strategy to diversify our energy portfolio and cost effectively achieve the states renewable energy policy, Hodnik said.
 
The project will have little to no immediate impact on base electric rates. Over time, the addition of wind energy is expected to lower costs to customers by offsetting power purchases in the wholesale market. Minnesota Power will seek current cost recovery eligibility for Bison 3, which, if approved, will occur under the Companys Renewable Resources Rider.
 
ALLETE is an energy company and its principal operating division Minnesota Power provides retail electric service within a 26,000-square-mile area in northeastern Minnesota to 144,000 customers and wholesale electric service to 16 municipalities. More information can be found at .
www.mnpower.com
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20110701080654.txt.gz
TIME:20110701080654
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C.  20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported) June 29, 2011 (July 1, 2011)
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01                      Other Events
On June 29, 2011, Minnesota Power, a division of ALLETE, Inc., issued a press release announcing agreements reached with 15 Minnesota municipal customers for new wholesale electric service contracts that will take effect July 1, 2011 and extend through June 30, 2019. A copy of the press release is filed as Exhibit 99 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and is incorporated herein by reference.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01                      Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
 
 
2
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
 
 
3
 
 
SIGNATURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
4
 

   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
 
 
DULUTH, Minn. -- Minnesota Power, an ALLETE company (NYSE:ALE), has reached agreement with 15 Minnesota municipal customers on new wholesale electric service contracts that take effect July 1 and extend through June 30, 2019.
 
The municipal electric service contracts continue using formula-based electric rates authorized by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission. Taken in total, the municipal contracts of Minnesota Power represent approximately 300 megawatts.
 
Al Hodnik, ALLETEs Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, gave much credit for negotiating the new contracts to the Northern Minnesota Electrical Association, a consortium of the utilitys municipal customers.
 
Powering the cities and towns in northern Minnesota is a fundamental part of our business and a significant piece of our energy load, Hodnik said. We greatly value these municipal customers and the strong relationships weve built with them over the years. Were excited theyve chosen us as their power provider.
 
Minnesota Power provides wholesale electric service to the municipalities of Virginia, Hibbing, Grand Rapids, Brainerd, Ely, Aitkin, Two Harbors, Proctor, Biwabik, Buhl, Gilbert, Keewatin, Mountain Iron, Pierz, Randall and Nashwauk (which signed a new long-term agreement with Minnesota Power in February).
 
The company also provides wholesale electric service to Superior Water, Light & Power Co. in Superior, Wis. and to Dahlberg Light and Power, based in Solon Springs, Wis.
 
In addition to selling electric power to municipal customers, Minnesota Power provides retail electric service to about 144,000 residents and to many large industrial customers involved in taconite and paper production and petroleum pipeline transport.
 
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20110729080244.txt.gz
TIME:20110729080244
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 2  FINANCIAL INFORMATION
Item 2.02                      Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On July 29, 2011, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) issued a press release announcing earnings for the second quarter of 2011, which is attached to this Current Report on Form 8-K and furnished as Exhibit 99.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01                      Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 29, 2011
 
2
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 29, 2011
 
3
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated July 29, 2011
 
4
 

 
 
ALLETE, Inc. (NYSE: ALE) today reported second quarter 2011 earnings of 48 cents per share and net income of $17 million, compared to earnings of 57 cents per share and net income of $19.4 million in last years second quarter. Revenue for the quarter increased four percent to $219.9 million from $211.2 million a year ago.
 
Income from ALLETEs segment was similar to last years second quarter at $18.3 million, and reflected a $2.9 million, or eight cents per share, income tax benefit. This non-recurring benefit resulted from the Minnesota Public Utilities Commissions approval of our request to defer the retail portion of last years tax charge for the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (PPACA).
Regulated Operations
 
Regulated Operations income for the quarter also included a $2.6 million benefit from the implementation of final electric rates and cost recovery rider revenue, and a $1.5 million impact from higher retail and municipal electric sales.
 
Operating and maintenance expenses for the segment increased by $7.9 million, compared to the same period a year ago. The second quarter of 2011 also recorded higher depreciation and interest expenses related to the companys recent investments in environmental improvements, renewable energy production and transmission assets.
 
Results for the quarter were consistent with our expectations, said ALLETE Chairman, President and CEO Alan R. Hodnik. It is important to note that the year-to-date increase in operating and maintenance expenses was anticipated, and was primarily related to scheduled maintenance projects at Minnesota Powers generating stations. For the full year, however, we expect operations and maintenance expenses to be comparable to those in 2010.
 
In the segment, ALLETE recorded a net loss of $1.3 million in the second quarter of 2011, compared to income of $1.2 million in the year-ago period. Last years quarterly income included a $1.1 million benefit from the successful resolution of a state income tax audit. Income from BNI Coal was about the same as in 2010. ALLETE Properties recorded no sales during the period, but reduced its operating expenses compared to last year. Quarterly results for this segment also included an increase in investment-related expenses for 2011.
Investments and Other
 
An increase in the average number of common shares outstanding, with proceeds used to fund the companys capital investment program, had a dilutive impact of two cents per share for the quarter.
 
Im pleased with our progress this year, both financially and operationally, and ALLETE is in great position to meet its 2011 earnings guidance of between $2.40 and $2.60 per share, excluding the tax benefit related to the PPACA, Hodnik said.
 
 
1
 
Since the beginning of the year, weve made significant strides in executing a strategy that will build value over the long term. Weve signed a long-term power purchase agreement with Manitoba Hydro; announced plans to build the Bison 2 and 3 wind energy projects; signed new wholesale electric service contracts with 16 municipal customers through at least 2019; participated in negotiations resulting in a long-term electric service contract between Essar Steel Minnesota and one of our municipal customers, the City of Nashwauk; and launched a new business, ALLETE Clean Energy. It is an exciting time for ALLETE.
 
The company will host a conference call and webcast at 10:00 a.m. Eastern time today to discuss details of its performance for the year. Interested parties may listen live by calling (877) 303-5852, or by accessing the webcast at . A replay of the call will be available through August 2, 2011 by dialing
www.allete.com
(800) 642-1687, pass code 78840521.
 
ALLETEs corporate headquarters are in Duluth, Minn. In addition to its electric utilities, Minnesota Power and Superior Water, Light & Power Co. of Wisconsin, ALLETE owns BNI Coal in Center, N.D., ALLETE Clean Energy, also based in Duluth, and has an eight percent equity interest in the American Transmission Co. More information about the company is available at www.allete.com.
 
The statements contained in this release and statements that ALLETE may make orally in connection with this release that are not historical facts, are forward-looking statements. Actual results may differ materially from those projected in the forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties and investors are directed to the risks discussed in documents filed by ALLETE with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
ALLETEs press releases and other communications may include certain non-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP) financial measures. A non-GAAP financial measure is defined as a numerical measure of a companys financial performance, financial position or cash flows that excludes (or includes) amounts that are included in (or excluded from) the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP in the companys financial statements.
 
Non-GAAP financial measures utilized by the Company include presentations of earnings (loss) per share. ALLETEs management believes that these non-GAAP financial measures provide useful information to investors by removing the effect of variances in GAAP reported results of operations that are not indicative of changes in the fundamental earnings power of the Companys operations. Management believes that the presentation of the non-GAAP financial measures is appropriate and enables investors and analysts to more accurately compare the companys ongoing financial performance over the periods presented.
 
 
2 
 
 
ALLETE, Inc.
 
 
3 
 
 
4 
 
 
 
5 
 
Regulated Operations includes our regulated utilities, Minnesota Power and SWL&P, as well as our investment in ATC, a Wisconsin-based utility that owns and maintains electric transmission assets in parts of Wisconsin, Michigan, Minnesota, and Illinois. Investments and Other is comprised primarily of BNI Coal, our coal mining operations in North Dakota, and ALLETE Properties, our Florida real estate investment. This segment also includes a small amount of non-rate base generation, land available-for-sale in Minnesota and earnings on cash and short-term investments.
 
6 
 
 
 
7 
 
Our capital expenditures for 2011 are expected to be approximately $280 million. For the six months ended June 30, 2011, capital expenditures totaled $79.7 million ($85.1 million for the six months ended June 30, 2010). The expenditures were primarily made in the Regulated Operations segment.
ALLETEs projected capital expenditures for the years 2011 through 2015 are presented in the table below. Actual capital expenditures may vary from the estimates due to changes in forecasted plant maintenance, regulatory decisions or approvals, future environmental requirements, base load growth, capital market conditions or executions of new business strategies.
Pending environmental regulations could result in significant capital expenditures in the future that are not included in the table above. Currently, future CapX2020 transmission projects are under discussions. Minnesota Power may elect to participate on a project-by-project basis.
This exhibit has been furnished and shall not be deemed filed for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such filing.
 
8 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20110831162721.txt.gz
TIME:20110831162721
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
 
 
 
SECTION 2  FINANCIAL INFORMATION
Item 2.03                      Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation Under an Off-Balance Sheet
Arrangement of a Registrant
On August 25, 2011, ALLETE, Inc. entered into a $75 million Term Loan Agreement with JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent and a Lender, Bank of America, N.A., as a Lender, and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC as Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Book Runner (Term Loan). The Term Loan is an unsecured, single-draw loan that is due on August 25, 2014. The interest rate on the Term Loan is equal to LIBOR plus 1.00 percent; however, we have entered into an interest rate swap agreement to effectively lock the interest rate at 1.825 percent for the length of the loan. Proceeds from the Term Loan will be used for general corporate purposes.
The Term Loan contains customary conditions of borrowing, customary events of default and customary affirmative and negative covenants. The Term Loan includes a financial covenant to maintain a ratio of Total Indebtedness to Total Capitalization (as defined therein) equal to or less than 65 percent. Indebtedness under the Term Loan may be accelerated upon the occurrence of an event of default, including cross-default to other indebtedness in excess of $35 million.
A copy of the Term Loan is filed as Exhibit 4 hereto and is incorporated by reference herein. The description of the Term Loan above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Term Loan.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01                      Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 3 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 31, 2011
 
2
 
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 31, 2011
 
3
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 31, 2011
 
4
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(iii)
 
 
THIS TERM LOAN AGREEMENT (this ) dated as of August 25, 2011, is among ALLETE, INC., the Lenders party hereto and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent,
Agreement
 
WHEREAS, the Lenders have agreed to make term loans to the Borrower in an aggregate principal amount up to $75,000,000,
 
NOW, THEREFORE, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
ARTICLE 1.
 
DEFINITIONS AND INTERPRETATION
 
Section 1.1.
   
.  As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms
 
 means PricewaterhouseCoopers, L.L.P. or another registered public accounting firm of recognized national standing.
Accountants
 
 means, for any Interest Period, an interest rate (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period (b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
per annum
 
multiplied by
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder, and any successor in such capacity.
Administrative Agent
 
 means an administrative questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
 
 means, for any day, a rate equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus 1/2 of 1%, and (c) the Adjusted LIBO Rate for a one month Interest Period on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) plus 1% (provided that, for the avoidance of doubt, the Adjusted LIBO Rate for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on the Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page 1 (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service)at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day).  Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
per annum
per annum
 
 
  means, with respect to any Lender, (a) prior to the making of the Loans, the percentage of the total Commitments represented by such Lenders Commitment; and (b) thereafter, the percentage of the aggregate principal amount of the Loans represented by the principal amount of such Lenders Loan.
Applicable Percentage
 
 
 
 
 means, with respect to any Lender that is a fund that invests in commercial loans, any other fund that invests in commercial loans and is managed or advised by the same investment advisor as such Lender or by an Affiliate of such investment advisor.
Approved Fund
 
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an Eligible Assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by ), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, substantially in the form of or in such other form as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
Section 10.4
Exhibit A
 
  means, with respect to any Person, such Person becomes the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee, administrator, custodian, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with the reorganization or liquidation of its business appointed for it, or, in the good faith determination of the Administrative Agent, has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of, or acquiescence in, any such proceeding or appointment, that a Bankruptcy Event shall not result solely by virtue of any ownership interest, or the acquisition of any ownership interest, in such Person by a Governmental Authority or instrumentality thereof, , , that such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Person with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Person (or such Governmental Authority or instrumentality) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made by such Person.
Bankruptcy Event
provided
provided
further
 
 means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
 
 means ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation.
Borrower
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Borrower Financial Statements
Section 4.4(a)
 
 means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed, that, when used in connection with borrowing or continuing, or paying principal of or interest on, or determining the interest rate for, the Loans, the term Business Day shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
provided
 
 means with respect to any Person, obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP, provided that no power purchase agreement shall constitute a Capital Lease Obligation.
Capital Lease Obligations
 
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (a) the consummation of any transaction the result of which is that any person or group (within the meaning of Section 13(d)(3) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 but excluding any employee benefit plan of the Borrower or its Subsidiaries, and any Person acting in its capacity as trustee, agent or other fiduciary or administrator of any such plan) becomes the beneficial owner (as such term is defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) of more than 30% of the total voting power in the aggregate of all classes of the Voting Securities of the Borrower then outstanding, (b) during any period of two consecutive calendar years, individuals who at the beginning of such period constituted the board of directors of the Borrower cease for any reason to constitute a majority of the directors of the Borrower then in office unless (i) such new directors were elected or nominated by a majority of the directors of the Borrower who constituted
Change in Control
 
 
2
 
the board of directors of the Borrower at the beginning of such period or (ii) the reason for such directors failing to constitute a majority is a result of retirement by directors due to age, death or disability or (c) any event or condition relating to a change of control of the Borrower shall occur which requires or permits the holder or holders of indebtedness of the Borrower in an aggregate principal amount of $35,000,000 or more, or any agent or trustee for such holders, to require payment, purchase, redemption or defeasance of such indebtedness prior to its expressed maturity.
 
 means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the date hereof, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the date hereof or (c) compliance by any Credit Party (or, for purposes of , by any lending office of such Credit Party or by such Credit Partys holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the date hereof; that, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or any United States regulatory authority pursuant to Basel III shall, in each case referred to in the foregoing and , be deemed to be a Change in Law, regardless of the date enacted, adopted, promulgated or issued.
Change in Law
Section 3.3(b)
provided
clauses (i)
(ii)
 
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Code
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make its Loan on the Effective Date in the amount set forth opposite such Lenders name on .  The aggregate amount of the Commitments is $75,000,000.
Commitment
Schedule 2.1
 
 means a certificate, substantially in the form of .
Compliance Certificate
Exhibit C
 
 means the total amount of assets shown on the consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, determined in accordance with GAAP and prepared as of the end of the fiscal quarter then most recently ended for which financial statements have been filed with the SEC.
Consolidated Assets
 
  means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise.  The terms Controlling and Controlled have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
 
 means the Administrative Agent and the Lenders.
Credit Parties
 
  means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
 means the actions, suits, proceedings and environmental matters disclosed in (a) , (b) the current and periodic reports filed by the Borrower from time to time with the SEC pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the
Disclosed Matters
Schedule 4.5/4.6
 
 
3
 
rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, or (c) disclosed by the Borrower to the Lenders (either directly or indirectly through the Administrative Agent) in writing.
 
 means any Equity Interest that, by its terms (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable at the option of the holder thereof), or upon the happening of any event, matures (excluding any maturity as a result of an optional redemption by the issuer thereof) or is mandatorily redeemable, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, or is redeemable at the unconditional sole option of the holder thereof (other than solely for Equity Interests that do not constitute Disqualified Stock), in whole or in part, on or prior to the date that is 180 days after the Maturity Date.
Disqualified Stock
 
 or  refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
 
 means August 25, 2011.
Effective Date
 
 means any of the following (a) any commercial banks, finance companies, insurance companies and other financial institutions and funds (whether a corporation, partnership or other entity) engaged generally in making, purchasing or otherwise investing in commercial loans in the ordinary course of its business, that unless such entity is a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender, such entity has been approved by the Administrative Agent and, unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of assignment to such entity, the Borrower (each such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed), and , , that any such entity shall be entitled, as of the date such entity becomes a Lender, to receive payments under its Note without deduction or withholding with respect to United States federal income tax, (b) each of the Lenders and (c) any Affiliate or Approved Fund of a Lender, and each is an Eligible Assignee.
Eligible Assignees
provided
provided
 
further
 
 means ambient air, surface water and groundwater (including potable water, navigable water and wetlands), the land surface or subsurface strata, the workplace or as otherwise defined in any Environmental Law.
Environment
 
  means any and all applicable present and future treaties, laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by or with any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the presence, management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Environmental Law
 
 means any permit, approval, authorization, certificate, license, variance, filing or permission required by or from any Governmental Authority pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Environmental Permit
 
 means (a) shares of corporate stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membership interests, and any other interest that confers on a Person the right to receive a share of the profits and losses of, or distribution of assets of, the issuing Person, and (b) all warrants, options or other rights to acquire any Equity Interest set forth in the foregoing .
Equity Interest
clause (a)
 
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
ERISA
 
 means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Borrower or any Subsidiary, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the
ERISA Affiliate
 
 
4
 
Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
 
 means (a) any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30 day notice period is waived), (b) any failure to satisfy the minimum funding standards of Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA with respect to any Plan, whether or not waived, (c) the incurrence by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan, (d) the receipt by  the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan, (e) the incurrence by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan or (f) the receipt by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Event of Default
Article 8
 
 means, for any day, a rate (expressed as a decimal, rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next higher 1/100 of 1%) equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by federal funds brokers on such day, as published for such day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, that (a) if the day for which such rate is to be determined is not a Business Day, the Federal Funds Effective Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Business Day and (b) if such rate is not so published for any day, the Federal Funds Effective Rate for such day shall be the average of the quotations for such day on such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal Funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
per annum
provided
 
 means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of the Borrower.
Financial Officer
 
 means Fitch Ratings, or any successor thereto.
Fitch
 
 means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is located.  For purposes of this definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
 
  means generally accepted accounting principles set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and in the statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statement by such other entity as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession, which are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied; that in the event Borrower converts to use the International Financial Reporting Standards by the International Accounting Standards Board or other method of accounting, as may hereafter be required or permitted by the SEC, then the term GAAP as used in this Agreement shall be deemed to mean and refer to such International Financial Reporting Standards or
GAAP
provided
 
 
5
 
such other method of accounting instead, which are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied.
 
 means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, commission, exchange, association, board, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
 
 of or by any Person (the ) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the primary obligor) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation, that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.  The term Guaranteed has a meaning correlative thereto.  The amount of any Guarantee of a Person shall be deemed to be an amount equal to the stated or determinable amount of the primary obligation in respect of which such Guarantee is made (or, if less, the maximum amount of such primary obligation for which such Person may be liable pursuant to the terms of the instrument evidencing such Guarantee) or, if not stated or determinable, the maximum reasonably anticipated liability in respect thereof as determined by such Person in good faith, that, notwithstanding anything in this definition to the contrary, the amount of any Guarantee of a Person in respect of any Permitted Hedge Agreement by any other Person with a counterparty shall be deemed to be the maximum reasonably anticipated liability of such other Person, as determined in good faith by such Person, net of any obligation or liability of such counterparty in respect of any Permitted Hedge Agreement with such Person, that the obligations of such other Person under such Permitted Hedge Agreement with such counterparty shall be terminable at the election of such other Person in the event of a default by such counterparty in its obligations to such other Person.
Guarantee
guarantor
provided
provided
provided
further
 
 means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
 
 means any interest rate protection agreement, foreign currency exchange agreement, commodity price protection agreement or other interest rate, currency exchange rate or commodity price hedge, future, forward, swap, option, cap, floor, collar or similar agreement or arrangement (including both physical and financial settlement transactions).
Hedge Agreement
 
 means a Subsidiary that (a) has consolidated total assets with a book value not exceeding 5% of Consolidated Assets as of the end of the most recent fiscal quarter for which financial statements have been filed with the SEC and (b) had total revenues not exceeding 5%
Immaterial Subsidiary
 
 
6
 
of the Borrowers consolidated total revenues for the period ending on the last day of such fiscal quarter.
 
 means any transaction or event described in or of so long as, after giving effect to such transaction or event, all Subsidiaries that have become subject to such transactions or events during the 12-month period ending on the date of such transaction or event (a) had consolidated total assets with a fair market value not exceeding 5% of Consolidated Assets as of the end of the most recent fiscal quarter for which financial statements have been filed with the SEC and (b) had total revenues not exceeding 5% of the Borrowers consolidated total revenues for the period ending on the last day of such fiscal quarter.
Immaterial Transaction
paragraph (i)
(j)
Article 8
 
  means as to any Person, at a particular time, all items which constitute, without duplication, (a) indebtedness for borrowed money or the deferred purchase price of property (excluding trade payables incurred in the ordinary course of business and excluding any such obligations payable solely through the Borrowers issuance of Equity Interests (other than the Disqualified Stock and Equity Interests convertible into Disqualified Stock)), (b) indebtedness evidenced by notes, bonds, debentures or similar instruments, (c) obligations with respect to any conditional sale or title retention agreement, (d) indebtedness arising under acceptance facilities and the amount available to be drawn under all letters of credit issued for the account of such Person and, without duplication, all drafts drawn thereunder to the extent such Person shall not have reimbursed the issuer in respect of the issuers payment of such drafts, (e) all liabilities secured by any Lien on any property owned by such Person even though such Person has not assumed or otherwise become liable for the payment thereof, that the amount of such liabilities included for purposes of this definition will be the amount equal to the lesser of the fair market value of such property and the amount of the liabilities so secured, (f) indebtedness in respect of Disqualified Stock valued at the greater of its voluntary or involuntary maximum fixed repurchase price plus accrued dividends, (g) liabilities in respect of any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to purchase, redeem, retire, acquire or make any other payment in respect of any shares of equity securities or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any shares of equity securities, (h) obligations under Capital Lease Obligations, (i) Guarantees of such Person in respect of Indebtedness of others, and (i) to the extent not otherwise included, all net obligations of such Person under Permitted Hedge Agreements.
Indebtedness
provided
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Indemnitee
Section 10.3(b)
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Information
Section 10.15
 
 means all copyrights, trademarks, servicemarks, patents, trade names and service names.
Intellectual Property
 
 means (i) the last day of each Interest Period, (ii) the date of payment of any of the Loans (due to acceleration or otherwise) and (ii) the Maturity Date.
Interest Payment Date
 
 means (a) a period commencing on the Effective Date or on the last day of the preceding Interest Period and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the immediately following calendar month, that (a) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day, (b) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding
Interest Period
provided
 
 
7
 
day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the next calendar month and (c) no Interest Period shall extend beyond the Maturity Date.
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Investment Grade Rating
Section 7.2.
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
JPMorgan Chase
 
 means the Persons listed on and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption.
Lenders
Schedule 2.1
 
 means, for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Market Service (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period.  In the event that such rate does not appear on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Market Service (or on any such successor or substitute page, or any successor to or substitute for such Service) at such time for any reason, then the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period shall be the rate of interest , as reported by JPMorgan Chase to the Administrative Agent, quoted by JPMorgan Chase to leading banks in the interbank eurodollar market as the rate at which JPMorgan Chase is offering dollar deposits in an amount equal approximately to JPMorgan Chases Loan for a period equal to such Interest Period, as quoted at approximately 11:00 a.m. two Business Days prior to the first day of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
per annum
 
 means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien (statutory or other), assignment, deposit arrangement, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance or preference, priority, charge or other security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
 
 has the meaning specified in .
Loan
Section 2.1
 
 means this Agreement and each Note issued pursuant to .
Loan Documents
Section 2.3(e)
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Regulation U.
Margin Stock
 
 means a material adverse change in (a) the financial condition, operations, business or property of (i) the Borrower or (ii) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, (b) the ability of the Borrower to perform its obligations under the Loan Documents or (c) the ability of the Credit Parties to enforce their rights and remedies under the Loan Documents.
Material Adverse Change
 
 means a material adverse effect on (a) the financial condition, operations, business or property of (i) the Borrower or (ii) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, (b) the ability of the Borrower to perform its obligations under the Loan Documents or (c) the ability of the Credit Parties to enforce their rights and remedies under the Loan Documents.
Material Adverse Effect
 
 
8
 
 means as of any date, Indebtedness (other than Indebtedness under the Loan Documents) or operating leases of any one or more of the Borrower or any Subsidiary or, in the case of the Borrower only, any Guarantee, in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $35,000,000.  For purposes of determining Material Obligations, the principal amount of Indebtedness, operating leases or Guarantees at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, would be required to pay if such Indebtedness, operating leases or Guarantees became due and payable on such day.
Material Obligations
 
 means the August 25, 2014.
Maturity Date
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereto.
Moodys
 
 means the Mortgage and Deed of Trust, dated as of September 1, 1945, among the Borrower, The Bank of New York Mellon (formerly Irving Trust Company) and Ming Ryan (successor to Richard H. West), Trustees.
Mortgage
 
 means the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
MPUC
 
 means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
 
  means a promissory note substantially in the form of issued at the request of a Lender pursuant to to evidence its Loans.
Note
Exhibit B
Section 2.3(e)
 
 means (a) the due and punctual payment of (i) principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise, (b) all other monetary obligations, including fees, commissions, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Borrower to the Lenders, or that are otherwise payable to any Credit Party, in each case under the Loan Documents and (c) the due and punctual performance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Borrower under or pursuant to the Loan Documents.
Obligations
 
 means any and all current or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made hereunder or from the execution or delivery of, or performance under, or otherwise with respect to, the Loan Documents.
Other Taxes
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Participant
Section 10.4(d)
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Patriot Act
Section 10.14
 
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA.
PBGC
 
 means:
Permitted Encumbrances
 
 
9
 
(a)
   
Liens imposed by law for taxes, assessments or similar charges incurred in the ordinary course of business that are not yet due or are being contested in compliance with , that enforcement of such Liens is stayed pending such contest;
Section 6.4
provided
 
(b)
   
landlords, vendors, carriers, warehousemens, mechanics, materialmens, contractors, repairmens and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations which are not delinquent or are being contested, that enforcement of such Liens is stayed pending such contest;
provided
 
(c)
   
pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations (but not ERISA);
 
(d)
   
pledges and deposits to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, purchase agreements, government contracts, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business, and other than promissory notes and contracts for the repayment of borrowed money;
 
(e)
   
Liens (including contractual security interests) in favor of a financial institution (including securities firms) encumbering deposit accounts or checks or instruments for collection, commodity accounts or securities accounts (including the right of set-off) at or held by such financial institution in the ordinary course of its commercial business and which secure only liabilities owed to such financial institution arising out of or resulting from its maintenance of such account or otherwise are within the general parameters customary in the financial industry;
 
(f)
   
judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under of ;
paragraph (k)
Article 8
 
(g)
   
any interest of a lessor or licensor in property under an operating lease under which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is lessee or licensee, and any restriction or encumbrance to which the interest of such lessor or licensor is subject;
 
(h)
   
Liens arising from filed UCC-1 financing statements relating solely to leases not prohibited by this Agreement;
 
(i)
   
leases or subleases granted to others that do not materially interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries;
 
(j)
   
licenses of Intellectual Property granted by the Borrower or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business and not materially interfering with the ordinary conduct of the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries;
 
(k)
   
easements, servitudes (contractual and legal), zoning restrictions, rights of way, encroachments, minor defects and irregularities in title and other similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not render title to such property unmarketable or materially interfere with the ability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, as the case may be, to utilize their respective properties for their intended purposes;
 
 
10
 
(l)
   
Liens securing obligations, neither assumed by the Borrower or any Subsidiary nor on account of which the Borrower or any Subsidiary customarily pays interest, upon real estate on which the Borrower or any Subsidiary has a right-of-way, easement, franchise or other servitude or of which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is the lessee, for the purpose of locating transmission and distribution lines and related support structures, pipe lines, substations, measuring stations, tanks, pumping or delivery equipment or similar equipment, or service buildings incidental to any of the foregoing;
 
(m)
   
with respect to properties involved in the production of oil, gas and other minerals, unitization and pooling agreements and orders, operating agreements, royalties, reversionary interests, preferential purchase rights, farmout agreements, gas balancing agreements and other agreements, in each case that are customary in the oil, gas and mineral production business in the general area of such property and that are entered into in the ordinary course of business;
 
(n)
   
Liens in favor of Governmental Authorities encumbering assets acquired in connection with a government grant program, and the right reserved to, or vested in, any Governmental Authority by the terms of any right, power, franchise, grant, license, or permit, or by any provision of law, to purchase, condemn, recapture or designate a purchaser of any property;
 
(o)
   
Liens on Margin Stock to the extent that a prohibition on such Liens would violate Regulation U;
 
(p)
   
Liens on any cash collateral for letters of credit issued under the Borrowers primary revolving credit facility upon the occurrence of an event of default thereunder or to cover an issuing lenders credit exposure under such facility with respect to a defaulting lender thereunder;
 
(q)
   
customary Liens for the fees and expenses of trustees and escrow agents pursuant to any indenture, escrow agreement or similar agreement establishing a trust or escrow arrangement;
 
(r)
   
agreements for and obligations (other than repayment of borrowed money) relating to the joint or common ownership, operation, and use of property, including Liens under joint venture or similar agreements securing obligations incurred in the conduct of operations or consisting of a purchase option, call or right of first refusal with respect to the Equity Interests in such jointly owned Person; and
 
(s)
   
Liens granted on cash or invested funds constituting proceeds of any sale or disposition of property deposited into escrow accounts to secure indemnification, adjustment of purchase price or similar obligations incurred in connection with such sale or disposition, in an amount not to exceed the amount of gross proceeds received from such sale or disposition.
 
 means any Hedge Agreement engaged in by a Person as part of its normal business operations with the purpose and effect of hedging and protecting such Person against fluctuations or adverse changes in the prices of electricity, gas, fuel or other commodities, interest rates or currency exchange rates, which Hedge Agreement is part of a risk management strategy and not for purposes of speculation and not intended primarily as a borrowing of funds.
Permitted Hedge Agreement
 
 means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
 
 means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in
Plan
 
 
11
 
respect of which the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an employer as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
 
  means the rate of interest publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase as its prime rate at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate being effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.  The Prime Rate is not intended to be lowest rate of interest charged by JPMorgan Chase in connection with extensions of credit to borrowers.
Prime Rate
per annum
 
  means Fitch, Moodys and S&P (or, if any of the foregoing ceases to provide Senior Debt Ratings as contemplated hereby, such other nationally recognized rating agency as shall be agreed by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent).
Rating Agencies
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in .
Register
Section 10.4(c)
 
 means Regulation D of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation D
 
 means Regulation T of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation T
 
 means Regulation U of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation U
 
 means Regulation X of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation X
 
 means, with respect to any specified Person, such Persons Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Persons Affiliates.
Related Parties
 
 means (a) remedial action as such term is defined in CERCLA, 42 U.S.C. Section 9601(24), and (b) all other actions required by any Governmental Authority or voluntarily undertaken to: (i) clean up, remove, treat, abate or in any other way address any Hazardous Material in the environment; (ii) prevent the release or threat of release, or minimize the further release of any Hazardous Material so it does not migrate or endanger or threaten to endanger public health, welfare or the environment; or (iii) perform studies and investigations in connection with, or as a precondition to, or above.
Remedial Action
clause (i)
(ii)
 
  means, at any time, two or more Lenders holding Applicable Percentages totaling more than 50%.
Required Lenders
 
  means Standard & Poors Ratings Group, a Standard & Poors Financial Services LLC business, or any successor thereto.
S&P
 
 means the Securities and Exchange Commission or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
SEC
 
 
12
 
 means, at any date, the credit rating identified by a Rating Agency as the credit rating that (a) it has assigned to long term unsecured senior debt of the Borrower or (b) would assign to long term unsecured senior debt of the Borrower were the Borrower to issue or have outstanding any long term unsecured senior debt on such date.
Senior Debt Rating
 
  means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages, if any, (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which member banks of the United States Federal Reserve System in New York City with deposits exceeding $250,000,000 are subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as Eurocurrency liabilities in Regulation D).  Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to Regulation D.  The Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under Regulation D or any comparable regulation.  The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
minus
 
 means, as to any Person, any corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture or other business entity of which such Person or any Subsidiary of such Person, directly or indirectly, either (i) in respect of a corporation, owns or controls more than 50% of the outstanding Equity Interests having ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or similar managing body, irrespective of whether a class or classes shall or might have voting power by reason of the happening of any contingency or (ii) in respect of an association, partnership, joint venture or other business entity, is entitled to share in more than 50% of the profits and losses, however determined.  Unless the context otherwise requires, any reference to a Subsidiary shall be deemed to refer to a Subsidiary of the Borrower.
Subsidiary
 
 means any present or future tax, levy, assessment, impost, duty, charge, fee, deduction or withholding of any nature, and whatever called, by a Governmental Authority, on whomsoever and wherever imposed, levied, collected, withheld or assessed.
Tax
 
 means, as to any Person, a Tax imposed by the jurisdiction in which that Persons principal office (and/or, in the case of a Lender, its lending office in the United States of America designated in its Administrative Questionnaire or such other office as such Lender may designate in writing to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower) is located, or by any political subdivision or taxing authority thereof, or in which that Person is deemed to be doing business, except to the extent such Person is doing business solely as a result of negotiation, execution, delivery or performance of the Transactions contemplated by this Agreement, imposed on (or measured by) all or part of the net income, profits or gains of that Person (whether worldwide, or only insofar as such income, profits or gains are considered to arise in or to relate to a particular jurisdiction, or otherwise).
Tax on the Overall Net Income
 
 means, at any time, the difference between (a) the sum of each of the following at such time with respect to the Borrower and the Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP: (i) preferred Equity Interests, (ii) common Equity Interests and any premium on Equity Interests thereon (as such term is used in the Borrower Financial Statements), excluding accumulated other comprehensive income or loss, (iii) retained earnings, (iv) Total Indebtedness, and (b) (i) stock of the Borrower acquired by the Borrower and (ii) stock of a Subsidiary acquired by such Subsidiary, in each case at such time, as applicable, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Total Capitalization
plus
plus
plus
 
 
13
 
 means, at any time, all Indebtedness (net of unamortized premium and discount (as such term is used in the Financial Statements)) at such time of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Total Indebtedness
 
 means (a) the execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of each Loan Document to which it is a party, (b) the borrowing of the Loans and (c) the use of the proceeds of the Loans.
Transactions
 
 means a security which ordinarily has voting power for the election of the board of directors (or other governing body), whether at all times or only so long as no senior class of Equity Interests has such voting power by reason of any contingency.
Voting Security
 
  means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
 means the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
WPS
 
Section 1.2.
   
.  The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined.  Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms.  The words include, includes and including shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase without limitation.  The word will shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word shall.  Unless the context requires otherwise, (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, (b) any definition of or reference to any law shall be construed as referring to such law as from time to time amended and any successor thereto and the rules and regulations promulgated from time to time thereunder, (c) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Persons successors and assigns, (d) the words herein, hereof and hereunder, and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (e) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement, (f) the words asset and property shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights, and (g) any reference to a fiscal quarter or fiscal year means a fiscal quarter or fiscal year of the Borrower.
Terms Generally
 
Section 1.3.
   
.  Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, as used in the Loan Documents and in any certificate, opinion or other document made or delivered pursuant thereto, accounting terms not defined in , and accounting terms partly defined in , to the extent not defined, shall have the respective meanings given to them under GAAP.  If at any time any change in GAAP (including any change to the International Financial Reporting Standards by the International Accounting Standards Board or other method of accounting, as may hereafter be required or permitted by the SEC) would affect the computation of any financial requirement set forth in this Agreement, the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Borrower shall negotiate in good faith to amend such requirement to reflect such change in GAAP (subject to the approval of the Required Lenders), that, until so amended, (a) such requirement shall continue to be computed in accordance with GAAP prior to such change therein and (b) the Borrower shall provide to the Credit Parties financial statements and other documents required under this
Accounting Terms; GAAP
Section 1.1
Section 1.1
provided
 
 
14
 
Agreement or as reasonably requested hereunder setting forth a reconciliation between calculations of such requirement made before and after giving effect to such change in GAAP.
 
Section 1.4.
   
.  Any financial ratios required to be maintained by the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement shall be calculated by dividing the appropriate component by the other component, carrying the result to one place more than the number of places by which such ratio is expressed herein and rounding the result up or down to the nearest number (with a rounding-up if there is no nearest number).
Rounding
 
ARTICLE 2.
 
THE CREDITS
 
Section 2.1.
   
.  Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, each Lender agrees, severally and not jointly, to make a loan in dollars (each a  and collectively the ) to the Borrower on the Effective Date in an amount equal to such Lenders Commitment.  The Commitments will automatically terminate concurrently with the making of the Loans on the Effective Date.  For the avoidance of doubt, the failure of any Lender to make its Loan shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder, that the Commitments of the Lenders are several, and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lenders failure to make its Loan.
Commitments
Loan
Loans
provided
 
Section 2.2.
   
.
Funding of Loans
 
(a)
   
Not later than 2:00 p.m. New York City time on the Effective Date, each Lender shall deliver the proceeds of its Loan by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the account of the Administrative Agent designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders.  The Administrative Agent will make such proceeds available to the Borrower by promptly crediting or otherwise transferring the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Borrower designated by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent.
 
(b)
   
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the Effective Date that such Lender will not make the proceeds of its Loan available to the Administrative Agent, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such proceeds available on such date in accordance with and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower a corresponding amount.  In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its Loan available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate that would be otherwise applicable to such Loan.  Any payment by the Borrower, however, shall be without prejudice to its rights against the applicable Lender.  If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lenders Loan.
Section 2.2(a)
 
Section 2.3.
   
.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
 
 
15
 
(a)
   
The Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of such Lenders Loan on the Maturity Date.
 
(b)
   
Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the debt of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from the Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
 
(c)
   
The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Lenders Loan made hereunder, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lenders share thereof.
 
(d)
   
The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to or of this Section shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein, that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
paragraph (b)
(c)
provided
 
(e)
   
Any Lender may request that its Loan be evidenced by a Note in the original principal amount of such Lenders Loan.  In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a Note payable to the order of such Lender.  Thereafter, the Loan evidenced by such Note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after any assignment pursuant to ) be represented by a Note payable to the order of the payee named therein or any Eligible Assignee pursuant to , except to the extent that any such Lender or Eligible Assignee subsequently returns any such Note for cancellation and requests that such Loan once again be evidenced as described in and above.
Section 10.4
Section 10.4
paragraphs (b)
(c)
 
Section 2.4.
   
. The Borrower may not prepay the Loans.
No Voluntary Prepayments
 
Section 2.5.
   
.
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs
 
(a)
   
The Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder or under any other Loan Document (whether of principal of Loans, interest or fees, or of amounts payable under , , or , or otherwise) prior to 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim.  Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon.  All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its office at 10 S. Dearborn, Chicago, Illinois, or such other office as to which the Administrative Agent may notify the other parties hereto, except that payments pursuant to , , and shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto.  The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof.  If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension.  All payments hereunder shall be made in dollars.
Sections 3.3
3.4
3.5
10.3
Sections 3.3
3.4
3.5
10.3
 
 
16
 
(b)
   
Each payment of principal or interest on the Loans shall be allocated among the Lenders in accordance with their Applicable Percentages.  If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal of Loans, interest, fees and commissions then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest, fees and commissions then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest, fees and commissions then due to such parties and (ii) second, towards payment of principal of Loans then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal of the Loans then due to such parties.
pro rata
 
(c)
   
If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of, or interest on, its Loan resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loan and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of, and accrued interest on, their respective Loans, that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply).  The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
 
(d)
   
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the applicable Credit Parties hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to such Credit Parties the amount due.  In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each such Credit Party severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Credit Party with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
 
(e)
   
If any Credit Party shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to , then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Credit Party to satisfy such Credit Partys obligations under such Section until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
2.5(d)
 
 
17
 
ARTICLE 3.
 
INTEREST, FEES, YIELD PROTECTION, ETC.
 
Section 3.1.
   
.
Interest
 
(a)
   
The Borrower promises to pay interest on the unpaid principal amount of each Loan for the period commencing on the date such Loan is made until such Loan is paid in full at a rate equal to the sum of the LIBO Rate for each applicable Interest Period plus 1.00%.
per annum
 
(b)
   
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan, or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate equal to in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraph of this Section or, in the case of any other amount, 2% plus Alternate Base Rate from time to time in effect.
per annum
 
plus
 
 
(c)
   
Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date, that (i) interest accrued pursuant to of this Section shall be payable on demand.
provided
paragraph (b)
 
(d)
   
All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).  The applicable Alternate Base Rate, Adjusted LIBO Rate or LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent clearly demonstrable error.  If any amount payable hereunder is bearing interest at the Alternate Base Rate, the Administrative Agent shall, as soon as practicable, notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the effective date and the amount of each change in the Prime Rate or Alternate Base Rate, but any failure to so notify shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to pay interest hereunder in the amounts and on the dates required.
 
Section 3.2.
   
.  If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period:
Alternate Rate of Interest
 
(a)
   
the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period; or
 
(b)
   
the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost of maintaining their Loans for such Interest Period;
 
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) or facsimile as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, all Loans shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate.
 
 
18
 
Section 3.3.
   
.
Increased Costs; Illegality
 
(a)
   
If any Change in Law shall:
 
   
(i)
   
impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Credit Party (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate);
 
 (ii)
   
   
subject any Lender to any Tax of any kind whatsoever with respect to this Agreement or its Loan, or change the basis of taxation of payments to such Lender in respect thereof (except for indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes covered by and the imposition of, or any change in the rate of, any Tax on the Overall Net Income payable by such Lender); or
Section 3.5
 
 (iii)
   
   
impose on any Credit Party or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or such Lenders Loan;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Credit Party of making or maintaining its Loan or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Credit Party hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Borrower will pay to such Credit Party such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Credit Party for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
 
(b)
   
If any Credit Party determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Credit Partys capital or on the capital of such Credit Partys holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or its Loans to a level below that which such Credit Party or such Credit Partys holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Credit Partys policies and the policies of such Credit Partys holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Credit Party such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Credit Party or such Credit Partys holding company for any such reduction suffered.
 
(c)
   
A certificate of a Credit Party setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Credit Party or its holding company, as applicable, as specified in or of this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive and binding upon all parties hereto absent manifest error.  The Borrower shall pay such Credit Party the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 Business Days after receipt thereof.
paragraph (a)
(b)
 
(d)
   
Failure or delay on the part of any Credit Party to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Credit Partys right to demand such compensation; that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Credit Party pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 180 days prior to the date that such Credit Party notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Credit Partys intention to claim compensation therefor; and that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 180 day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof but not to exceed a period of 365 days.
provided
provided
further
 
 
19
 
(e)
   
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, if, any Change in Law shall make it unlawful for any Lender to make or maintain its Loan at the Adjusted LIBO Rate, then, by written notice to the Borrower and to the Administrative Agent, such Lender may declare that, beginning on the date such unlawfulness becomes effective, such Lenders Loan shall be bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate, unless such declaration shall be subsequently withdrawn.
 
Section 3.4.
   
.  In the event of (a) the prepayment of any principal of any Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the failure to borrow any Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto or to continue a Loan for a new Interest Period in accordance herewith (other than at maturity) or (c) the assignment of any portion of a Loan other than on the last day of the relevant Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to , then, in any such event, the Borrower shall compensate each applicable Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event.  Such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow or continue a Loan, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest that would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate that such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the eurodollar market.  A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 Business Days after receipt thereof.
Break Funding Payments
Section 3.6
 
Section 3.5.
   
.
Taxes
 
(a)
   
.  Provided that all documentation, if any, then required to be delivered by any Lender or the Administrative Agent pursuant to has been delivered, all sums payable by the Borrower under the Loan Documents shall be paid free and clear of and (except to the extent required by law) without any deduction or withholding on account of any Tax (other than a Tax on the Overall Net Income of any Lender (for which payment need not be free and clear, but no deduction or withholding shall be made unless then required by applicable law)) imposed, levied, collected, withheld or assessed by or within the United States or any political subdivision in or of the United States or any other jurisdiction from or to which a payment is made by or on behalf of the Borrower or by any federation or organization of which the United States or any such jurisdiction is a member at the time of payment.
Payments to be Free and Clear
Section 3.5(c)
 
(b)
   
.  If the Borrower or any other Person is required by law to make any deduction or withholding on account of any such Tax from any sum paid or payable by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent or any Lender under any of the Loan Documents:
Grossing up of Payments
 
 (i)
   
   
the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent and such Lender of any such requirement or any change in any such requirement as soon as the Borrower becomes aware of it;
 
(ii)
   
the Borrower shall pay any such Tax before the date on which penalties attach thereto, such payment to be made (if the liability to pay is imposed on
 
 
20
 
 
the Borrower) for its own account or (if that liability is imposed on the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be) on behalf of and in the name of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be;
 
 (iii)
   
   
the sum payable by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent or a Lender in respect of which the relevant deduction, withholding or payment is required shall be increased to the extent necessary to ensure that, after the making of that deduction, withholding or payment, the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be, receives on the due date therefor a net sum equal to what it would have received had no such deduction, withholding or payment been required or made, that no amount shall be required to be paid to any Foreign Lender for any Tax imposed as a result of such Foreign Lenders failure to comply with the reporting requirements as set forth in Sections 1471 and 1472 of the Code (or regulation or administrative guidance promulgated thereunder) except to the extent that such compliance would cause a Foreign Lender to be in violation of any applicable law;
provided
 
 (iv)
   
   
within 30 days after paying any sum from which it is required by law to make any deduction or withholding, and within 30 days after the due date of payment of any Tax which it is required by above to pay, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender evidence satisfactory to the other affected parties of such deduction, withholding or payment and of the remittance thereof to the relevant Governmental Authority; and
clause (ii)
 
 (v)
   
   
that no additional amount shall be required to be paid to any Lender under above except to the extent that any change after the Effective Date (in the case of each Lender listed on the signature pages hereof) or after the date of the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender became a Lender (in the case of each other Lender) if any such requirement for a deduction, withholding or payment as is mentioned therein shall result in an increase in the rate of such deduction, withholding or payment from that in effect at the date of this Agreement or at the date of such Assignment and Assumption, as the case may be, in respect of payments to such Lender, and further that any Lender claiming any additional amounts payable pursuant to this shall use reasonable efforts (consistent with its internal policy and legal and regulatory restrictions) to change the jurisdiction of its applicable lending office or take other appropriate action if the making of such a change or the taking of such action, as the case may be, would avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, any such additional amounts that may thereafter accrue and would not, in the reasonable judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender.
provided
clause (iii)
provided
Section 3.5
 
(c)
   
.  Each Foreign Lender listed on the signature pages hereof shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), on or prior to the Effective Date (in the case of each Foreign Lender listed on the signature pages hereof) or on the effective date of the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which it becomes a Lender (in the case of each other Foreign Lender), and at such other times as may be necessary in the determination of the Borrower or the Administrative Agent (each in the reasonable exercise of its discretion), including upon the occurrence of any event requiring a change in the most recent counterpart of any form set forth below previously delivered by such Foreign Lender to the Borrower, such certificates, documents or other evidence, properly completed and duly executed by such Foreign Lender including (i) two accurate and complete original signed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W8-BEN or Form W8-ECI, or
Tax Certificates
 
 
21
 
successor applicable form and (ii) an Internal Revenue Service Form W-8 or W-9 (or any other certificate or statement of exemption required by Treasury Regulations Section 1.1441 4(a) or Section 1.1441 6(c) or any successor thereto) to establish that such Foreign Lender is not subject to deduction or withholding of United States federal income tax under Section 1441 or 1442 of the Code or otherwise (or under any comparable provisions of any successor statute) with respect to any payments to such Foreign Lender of principal, interest, fees or other amounts payable under any of the Loan Documents.  The Borrower shall not be required to pay any additional amount to any such Foreign Lender under if such Foreign Lender shall have failed to satisfy the requirements of the immediately preceding sentence; that if such Foreign Lender shall have satisfied such requirements on the Effective Date (in the case of each Foreign Lender listed on the signature pages hereof) or on the effective date of the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which it becomes a Lender (in the case of each other Foreign Lender), nothing in this Section shall relieve the Borrower of its obligation to pay any additional amounts pursuant to in the event that, as a result of any change in applicable law, such Foreign Lender is no longer properly entitled to deliver certificates, documents or other evidence at a subsequent date establishing the fact that such Foreign Lender is not subject to withholding as described in the immediately preceding sentence.
Section 3.5(b)(iii)
provided
Section 3.5(b)(iii)
 
(d)
   
.
Other Taxes
 
 (i)
   
   
The Borrower shall pay Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law; and
 
 (ii)
   
   
the Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent and each Lender within 10 Business Days after written demand thereof, for the full amount of any Taxes (other than Taxes on the Overall Net Income) or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder (including Taxes, other than Taxes on the Overall Net Income, or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and (unless caused by the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such party) any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes, other than Taxes on the Overall Net Income, or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Government Authority. A certificate as to the amount such of payment or liability delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
(e)
   
.  If the Administrative Agent or Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this , it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest, or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. Each of the Administrative Agent and each Lender agrees to cooperate with any reasonable request made by the Borrower in respect of a claim of
Tax Refunds
Section 3.5
Section 3.5
provided
 
 
22
 
a refund in respect of any Taxes paid by the Borrower or by such Lender for an on account of the Borrower if (i) the Borrower has agreed in writing to pay all of the Administrative Agents or such Lenders reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses relating to such claim, (ii) the Administrative Agent or such Lender determines, in its good faith judgment, that it would not be disadvantaged, unduly burdened or prejudiced as a result of such claim, and (iii) the Borrower furnishes, upon request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, an opinion of tax counsel (such opinion, which can be reasoned, and such counsel to be reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent or such Lender) that the Borrower is likely to receive a refund or credit.  This Section shall not be construed to require any Lender to make available its Tax returns (or any other information relating to its Taxes which it deems confidential) to either the Borrower or any other Person.
 
Section 3.6.
   
.
Mitigation Obligations
 
(a)
   
.In the event that the Borrower becomes obligated to pay additional amounts to any Lender (or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender) pursuant to , or , then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to , or , as the case may be, in the future, and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender.  The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Designation of a Different Lending Office
 
Section
3
.3
Section 3.4
Section 3.5
Section 3.3
Section 3.4
Section 3.5
 
(b)
   
. In the event that (i) the Borrower becomes obligated to pay additional amounts to any Lender (or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender) pursuant to , or , or  (ii) any Lender has failed to consent to a proposed amendment, waiver, discharge or termination that under requires the consent of all the Lenders and with respect to which the Required Lenders shall have granted their consent, then the Borrower may, at its sole cost and expense, within 60 days of the demand by such Lender for such additional amounts or the relevant action by such Lender, as the case may be, and subject to and in accordance with the provisions of (with the Borrower obligated to pay any applicable processing and recordation fee), designate an Eligible Assignee (acceptable to the Administrative Agent) to purchase and assume all of such Lenders interests, rights and obligations under the Loan Documents, without recourse to or warranty by or expense to, such Lender, for a purchase price equal to the outstanding principal amount of such Lenders Loans plus any accrued but unpaid interest thereon and any other amounts payable to such Lender hereunder, and to assume all the obligations of such Lender hereunder, and, upon such purchase, such Lender shall no longer be a party hereto or have any rights hereunder (except those that survive full repayment hereunder) and shall be relieved from all obligations to the Borrower hereunder, and the Eligible Assignee shall succeed to the rights and obligations of such Lender hereunder.  The Borrower shall execute and deliver to such Eligible Assignee a Note.  Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, in the event that a Lender is replaced pursuant to this as a result of the Borrower becoming obligated to pay additional amounts to such Lender (or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender)pursuant to , or , such Lender shall be entitled to receive such additional amounts as if it had not been so replaced.
Replacement of Lenders
Section
3
.3
Section 3.4
Section 3.5
Section 10.2
Section 10.4
Section 3.6
 
Section 3.3
Section 3.4
Section 3.5
 
 
23
 
ARTICLE 4.
 
REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES
 
The Borrower represents and warrants to the Credit Parties that:
 
Section 4.1.
   
.  Each of the Borrower and each Subsidiary is duly organized or formed, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization or formation, has all requisite corporate power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Organization; Powers
 
Section 4.2.
   
.  The Transactions are within the corporate powers of the Borrower and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, equity holder action.  Each Loan Document has been duly executed and delivered by the Borrower and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation thereof, enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting creditors rights generally and general principles of equity.
Authorization; Enforceability
 
Section 4.3.
   
.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts
 
(a)
   
The execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of the Loan Documents and the borrowing of the Loans do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except for (i) information filings to be made in the ordinary course of business, which filings are not a condition to the Borrowers performance under the Loan Documents and (ii) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect and not subject to any appeals period.
 
(b)
   
The Transactions will not (i) violate the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Borrower, (ii) violate any applicable law or regulation or any order of any Governmental Authority, (iii) violate or result in a default under any material indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon the Borrower or its assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Borrower, and (iv) result in or require the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Borrower.
 
Section 4.4.
   
.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change
 
(a)
   
The Borrower has previously delivered to the Credit Parties copies of  (i) its Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, containing the audited consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and the related audited consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, changes in stockholders equity and cash flows for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2010, and (ii) the unaudited consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and the related unaudited consolidated statements of income, equity and cash flows for the fiscal quarter ended June 30, 2011.  All such financial statements have been prepared in accordance with GAAP and fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial condition and results of the operations of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as of the dates and for the periods indicated therein (subject, in the case of unaudited financial statements, to the absence of footnotes and to normal, year end audit adjustments).
 
 
24
 
(b)
   
Since December 31, 2010, there has been no Material Adverse Change.
 
Section 4.5.
   
.
Litigation
 
(a)
   
There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened in writing against or affecting the Borrower or any Subsidiary (a) that, if adversely determined (and provided that there exists a reasonable possibility of such adverse determination), would reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect, except for any Disclosed Matters, and except that the commencement by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any Governmental Authority of a rate proceeding, fuel adjustment clause audit or earnings review before such Governmental Authority shall not constitute such a pending or threatened action, suit or proceeding unless and until such Governmental Authority has made a final determination thereunder that would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or (b) that involve any Loan Document or the Transactions.
 
Section 4.6.
   
.  Except for the Disclosed Matters, the Borrower and its Subsidiaries (a) are in compliance with Environmental Law, (b) have received all permits, licenses or other approvals required of them under applicable Environmental Law to conduct their respective businesses and (c) are in compliance with all terms and conditions of any such permit, license, or approval, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Environmental Matters
 
Section 4.7.
   
.  Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is an investment company or a company controlled by an investment company as defined in, or is otherwise subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Investment Company Status
 
Section 4.8.
   
.  Each of the Borrower and each of its ERISA Affiliates is in compliance in all material respects with the applicable provisions of ERISA and the Code and the regulations and published interpretations thereunder except for any such failure that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
ERISA
 
Section 4.9.
   
.  None of the reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary to any Credit Party in connection with the negotiation of, or delivered under any Loan Document when taken as a whole (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished, including the information contained in the Borrowers most recent annual report on Form 10-K and in Borrowers reports filed with the SEC under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not materially misleading, provided that, to the extent any such reports, financial statements, certificates or other information was based upon or constitutes a forecast or a projection (including statements concerning future financial performance, ongoing business strategies or prospects or possible future actions, and other forward-looking statements), the Borrower represents only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
Disclosure
 
 
25
 
Section 4.10.
   
.  The Borrower has only the Subsidiaries set forth on .   sets forth with respect to each Subsidiary, the identity of each Person that owns Equity Interests in such Subsidiary and the percentage of the issued and outstanding Equity Interests owned by each such Person.  The shares of each Subsidiary (excluding any Immaterial Subsidiary) are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and non assessable and are owned free and clear of any Liens, other than Liens permitted pursuant to .
Subsidiaries
Schedule 4.10
Schedule 4.10
Section 7.1
 
Section 4.11.
   
.
Use of Proceeds; Federal Reserve Regulations
 
(a)
   
The proceeds of the Loans will be used for general corporate purposes not inconsistent with the terms of this Agreement.
 
(b)
   
Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is engaged principally, or as one of their important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of buying or carrying Margin Stock.  Immediately before and after giving effect to the making of the Loans, Margin Stock will constitute less than 25% of the Borrowers assets as determined in accordance with Regulation U.
 
(c)
   
No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, and whether immediately, incidentally or ultimately, (i) to purchase, acquire or carry any Margin Stock (other than any purchase of Equity Interests in the Borrower so long as such Equity Interests are retired immediately upon the purchase thereof) or for any purpose that entails a violation of, or that is inconsistent with, the provisions of the regulations of the Board, including Regulation T, U or X or (ii) to fund a personal loan to or for the benefit of a director or executive officer of the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
 
ARTICLE 5.
 
CONDITIONS
 
Section 5.1.
   
.  The obligation of each Lender to make its Loan hereunder is subject to the satisfaction (or waiver in accordance with ) of the following conditions precedent:
Effectiveness
Section 10.2
 
(a)
   
.  The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include facsimile transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement.
Term Loan Agreement
 
(b)
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received any Note requested by a Lender pursuant to payable to the order of such requesting Lender.
Notes
Section 2.3(e)
 
(c)
   
.  The representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in shall be true and correct on and as of the Effective Date, except to the extent such representations and warranties specifically relate to an earlier date, in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct on and as of such earlier date.
Accuracy of Representations and Warranties
Article 4
 
(d)
   
.  No Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
No Default
 
 
26
 
(e)
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received favorable written opinions (addressed to the Credit Parties and dated on or prior to the Effective Date) from Deborah A. Amberg, Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of the Borrower, and Cohen Tauber Spievack & Wagner P.C., special counsel to the Borrower, covering such matters relating to the Borrower, the Loan Documents and the Transactions as the Required Lenders may reasonably request.  The Borrower hereby requests such counsel to deliver such opinion.
Legal Opinion
 
(f)
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to (i) the organization, existence and good standing of the Borrower (including (x) a certificate of incorporation of the Borrower, certified as of a recent date by the Secretary of State of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, and (y) certificates of good standing (or comparable certificates) for the Borrower, certified as of a recent date prior to the Effective Date, by the Secretaries of State (or comparable official)) of the jurisdiction of its incorporation and each other jurisdiction in which it is qualified to do business, (ii) the authorization of the Transactions, (iii) the incumbency of its officer or officers who may sign the Loan Documents, including therein a signature specimen of such officer or officers, and (iv) any other legal matters relating to the Borrower, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
Organizational Documents, etc
 
(g)
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, dated on or prior to the Effective Date and signed by the chief executive officer or a Financial Officer acceptable to the Administrative Agent, confirming (i) the representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in the Loan Documents are true and correct and (ii) no Default exists.
Officers Certificate
 
(h)
   
.  The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate of a Financial Officer, in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrate Agent, dated the Effective Date, to the effect that since December 31, 2010, no Material Adverse Change has occurred.
No Material Adverse Change
 
(i)
   
.  Such other documents as any Lender or its counsel may have reasonably requested.
Miscellaneous
 
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Credit Parties when the conditions set forth above have been satisfied or waived, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.
 
ARTICLE 6.
 
AFFIRMATIVE COVENANTS
 
Until the principal of and interest on all Loans and all other amounts payable under the Loan Documents shall have been paid in full, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Credit Parties that:
 
Section 6.1.
   
.  The Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements and Other Information
 
(a)
   
As soon as available, but in any event within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year, (i) a copy of the Borrowers Annual Report on Form 10-K in respect of such fiscal year
 
 
27
 
required to be filed by the Borrower with the SEC, together with the financial statements attached thereto, and (ii) the Borrowers audited consolidated balance sheet and related consolidated statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on by the Accountants (without a going concern or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial conditions and results of operations of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied during such fiscal year;
 
(b)
   
As soon as available, but in any event within 60 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year, (i) a copy of the Borrowers Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q in respect of such fiscal quarter required to be filed by the Borrower with the SEC, together with the financial statements attached thereto, and (ii) the Borrowers unaudited consolidated balance sheet and related consolidated statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by a duly authorized Financial Officer as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial conditions and results of operations of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
(c)
   
Within 60 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters and within 120 days after the end of the last fiscal quarter, a Compliance Certificate, signed by a Financial Officer (or such other officer as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent) as to the Borrowers compliance, as of such fiscal quarter ending date, with , and as to the absence of any Default as of such fiscal quarter ending date and the date of such certificate (or if a Default existed or exists, the nature thereof); and
Section 7.5
 
(d)
   
promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of the Loan Documents, as any Credit Party may reasonably request.
 
Section 6.2.
   
.  The Borrower will furnish the following to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Notices of Material Events
 
(a)
   
prompt written notice of the occurrence of any Default, specifying the nature thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto;
 
(b)
   
promptly upon becoming available, copies of all (i) regular, periodic or special reports, schedules and other material which the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries may be required to file with or deliver to any securities exchange or the SEC, or any other Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof, and (ii) upon the written request of the Administrative Agent, reports that the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries sends to or files with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the WPS, the MPUC or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof, or any similar state or local Governmental Authority;
 
(c)
   
prompt written notice of (i) any material citation, summons, subpoena, order, notice, claim or proceeding received by, or brought against, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, with respect to (x) any proceeding before any Governmental Authority (other than proceedings in the
 
 
28
 
ordinary course of business before the WPS or the MPUC), or (y) any real property under any Environmental Law, and (ii) any lapse or other termination of, or refusal to renew or extend, any material franchise or other authorization issued to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries by any Governmental Authority (other than in the ordinary course of business), that any of the foregoing set forth in this paragraph would, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and
provided
 
(d)
   
prompt written notice of any change by any Rating Agency in a Senior Debt Rating.
 
Each notice delivered under or shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Borrower setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
Section 6.2(a)
(c)
 
Documents required to be delivered pursuant to or or or (to the extent any such documents are included in materials otherwise filed with the SEC) may be delivered electronically and if so delivered, shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date (a) on which the Borrower posts such documents, or provides a link thereto, on the Borrowers website on the Internet at the website address listed in ; or (b) on which such documents are posted on the Borrowers behalf on an Internet or intranet website, if any, to which each Lender and the Administrative have access (whether a commercial, third-party website or whether sponsored by the Administrative Agent), that: (i) the Borrower shall deliver paper copies of such documents to the Administrative Agent or any Lender that requests the Borrower to deliver such paper copies until a written request to cease delivering paper copies is given by the Administrative Agent or such Lender and (ii) the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender (by facsimile or electronic mail) of the posting of any such documents and provide to the Administrative Agent by electronic mail electronic versions (, soft copies) of such documents.  Except for such Compliance Certificates, the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to request the delivery or to maintain copies of the documents referred to above, and in any event shall have no responsibility to monitor compliance by the Borrower with any such request for delivery, and each Lender shall be solely responsible for requesting delivery to it or maintaining its copies of such documents.
Section 6.1(a)
(b)
Section 6.2(b)
(c)
Section 10.1(b)
provided
i.e.
 
Section 6.3.
   
.  Except as permitted under , the Borrower shall maintain its legal existence in good standing in the jurisdiction of its organization or formation and in each other jurisdiction in which the failure so to do would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and cause each of the Subsidiaries to maintain its qualification to do business and good standing in each jurisdiction in which the failure so to do would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect (it being understood that the foregoing shall not prohibit the Borrower from dissolving or terminating the existence of any Subsidiary that is inactive or whose preservation otherwise is no longer desirable in the conduct of the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries considered as a whole).
Legal Existence
Section 7.2
 
Section 6.4.
   
.  The Borrower shall pay and discharge when due, and cause each of the Subsidiaries so to do, all Taxes imposed upon it or upon its property, which if unpaid would, individually or collectively, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or become a Lien on the property of the Borrower or such Subsidiary (other than a Lien described in of the definition of Permitted Encumbrances), as the case may be, unless and to the extent only that such Taxes shall be contested in good faith and by appropriate proceedings diligently conducted by the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be.
Taxes
clause (a)
 
 
29
 
Section 6.5.
   
.  The Borrower shall maintain, and cause each of its Subsidiaries to maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies insurance on all its property in at least such amounts and against at least such risks as are usually insured against in the same general area by companies engaged in the same or a similar business, that the Borrower and its Subsidiaries may self-insure to the same extent as other companies engaged in similar businesses and owning similar properties in the same general areas in which the Borrower or such Subsidiary operates and to the extent consistent with prudent business practice.  The Borrower shall furnish to the Administrative Agent, upon written request of the Administrative Agent or any Lender, full information as to the insurance carried.
Insurance
provided
 
Section 6.6.
   
.  The Borrower shall at all times maintain, protect and keep in good repair, working order and condition in all material respects (ordinary wear and tear excepted), and cause each of its Subsidiaries so to do, all material property necessary to the operation of the Borrowers or such Subsidiarys, as the case may be, material businesses, that nothing shall prevent the Borrower or its Subsidiaries, as appropriate, from discontinuing the maintenance or operation of any property if such discontinuance is, in the judgment of the Borrower or such Subsidiary, desirable in the conduct of the business of the Borrower or such Subsidiary.  It is understood that this covenant relates only to working order and condition of such property in accordance with prudent industry practices and shall not be construed as a covenant not to dispose of property.
Condition of Property
provided
 
Section 6.7.
   
.  The Borrower shall observe and comply in all material respects, and cause each of its Subsidiaries so to do, with all laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority which now or at any time hereafter may be applicable to it, including ERISA and all Environmental Laws, a violation of which would individually or collectively reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, except such thereof as shall be contested in good faith and, if applicable, by appropriate proceedings diligently conducted by it.
Observance of Legal Requirements
 
Section 6.8.
   
.  The Borrower shall keep proper books of record and account in conformity with GAAP and all requirements of law.  The Borrower shall permit representatives of the Administrative Agent and any Lender to visit its offices, to inspect any of its property (subject to reasonable procedures relating to safety and security) and examine and make copies or abstracts from any of its books and records at any reasonable time and as often as may reasonably be desired, and to discuss the business, operations, prospects, property and financial condition of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries with the officers thereof and the Accountants; that none of the Administrative Agent, its agents, its representatives or the Lenders shall be entitled to examine or make copies or abstracts of, or otherwise obtain information with respect to, the Borrowers records relating to pending or threatened litigation if any such disclosure by the Borrower would reasonably be expected (i) to give rise to a waiver of any attorney/client privilege of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries relating to such information or (ii) to be otherwise materially disadvantageous to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries in the defense of such litigation; and that in the case of any discussion with the Accountants, the Borrower shall have been given the opportunity to participate in such discussion and, unless a Default exists, the Lender or Lenders requesting such discussion shall pay any fees and expenses of the Accountant in connection therewith.
Inspection of Property; Books and Records; Discussions
provided
provided further
 
 
30
 
 
 
Until the principal of and interest on all Loans and all other amounts payable under the Loan Documents shall have been paid in full, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Credit Parties that:
 
Section 7.1.
   
.  The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or suffer to exist any Lien upon any of its property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired by it, except:
Liens
 
(a)
   
Liens now existing or hereafter arising in favor of the Administrative Agent or the Lenders under the Loan Documents;
 
(b)
   
Permitted Encumbrances;
 
(c)
   
any Lien existing on any property prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or existing on any property of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary or that is merged with or into or consolidated with the Borrower or any Subsidiary prior to such merger or consolidation, that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary or such merger or consolidation, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations and liabilities that it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary of the Borrower or such merger or consolidation, as the case may be;
provided
 
(d)
   
Liens (including precautionary Liens in connection with Capital Lease Obligations) on fixed or capital assets and other property (including any natural gas, oil or other mineral assets, pollution control facilities, electrical generating plants, equipment and machinery, and related accounts, financial assets, contracts and general intangibles) acquired, constructed, explored, drilled, developed, improved, repaired or serviced (including in connection with the financing of working capital and ongoing maintenance) by the Borrower or any Subsidiary, that (i) such security interests and the obligations and liabilities secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 270 days after the acquisition of the relevant asset or the completion of the relevant construction, exploration, drilling, development, improvement, repair or servicing (including the relevant financing of working capital and ongoing maintenance), as the case may be, (ii) the obligations and liabilities secured thereby do not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing, exploring, drilling, developing, improving, repairing or servicing (including the financing of working capital and ongoing maintenance in respect of) the relevant assets, and (iii) such security interests shall not apply to any other property beyond the relevant property set forth in this (and in the case of construction or improvement, any theretofore unimproved real property on which the property so constructed or the improvement is located) and , as applicable, of the Borrower or any Subsidiary;
provided
paragraph (d)
paragraph (f)
 
(e)
   
Liens created under or in connection with the Mortgage;
 
(f)
   
Liens on any Equity Interest owned or otherwise held by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in any Person created as a special purpose, bankruptcy-remote Person for
 
 
31
 
the sole and exclusive purpose of engaging in activities in connection with the owning and operating of property in connection with any project financing permitted to be secured under ;
paragraph (d)
 
(g)
   
Liens created to secure Indebtedness of any Subsidiary to the Borrower or to any other Subsidiary;
 
(h)
   
rights reserved to or vested in others to take or receive any part of any coal, ore, gas, oil and other minerals, any timber and/or any electric capacity or energy, gas, water, steam and any other product developed, produced, manufactured, generated, purchased or otherwise acquired by the Borrower or by others on property of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, that no Lien described in this paragraph shall secure Indebtedness;
provided
 
(i)
   
Liens created for the sole purpose of extending, renewing or replacing in whole or in part Indebtedness secured by any lien, mortgage or security interest referred to in the foregoing through , that the principal amount of Indebtedness secured thereby shall not exceed the principal amount of Indebtedness so secured at the time of such extension, renewal or replacement and that such extension, renewal or replacement, as the case may be, shall be limited to all or a part of the property or indebtedness that secured the lien or mortgage so extended, renewed or replaced (and any improvements on such property);
paragraphs (a)
(h)
provided
 
(j)
   
Liens on cash or invested funds used to make a defeasance, covenant defeasance or in substance defeasance of any Indebtedness pursuant to an express contractual provision in the agreement governing such Indebtedness, that immediately before and immediately after giving effect to the making of such defeasance, no Default shall exist; and
provided
 
(k)
   
any Lien, in addition to those described in the foregoing through , securing obligations that, together with all other obligations secured pursuant to this , do not exceed 10% of Consolidated Assets at the time of the incurrence thereof.
paragraphs (a)
(j)
paragraph (k)
 
Section 7.2.
   
.  The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary to consolidate with or merge into any other Person (other than a merger of a Subsidiary into, or a consolidation of a Subsidiary with, the Borrower or another Subsidiary), unless:
Merger; Consolidation
 
(a)           immediately before and after giving effect thereto no Default shall exist;
 
(b)           immediately before and after giving effect thereto, all of the representations and warranties contained in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct except as the context thereof otherwise requires and except for those representations and warranties which by their terms or by necessary implication are expressly limited to a state of facts existing at a time prior to such merger, consolidation or acquisition, as the case may be, or such other matters relating thereto as are identified in a writing to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and are satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders; and
 
(c)           in the case of a transaction involving the Borrower, either (i) the Borrower shall be the surviving entity thereof, or in the event the Borrower shall not be the surviving entity thereof, each of the following conditions shall be satisfied: (A) such surviving entity shall have been incorporated or otherwise formed in a State of the United States with substantially all of its assets and business located and
 
 
32
 
 
conducted in the United States, (B) such surviving entity shall, immediately after giving effect to such transaction, have an Investment Grade Rating and (C) such surviving entity shall have expressly assumed the obligations of the Borrower under the Loan Documents pursuant to a writing in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; and (ii) the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall have received a certificate signed by a duly authorized officer of the Borrower identifying the Person to be merged with or into, or consolidated with, or acquired by, the Borrower, and certifying as to each of the matters set forth in of this .
clauses (a), (b) and
(c)(i)
Section 7.2
 
 For purposes of Clause (c) above,  means a Senior Debt Rating from at least two Rating Agencies equal to (1) for any transaction where the surviving entity has a Senior Debt Rating,  a rating for such surviving entity of BBB- or higher from S&P or Fitch or Baa3 or higher from Moodys and (2) for any transaction where the surviving entity is an indirect or direct holding company for a public utility that does not have a Senior Debt Rating, a rating for such surviving entitys primary utility Subsidiary of BBB- or higher from S&P or Fitch or Baa3 or higher from Moodys.
   
   
Investment Grade Rating
 
Section 7.3.
   
.  The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of (including pursuant to a merger) any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire (including pursuant to a merger) any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less materially favorable to the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, than could be obtained on an arms length basis from unrelated third parties, that this Section shall not apply to (i) any transaction that is in compliance with applicable laws and regulations of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the WPS or the MPUC pertaining to affiliate transactions or is authorized by a tariff or rate schedule which has been approved by a Governmental Authority or performed in accordance with its orders, (ii) any transaction that is otherwise permitted under and (iii) transactions pursuant to any contract in effect on May 25, 2011, as the same may be amended, extended or replaced from time to time so long as such contract as so amended, extended or replaced is, taken as a whole, not materially less favorable to the Borrower and its Subsidiaries than under those contracts in effect on May 25, 2011.
Transactions with Affiliates
provided
Section 7.2
 
Section 7.4.
   
.  The Borrower shall not enter into any Hedge Agreements other than (a) Permitted Hedge Agreements and (b) transactions in futures, floors, collars and similar Hedge Agreements involving the stock price of a Person involved in a merger transaction permitted by .
Permitted Hedge Agreements
Section 7.2
 
Section 7.5.
   
.  The Borrower will not permit Total Indebtedness to be greater than 65% of Total Capitalization as of the end of any fiscal quarter.
Financial Covenant
 
ARTICLE 8.
 
EVENTS OF DEFAULT
 
If any of the following events (each an ) shall occur:
Event of Default
 
 
33
 
(a)
   
the Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
 
(b)
   
the Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee, commission or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in of this Article) payable under any Loan Document, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of five Business Days;
paragraph (a)
 
(c)
   
any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
 
(d)
   
the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in (with respect to the Borrowers existence), , or ;
Section 6.3
7.2
7.4
7.5
 
(e)
   
the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in or and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of ten days after the Borrower shall have obtained knowledge thereof.
Section 7.1
Section 7.3
 
(f)
   
the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in any Loan Document to which it is a party (other than those specified in , , or of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after the Borrower shall have obtained knowledge thereof;
paragraph (a)
(b)
(d)
(e)
 
(g)
   
the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect to any Material Obligations, when and as the same shall become due and payable and after the expiration of any applicable grace period;
 
(h)
   
any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Obligations becoming due prior to their scheduled maturity or payment date, or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Obligations or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Obligations to become due prior to their scheduled maturity or payment date or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof prior to their scheduled maturity or payment date (in each case after giving effect to any applicable cure period), that this shall not apply to (i) Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of a notice of voluntary prepayment or redemption delivered by the Borrower or a Subsidiary, (ii) secured Indebtedness that becomes due solely as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness, (iii) intercompany indebtedness or (iv) the exercise of any contractual right to cause the prepayment of any Material Obligations (other than the exercise of a remedy for an event of default under the applicable contract or agreement);
provided
paragraph (h)
 
(i)
   
except for Immaterial Transactions and transactions expressly permitted by with respect to Subsidiaries, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall (i) suspend or discontinue its business, (ii) make an assignment for the benefit of creditors, (iii) generally not pay its debts as such debts become due, (iv) admit in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due,
Section 6.3
 
 
34
 
(v) file a voluntary petition in bankruptcy, (vi) become insolvent (however such insolvency shall be evidenced), (vii) file any petition or answer seeking for itself any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment of debt, liquidation or dissolution or similar relief under any present or future statute, law or regulation of any jurisdiction, (viii) petition or apply to any tribunal for any receiver, custodian or any trustee for any substantial part of its property, (ix) be the subject of any such proceeding filed against it which remains undismissed for a period of 45 days, (x) file any answer admitting or not contesting the material allegations of any such petition filed against it or any order, judgment or decree approving such petition in any such proceeding, (xi) seek, approve, consent to, or acquiesce in any such proceeding, or in the appointment of any trustee, receiver, sequestrator, custodian, liquidator, or fiscal agent for it, or any substantial part of its property, or an order is entered appointing any such trustee, receiver, custodian, liquidator or fiscal agent and such order remains in effect for 45 days, or (xii) take any formal action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing or looking to the liquidation or dissolution of the Borrower or any Subsidiary;
 
(j)
   
except to the extent arising solely out of an Immaterial Transaction, an order for relief is entered under the United States bankruptcy laws or any other decree or order is entered by a court having jurisdiction (i) adjudging the Borrower or any Subsidiary bankrupt or insolvent, (ii) approving as properly filed a petition seeking reorganization, liquidation, arrangement, adjustment or composition of or in respect of Borrower or any Subsidiary under the United States bankruptcy laws or any other applicable Federal or state law, (iii) appointing a receiver, liquidator, assignee, trustee, custodian, sequestrator (or other similar official) of the Borrower or any Subsidiary of any substantial part of the property thereof, or (iv) ordering the winding up or liquidation (other than, in the case of a Subsidiary, voluntary liquidation, not under any bankruptcy, insolvency or similar law) of the affairs of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, and any such decree or order continues unstayed and in effect for a period of 45 days;
 
(k)
   
one or more judgments or decrees against the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or any combination thereof aggregating in excess of $35,000,000, which judgment or decree (i) shall not be fully covered by insurance after taking into account any applicable deductibles and (ii) shall remain unpaid, unstayed on appeal, undischarged, unbonded or undismissed for a period of at least 30 consecutive days;
 
(l)
   
any Loan Document shall cease, for any reason, to be in full force and effect or the Borrower shall so assert in writing or shall disavow any of its Obligations;
 
(m)
   
an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(n)
   
any authorization or approval or other action by any Governmental Authority required for the execution, delivery or performance of any Loan Document shall be terminated, revoked or rescinded or shall otherwise no longer be in full force and effect;
 
(o)
   
a Change in Control shall occur; or
 
(p)
   
the Borrower shall fail to own, directly or indirectly, substantially all of the assets of Minnesota Power;
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event described in or of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the
paragraph (i)
(j)
 
 
35
 
request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower, declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other Obligations, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; and in case of any event described in or of this Article, the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other Obligations, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
paragraph (i)
(j)
 
ARTICLE 9.
 
THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT
 
Each Credit Party hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
 
The Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such Person and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
 
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (i) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (ii) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Credit Parties as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in ), and (iii) except as expressly set forth herein, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the Person serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity.  The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Credit Parties as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in ) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct.  The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Borrower or a Credit Party (and, promptly after its receipt of any such notice, it shall give each Credit Party and the Borrower notice thereof), and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (a) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (b) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered thereunder or in connection therewith, (c) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth therein, (d) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness thereof or any other agreement, instrument or
Section 10.2
Section 10.2
 
 
36
 
other document or (e) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in or elsewhere herein, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
Article 5
 
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person.  The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon.  The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
 
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub agents appointed by the Administrative Agent, that no such delegation shall serve as a release of the Administrative Agent or waiver by the Borrower of any rights hereunder.  The Administrative Agent and any such sub agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties.  The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
provided
 
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Credit Parties and the Borrower.  Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, with the consent of the Borrower (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld and not to be required during the existence of an Event of Default), to appoint a successor, which successor Administrative Agent shall be a commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States or any State thereof and having a combined capital, surplus, and undivided profits of at least $100,000,000. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Credit Parties, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank.  Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder.  The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor.  After the Administrative Agents resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
Section 10.3
 
Each Credit Party acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Credit Party and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.  Each Credit Party also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Credit Party and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking
 
 
37
 
action under or based upon any Loan Document, any related agreement or any document furnished thereunder.
 
Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Book Runner shall have no powers, duties or responsibilities under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents.
 
ARTICLE 10.
 
MISCELLANEOUS
 
Section 10.1.
   
.
Notices
 
 (i)
   
   
.  Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and except as provided in below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by facsimile (or e-mail in accordance with below) as follows:
Notices Generally
paragraph (b)
Section 10.1(b)
 
 (ii)
   
   
if to the Borrower, to it at 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota, Attention of: Donald W. Stellmaker, Vice President and Corporate Treasurer, Phone: 218-723-3942, Fax: 218-723-3912, Email: dstellmaker@allete.com.
 
 (iii)
   
   
if to the Administrative Agent,
 
 (A)           for Loans, to it at its Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 S. Dearborn Street, Floor 07, Chicago, Illinois, Attention of: Teresita Siao, Phone: 312-385-7051, Fax: 888-292-9533, Email:  teresita.r.siao@jpmchase.com;
   
   
 
 (B)           for credit related matters including compliance requirements pursuant to , to it at its Corporate Client Banking, 10 S. Dearborn Street, Floor 09, Chicago, Illinois, Attention of: John Zur, Phone: 312-732-1754, Fax: 312-732-1762, Email: john.e.zur@jpmorgan.com; and           
   
   
Article 6
 
 (iv)
   
   
if to any other Credit Party, to it at its address (or facsimile number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
 
Notices sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received; notices sent by facsimile shall be deemed to have been given when sent (except that, if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient).  Notices delivered through electronic communications to the extent provided in below, shall be effective as provided in such .
paragraph (b)
paragraph (b)
 
(b)
   
.  Notices and other communications to the Credit Parties hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communication (including e-mail and Internet or intranet websites) pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent, that the foregoing shall not apply to notices to any Credit Party pursuant to if such Credit
Electronic Communications
provided
Article 2
 
 
38
 
Party has notified the Administrative Agent that it is incapable of receiving notices under such Article by electronic communication.  The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it, that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
provided
 
Unless the Administrative Agent otherwise prescribes, (i) notices and other communications sent to an e-mail address shall be deemed received upon the senders receipt of an acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by the return receipt requested function, as available, return e-mail or other written acknowledgement), that if such notice or other communication is not sent during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been sent at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient, and (ii) notices or communications posted to an Internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its e-mail address as described in the foregoing of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor.
provided
clause (i)
 
For purposes of , the Borrowers website is www.allete.com.
Section 6.2(d)
 
(c)
   
  Any party hereto may change its address or facsimile number or e-mail address for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.
Change of Address, Etc.
 
Section 10.2.
   
.
Waivers; Amendments
 
(a)
   
No failure or delay by any Credit Party in exercising any right or power under any Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  The rights and remedies of the Credit Parties under the Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by the Borrower therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether any Credit Party may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
paragraph (b)
 
(b)
   
Neither any Loan Document nor any provision thereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Borrower and the Required Lenders or by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent with the consent of the Required Lenders, that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan, or reduce the rate of any interest, or reduce any fees, payable under the Loan Documents, without the written consent of each Credit Party affected thereby, (iii) postpone the date of payment at stated maturity of any Loan, or the date of any interest or any fees payable under the Loan Documents, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, without the written consent of each Credit Party affected thereby, (iv) change any provision hereof in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required by or without the written consent of each Credit Party affected thereby, and (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of the term Required Lenders or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of
provided
Section 2.5(b)
2.5(c)
 
 
39
 
Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder, or change the currency in which Loans are to be made or payment under the Loan Documents is to be made, or add additional borrowers, without the written consent of each Lender, and that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, as applicable.
provided
further
 
Section 10.3.
   
.
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
 
(a)
   
.  The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of each Loan Document or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated thereby shall be consummated) and (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred by any Credit Party, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Credit Party and any consultant or expert witness fees and expenses, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made hereunder, including all such reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans.
Cost and Expenses
 
(b)
   
.  The Borrower shall indemnify each Credit Party and each Related Party thereof (each such Person being called an ) against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of any Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated thereby, the performance by the parties to the Loan Documents of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated thereby, (ii) any Loan or the use of the proceeds thereof, (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto, that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee or a breach in bad faith by such Indemnitee or arising solely from claims between or among one or more Indemnitees.
Indemnification by the Borrower
Indemnitee
provided
 
(c)
   
.  To the extent that the Borrower fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent under or of this Section (and without limiting the Borrowers obligation to do so), each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to the product of such unpaid amount a fraction, the numerator of which is the outstanding principal balance of such Lenders Loans and the denominator of which is the outstanding principal balance of all Lenders Loans (in each case determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought), that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related
Reimbursement by Lenders
paragraph (a)
(b)
multiplied by
provided
 
 
40
 
expense, as applicable, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent in its capacity as such.
 
(d)
   
  To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct and actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, any Loan Document or any agreement, instrument or other document contemplated thereby, the Transactions or any Loan or the use of the proceeds thereof.
Waiver of Consequential Damages, etc.
 
(e)
   
.  All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly but in no event later than ten days after written demand therefor.
Payments
 
Section 10.4.
   
.
Successors and Assigns
 
(a)
   
.  The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, except that the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and each Lender, and no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder except (i) to an Eligible Assignee in accordance with the provisions of of this Section, (ii) by way of participation in accordance with the provisions of of this Section or (iii) by way of pledge or assignment of a security interest subject to the restrictions of of this Section (and any other attempted assignment or transfer by any party hereto shall be null and void).  Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, Participants to the extent provided in of this Section and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each Credit Party) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns Generally
paragraph (b)
paragraph (d)
paragraph (f)
paragraph (d)
 
(b)
   
.  Any Lender may (and if demanded by Borrower pursuant to shall to the extent required thereby) at any time assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitments and the Loans at the time owing to it); that any such assignment shall be subject to the following conditions:
Assignments by Lenders
Section 3.6
provided
 
(i)
   
.
Minimum Amounts
 
 (A)
   
   
In the case of an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lenders Loans at the time owing to it or in the case of an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund, no minimum amount need be assigned; and
 
 (B)
   
   
In any case not described in of this Section, the principal outstanding balance of the Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent or, if Trade Date is specified in the Assignment and Assumption, as of the Trade Date) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Administrative Agent and, so long as no
paragraph (b)(i)(A)
 
 
41
 
 
Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower otherwise consents (each such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed).
 
 (ii)
   
   
.  Each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement with respect to the Loan or the Commitment assigned.
Proportionate Amounts
 
 (iii)
   
   
.  For each such assignment, the consent of the Borrower (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) shall be required unless (x) an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of such assignment or (y) such assignment is to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund; that the Borrower shall be deemed to have consented to any such assignment unless it shall object thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within five Business Days after having received notice thereof.
Required Consents
provided
 
 (iv)
   
   
.  The parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500, and the Eligible Assignee, if it is not a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire.
Assignment and Assumption
 
 (v)
   
   
.  No such assignment shall be made to the Borrower or any of the Borrowers Affiliates or Subsidiaries.
No Assignment to Borrower
 
 (vi)
   
   
.  No such assignment shall be made to a natural person.
No Assignment to Natural Persons
 
Subject to acceptance and recording thereof by the Administrative Agent pursuant to of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption, the Eligible Assignee thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto) but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of , , and with respect to facts and circumstances occurring prior to the effective date of such assignment.  Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this paragraph shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with of this Section.
paragraph (c)
Sections 3.3
3.4
3.5
10.3
paragraph (d)
 
(c)
   
.  The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices in New York, New York a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitments of, and principal amounts of the Loans owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ).  The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary.  The Register shall be available
Register
Register
 
 
42
 
for inspection by the Borrower and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
 
(d)
   
.  Any Lender may at any time, without the consent of, but with notice to, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent ( that any failure to give such notice shall not impair the effectiveness of such participation except as expressly provided in of this Section), sell participations to any Person (other than a natural person or the Borrower or any of the Borrowers Affiliates or Subsidiaries) (each, a ) in all or a portion of such Lenders rights and/or obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of the Loans owing to it); that (i) such Lenders obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations, (iii) such Lender shall remain the holder of any Note for all purposes of this Agreement and (iv) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and each Credit Party shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event may a participation be granted to any entity which is not a commercial bank, finance company, insurance company or other financial institution or fund (whether a corporation, partnership or other entity) engaged generally in making, purchasing or otherwise investing in commercial loans in the ordinary course of its business without the express prior written consent of the Borrower.
Participations
provided
paragraph (e)
Participant
provided
 
Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver with respect to the following matters described in and of the first proviso in that directly affects such Participant. Subject to of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of , and to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to of this Section but (x) shall not be entitled to recover greater amounts under any such Section than the selling Lender would be entitled to recover and (y) shall be subject to replacement by the Borrower under to the same extent as if it were a Lender; that such replacement Participant shall be a commercial bank, finance company, insurance company or other financial institution or fund (whether a corporation, partnership or other entity) engaged generally in making, purchasing or otherwise investing in commercial loans in the ordinary course of its business. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to as though it were a Lender.
provided
clauses (ii)
(iii)
Section 10.2(b)
paragraph (e)
Sections 3.3
3.4
3.5
paragraph (b)
Section 3.6
provided
Section 10.8
 
Section 2.5(c)
 
Each Lender that sells a participating interest in any Loan or other interest to a Participant shall, as agent of the Borrower solely for the purpose of this ,  record in book entries maintained by such Lender the name and the amount of the participating interest of each Participant entitled to receive payments in respect of such participating interests; that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of such participant register to the Borrower or any other Person (other than the identity of any Participant pursuant to the first paragraph of this , but including any information relating to a Participants interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement) except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that the Loans are in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations.
Section 10.4
provided
clause (d)
 
 
43
 
(e)
   
.  A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under or than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrowers prior written consent.  A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with as though it were a Lender.
Limitations upon Participant Rights
Sections 3.4
3.6
Section 3.5
Section 3.5(c)
 
(f)
   
.  Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank; that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
Certain Pledges
provided
 
Section 10.5.
   
.  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Borrower herein and in the certificates or other instruments prepared or delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of any Loan Document and the making of any Loans, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that any Credit Party may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under the Loan Documents is outstanding and unpaid and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated.  The provisions of , , , , , and shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the Transactions, the repayment of the Loans or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Survival
Sections 3.4
3.5
3.6
10.3
10.9
10.10
Article 9
 
Section 10.6.
   
.  This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which, when taken together, shall constitute a single contract.  This Agreement and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to any Credit Party or the syndication of the credit facility established hereunder constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof.  Except as provided in , this Agreement shall become effective as of the date set forth in the preamble to this Agreement when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of this Agreement by facsimile transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
Section 5.1
 
Section 10.7.
   
.  In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Agreement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).  The parties shall endeavor in good faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
Severability
 
 
44
 
Section 10.8.
   
.  If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, and the acceleration of all obligations owing in connection with the Loan Documents, or at any time upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default under of , each of the Lenders and their respective Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, to set-off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by it to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against any of the Obligations now or hereafter existing under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents held by it, irrespective of whether or not it shall have made any demand therefor and although such Obligations may be unmatured.  The rights of each of the Lenders and their respective Affiliates under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of set-off) that it may have.  Each Lender agrees promptly to notify the Borrower and the Administrative Agent after any such set off and application made by such Lender, that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such set off and application.
Right of Set-off
paragraph (a)
Article 8
provided
 
Section 10.9.
   
.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process
 
(a)
   
This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
 
(b)
   
The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York City, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State court or, to the extent permitted by applicable law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent or any other Credit Party may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents against the Borrower, or any of its property, in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
(c)
   
The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents in any court referred to in of this Section.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
paragraph (b)
 
(d)
   
The Borrower irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in .  Nothing in this Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
Section 10.1
 
Section 10.10.
   
.  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR RELATING TO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
 
 
45
 
OR ANY OTHER THEORY).  EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS TO WHICH IT IS A PARTY BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
 
Section 10.11.
   
.  Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
 
Section 10.12.
   
.  Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan, together with all fees, charges and other amounts that are treated as interest thereon under applicable law (collectively the ), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the ) that may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding an interest in such Loan in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan hereunder, together with all of the charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and the charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated, and the interest and the charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
Interest Rate Limitation
Charges
Maximum Rate
 
Section 10.13.
   
.  The Borrower hereby authorizes JPMorgan Chase or any Affiliate thereof to publish the name of the Borrower and the amount of the financing evidenced hereby in any tombstone or comparable advertisement that JPMorgan Chase or such Affiliate elects to publish.  In addition, the Borrower agrees that JPMorgan Chase or any Affiliates thereof may provide lending industry trade organizations with information necessary and customary for inclusion in league table measurements after the Effective Date.
Advertisement
 
Section 10.14.
   
.  Each Lender that is subject to the Patriot Act (as hereinafter defined) and the Administrative Agent (for itself and not on behalf of any Lender) hereby notifies the Borrower that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the ), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrower, which information includes the name and address of the Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, to identify the Borrower in accordance with the Patriot Act.
USA Patriot Act Notice
Patriot Act
 
Section 10.15.
   
.  Each Credit Party agrees to use reasonable precautions to keep confidential, in accordance with its customary procedures for handling confidential information of the same nature, all confidential, proprietary or non-public information supplied by the Borrower or any Subsidiary pursuant to this Agreement relating to the Borrower, such Subsidiary or their respective businesses, including, without limitation, any financial statement, financial projections or forecasts, budget, Compliance Certificate, audit report, management letter or accountants certification delivered hereunder (), provided that nothing herein shall limit the disclosure of any Information (a) to any of its respective Related Parties that needs to know such Information, (b) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar
Treatment of Certain Information
Information
 
 
46
 
legal process, or requested by any bank regulatory authority, (c) on a confidential basis, to any bona fide or potential assignee or participant in connection with the contemplated assignment or participation of any Loans or any participations therein or by any direct or indirect contractual counterparties (or the professional advisors thereto) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations (provided such assignees, participants, counterparties and advisors are advised of and agree to be bound by either the provisions of this or other provisions at least as restrictive as this ), (d) to auditors, accountants, consultants and advisors, and any analogous counterpart thereof, (e) to any other Credit Party, (f) in connection with any litigation to which any one or more of the Credit Parties is a party, (g) to the extent such information (A) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Agreement, (B) becomes available to any of the Credit Parties on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower or any of its Affiliates or (C) was available to the Credit Parties on a non-confidential basis prior to its disclosure to any of them by the Borrower or any of its Affiliates; and (h) to the extent the Borrower shall have consented to such disclosure in writing.
Section 10.15
Section 10.15
 
Section 10.16.
   
.  The Administrative Agent, each Lender and their Affiliates (collectively, solely for purposes of this paragraph, the Lenders), may have economic interests that conflict with those of the Borrower, their stockholders and/or their affiliates.  The Borrower agrees that nothing in the Loan Documents or otherwise will be deemed to create an advisory, fiduciary or agency relationship or fiduciary or other implied duty between any Lender, on the one hand, and such Borrower, its stockholders or its affiliates, on the other. The Borrower acknowledges and agrees that (i) the transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents (including the exercise of rights and remedies hereunder and thereunder) are arms-length commercial transactions between the Lenders, on the one hand, and the Borrower, on the other, and (ii) in connection therewith and with the process leading thereto, (x) no Lender has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Borrower, its stockholders or its affiliates with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby (or the exercise of rights or remedies with respect thereto) or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether any Lender has advised, is currently advising or will advise the Borrower, its stockholders or its Affiliates on other matters) or any other obligation to the Borrower except the obligations expressly set forth in the Loan Documents and (y) each Lender is acting solely as principal and not as the agent or fiduciary of the Borrower, its management, stockholders, creditors or any other Person. The Borrower acknowledges and agrees that it has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate and that it is responsible for making its own independent judgment with respect to such transactions and the process leading thereto. The Borrower agrees that it will not claim that any Lender has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a fiduciary or similar duty to the Borrower, in connection with such transaction or the process leading thereto.
No Fiduciary Duty
 
 
 
47
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
       
 
 
 
 
 
 
      
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SCHEDULE 2.1
 
LIST OF COMMITMENTS
 
 
 
Schedule 2.1
 
SCHEDULE 4.5/4.6
 
DISCLOSED MATTERS
 
 
 
 
Schedule 4.5/4.6
 
SCHEDULE 4.10
 
LIST OF SUBSIDIARIES
 
ALLETE Automotive Services, LLC
ALLETE Capital II
ALLETE Capital III
ALLETE Properties, LLC
ALLETE Commercial, LLC
Cape Coral Holdings, Inc.
Lake Swamp, LLC
Lehigh Acquisition Corporation
Florida Landmark Communities, LLC
Lehigh Corporation
Mardem, LLC
Palm Coast Holdings, Inc.
Port Orange Holdings, LLC
Interlachen Lakes Estates, LLC
Palm Coast Land, LLC
Tomoka Holdings, LLC
ALLETE Water Services, Inc.
Florida Water Services Corporation
Energy Replacement Property, LLC
Georgia Water Services Corporation
Energy Land, Incorporated
Lakeview Financial Corporation I
Lakeview Financial Corporation II
Logistics Coal, LLC
Minnesota Power Enterprises, Inc.
ALLETE Clean Energy, Inc.
ALLETE Renewable Resources, Inc.
BNI Coal, Ltd.
MP Affiliate Resources, Inc.
Rainy River Energy Corporation
Rainy River Energy Corporation  Wisconsin
Synertec, Incorporated
Upper Minnesota Properties, Inc.
Upper Minnesota Properties - Development, Inc.
Upper Minnesota Properties - Irving, Inc.
Upper Minnesota Properties - Meadowlands, Inc.
MP Investments, Inc.
RendField Land Company, Inc.
Superior Water, Light and Power Company
 
 
Schedule 4.10
 
EXHIBIT A
 
FORM OF ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION
 
This Assignment and Assumption (the ) is dated as of the Effective Date set forth below and is entered into by and between [the] [each] Assignor identified in item 1 below ([the][each, an] ) and [the][each] Assignee identified in item 2 below ([the][each, an] ).  [It is understood and agreed that the rights and obligations of [the Assignors][the Assignees] hereunder are several and not joint.]  Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Term Loan Agreement identified below (as amended, modified or otherwise supplemented from time to time, the ), receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged by [the][each] Assignee.  The Standard Terms and Conditions set forth in attached hereto are hereby agreed to and incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Assignment and Assumption as if set forth herein in full.
Assignment and Assumption
1
Assignor
2
Assignee
3
4
Term Loan Agreement
Annex 1
 
For an agreed consideration, the Assignor hereby irrevocably sells and assigns to the Assignee, and the Assignee hereby irrevocably purchases and assumes from the Assignor, subject to and in accordance with the Standard Terms and Conditions and the Term Loan Agreement, as of the Effective Date inserted by the Administrative Agent as contemplated below, all of the Assignors rights and obligations in its capacity as a Lender under the Term Loan Agreement and any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto that represents the amount and percentage interest identified below of all of the Assignors outstanding rights and obligations under the respective facilities identified below (including without limitation, to the extent permitted to be assigned under applicable law, all claims (including without limitation contract claims, tort claims, malpractice claims, statutory claims and all other claims at law or in equity), suits, causes of action and any other right of the Assignor against any Person whether known or unknown arising under or in connection with the Term Loan Agreement, any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto or the loan transactions governed thereby) other than claims for indemnification or reimbursement with respect to any period prior to the Effective Date referred to below (the ).  Such sale and assignment is without recourse to the Assignor and, except as expressly provided in this Assignment and Assumption, without representation or warranty by the Assignor.
Assigned Interest
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
For bracketed language here and elsewhere in this form relating to the Assignor(s), if the assignment is from a single Assignor, choose the first bracketed language.  If the assignment is from multiple Assignors, choose the second bracketed language.
1
 
For bracketed language here and elsewhere in this form relating to the Assignee(s), if the assignment is to a single Assignee, choose the first bracketed language.  If the assignment is to multiple Assignees, choose the second bracketed language.
2
 
Select as appropriate.
3
 
Include bracketed language if there are either multiple Assignors or multiple Assignees.
4
 
 
Exhibit A-1
 
 
 
Effective Date: ____________________, 20__ [TO BE INSERTED BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND WHICH SHALL BE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF RECORDATION OF TRANSFER BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT.]
 
The terms set forth in this Assignment and Assumption are hereby agreed to:
 
ASSIGNOR
[NAME OF ASSIGNOR]
By:
Title:
ASSIGNEE
[NAME OF ASSIGNEE]
By:
Title:
 
List each Assignor, as appropriate.
5
List each Assignee, as appropriate.
6
 
Amount to be adjusted by the counterparties to take into account any payments or prepayments made between the Trade Date and the Effective Date.
7
 
Set forth, to at least 9 decimals, as a percentage of the Commitment/Loans of all Lenders thereunder.
8
 
Insert if satisfaction of minimum amounts is to be determined as of the Trade Date.
9
 
 
Exhibit A-2
 
[Consented to and] [a] [A]ccepted:
10
 
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent
By:
Title:
 
[Consented to:]
11
[NAME OF RELEVANT PARTY]
By:
Title:
 
 
To be added only if the consent of the Administrative Agent is required by the terms of the Term Loan Agreement.
10
 
To be added only if the consent of the Borrower and/or other parties is required by the terms of the Term Loan Agreement.
11
 
 
Exhibit A-3
 
ANNEX 1
TERMS AND CONDITIONS FOR
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION
 
1.  .
Representations and Warranties
 
1.1  .  The Assignor (a) represents and warrants that (i) it is the legal and beneficial owner of the Assigned Interest, (ii) the Assigned Interest is free and clear of any lien, encumbrance or other adverse claim and (iii) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby; and (b) assumes no responsibility with respect to (i) any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with the Term Loan Agreement or any other Loan Document, (ii) the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of the Loan Documents or any collateral thereunder, (iii) the financial condition of the Borrower, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person obligated in respect of any Loan Document or (iv) the performance or observance by the Borrower, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person of any of their respective obligations under any Loan Document.
Assignor
 
1.2.  .  The Assignee (a) represents and warrants that (i) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and to become a Lender under the Term Loan Agreement, (ii) it satisfies the requirements specified in the Term Loan Agreement that are required to be satisfied by it in order to acquire the Assigned Interest and become a Lender, (iii) from and after the Effective Date, it shall be bound by the provisions of the Term Loan Agreement as a Lender thereunder and, to the extent of the Assigned Interest, shall have the obligations of a Lender thereunder, (iv) it is sophisticated with respect to decisions to acquire assets of the type represented by the Assigned Interest and either it, or the Person exercising discretion in making its decision to acquire the Assigned Interest, is experienced in acquiring assets of such type, (v) it has received a copy of the Term Loan Agreement, together with copies of the most recent financial statements delivered pursuant to thereof, as applicable, and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Assignment and Assumption and to purchase the Assigned Interest on the basis of which it has made such analysis and decision independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent or any other Lender, and (vi) if it is a Foreign Lender, attached to the Assignment and Assumption is any documentation required to be delivered by it pursuant to the terms of the Term Loan Agreement, duly completed and executed by the Assignee; and (b) agrees that (i) it will, independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent, the Assignor or any other Lender, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Loan Documents, and (ii) it will perform in accordance with their terms all of the obligations which by the terms of the Loan Documents are required to be performed by it as a Lender.
Assignee
Section 6.1
 
2.  .  From and after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments in respect of the Assigned Interest (including payments of principal, interest, fees and other amounts) to the Assignor for amounts which have accrued to but excluding the Effective Date and to the Assignee for amounts which have accrued from and after the Effective Date. The Assignor and Assignee shall make all appropriate adjustments in payments by the Administrative Agent for periods prior to the Effective Date with respect to the making of this assignment directly between themselves.
Payments
 
3.  .  This Assignment and Assumption shall be binding upon, and inure to the benefit of, the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  This Assignment and Assumption may be executed in any number of counterparts, which together shall constitute one
General Provisions
 
 
Exhibit A-4
 
instrument.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Assignment and Assumption by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Assignment and Assumption.  This Assignment and Assumption shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of New York.
 
 
 
Exhibit A-5
 
EXHIBIT B
 
FORM OF NOTE
 
 
 
 
 
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned, ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the ), hereby promises to pay to the order of [INSERT LENDER NAME] (the ), on the Maturity Date (as defined in the Term Loan Agreement referred to below), the unpaid principal amount of the Loan made by the Lender to the Borrower pursuant to the Term Loan Agreement dated as of August 25, 2011 among the Borrower, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ), and to pay interest from the date hereof on the principal balance of the Loan from time to time outstanding at the rate or rates and at the times set forth in the Term Loan Agreement, in each case at the office of the Administrative Agent located at Ten South Dearborn Street, Chicago, Illinois, or at such other place as the Administrative Agent may specify from time to time, in lawful money of the United States in immediately available funds.  Terms not otherwise defined herein but defined in the Term Loan Agreement are used herein with the same meanings.
Borrower
Lender
Term Loan Agreement
 
The Loan evidenced by this Note is prepayable in the amounts, and under the circumstances, and its maturity is subject to acceleration upon the terms, set forth in the Term Loan Agreement.  This Note is subject to, and shall be construed in accordance with, the provisions of the Term Loan Agreement.
 
Except as specifically otherwise provided in the Term Loan Agreement, the Borrower hereby waives presentment, demand, notice of dishonor, protest, notice of protest and all other demands, protests and notices in connection with the execution, delivery, performance, collection and enforcement of this Note.
 
Whenever in this Note either party hereto is referred to, such reference shall be deemed to include the successors and assigns of such party.  The Borrower shall not have the right to assign its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein (and any such attempted assignment shall be void), except as expressly permitted by the Loan Documents.  No failure or delay of the Lender in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  Neither this Note nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified, nor shall any departure therefrom be consented to, except pursuant to a written agreement entered into between the Borrower and the Lender with respect to which such waiver, amendment, modification or consent is to apply, subject to any consent required in accordance with Section 10.2 of the Term Loan Agreement.
 
THIS NOTE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 10.1 of the Term Loan Agreement.
 
 
Exhibit B-1
 
The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York City, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Note or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State court or, to the extent permitted by applicable law, in such Federal court.  The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Note shall affect any right that the Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Note or the other Loan Documents against the Borrower, or any of its property, in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Note or the other Loan Documents in any court referred to in the preceding paragraph hereof.  The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices herein.  Nothing herein will affect the right of the Lender to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
THE BORROWER, AND BY ACCEPTING THIS NOTE, THE LENDER, EACH HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR RELATING TO THIS NOTE.  THE BORROWER (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF THE LENDER HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH LENDER WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT SUCH LENDER HAS BEEN INDUCED TO ACCEPT THIS NOTE AND ENTER INTO THE LOAN DOCUMENTS TO WHICH IT IS A PARTY BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS PARAGRAPH.
 
 
 
Exhibit B-2
 
EXHIBIT C
 
FORM OF COMPLIANCE CERTIFICATE
 
I, ______________, do hereby certify that I am the ______________ of ALLETE, Inc. (the ), and that, as such, I am duly authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on the Borrowers behalf pursuant to Section 6.1(c) of the Term Loan Agreement dated as of August 25, 2011 among the Borrower, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ).  Capitalized terms used herein which are not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Term Loan Agreement.
Borrower
Term Loan Agreement
 
I hereby certify that:
 
1.           To the best of my knowledge, all financial statements delivered herewith have been prepared in accordance with GAAP.  There have been no changes in GAAP pertinent to the Borrower or in the application thereof to Borrower and that affects the computation of any financial covenant set forth in Section 7.5 of the Term Loan Agreement, since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 4.4(a) of the Term Loan Agreement,[, except as follows:]
 
 
12
 
2.           There existed no Default on the last day of the fiscal quarter ended _________, 200__, and there exists no Default as of the date hereof [, except as follows]
13
 
3.           Attached are true and correct calculations demonstrating compliance with Section 7.5 of the Term Loan Agreement as of the fiscal quarter ended _________, 200__ (the ).
Quarter
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have executed this Compliance Certificate on this ___ day of ________________, 201_.
 
 
Specify each such change and the effect thereof on the financial statements accompanying this Compliance Certificate as set forth in Section 1.3 of the Term Loan Agreement.
12
 
Specify all such violations, conditions and events, the nature and status thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
13
 
 
 
 
Section 7.5
 
Ratio of Total Indebtedness to Total Capitalization
14
 
 
 
Each of the computations is based on the Borrower and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
14
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20111201115944.txt.gz
TIME:20111201115944
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
December 1, 2011
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS
Minnesota Power's taconite customers nominate minimum demand levels for their energy needs each December, March, and August for following four-month periods. Based on nominations received on December 1, 2011, Minnesota Power's taconite customers are expected to operate at 100 percent of their full demand levels for January through April, 2012, compared to 100 percent during the same period a year ago, and 100 percent for the September through December, 2011 period.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETE's disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 1, 2011
Safe Harbor Statement
Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 1, 2011
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December 1, 2011


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20111213122459.txt.gz
TIME:20111213122459
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
December
13,
2011
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 7 - REGULATION FD
ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) expects to earn between $2.45 and $2.65 per share on net income of $92 million to $100 million in 2012.
Significant assumptions impacting ALLETE's 2012 earnings guidance include:
Future large industrial expansions continue to progress towards start up in 2012 as well. Essar Steel Minnesota, LLC and Magnetation, Inc., are examples of new load additions associated with iron ore mining and processing in our service area. Future load growth opportunities in non-ferrous mining are being pursued as well.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETE's disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
13
, 2011
Safe Harbor Statement
Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
13
, 2011
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
13
, 2011


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20111215161249.txt.gz
TIME:20111215161249
EVENTS:	Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
TEXT:
ITEM: Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
December 15, 2011
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 3 - SECURITIES AND TRADING MARKETS
On December 15, 2011, ALLETE, Inc. contributed approximately 507,600 shares of ALLETE common stock to its pension plan. The issuance of these shares was reflected in our 2012 earnings guidance issued on December 13, 2011. These shares of ALLETE common stock were contributed pursuant to Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933 and had an aggregate value of approximately $20 million when contributed.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETE's disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
15,
2011
Safe Harbor Statement
Under the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts may be considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, will likely result, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are hereby filing cautionary statements identifying important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected, or expectations suggested, in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
15,
2011
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
15,
2011


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20120206161236.txt.gz
TIME:20120206161236
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
February 6, 2012 (February 1, 2012)
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 1 - REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION
On February 1, 2012, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) entered into a new $150 million credit agreement with JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as Administrative Agent, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC as Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Book Runner, and the several lenders party thereto (Credit Agreement). As of February 1, 2012, the Company had availability under this facility of $150 million.
The Credit Agreement is unsecured and has a maturity date of January 31, 2014, which may be extended for a one-year period. Advances may be used by ALLETE for general corporate purposes, to provide liquidity in support of ALLETE's commercial paper program and to issue up to $10 million in letters of credit.
ALLETE has the option to borrow funds under the Credit Agreement at an interest rate equal to the Eurodollar rate plus a margin of 0.90% to 1.475%, or an alternate base rate. In addition, ALLETE will pay annual facility fees ranging from 0.10% to 0.275%. Such interest rates and annual fees are based on ALLETE's then-current senior unsecured credit ratings.
The Credit Agreement contains customary conditions of borrowing, customary events of default and customary affirmative and negative covenants. The Credit Agreement includes only one financial covenant to maintain a ratio of Total Indebtedness to Total Capitalization (as defined in the Credit Agreement) equal to or less than 65%. Indebtedness under the Credit Agreement may be accelerated upon the occurrence of an event of default, including cross-default to other indebtedness in excess of $35 million.
A copy of the Credit Agreement is filed as Exhibit 10 hereto and is incorporated by reference herein. The description of the Credit Agreement above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Credit Agreement.
SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETE's disclosures under the heading: Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 6, 2012
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 22 of our 2010 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 6, 2012
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 6, 2012

EXECUTION COPY
TABLE OF CONTENTS
(i)            ALLETE Credit Agreement    
TABLE OF CONTENTS
(ii)            ALLETE Credit Agreement        
SCHEDULES:
EXHIBITS:
(iii)            ALLETE Credit Agreement
THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT (this 
Agreement
) dated as of February 1, 2012, is among ALLETE, INC., the Lenders party hereto and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
The parties hereto agree as follows:
ARTICLE 1.
DEFINITIONS AND INTERPRETATION
    
Section 1.1.    
Defined Terms
. As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
ABR
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate. For the avoidance of doubt, a Loan that bears interest at a rate determined pursuant to
clause (c)
of the definition of Alternate Base Rate shall, for all purposes of this Agreement, be deemed to be an ABR Loan and not a Eurodollar Loan.
Accountants
 means PricewaterhouseCoopers, L.L.P. or another registered public accounting firm of recognized national standing.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, an interest rate
per annum
(rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100
of 1%) equal to (a) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period
multiplied by
(b) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Administrative Agent
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder, and any successor in such capacity.
Administrative Questionnaire
 means an administrative questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Affiliate
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Agreement
 has the meaning assigned to such term in the preamble.
Alternate Base Rate
 means, for any day, a rate
per annum
equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus 1/2 of 1%, and (c) the Adjusted LIBO Rate for a one month Interest Period on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day)
plus
1%
per annum
(provided that, for the avoidance of doubt, the Adjusted LIBO Rate for any day shall be based on the rate appearing on the Reuters Screen LIBOR01 Page 1 (or on any successor or substitute page of such service)
at approximately 11:00 a.m. London time on such day). Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate, respectively.
Anniversary Date
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 2.8
.
                                    
1
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Applicable Margin
 means a rate
per annum
determined pursuant to
Schedule 1
.
Applicable Percentage
 means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Commitments represented by such Lender's Commitment; provided that in the case of
Section 2.11
when a Defaulting Lender shall exist, Applicable Percentage shall mean the percentage of the total Commitments (disregarding any Defaulting Lender's Commitments) represented by such Lender's Commitments. If the Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments and to any Lender's status as a Defaulting Lender at the time of such determination.
Approved Fund
 means, with respect to any Lender that is a fund that invests in commercial loans, any other fund that invests in commercial loans and is managed or advised by the same investment advisor as such Lender or by an Affiliate of such investment advisor.
Assignment and Assumption
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an Eligible Assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by
Section 10.4
), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, substantially in the form of
Exhibit A
or in such other form as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
Availability Period
 means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Maturity Date and, if different, the date of termination of the Commitments.
Bankruptcy Event
 means, with respect to any Person, such Person becomes the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee, administrator, custodian, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with the reorganization or liquidation of its business appointed for it, or, in the good faith determination of the Administrative Agent, has taken any action in furtherance of, or indicating its consent to, approval of, or acquiescence in, any such proceeding or appointment,
provided
that a Bankruptcy Event shall not result solely by virtue of any ownership interest, or the acquisition of any ownership interest, in such Person by a Governmental Authority or instrumentality thereof,
provided
,
further
, that such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Person with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Person (or such Governmental Authority or instrumentality) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made by such Person.
Board
 means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Borrower
 means ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation.
Borrower Financial Statements
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 4.4(a)
.
Borrowing
 means Loans of the same Type made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect.
Business Day
 means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed,
provided
                
        
2
ALLETE Credit Agreement
that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term Business Day shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Capital Lease Obligations
 means with respect to any Person, obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP, provided that no power purchase agreement shall constitute a Capital Lease Obligation.
Change in Control
 means the occurrence of any of the following: (a) the consummation of any transaction the result of which is that any person or group (within the meaning of Section 13(d)(3) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 but excluding any employee benefit plan of the Borrower or its Subsidiaries, and any Person acting in its capacity as trustee, agent or other fiduciary or administrator of any such plan) becomes the beneficial owner (as such term is defined in Rule 13d3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) of more than 30% of the total voting power in the aggregate of all classes of the Voting Securities of the Borrower then outstanding, (b) during any period of two consecutive calendar years, individuals who at the beginning of such period constituted the board of directors of the Borrower cease for any reason to constitute a majority of the directors of the Borrower then in office unless (i) such new directors were elected or nominated by a majority of the directors of the Borrower who constituted the board of directors of the Borrower at the beginning of such period or (ii) the reason for such directors failing to constitute a majority is a result of retirement by directors due to age, death or disability or (c) any event or condition relating to a change of control of the Borrower shall occur which requires or permits the holder or holders of indebtedness of the Borrower in an aggregate principal amount of $35,000,000 or more, or any agent or trustee for such holders, to require payment, purchase, redemption or defeasance of such indebtedness prior to its expressed maturity.
Change in Law
 means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the date hereof, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the date hereof or (c) compliance by any Credit Party (or, for purposes of
Section 3.5(b)
, by any lending office of such Credit Party or by such Credit Party's holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the date hereof;
provided
that, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or any United States regulatory authority pursuant to Basel III shall, in each case referred to in the foregoing
clauses (i)
and
(ii)
, be deemed to be a Change in Law, regardless of the date enacted, adopted, promulgated or issued.
Code
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
Commitment
 means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment of such Lender to make Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit hereunder in an aggregate outstanding amount not exceeding the amount of such Lender's Commitment as set forth on
Schedule 2.1
plus
, the amount of any increase set forth in each Increase Supplement executed and delivered by such Lender, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Commitment in accordance with
Section 10.4(b)
, as
                
3
ALLETE Credit Agreement
applicable, as such Commitment may be adjusted from time to time pursuant to
Section 2.5
or pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to
Section 10.4
. The initial aggregate amount of the Commitments is $150,000,000.
Compliance Certificate
 means a certificate, substantially in the form of
Exhibit D
.
Consolidated Assets
 means the total amount of assets shown on the consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, determined in accordance with GAAP and prepared as of the end of the fiscal quarter then most recently ended for which financial statements have been filed with the SEC.
Control
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. The terms Controlling and Controlled have meanings correlative thereto.
Credit Event
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 5.2
.
Credit Exposure
 means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the aggregate outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Loans and its LC Exposure at such time.
Credit Parties
 means the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders.
Credit Request
 means a Credit Request, substantially in the form of
Exhibit B
, or in such other form as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent.
Declining Lender
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 2.8
.
Default
 means any event or condition that constitutes an Event of Default or that upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Defaulting Lender
 means any Lender, as determined by the Administrative Agent (or if the Administrative Agent is the Defaulting Lender, by the Required Lenders), that (a) has failed, within three (3) Business Days of the date required to be funded or paid, to (i) fund any portion of its Loans, (ii) fund any portion of its participations in Letters of Credit or (iii) pay over to any Credit Party any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder, unless, in the case of clause (i) above, such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent in writing that such failure is the result of such Lender's good faith determination that a condition precedent to funding (specifically identified and including the particular default, if any) has not been satisfied, (b) has notified the Borrower or any Credit Party in writing, or has made a public statement to the effect, that it does not intend or expect to comply with any of its funding obligations under this Agreement) or generally under other agreements in which it commits to extend credit, (c) has failed, within three (3) Business Days after request by a Credit Party (based on the reasonable belief that it may not fulfill its funding obligation), acting in good faith, to provide a certification in writing from an authorized officer of such Lender that it will comply with its obligations (and is financially able to meet such obligations) to fund prospective Loans and participations in then outstanding Letters of Credit under this Agreement,
provided
that such Lender shall cease to be a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this
clause (c)
upon such Credit Party's receipt of such certification in form and substance satisfactory to it and the Administrative Agent, or (d) has become the subject of a Bankruptcy Event.
                        
4
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Disclosed Matters
 means the actions, suits, proceedings and environmental matters disclosed in (a)
Schedule 4.5/4.6
, (b) the current and periodic reports filed by the Borrower from time to time with the SEC pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, or (c) disclosed by the Borrower to the Lenders (either directly or indirectly through the Administrative Agent) in writing.
Disqualified Stock
 means any Equity Interest that, by its terms (or by the terms of any security into which it is convertible or for which it is exchangeable at the option of the holder thereof), or upon the happening of any event, matures (excluding any maturity as a result of an optional redemption by the issuer thereof) or is mandatorily redeemable, pursuant to a sinking fund obligation or otherwise, or is redeemable at the unconditional sole option of the holder thereof (other than solely for Equity Interests that do not constitute Disqualified Stock), in whole or in part, on or prior to the date that is 180 days after the Maturity Date.
dollars
 or 
$
 refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
Effective Date
 means February 1, 2012.
Eligible Assignees
 means any of the following (a) any commercial banks, finance companies, insurance companies and other financial institutions and funds (whether a corporation, partnership or other entity) engaged generally in making, purchasing or otherwise investing in commercial loans in the ordinary course of its business,
provided
that unless such entity is a Lender or an Affiliate of a Lender, such entity has been approved by the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and, unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of assignment to such entity, the Borrower (each such approval not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed), and
provided
,
further
, that any such entity shall be entitled, as of the date such entity becomes a Lender, to receive payments under its Note without deduction or withholding with respect to United States federal income tax, (b) each of the Lenders and (c) any Affiliate or Approved Fund of a Lender, and each is an Eligible Assignee.
Environmental Law
 means any and all applicable present and future treaties, laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by or with any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the presence, management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Equity Interest
 means (a) shares of corporate stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membership interests, and any other interest that confers on a Person the right to receive a share of the profits and losses of, or distribution of assets of, the issuing Person, and (b) all warrants, options or other rights to acquire any Equity Interest set forth in the foregoing
clause (a)
.
ERISA
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.
ERISA Affiliate
 means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Borrower or any Subsidiary, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Event
 means (a) any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the
                    
5
ALLETE Credit Agreement
30 day notice period is waived), (b) any failure to satisfy the minimum funding standards of Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA with respect to any Plan, whether or not waived, (c) the incurrence by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan, (d) the receipt by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan, (e) the incurrence by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan or (f) the receipt by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
Eurodollar
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate. For the avoidance of doubt, a Loan that bears interest at a rate determined pursuant to
clause (c)
of the definition of Alternate Base Rate shall, for all purposes of this Agreement, be deemed to be an ABR Loan and not a Eurodollar Loan.
Event of Default
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Article 8
.
Extension Request
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 2.8
.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
 means, for any day, a rate
per annum
(expressed as a decimal, rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next higher 1/100 of 1%) equal to the weighted average of the rates on overnight federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by federal funds brokers on such day, as published for such day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York,
provided
that (a) if the day for which such rate is to be determined is not a Business Day, the Federal Funds Effective Rate for such day shall be such rate on such transactions on the next preceding Business Day as so published on the next succeeding Business Day and (b) if such rate is not so published for any day, the Federal Funds Effective Rate for such day shall be the average of the quotations for such day on such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal Funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Financial Officer
 means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of the Borrower.
Fitch
 means Fitch Ratings, or any successor thereto.
Foreign Lender
 means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is located. For purposes of this definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
GAAP
 means generally accepted accounting principles set forth in the opinions and pronouncements of the Accounting Principles Board and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and in the statements and pronouncements of the Financial Accounting Standards Board or in such other statement by such other entity as may be approved by a significant segment of the accounting profession, which are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied;
provided
that in the event Borrower converts to use the
                        
6
ALLETE Credit Agreement
International Financial Reporting Standards by the International Accounting Standards Board or other method of accounting, as may hereafter be required or permitted by the SEC, then the term GAAP as used in this Agreement shall be deemed to mean and refer to such International Financial Reporting Standards or such other method of accounting instead, which are applicable to the circumstances as of the date of determination, consistently applied.
Governmental Authority
 means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, commission, exchange, association, board, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Guarantee
 of or by any Person (the 
guarantor
) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the 
primary obligor
) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation,
provided
that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business. The term Guaranteed has a meaning correlative thereto. The amount of any Guarantee of a Person shall be deemed to be an amount equal to the stated or determinable amount of the primary obligation in respect of which such Guarantee is made (or, if less, the maximum amount of such primary obligation for which such Person may be liable pursuant to the terms of the instrument evidencing such Guarantee) or, if not stated or determinable, the maximum reasonably anticipated liability in respect thereof as determined by such Person in good faith,
provided
that, notwithstanding anything in this definition to the contrary, the amount of any Guarantee of a Person in respect of any Permitted Hedge Agreement by any other Person with a counterparty shall be deemed to be the maximum reasonably anticipated liability of such other Person, as determined in good faith by such Person, net of any obligation or liability of such counterparty in respect of any Permitted Hedge Agreement with such Person,
provided
further
that the obligations of such other Person under such Permitted Hedge Agreement with such counterparty shall be terminable at the election of such other Person in the event of a default by such counterparty in its obligations to such other Person.
Hazardous Materials
 means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hedge Agreement
 means any interest rate protection agreement, foreign currency exchange agreement, commodity price protection agreement or other interest rate, currency exchange rate or commodity price hedge, future, forward, swap, option, cap, floor, collar or similar agreement or arrangement (including both physical and financial settlement transactions).
                
        
7
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Immaterial Subsidiary
 means a Subsidiary that (a) has consolidated total assets with a book value not exceeding 5% of Consolidated Assets as of the end of the most recent fiscal quarter for which financial statements have been filed with the SEC and (b) had total revenues not exceeding 5% of the Borrower's consolidated total revenues for the period ending on the last day of such fiscal quarter.
Immaterial Transaction
 means any transaction or event described in
paragraph (i)
or
(j)
of
Article 8
so long as, after giving effect to such transaction or event, all Subsidiaries that have become subject to such transactions or events during the 12-month period ending on the date of such transaction or event (a) had consolidated total assets with a fair market value not exceeding 5% of Consolidated Assets as of the end of the most recent fiscal quarter for which financial statements have been filed with the SEC and (b) had total revenues not exceeding 5% of the Borrower's consolidated total revenues for the period ending on the last day of such fiscal quarter.
Increase Supplement
 means an increase supplement in the form of
Exhibit E
.
Increasing Lender
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 2.5(d)
.
Indebtedness
 means as to any Person, at a particular time, all items which constitute, without duplication, (a) indebtedness for borrowed money or the deferred purchase price of property (excluding trade payables incurred in the ordinary course of business and excluding any such obligations payable solely through the Borrower's issuance of Equity Interests (other than the Disqualified Stock and Equity Interests convertible into Disqualified Stock)), (b) indebtedness evidenced by notes, bonds, debentures or similar instruments, (c) obligations with respect to any conditional sale or title retention agreement, (d) indebtedness arising under acceptance facilities and the amount available to be drawn under all letters of credit issued for the account of such Person and, without duplication, all drafts drawn thereunder to the extent such Person shall not have reimbursed the issuer in respect of the issuer's payment of such drafts, (e) all liabilities secured by any Lien on any property owned by such Person even though such Person has not assumed or otherwise become liable for the payment thereof,
provided
that the amount of such liabilities included for purposes of this definition will be the amount equal to the lesser of the fair market value of such property and the amount of the liabilities so secured, (f) indebtedness in respect of Disqualified Stock valued at the greater of its voluntary or involuntary maximum fixed repurchase price plus accrued dividends, (g) liabilities in respect of any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to purchase, redeem, retire, acquire or make any other payment in respect of any shares of equity securities or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any shares of equity securities, (h) obligations under Capital Lease Obligations, (i) Guarantees of such Person in respect of Indebtedness of others, and (i) to the extent not otherwise included, all net obligations of such Person under Permitted Hedge Agreements.
Indemnitee
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 10.3(b)
.
Information
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 10.15
.
Intellectual Property
 means all copyrights, trademarks, servicemarks, patents, trade names and service names.
Interest Election Request
 means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with
Section 3.2
.
            
            
8
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Interest Payment Date
 means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan, the last day of each March, June, September and December, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Eurodollar Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Loan with an Interest Period of more than three months' duration, the three-month anniversary of the first day of such interest period and (c) with respect to all Loans, (i) on the date of any prepayment or (ii) on the Maturity Date.
Interest Period
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months thereafter, as the Borrower may elect,
provided
that (a) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day, and (b) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Investment Grade Rating
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 7.2.
Issuing Bank
 means each of JPMorgan Chase and any other Lender approved by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent (which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed), in each case in its capacity as an issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder.
JPMorgan Chase
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A.
LC Disbursement
 means a payment made by an Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Exposure
 means, at any time, (a) with respect to all of the Lenders, the sum, without duplication, of (i) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time
plus
(ii) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time and (b) with respect to each Lender, its Applicable Percentage of the amount determined under
clause (a)
.
Lenders
 means the Persons listed on
Schedule 2.1
and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption or an Increase Supplement other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption.
Letter of Credit
 means any standby letter of credit (and any successive renewals thereof) issued pursuant to this Agreement.
Letter of Credit Commitment
 means with respect to any Issuing Bank, the commitment of such Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit hereunder in a maximum amount separately agreed in writing between the Borrower and such Issuing Bank (it being understood that the Letter of Credit Commitments of all Issuing Banks may, but the amount of all Letters of Credit
                        
9
ALLETE Credit Agreement
issued by all Issuing Banks may not, exceed the maximum amount of Letters of Credit permitted to be issued pursuant to
Section 2.9(a)
).
LIBO Rate
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Market Service (or on any successor or substitute page of such service, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate does not appear on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Market Service (or on any such successor or substitute page, or any successor to or substitute for such service) at such time for any reason, then the LIBO Rate with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate of interest
per annum
, as reported by JPMorgan Chase to the Administrative Agent, quoted by JPMorgan Chase to leading banks in the interbank eurodollar market as the rate at which JPMorgan Chase is offering dollar deposits in an amount equal approximately to the Eurodollar Loan of JPMorgan Chase to which such Interest Period shall apply for a period equal to such Interest Period, as quoted at approximately 11:00 a.m. two Business Days prior to the first day of such Interest Period.
Lien
 means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien (statutory or other), assignment, deposit arrangement, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance or preference, priority, charge or other security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Loan
 means a loan referred to in
Section 2.1
and made pursuant to
Section 2.4
.
Loan Documents
 means this Agreement, each Note issued pursuant to
Section 2.6
and each Letter of Credit and the related documentation.
Margin Stock
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Regulation U.
Material Adverse Change
 means a material adverse change in (a) the financial condition, operations, business or property of (ii) the Borrower or (ii) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, (b) the ability of the Borrower to perform its obligations under the Loan Documents or (c) the ability of the Credit Parties to enforce their rights and remedies under the Loan Documents.
Material Adverse Effect
 means a material adverse effect on (a) the financial condition, operations, business or property of (i) the Borrower or (ii) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, (b) the ability of the Borrower to perform its obligations under the Loan Documents, or (c) the ability of the Credit Parties to enforce their rights and remedies under the Loan Documents.
Material Obligations
 means as of any date, Indebtedness (other than Indebtedness under the Loan Documents) or operating leases of any one or more of the Borrower or any Subsidiary or, in the case of the Borrower only, any Guarantee, in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $35,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Obligations, the principal amount of
                        
10
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Indebtedness, operating leases or Guarantees at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, would be required to pay if such Indebtedness, operating leases or Guarantees became due and payable on such day.
Maturity Date
 means January 31, 2014.
Maximum Rate
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 10.12
.
Moody's
 means Moody's Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereto.
Mortgage
 means the Mortgage and Deed of Trust, dated as of September 1, 1945, among the Borrower, The Bank of New York Mellon (formerly Irving Trust Company) and Ming Ryan (successor to Richard H. West), Trustees.
MPUC
 means the Minnesota Public Utilities Commission or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
Multiemployer Plan
 means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
New Lender
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 2.5(d)
.
Note
 means a promissory note substantially in the form of
Exhibit C
issued at the request of a Lender pursuant to
Section 2.6(e)
to evidence its Loans.
Other Taxes
 means any and all current or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made hereunder or from the execution or delivery of, or performance under, or otherwise with respect to, the Loan Documents.
Participant
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 10.4(d)
.
Patriot Act
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 10.14
.
PBGC
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA.
Permitted Encumbrances
 means:
(a)
Liens imposed by law for taxes, assessments or similar charges incurred in the ordinary course of business that are not yet due or are being contested in compliance with
Section 6.4
,
provided
that enforcement of such Liens is stayed pending such contest;
(b)
landlords', vendors', carriers', warehousemen's, mechanics', materialmen's, contractors', repairmen's and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations which are not delinquent or are being contested,
provided
that enforcement of such Liens is stayed pending such contest;
11
ALLETE Credit Agreement
                        
(c)
pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations (but not ERISA);
(d)
pledges and deposits to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, purchase agreements, government contracts, statutory obligations, surety and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business, and other than promissory notes and contracts for the repayment of borrowed money;
(e)
Liens (including contractual security interests) in favor of a financial institution (including securities firms) encumbering deposit accounts or checks or instruments for collection, commodity accounts or securities accounts (including the right of setoff) at or held by such financial institution in the ordinary course of its commercial business and which secure only liabilities owed to such financial institution arising out of or resulting from its maintenance of such account or otherwise are within the general parameters customary in the financial industry;
(f)
judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under
paragraph (k)
of
Article 8
;
(g)
any interest of a lessor or licensor in property under an operating lease under which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is lessee or licensee, and any restriction or encumbrance to which the interest of such lessor or licensor is subject;
(h)
Liens arising from filed UCC-1 financing statements relating solely to leases not prohibited by this Agreement;
(i)
leases or subleases granted to others that do not materially interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries;
(j)
licenses of Intellectual Property granted by the Borrower or any Subsidiary in the ordinary course of business and not materially interfering with the ordinary conduct of the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries;
(k)
easements, servitudes (contractual and legal), zoning restrictions, rights of way, encroachments, minor defects and irregularities in title and other similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not render title to such property unmarketable or materially interfere with the ability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, as the case may be, to utilize their respective properties for their intended purposes;
(l)
Liens securing obligations, neither assumed by the Borrower or any Subsidiary nor on account of which the Borrower or any Subsidiary customarily pays interest, upon real estate on which the Borrower or any Subsidiary has a right-of-way, easement, franchise or other servitude or of which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is the lessee, for the purpose of locating transmission and distribution lines and related support structures, pipe lines, substations, measuring stations, tanks, pumping or delivery equipment or similar equipment, or service buildings incidental to any of the foregoing;
(m)
with respect to properties involved in the production of oil, gas and other minerals, unitization and pooling agreements and orders, operating agreements, royalties,
                
12
ALLETE Credit Agreement
reversionary interests, preferential purchase rights, farmout agreements, gas balancing agreements and other agreements, in each case that are customary in the oil, gas and mineral production business in the general area of such property and that are entered into in the ordinary course of business;
(n)
Liens in favor of Governmental Authorities encumbering assets acquired in connection with a government grant program, and the right reserved to, or vested in, any Governmental Authority by the terms of any right, power, franchise, grant, license, or permit, or by any provision of law, to purchase, condemn, recapture or designate a purchaser of any property;
(o)
Liens on Margin Stock to the extent that a prohibition on such Liens would violate Regulation U;
(p)
Liens on any cash collateral for Letters of Credit issued under (i) the Borrower's primary revolving credit facility upon the occurrence of an event of default thereunder or to cover an issuing lender's credit exposure under such facility with respect to a defaulting lender thereunder and (ii) this Agreement or for a Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure;
(q)
customary Liens for the fees and expenses of trustees and escrow agents pursuant to any indenture, escrow agreement or similar agreement establishing a trust or escrow arrangement;
(r)
agreements for and obligations (other than repayment of borrowed money) relating to the joint or common ownership, operation, and use of property, including Liens under joint venture or similar agreements securing obligations incurred in the conduct of operations or consisting of a purchase option, call or right of first refusal with respect to the Equity Interests in such jointly owned Person; and
(s)
Liens granted on cash or invested funds constituting proceeds of any sale or disposition of property deposited into escrow accounts to secure indemnification, adjustment of purchase price or similar obligations incurred in connection with such sale or disposition, in an amount not to exceed the amount of gross proceeds received from such sale or disposition.
Permitted Hedge Agreement
 means any Hedge Agreement engaged in by a Person as part of its normal business operations with the purpose and effect of hedging and protecting such Person against fluctuations or adverse changes in the prices of electricity, gas, fuel or other commodities, interest rates or currency exchange rates, which Hedge Agreement is part of a risk management strategy and not for purposes of speculation and not intended primarily as a borrowing of funds.
Person
 means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Plan
 means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an employer as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Prime Rate
 means the rate of interest
per annum
publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase as its prime rate at its principal office in New York City; each change
                        
13
ALLETE Credit Agreement
in the Prime Rate being effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective. The Prime Rate is not intended to be lowest rate of interest charged by JPMorgan Chase in connection with extensions of credit to borrowers.
Rating Agencies
 means Fitch, Moody's and S&P (or, if any of the foregoing ceases to provide Senior Debt Ratings as contemplated hereby, such other nationally recognized rating agency as shall be agreed by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent).
Register
 has the meaning assigned to such term in
Section 10.4(c)
.
Regulation D
 means Regulation D of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation T
 means Regulation T of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation U
 means Regulation U of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Regulation X
 means Regulation X of the Board as from time to time in effect and all official rulings and interpretations thereunder or thereof.
Related Parties
 means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Person's Affiliates.
Required Deposit Amount
 means in the event that as a result of the deposit of cash collateral with the Administrative Agent pursuant to
Section 2.9(i)
the Borrower (a) is not required to grant a security interest in such cash collateral to any other Person, an amount equal to the LC Exposure on the date on which cash collateral is required to be deposited, or (b) is required to grant a security interest in such cash collateral to any other Person, an amount equal to the LC Exposure on the date on which cash collateral is required to be deposited multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the sum of the LC Exposure
plus
the principal amount of all other obligations to be secured by such cash collateral and the denominator of which is the amount of such LC Exposure.
Required Lenders
 means, at any time, Lenders having unused Commitments, LC Exposure and outstanding Loans representing more than 50% of the sum of the unused Commitments, LC Exposure and outstanding Loans of all Lenders.
S&P
 means Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, a Standard & Poor's Financial Services LLC business, or any successor thereto.
SEC
 means the Securities and Exchange Commission or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
Senior Debt Rating
 means, at any date, the credit rating identified by a Rating Agency as the credit rating that (i) it has assigned to long term unsecured senior debt of the Borrower or (ii) would assign to long term unsecured senior debt of the Borrower were the Borrower to issue or have outstanding any long term unsecured senior debt on such date.
14
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Bookrunner
 means J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, in its capacity as Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Bookrunner hereunder.
Statutory Reserve Rate
 means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages, if any, (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which member banks of the United States Federal Reserve System in New York City with deposits exceeding $250,000,000 are subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as Eurocurrency liabilities in Regulation D). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Subsidiary
 means, as to any Person, any corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture or other business entity of which such Person or any Subsidiary of such Person, directly or indirectly, either (i) in respect of a corporation, owns or controls more than 50% of the outstanding Equity Interests having ordinary voting power to elect a majority of the board of directors or similar managing body, irrespective of whether a class or classes shall or might have voting power by reason of the happening of any contingency, or (ii) in respect of an association, partnership, joint venture or other business entity, is entitled to share in more than 50% of the profits and losses, however determined. Unless the context otherwise requires, any reference to a Subsidiary shall be deemed to refer to a Subsidiary of the Borrower.
Tax
 means any present or future tax, levy, assessment, impost, duty, charge, fee, deduction or withholding of any nature, and whatever called, by a Governmental Authority, on whomsoever and wherever imposed, levied, collected, withheld or assessed.
Tax on the Overall Net Income
 means, as to any Person, a Tax imposed by the jurisdiction in which that Person's principal office (and/or, in the case of a Lender, its lending office in the United States of America designated in its Administrative Questionnaire or such other office as such Lender may designate in writing to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower) is located, or by any political subdivision or taxing authority thereof, or in which that Person is deemed to be doing business, except to the extent such Person is doing business solely as a result of negotiation, execution, delivery or performance of the Transactions contemplated by this Agreement, imposed on (or measured by) all or part of the net income, profits or gains of that Person (whether worldwide, or only insofar as such income, profits or gains are considered to arise in or to relate to a particular jurisdiction, or otherwise).
Total Capitalization
 means, at any time, the difference between (a) the sum of each of the following at such time with respect to the Borrower and the Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP: (i) preferred Equity Interests,
plus
(ii) common Equity Interests and any premium on Equity Interests thereon (as such term is used in the Borrower Financial Statements), excluding accumulated other comprehensive income or loss,
plus
(iii) retained earnings,
plus
(iv) Total Indebtedness, and (b) (i) stock of the Borrower acquired by the Borrower and (ii) stock of a Subsidiary acquired by such Subsidiary, in each case at such time, as applicable, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
15
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Total Indebtedness
 means at any time, all Indebtedness (net of unamortized premium and discount (as such term is used in the Borrower Financial Statements)) at such time of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Transactions
 means (a) the execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of each Loan Document to which it is a party, (b) the borrowing of the Loans and the issuance of the Letters of Credit and (c) the use of the proceeds of the Loans and the Letters of Credit.
Type
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to (a) the Adjusted LIBO Rate or (b) the Alternate Base Rate. For the avoidance of doubt, a Loan that bears interest at a rate determined pursuant to
clause (c)
of the definition of Alternate Base Rate shall, for all purposes of this Agreement, be deemed to be an ABR Loan and not a Eurodollar Loan.
Voting Security
 means a security which ordinarily has voting power for the election of the board of directors (or other governing body), whether at all times or only so long as no senior class of Equity Interests has such voting power by reason of any contingency.
Withdrawal Liability
 means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
WPS
 means the Public Service Commission of Wisconsin or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof.
Section 1.2.    
Classification of Loans and Borrowings
. For purposes of this Agreement, (a) Loans may be classified and referred to by Type (
e.g.
, a 
Eurodollar Loan
) and (b) Borrowings may also be classified and referred to by Type (
e.g.
, a 
Eurodollar Borrowing
).
Section 1.3.    
Terms Generally
. The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words include, includes and including shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase without limitation. The word will shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word shall. Unless the context requires otherwise, (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, (b) any definition of or reference to any law shall be construed as referring to such law as from time to time amended and any successor thereto and the rules and regulations promulgated from time to time thereunder, (c) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (d) the words herein, hereof and hereunder, and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (e) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement, (f) the words asset and property shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights, and (g) any reference to a fiscal quarter or fiscal year means a fiscal quarter or fiscal year of the Borrower.
Section 1.4.    
Accounting Terms; GAAP
. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, as used in the Loan Documents and in any certificate, opinion or other document made or delivered
16
ALLETE Credit Agreement
pursuant thereto, accounting terms not defined in
Section 1.1
, and accounting terms partly defined in
Section 1.1
, to the extent not defined, shall have the respective meanings given to them under GAAP. If at any time any change in GAAP (including any change to the International Financial Reporting Standards by the International Accounting Standards Board or other method of accounting, as may hereafter be required or permitted by the SEC) would affect the computation of any financial requirement set forth in this Agreement, the Administrative Agent, the Lenders and the Borrower shall negotiate in good faith to amend such requirement to reflect such change in GAAP (subject to the approval of the Required Lenders),
provided
that, until so amended, (a) such requirement shall continue to be computed in accordance with GAAP prior to such change therein and (b) the Borrower shall provide to the Credit Parties financial statements and other documents required under this Agreement or as reasonably requested hereunder setting forth a reconciliation between calculations of such requirement made before and after giving effect to such change in GAAP.
Section 1.5.    
Rounding
. Any financial ratios required to be maintained by the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement shall be calculated by dividing the appropriate component by the other component, carrying the result to one place more than the number of places by which such ratio is expressed herein and rounding the result up or down to the nearest number (with a roundingup if there is no nearest number).
ARTICLE 2.
THE CREDITS
Section 2.1.    
Commitments
. Subject to the terms and conditions hereof, each Lender severally agrees to make Loans to the Borrower in dollars from time to time during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in such Lender's Credit Exposure exceeding such Lender's Commitment. Within the foregoing limits, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Loans.
Section 2.2.    
Loans and Borrowings
.
(a)
Each Loan shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments. The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder,
provided
that the Commitments of the Lenders are several, and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lender's failure to make any Loan as required.
(b)
Subject to
Section 3.4
, each Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans, as applicable, in each case as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith. Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan (and any ABR Loan, the interest on which is determined pursuant to
clause (c)
of the definition of Alternate Base Rate) by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan, provided that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
(c)
At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is $5,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of $1,000,000. At the time that each ABR Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is $5,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of $1,000,000, provided that an ABR Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the
17
ALLETE Credit Agreement
total Commitments or in an aggregate amount that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by
Section 2.9(e)
. Borrowings of more than one Type may be outstanding at the same time,
provided
that there shall not at any time be more than a total of ten Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
(d)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
Section 2.3.    
Requests for Borrowings
.
(a)    To request a Borrowing, the Borrower shall deliver a Credit Request to the Administrative Agent by hand or facsimile (or transmit by electronic communication, pursuant to arrangements for doing so approved by the Administrative Agent) or notify the Administrative Agent by telephone, in each case to be promptly confirmed by the delivery to the Administrative Agent of a signed Credit Request (i) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 12:30 p.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (ii) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 12:30 p.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such Credit Request (including each such telephonic request) shall be irrevocable (except as otherwise provided in
Section 3.4
) and shall specify the following information in compliance with
Section 2.2
:
(i)
the aggregate amount of the requested Borrowing;
(ii)
the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
(iii)
whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
(iv)
in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period; and
(v)
the location and number of the Borrower's account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of
Section 2.4
.
(b)    If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration. Promptly following receipt of a Credit Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
Section 2.4.    
Funding of Borrowings
.
(a)    Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 2:00 p.m., New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders. Subject to
Section 5.2
, the Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower by promptly crediting or otherwise transferring the amounts so received,
18
ALLETE Credit Agreement
in like funds, to an account of the Borrower designated by the Borrower in the applicable Credit Request,
provided
that ABR Loans made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in
Section 2.9(e)
shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the applicable Issuing Bank.
(b)    Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with
Section 2.4(a)
or
Section 2.9(e)
and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower or the applicable Issuing Bank, as applicable, a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower (and, if applicable, the applicable Issuing Bank) severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower or such Issuing Bank, as applicable, to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender or an Issuing Bank, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate that would be otherwise applicable to such Borrowing. Any payment by the Borrower or an Issuing Bank, however, shall be without prejudice to its rights against the applicable Lender. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing.
Section 2.5.    
Termination, Reduction and Increase of Commitments
.
(a)    Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Maturity Date.
(b)    The Borrower may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Commitments,
provided
that (i) the Borrower shall not terminate or reduce the Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment or repayment of the Loans in accordance with
Section 2.7
, the sum of the Credit Exposures would exceed the total Commitments and (ii) each such reduction of the Commitments shall be in the amount of $5,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of $1,000,000.
(c)    The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under
paragraph (b)
of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable,
provided
that a notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Borrower may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied. Each reduction, and any termination, of the Commitments shall be permanent and each reduction of the Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
(d)    The Borrower may at any time and from time to time prior to the Maturity Date, at its sole cost, expense and effort, request any one or more of the Lenders to increase its Commitment (the decision to increase the Commitment of a Lender to be within the sole and absolute discretion of such Lender), or any other Person reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent
19
ALLETE Credit Agreement
and the Issuing Banks to provide a new Commitment, by submitting to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks an Increase Supplement duly executed by the Borrower and each such Lender or other Person, as the case may be, together with such other documentation and deliveries as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably require (which may include copies of resolutions authorizing such increase and/or opinion of counsel). If such Increase Supplement is in all respects reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks, the Administrative Agent shall execute such Increase Supplement and the Administrative Agent shall deliver a copy thereof to the Borrower and each such Lender or other Person, as the case may be. Upon execution and delivery of such Increase Supplement by the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks, (i) in the case of each such Lender (an 
Increasing Lender
), its Commitment shall be increased to the amount set forth in such Increase Supplement, (ii) in the case of each such other Person (a 
New Lender
), such New Lender shall become a party hereto and have the rights and obligations of a Lender under the Loan Documents and its Commitment shall be as set forth in such Increase Supplement;
provided
that:
(A)
immediately after giving effect thereto, the sum of all increases (other than any increase in any Lender's Commitment in order to replace another Lender pursuant to
Section 3.8(b)
) in the aggregate Commitments made pursuant to this
Section 2.5(d)
shall not exceed the sum of (x) $50,000,000 plus (y) the amount of the Commitment of each Lender that becomes a Defaulting Lender;
(B)
each such increase of the aggregate Commitments shall be in an amount not less than $10,000,000 or a higher integral multiple of $5,000,000;
(C)
if Loans would be outstanding immediately after giving effect to any such increase, then simultaneously with such increase (1) each such Increasing Lender, each New Lender and each other Lender shall be deemed to have entered into an Assignment and Assumption, pursuant to which each such other Lender shall have assigned to each such Increasing Lender and each such New Lender a portion of its Commitment, Loans and LC Exposure necessary to reflect proportionately the Commitments as adjusted in accordance with this
clause (d)
, and (2) in connection with such assignment, each such Increasing Lender and each such New Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of each such other Lender, such amount as shall be necessary to reflect the assignment to it of Loans, and in connection with such master assignment each such other Lender may treat the assignment of Eurodollar Borrowings as a prepayment of such Eurodollar Borrowings for purposes of
Section 3.6
;
(D)
each such other Person shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower all forms, if any, that are required to be delivered by such other Person pursuant to
Section 3.7
; and
(E)
the Borrower shall have delivered to the Administrative Agent with sufficient copies for each Lender a certificate of a Financial Officer demonstrating pro forma compliance with the terms of this Agreement through the Maturity Date and the Administrative Agent shall have received such certificates and other items as it shall reasonably request in connection with such increase.
Section 2.6.    
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt
.
20
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(a)    The Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Loan on the Maturity Date.
(b)    Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the debt of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
(c)    The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Type thereof and the Interest Period, if any, applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
(d)    The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to
paragraph (b)
or
(c)
of this Section shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein,
provided
that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
(e)    Any Lender may request that its Loans be evidenced by a Note. In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a Note payable to the order of such Lender. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such Note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after any assignment pursuant to
Section 10.4
) be represented by a Note payable to the order of the payee named therein or any Eligible Assignee pursuant to
Section 10.4
, except to the extent that any such Lender or Eligible Assignee subsequently returns any such Note for cancellation and requests that such Loans once again be evidenced as described in
paragraphs (b)
and
(c)
above.
Section 2.7.    
Prepayment of Loans
.
(a)    
Voluntary Prepayments
. The Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to the requirements of this Section.
(b)    
Prepayments Resulting from the Reduction of the Total Commitments
. In the event of any partial reduction or termination of the Commitments, then (i) at or prior to the date of such reduction or termination, the Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the sum of the Credit Exposures after giving effect thereto and (ii) if such sum would exceed the total Commitments after giving effect to such reduction or termination, then the Borrower shall, on the date of such reduction or termination, prepay Borrowings in an amount sufficient to eliminate such excess.
(c)    
Notice of Prepayment; Application of Prepayments
. The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) of any prepayment hereunder, (i) in the case of a prepayment of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:30 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment or (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:30 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid,
provided
that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Commitments as contemplated by
21
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Section 2.5
, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with
Section 2.5
. Promptly following receipt of any such notice relating to a Borrowing, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing under
Section 2.7(a)
shall, when added to the amount of each concurrent reduction of the Commitments and prepayment of Borrowings under such Sections, be in an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 (or, if the outstanding principal balance of the Loans is less than such minimum amount, then such lesser outstanding principal balance, as the case may be). Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by
Section 3.1
. Notwithstanding any provision of this
Section 2.7(c)
to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the provisions of
Section 2.11
shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender.
Section 2.8.    
Extension of Maturity Date
.
The Borrower may, on one occasion during the term of this Agreement, request an extension of the Maturity Date for up to one additional one-year period by submitting a request for extension to the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly advise each Lender) (an 
Extension Request
) not more than 75 days nor less than 30 days prior to any anniversary of the date of the Effective Date (each an 
Anniversary Date
). In response to such request, each Lender shall, not later than 20 days prior to the applicable Anniversary Date, notify the Administrative Agent whether it is willing (in its sole and complete discretion) to extend the scheduled Maturity Date for an additional year (and any Lender that fails to give such notice to the Agent shall be deemed to have elected not to extend the scheduled Maturity Date). The Administrative Agent will notify the Borrower of the Lenders' decisions no later than 15 days prior to such Anniversary Date. If Lenders holding more than 50% of the Commitments elect to extend the scheduled Maturity Date, then on such Anniversary Date the Commitments of such Lenders shall be extended for an additional year;
provided
that (i) no Default exists on such Anniversary Date and (ii) all representations and warranties are true and correct on such Anniversary Date, as though made as of such Anniversary Date (or, if any such representation or warranty is expressly stated to have been made as of a specific date, as of such specific date). No Lender shall be required to consent to any Extension Request and any Lender that elects, or is deemed to have elected, not to extend the scheduled Maturity Date (a 
Declining Lender
) will have its Commitment terminated on the then existing scheduled Maturity Date (without regard to any extension by other Lenders). The Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to any Declining Lender and the Administrative Agent, require any Declining Lender to assign and delegate its rights and obligations under this Agreement to an Eligible Assignee selected by the Borrower and willing to accept such assignment (in accordance with, and subject to, the restrictions and consents otherwise required for assignments generally).
22
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Section 2.9.    
Letters of Credit
.
(a)    
General
. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may request the issuance of Letters of Credit denominated in dollars for its own account, in a form acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank, at any time and from time to time during the period from the Effective Date to the tenth Business Day preceding the last day of the Availability Period;
provided
that (i) the aggregate amount of the Credit Exposure of all Lenders shall not exceed the total Commitments and (ii) the aggregate amount of all LC Exposure shall not at any time exceed $10,000,000. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrower to, or entered into by the Borrower with, an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
(b)    
Notice of Issuance; Amendment; Renewal; Extension; Certain Conditions
. To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower shall hand deliver or facsimile (or transmit by electronic communication, pursuant to arrangements for doing so approved by the applicable Issuing Bank) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (not later than three Business Days before the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a Credit
Request requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with
paragraph (c)
of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If requested by an Issuing Bank, the Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on such Issuing Bank's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and, upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension, (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $10,000,000 and (ii) the total Credit Exposures shall not exceed the total Commitments.
(c)    
Expiration Date
. Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date that is one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension), and (ii) the date that is ten Business Days prior to the Maturity Date,
provided
that any Letter of Credit may provide for the automatic renewal thereof for any period (unless the applicable Issuing Bank elects not to extend) so long as such period ends (x) at least ten Business Days prior to the Maturity Date or (y) if the Borrower shall have deposited cash collateral with the Administrative Agent to the extent required by
Section 2.9(i)
for such Letter of Credit, not later than the first anniversary of the Maturity Date.
  
(d)    
Participations
. By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the applicable Issuing Bank or the Lenders, such Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Lender and each Lender hereby acquires from such Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each such Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of such Issuing Bank, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by such Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrower on the date due as provided in
paragraph (e)
of this Section,
23
ALLETE Credit Agreement
or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason. Each such Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever;
provided
that no Lender shall be obligated to make any payment to the Administrative Agent for any wrongful LC Disbursement made by an Issuing Bank as a result of acts or omissions constituting willful misconduct or gross negligence on the part of such Issuing Bank.
(e)    
Reimbursement
. If any Issuing Bank shall make an LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, then such Issuing Bank shall either (i) notify the Borrower to reimburse such Issuing Bank therefor, in which case the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement and any accrued interest thereon not later than 2:00 p.m. on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 11:00 a.m. on such date, or if such notice has not been received by the Borrower prior to such time on such date, then not later than 2:00 p.m. on the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower receives such notice,
provided
that, if the LC Disbursement is equal to or greater than $1,000,000, the Borrower may, subject to the conditions of borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with
Section 2.3
or this
Section 2.9
that such payment be financed with an ABR Borrowing in an equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrower's obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Borrowing, and/or (ii) notify the Administrative Agent that such Issuing Bank is requesting that the Lenders make an ABR Borrowing in an amount equal to such LC Disbursement and any accrued interest thereon, in which case (A) the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of such ABR Borrowing, and (B) each Lender shall, whether or not any Default shall have occurred and be continuing, any representation or warranty shall be accurate, any condition to the making of any Loan hereunder shall have been fulfilled, or any other matter whatsoever, make the Loan to be made by it under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders on (1) the Business Day that such Lender receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the day of receipt or (2) the Business Day immediately following the day that such Lender receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt. Such Loans shall, for all purposes hereof, be deemed to be an ABR Borrowing referred to in
Section 2.2(a)
and made pursuant to
Section 2.3
, and the Lenders obligations to make such Loans shall be absolute and unconditional. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the applicable Issuing Bank by promptly crediting or otherwise transferring the amounts so received, in like funds, to such Issuing Bank for the purpose of repaying in full the LC Disbursement and all accrued interest thereon.
(f)    
Obligations Absolute
. The Borrower's obligations to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in
paragraph (e)
of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or any Loan Document, or any term or provision therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent, insufficient or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by any Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, (iv) any amendment or waiver of or any
24
ALLETE Credit Agreement
consent to departure from all or any of the provisions of any Letter of Credit or any Loan Document, (v) the existence of any claim, setoff, defense or other right that the Borrower, any other party guaranteeing, or otherwise obligated with, such Borrower, any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof or any other Person may at any time have against the beneficiary under any Letter of Credit, any Credit Party or any other Person, whether in connection with this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other related or unrelated agreement or transaction, or (vi) any other act or omission to act or delay of any kind of any Credit Party or any other Person or any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrower's obligations hereunder. Neither any Credit Party nor any of their respective Related Parties shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of any Issuing Bank;
provided
that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse an Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrower to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrower to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrower that are caused by any Issuing Bank's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct on the part of any Issuing Bank (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), such Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, any Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
(g)    
Disbursement Procedures
. Each Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit. Each Issuing Bank shall promptly notify (which may include telephonic notice, promptly confirmed by facsimile) the Administrative Agent and the Borrower of such demand for payment and whether the Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder;
provided
that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
(h)    
Interim Interest
. If any Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate
per annum
then applicable to ABR Loans;
provided
that, if the Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to
paragraph (e)
of this Section, then
Section 3.1(b)
shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the applicable Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to
paragraph (e)
of this Section to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
25
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(i)    
Cash Collateral
. In the event that (i) an Event of Default shall occur and be continuing or (ii) any Letter of Credit has an expiry date on or after the tenth Business Day prior to the Maturity Date (or any LC Disbursements remain unreimbursed on or after such date), the Borrower shall deposit with the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds on the Business Day on which it receives notice from the Administrative Agent or Required Lenders demanding the deposit of cash collateral in the case of
clause (i)
, or on or before the tenth Business Day prior to the Maturity Date or such earlier date as shall be requested by the applicable Issuing Bank in the case of
clause (ii)
, an amount equal to the Required Deposit Amount, which amount shall be held by the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders as cash collateral pursuant to a cash collateral agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Banks to secure the Borrower's reimbursement obligations with respect to LC Disbursements; provided that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default described in
paragraph (i)
or
(j)
of
Article 8
. Such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account. Such deposit shall not bear interest, nor shall the Administrative Agent be under any obligation whatsoever to invest the same,
provided
that, at the request of the Borrower, such deposit shall be invested by the Administrative Agent in direct short term obligations of, or short term obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America, in each case maturing no later than the expiry date of the Letter of Credit giving rise to the relevant LC Exposure. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the applicable Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrower for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of Required Lenders), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived. If the Borrower is required to provide cash collateral hereunder as a result of
clause (ii)
of the first sentence of this paragraph, the amount thereof (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower when the LC Exposure is zero and all applicable Letters of Credit shall have been returned to the applicable Issuing Banks and shall have been cancelled.
(j)    Notwithstanding any provision of this
Section 2.9
to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the provisions of
Section 2.11
shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender.
Section 2.10.    
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Setoffs
.
(a)    The Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder or under any other Loan Document (whether of principal of Loans, LC Disbursements, interest or fees, or of amounts payable under
Sections 3.5
,
3.6
,
3.7
or
10.3
, or otherwise) prior to 1:00 p.m., New York City time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without setoff or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its office at 10 S. Dearborn, Chicago, Illinois, or such other office as to which the Administrative Agent may notify the
26
ALLETE Credit Agreement
other parties hereto, except that payments pursuant to
Sections 3.3(b)
(with respect to the fronting fee and other amounts payable to the Issuing Banks),
3.3(c)
,
3.5
,
3.6
,
3.7
and
10.3
shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment hereunder shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments hereunder shall be made in dollars.
(b)    Each Borrowing, each payment or prepayment of principal of any Borrowing, each payment of interest on the Loans, each payment of fees, each reduction of the Commitments and each conversion of any Borrowing to or continuation of any Borrowing as a Borrowing of any Type shall be allocated pro rata among the Lenders in accordance with their respective applicable Commitments (or, if such Commitments shall have expired or been terminated, in accordance with the respective principal amounts of their outstanding Loans). Each Lender agrees that in computing such Lender's portion of any Borrowing to be made hereunder, the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion, round each Lender's percentage of such Borrowing to the next higher or lower whole dollar amount. If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal of Loans, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest, fees and commissions then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest, fees and commissions then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest, fees and commissions then due to such parties and (ii) second, towards payment of principal of Loans and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal of Loans and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
(c)    If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of setoff or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of, or interest on, any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans and participations in LC Disbursements of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of, and accrued interest on, their respective Loans and participations in LC Disbursements,
provided
that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply). The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of setoff and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
(d)    Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of
27
ALLETE Credit Agreement
the applicable Credit Parties hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to such Credit Parties the amount due. In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each such Credit Party severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Credit Party with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
(e)    If any Credit Party shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to
Section 2.4(b)
or
2.10(d)
, then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), (i) apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Credit Party to satisfy such Credit Party's obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid and (ii) hold any such amounts in a segregated account as cash collateral for, and application to, any future funding obligations of such Lender under such Sections; in the case of each of (i) and (ii) above, in any order as determined by the Administrative Agent in its discretion. Notwithstanding any provision of this
Section 2.10
to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the provisions of
Section 2.11
shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender.
Section 2.11.    
Defaulting Lenders
. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
(a)    Fees pursuant to
Section 3.3(a)
shall cease to accrue on the unfunded portion of the Commitment of such Defaulting Lender.
(b)    If any LC Exposure exists at the time a Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender then:
(i)    All or any part of such LC Exposure shall be reallocated among the non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages but only to the extent (x) the sum of all non-Defaulting Lenders' Credit Exposures plus such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure does not exceed the total of all non-Defaulting Lenders' Commitments and (y) the conditions set forth in
Section 5.2
are satisfied at such time;
(ii)    If the reallocation described in
clause (i)
above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Borrower shall within two (2) Business Days following notice by the Administrative Agent cash collateralize such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure (after giving effect to any partial reallocation pursuant to
clause (i)
above) in accordance with the procedures set forth in
Section 2.9(i)
for so long as such LC Exposure is outstanding;
(iii)    If the Borrower cash collateralizes any portion of such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure pursuant to this
Section 2.11(b)
, the Borrower shall not be required to pay any fees to such Defaulting Lender pursuant to
Section 3.3(b)
with respect to such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure during the period such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is cash collateralized;
28
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(iv)    If the LC Exposure of the non-Defaulting Lenders is reallocated pursuant to this
Section 2.11(b)
, then the fees payable to the Lenders pursuant to
Sections 3.3(a)
and
3.3(b)
shall be adjusted in accordance with such non-Defaulting Lenders' Applicable Percentages;
(v)    If any Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure is neither cash collateralized nor reallocated pursuant to this
Section 2.11(b)
, then, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the Issuing Banks or any Lender hereunder, all letter of credit fees payable under
Section 3.3(b)
with respect to such Defaulting Lender's LC Exposure shall be payable to the applicable Issuing Banks until such LC Exposure is cash collateralized and/or reallocated; and
(vi)
If and so long as any Lender is a Defaulting Lender, no Issuing Bank shall be required to issue, amend or increase any Letter of Credit, unless it is satisfied that the related exposure will be 100% covered by the Commitments of the non-Defaulting Lenders or cash collateral will be provided by the Borrower in accordance with this
Section 2.11(b)
, and participating interests in any such newly issued or increased Letter of Credit shall be allocated among non-Defaulting Lenders in a manner consistent with
Section 2.11(b)(i)
(and Defaulting Lenders shall not participate therein).
(c)    The Commitments and Credit Exposure of such Defaulting Lender shall not be included in determining whether all Lenders or the Required Lenders have voted or taken or may take any action hereunder (including any consent to any amendment, modification or waiver pursuant to
Section 10.2
);
provided
that (i) any waiver, amendment or modification requiring the consent of all Lenders or each affected Lender which affects such Defaulting Lender differently than other affected Lenders shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender and (ii) any amendment or modification that increases, or extends the maturity of, such Defaulting Lender's Commitment or reduces the principal amount of, or rate of interest on, any Loan made by such Defaulting Lender, shall require the consent of such Defaulting Lender.
(d)    In the event that the Administrative Agent, the Borrower and each Issuing Bank agree that a Defaulting Lender has adequately remedied all matters that caused such Lender to be a Defaulting Lender, then the LC Exposure of the Lenders shall be readjusted to reflect the inclusion of such Lender's Commitments and on such date such Lender shall purchase at par such of the Loans of the other Lenders as the Administrative Agent shall determine may be necessary in order for such Lender to hold such Loans in accordance with its Applicable Percentage, and all cash collateral and accrued interest thereon held by the Administrative Agent or the applicable Issuing Banks shall be returned to the Borrower forthwith.
29
ALLETE Credit Agreement
ARTICLE 3.
INTEREST, FEES, YIELD PROTECTION, ETC.
Section 3.1.    
Interest
.
(a)    The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate
plus
the Applicable Margin. The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Margin.
(b)    Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan, any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate
per annum
equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraph of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2%
plus
the rate applicable to ABR Borrowings as provided in the preceding paragraph of this Section.
(c)    Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan,
provided
that (i) interest accrued pursuant to
paragraph (b)
of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan, accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment, and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
(d)    All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate, Adjusted LIBO Rate or LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent clearly demonstrable error. The Administrative Agent shall, as soon as practicable, notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the effective date and the amount of each change in the Prime Rate or ABR, but any failure to so notify shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to pay interest on the Loans in the amounts and on the dates required.
Section 3.2.    
Interest Elections Relating to Borrowings
.
(a)    Each Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Credit Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Credit Request. Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing.
30
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(b)    To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a signed Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent (or notify the Administrative Agent by telephone, to be promptly confirmed by delivery to the Administrative Agent of a signed Interest Election Request) by the time that a Credit Request would be required under
Section 2.3
if the Borrower were requesting a Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election.
(c)    Each such telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable (except as otherwise provided in
Section 3.4
) and shall specify the following information:
(i)    the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to
clauses (iii)
and
(iv)
of this paragraph shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
(ii)    the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
(iii)    whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
(iv)    if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period.
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.
(d)    Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
(e)    If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period, such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing, (i) no outstanding Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
Section 3.3.    
Fees
.
(a)The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender, a facility fee, which shall accrue at a rate
per annum
equal to the Applicable Margin on the daily amount of the Commitment of such Lender (regardless of usage) during the period from and including the date on which this Agreement becomes effective pursuant to
Section 10.6
to but excluding the date on which such Commitment terminates;
provided
that, if such Lender continues to have any Credit Exposure after its Commitment terminates, then such facility fee shall continue to
31
ALLETE Credit Agreement
accrue on the daily amount of such Lender's Credit Exposure from and including the date on which such Lender's Commitment terminates to but excluding the date on which such Lender ceases to have any Credit Exposure. Accrued facility fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year, each date on which the Commitments are permanently reduced and on the date on which the Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date,
provided
that all unpaid facility fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and
provided
further
that facility fees which accrue after the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. All facility fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
(b)    The Borrower agrees to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at a rate
per annum
equal to the Applicable Margin on the average daily amount of such Lender's LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure and (ii) to each Issuing Bank for its own account a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate or rates
per annum
separately agreed upon between the Borrower and each Issuing Bank on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as each Issuing Bank's standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder. Accrued participation fees and fronting fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date;
provided
that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to any Issuing Bank pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within ten days after demand. All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
(c)    The Borrower agrees to pay to each Credit Party, for its own account, fees and other amounts payable in the amounts and at the times separately agreed upon in writing between the Borrower and such Credit Party.
(d)    All fees and other amounts payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds. Fees and other amounts paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances other than clearly demonstrable error.
Section 3.4.    
Alternate Rate of Interest
. If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
(a)
the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period; or
32
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(b)    the Administrative Agent is advised by Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the LIBO Rate, as applicable, for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders by telephone (confirmed by facsimile) or facsimile as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing to, or continuation of any Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective, and (ii) if any Credit Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the Borrower shall have submitted a Credit Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing and the Administrative Agent shall have notified the Borrower in accordance with the preceding sentence that such Borrowing will be made as an ABR Borrowing, the Borrower shall have the right, prior to the time by which it would have had to submit a Credit Request for an ABR Borrowing to be made on the same date, to withdraw such Credit Request.
Section 3.5.    
Increased Costs; Illegality
.
(a)    If any Change in Law shall:
(i)    impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Credit Party (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate);
(ii)    subject any Lender or any Issuing Bank to any Tax of any kind whatsoever with respect to this Agreement, any Letter of Credit, any participation in a Letter of Credit or any Eurodollar Loan made by it, or change the basis of taxation of payments to such Lender or the Issuing Bank in respect thereof (except for indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes covered by
Section 3.7
and the imposition of, or any change in the rate of, any Tax on the Overall Net Income payable by such Lender or the Issuing Bank); or
(iii)    impose on any Credit Party or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement, any Eurodollar Loans made by such Credit Party or any participation therein or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Credit Party of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan or the cost to such Credit Party of issuing, participating in or maintaining any Letter of Credit hereunder or to increase the cost to such Credit Party or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Credit Party hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Borrower will pay to such Credit Party such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Credit Party for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
(b)    If any Credit Party determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Credit Party's capital or on the capital of such Credit Party's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made, the Letters of Credit issued or the participations therein held, by such Credit Party
33
ALLETE Credit Agreement
to a level below that which such Credit Party or such Credit Party's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Credit Party's policies and the policies of such Credit Party's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Credit Party such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Credit Party or such Credit Party's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
 
(c)    A certificate of a Credit Party setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Credit Party or its holding company, as applicable, as specified in
paragraph (a)
or
(b)
of this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive and binding upon all parties hereto absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Credit Party the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 Business Days after receipt thereof.
(d)    Failure or delay on the part of any Credit Party to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Credit Party's right to demand such compensation;
provided
that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Credit Party pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 180 days prior to the date that such Credit Party notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Credit Party's intention to claim compensation therefor; and
provided
further
that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 180 day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof but not to exceed a period of 365 days.
(e)    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, if, after the date hereof, any Change in Law shall make it unlawful for any Lender to make or maintain any Eurodollar Loan or to give effect to its obligations as contemplated hereby with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, then, by written notice to the Borrower and to the Administrative Agent:
(i)    such Lender may declare that Eurodollar Loans will not thereafter (for the duration of such unlawfulness) be made by such Lender hereunder (or be continued for additional Interest Periods) and ABR Loans will not thereafter (for such duration) be converted into Eurodollar Loans, whereupon any request for a Eurodollar Borrowing or to convert an ABR Borrowing to a Eurodollar Borrowing or to continue a Eurodollar Borrowing, as applicable, for an additional Interest Period shall, as to such Lender only, be deemed a request for an ABR Loan (or a request to continue an ABR Loan as such for an additional Interest Period or to convert a Eurodollar Loan into an ABR Loan, as applicable), unless such declaration shall be subsequently withdrawn; and
(ii)    such Lender may require that all outstanding Eurodollar Loans made by it be converted to ABR Loans, in which event all such Eurodollar Loans shall be automatically converted to ABR Loans, as of the effective date of such notice as provided in the last sentence of this paragraph.
In the event any Lender shall exercise its rights under
clause (i)
or
(ii)
of this paragraph, all payments and prepayments of principal that would otherwise have been applied to repay the Eurodollar Loans that would have been made by such Lender or the converted Eurodollar Loans of such Lender shall instead be applied to repay the ABR Loans made by such Lender in lieu of, or resulting from the conversion of, such Eurodollar Loans, as applicable. For purposes of this paragraph, a notice to the Borrower by any Lender shall be effective as to each Eurodollar Loan made by such Lender, if lawful,
34
ALLETE Credit Agreement
on the last day of the Interest Period currently applicable to such Eurodollar Loan; in all other cases such notice shall be effective on the date of receipt by the Borrower.
Section 3.6.    
Break Funding Payments
. In the event of (a) the payment or prepayment (voluntary or otherwise) of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Eurodollar Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under
Section 2.7(c)
and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period or maturity date applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to
Section 3.8
, then, in any such event, the Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest that would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest that would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate that such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the eurodollar market. A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 Business Days after receipt thereof.
Section 3.7.    
Taxes
.
(a)    
Payments to be Free and Clear
. Provided that all documentation, if any, then required to be delivered by any Lender or the Administrative Agent pursuant to
Section 3.7(c)
has been delivered, all sums payable by the Borrower under the Loan Documents shall be paid free and clear of and (except to the extent required by law) without any deduction or withholding on account of any Tax (other than a Tax on the Overall Net Income of any Lender (for which payment need not be free and clear, but no deduction or withholding shall be made unless then required by applicable law)) imposed, levied, collected, withheld or assessed by or within the United States or any political subdivision in or of the United States or any other jurisdiction from or to which a payment is made by or on behalf of the Borrower or by any federation or organization of which the United States or any such jurisdiction is a member at the time of payment.
(b)    
Grossing up of Payments
. If the Borrower or any other Person is required by law to make any deduction or withholding on account of any such Tax from any sum paid or payable by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent or any Lender under any of the Loan Documents:
(i)    the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent and such Lender of any such requirement or any change in any such requirement as soon as the Borrower becomes aware of it;
(ii)    the Borrower shall pay any such Tax before the date on which penalties attach thereto, such payment to be made (if the liability to pay is imposed on the Borrower) for its own account or (if that liability is imposed on the Administrative
35
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Agent or such Lender, as the case may be) on behalf of and in the name of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be;
(iii)    the sum payable by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent or a Lender in respect of which the relevant deduction, withholding or payment is required shall be increased to the extent necessary to ensure that, after the making of that deduction, withholding or payment, the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be, receives on the due date therefor a net sum equal to what it would have received had no such deduction, withholding or payment been required or made,
provided
that no amount shall be required to be paid to any Foreign Lender for any Tax imposed as a result of such Foreign Lender's failure to comply with the reporting requirements as set forth in Sections 1471 and 1472 of the Code (or regulation or administrative guidance promulgated thereunder) except to the extent that such compliance would cause a Foreign Lender to be in violation of any applicable law;
(iv)    within 30 days after paying any sum from which it is required by law to make any deduction or withholding, and within 30 days after the due date of payment of any Tax which it is required by
clause (ii)
above to pay, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender evidence satisfactory to the other affected parties of such deduction, withholding or payment and of the remittance thereof to the relevant Governmental Authority; and
(v)    
provided
that no additional amount shall be required to be paid to any Lender under
clause (iii)
above except to the extent that any change after the date hereof (in the case of each Lender listed on the signature pages hereof) or after the date of the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender became a Lender (in the case of each other Lender) if any such requirement for a deduction, withholding or payment as is mentioned therein shall result in an increase in the rate of such deduction, withholding or payment from that in effect at the date of this Agreement or at the date of such Assignment and Assumption, as the case may be, in respect of payments to such Lender, and
provided
further that any Lender claiming any additional amounts payable pursuant to this
Section 3.7
shall use reasonable efforts (consistent with its internal policy and legal and regulatory restrictions) to change the jurisdiction of its applicable lending office or take other appropriate action if the making of such a change or the taking of such action, as the case may be, would avoid the need for, or reduce the amount of, any such additional amounts that may thereafter accrue and would not, in the reasonable judgment of such Lender, be otherwise disadvantageous to such Lender.
(c)    
Tax Certificates
. Each Foreign Lender listed on the signature pages hereof shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), on or prior to the Effective Date (in the case of each Foreign Lender listed on the signature pages hereof) or on the effective date of the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which it becomes a Lender (in the case of each other Foreign Lender), and at such other times as may be necessary in the determination of the Borrower or the Administrative Agent (each in the reasonable exercise of its discretion), including upon the occurrence of any event requiring a change in the most recent counterpart of any form set forth below previously delivered by such Foreign Lender to the Borrower, such certificates, documents or other evidence, properly completed and duly executed by such Foreign Lender including (i) two accurate and complete original signed copies of Internal Revenue Service Form W8BEN or Form W8ECI, or successor applicable form and (ii) an Internal Revenue Service Form W-8 or W-9 (or any other
36
ALLETE Credit Agreement
certificate or statement of exemption required by Treasury Regulations Section 1.1441 4(a) or Section 1.1441 6(c) or any successor thereto) to establish that such Foreign Lender is not subject to deduction or withholding of United States federal income tax under Section 1441 or 1442 of the Code or otherwise (or under any comparable provisions of any successor statute) with respect to any payments to such Foreign Lender of principal, interest, fees or other amounts payable under any of the Loan Documents. The Borrower shall not be required to pay any additional amount to any such Foreign Lender under
Section 3.7(b)(iii)
if such Foreign Lender shall have failed to satisfy the requirements of the immediately preceding sentence;
provided
that if such Foreign Lender shall have satisfied such requirements on the Effective Date (in the case of each Foreign Lender listed on the signature pages hereof) or on the effective date of the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which it becomes a Lender (in the case of each other Foreign Lender), nothing in this Section shall relieve the Borrower of its obligation to pay any additional amounts pursuant to
Section 3.7(b)(iii)
in the event that, as a result of any change in applicable law, such Foreign Lender is no longer properly entitled to deliver certificates, documents or other evidence at a subsequent date establishing the fact that such Foreign Lender is not subject to withholding as described in the immediately preceding sentence.
(d)    
Other Taxes
.
(i)    The Borrower shall pay Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law; and
(ii)    the Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent and each Lender within 10 Business Days after written demand thereof, for the full amount of any Taxes (other than Taxes on the Overall Net Income) or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder (including Taxes, other than Taxes on the Overall Net Income, or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and (unless caused by the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such party) any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes, other than Taxes on the Overall Net Income, or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Government Authority. A certificate as to the amount such of payment or liability delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
(e)    
Tax Refunds
. If the Administrative Agent or Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this
Section 3.7
, it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this
Section 3.7
with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund);
provided
that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest, or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders agrees to cooperate with any reasonable request made by the Borrower in respect of a claim of a refund in respect of any Taxes paid by the Borrower or by such Lender for an
37
ALLETE Credit Agreement
on account of the Borrower if (i) the Borrower has agreed in writing to pay all of the Administrative Agent's or the Issuing Banks' or such Lender's reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses relating to such claim, (ii) the Administrative Agent or such Issuing Bank or such Lender determines, in its good faith judgment, that it would not be disadvantaged, unduly burdened or prejudiced as a result of such claim, and (iii) the Borrower furnishes, upon request of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender, an opinion of tax counsel (such opinion, which can be reasoned, and such counsel to be reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or such Lender) that the Borrower is likely to receive a refund or credit. This Section shall not be construed to require any Lender to make available its Tax returns (or any other information relating to its Taxes which it deems confidential) to either the Borrower or any other Person.
Section 3.8.    
Mitigation Obligations
.
(a)    
Designation of a Different Lending Office
.
In the event that the Borrower becomes obligated to pay additional amounts to any Lender (or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender) pursuant to
Section 3.5
,
Section 3.6
or
Section 3.7
, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, in the judgment of such Lender, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to
Section 3.5
,
Section 3.6
or
Section 3.7
, as the case may be, in the future, and (ii) would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
(b)    
Replacement of Lenders
. In the event that (i) the Borrower becomes obligated to pay additional amounts to any Lender (or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender) pursuant to
Section 3.5
,
Section 3.6
or
Section 3.7
, (ii) any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, or (iii) if any Lender has failed to consent to a proposed amendment, waiver, discharge or termination that under
Section 10.2
requires the consent of all the Lenders and with respect to which the Required Lenders shall have granted their consent, then the Borrower may, at its sole cost and expense, within 60 days of the demand by such Lender for such additional amounts or the relevant default or action by such Lender, as the case may be, and subject to and in accordance with the provisions of
Section 10.4
(with the Borrower obligated to pay any applicable processing and recordation fee), designate an Eligible Assignee (acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the Issuing Banks) to purchase and assume all of such Lender's interests, rights and obligations under the Loan Documents, without recourse to or warranty by or expense to, such Lender, for a purchase price equal to the outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Loans plus any accrued but unpaid interest thereon and accrued but unpaid facility fees and letter of credit fees in respect of such Lender's Commitment and any other amounts payable to such Lender hereunder, and to assume all the obligations of such Lender hereunder, and, upon such purchase, such Lender shall no longer be a party hereto or have any rights hereunder (except those that survive full repayment hereunder) and shall be relieved from all obligations to the Borrower hereunder, and the Eligible Assignee shall succeed to the rights and obligations of such Lender hereunder. No replacement of a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this
Section 3.8
shall be deemed to be a waiver of any right that the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks or any other Lender may have against such Defaulting Lender. The Borrower shall execute and deliver to such Eligible Assignee a Note. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, in the event that a Lender is replaced pursuant to this
Section 3.8
as a result of the Borrower becoming obligated to pay additional amounts to such Lender (or to any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender)
pursuant to
Section 3.5
,
Section 3.6
or
Section 3.7
, such
38
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Lender shall be entitled to receive such additional amounts as if it had not been so replaced, except as otherwise provided in
Section 2.10
if such Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender.
ARTICLE 4.
REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES
The Borrower represents and warrants to the Credit Parties that:
Section 4.1.    
Organization; Powers
. Each of the Borrower and each Subsidiary is duly organized or formed, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization or formation, has all requisite corporate power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Section 4.2.    
Authorization; Enforceability
. The Transactions are within the corporate powers of the Borrower and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, equity holder action. Each Loan Document has been duly executed and delivered by the Borrower and constitutes a legal, valid and binding obligation thereof, enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other similar laws affecting creditors' rights generally and general principles of equity.
Section 4.3.    
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts
.
(a)    The execution, delivery and performance by the Borrower of the Loan Documents and the borrowing of the Loans and the issuance of the Letters of Credit do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except for (i) information filings to be made in the ordinary course of business, which filings are not a condition to the Borrower's performance under the Loan Documents and (ii) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect and not subject to any appeals period.
(b)    The Transactions will not (i) violate the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of the Borrower, (ii) violate any applicable law or regulation or any order of any Governmental Authority, (iii) violate or result in a default under any material indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon the Borrower or its assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by the Borrower, and (iv) result in or require the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of the Borrower.
Section 4.4.    
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change
.
(a)    The Borrower has previously delivered to the Credit Parties copies of (i) its Form 10K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2010, containing the audited consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and the related audited consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows for the fiscal year ending December 31, 2010 (including with the applicable related notes and schedules, the 
Borrower Financial Statements
), and (ii) the unaudited consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and the related unaudited consolidated statements of income, equity and cash flows for the fiscal quarter ended September 30, 2011. All such financial statements have been prepared in accordance with GAAP and fairly present in all material respects the consolidated financial condition
39
ALLETE Credit Agreement
and results of the operations of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries as of the dates and for the periods indicated therein (subject, in the case of unaudited financial statements, to the absence of footnotes and to normal, year end audit adjustments).
(b)    Since December 31, 2010, there has been no Material Adverse Change.
 
Section 4.5.    
Litigation
.
(a)    There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of the Borrower, threatened in writing against or affecting the Borrower or any Subsidiary (a) that, if adversely determined (and provided that there exists a reasonable possibility of such adverse determination), would reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect, except for any Disclosed Matters, and except that the commencement by the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any Governmental Authority of a rate proceeding, fuel adjustment clause audit or earnings review before such Governmental Authority shall not constitute such a pending or threatened action, suit or proceeding unless and until such Governmental Authority has made a final determination thereunder that would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, or (b) that involve any Loan Document or the Transactions.
Section 4.6.    
Environmental Matters
. Except for the Disclosed Matters, the Borrower and its Subsidiaries (a) are in compliance with Environmental Law, (b) have received all permits, licenses or other approvals required of them under applicable Environmental Law to conduct their respective businesses and (c) are in compliance with all terms and conditions of any such permit, license, or approval, except, in each case, such as could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 4.7.    
Investment Company Status
. Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is an investment company or a company controlled by an investment company as defined in, or is otherwise subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Section 4.8.    
ERISA
. Each of the Borrower and each of its ERISA Affiliates is in compliance in all material respects with the applicable provisions of ERISA and the Code and the regulations and published interpretations thereunder except for any such failure that, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Section 4.9.    
Disclosure
. None of the reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary to any Credit Party in connection with the negotiation of, or delivered under any Loan Document when taken as a whole (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished, including the information contained in the Borrower's most recent annual report on Form 10-K and in Borrower's reports filed with the SEC under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 subsequent to the filing of the Form 10-K) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not materially misleading, provided that, to the extent any such reports, financial statements, certificates or other information was based upon or constitutes a forecast or a projection (including statements concerning future financial performance, ongoing business strategies or prospects or possible future actions, and other forward-
40
ALLETE Credit Agreement
looking statements), the Borrower represents only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
Section 4.10.    
Subsidiaries
. As of the date hereof, the Borrower has only the Subsidiaries set forth on
Schedule 4.10
.
Schedule 4.10
sets forth with respect to each Subsidiary, the identity of each Person that owns Equity Interests in such Subsidiary and the percentage of the issued and outstanding Equity Interests owned by each such Person. The shares of each Subsidiary (excluding any Immaterial Subsidiary) are duly authorized, validly issued, fully paid and non assessable and are owned free and clear of any Liens, other than Liens permitted pursuant to
Section 7.1
.
Section 4.11.    
Use of Proceeds; Federal Reserve Regulations
.
(a)    The proceeds of the Loans and the Letters of Credit will be used for general corporate purposes not inconsistent with the terms hereof, including liquidity support for the Borrower's commercial paper program.
 
(b)    Neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary is engaged principally, or as one of their important activities, in the business of extending credit for the purpose of buying or carrying Margin Stock. Immediately before and after giving effect to the making of each Loan and the issuance of each Letter of Credit, Margin Stock will constitute less than 25% of the Borrower's assets as determined in accordance with Regulation U.
(c)    No part of the proceeds of any Loan or any Letter of Credit will be used, whether directly or indirectly, and whether immediately, incidentally or ultimately, (i) to purchase, acquire or carry any Margin Stock (other than any purchase of Equity Interests in the Borrower so long as such Equity Interests are retired immediately upon the purchase thereof) or for any purpose that entails a violation of, or that is inconsistent with, the provisions of the regulations of the Board, including Regulation T, U or X or (ii) to fund a personal loan to or for the benefit of a director or executive officer of the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
ARTICLE 5.
CONDITIONS
Section 5.1.    
Effectiveness
. The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit hereunder are subject the satisfaction (or waived in accordance with
Section 10.2
) of the following conditions precedent:
(a)    
Credit Agreement
. The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from each party hereto either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include facsimile transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement.
(b)    
Notes
. The Administrative Agent shall have received any Note requested by a Lender pursuant to
Section 2.6
payable to the order of such requesting Lender.
(c)    
Legal Opinion
. The Administrative Agent shall have received favorable written opinions (addressed to the Credit Parties and dated on or prior to the Effective Date) from Deborah A. Amberg, Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of the Borrower, and
41
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Cohen Tauber Spievack & Wagner P.C., special counsel to the Borrower, covering such matters relating to the Borrower, the Loan Documents and the Transactions as the Required Lenders may reasonably request. The Borrower hereby requests such counsel to deliver such opinion.
(d)    
Organizational Documents, etc
. The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to (i) the organization, existence and good standing of the Borrower (including (x) a certificate of incorporation of the Borrower, certified as of a recent date by the Secretary of State of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, and (y) certificates of good standing (or comparable certificates) for the Borrower, certified as of a recent date prior to the Effective Date, by the Secretaries of State (or comparable official) of the jurisdiction of its incorporation and each other jurisdiction in which it is qualified to do business, (ii) the authorization of the Transactions, (iii) the incumbency of its officer or officers who may sign the Loan Documents, including therein a signature specimen of such officer or officers, and (iv) any other legal matters relating to the Borrower, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
(e)
Officer's Certificate
. The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, dated on or prior to the Effective Date and signed by the chief executive officer or the chief financial officer of the Borrower (or other Financial Officer acceptable to the Administrative Agent), confirming (i) the representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in the Loan Documents are true and correct and (ii) no Default exists.
(f)
No Material Adverse Change
. The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate of a Financial Officer, in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrate Agent, dated the Effective Date, to the effect that since December 31, 2010, no Material Adverse Change has occurred.
(g)
Miscellaneous
. Such other documents as any Lender or its counsel may have reasonably requested.
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Credit Parties when the conditions set forth above have been satisfied or waived, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.
Section 5.2.    
Each Credit Event
. The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of the Issuing Banks to issue, increase, amend, renew or extend a Letter of Credit, (each such event being called a 
Credit Event
) is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
(a)    The representations and warranties of the Borrower set forth in the Loan Documents (other than the representations and warranties in
Section 4.4(b)
,
Section 4.5
and
Section 4.6
of this Agreement) shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of such issuance, increase, amendment, renewal or extension, as applicable, except to the extent such representations and warranties specifically relate to an earlier date, in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct on and as of such earlier date.
(b)    At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or such issuance, increase, amendment, renewal or extension, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
42
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(c)    The Administrative Agent shall have received a Credit Request and such other documentation and assurances as shall be reasonably required by it in connection herewith.
(d)    Such Loan or Letter of Credit shall not be prohibited by any applicable law, rule or regulation.
Each Borrowing and each issuance, increase, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by the Borrower on the date thereof as to the matters specified in
paragraphs (a)
and
(b)
of this Section.
ARTICLE 6.
AFFIRMATIVE COVENANTS
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees and other amounts payable under the Loan Documents shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired and all LC Disbursements have been reimbursed, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Credit Parties that:
Section 6.1.    
Financial Statements and Other Information
. The Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
(a)    As soon as available, but in any event within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year, (i) a copy of the Borrower's Annual Report on Form 10K in respect of such fiscal year required to be filed by the Borrower with the SEC, together with the financial statements attached thereto, and (ii) the Borrower's audited consolidated balance sheet and related consolidated statements of income, stockholder's equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on by the Accountants (without a going concern or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial conditions and results of operations of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied during such fiscal year;
(b)    As soon as available, but in any event within 60 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year, (i) a copy of the Borrower's Quarterly Report on Form 10Q in respect of such fiscal quarter required to be filed by the Borrower with the SEC, together with the financial statements attached thereto, and (ii) the Borrower's unaudited consolidated balance sheet and related consolidated statements of income, stockholder's equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by a duly authorized Financial Officer as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial conditions and results of operations of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
(c)    Within 60 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters and within 120 days after the end of the last fiscal quarter, a Compliance Certificate, signed by a Financial Officer (or such other officer as shall be acceptable to the Administrative Agent) as to the Borrower's compliance, as of such fiscal quarter ending date, with
Section 7.5
, and as to the absence of any
43
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Default as of such fiscal quarter ending date and the date of such certificate (or if a Default existed or exists, the nature thereof); and
(d)    promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of the Loan Documents, as any Credit Party may reasonably request.
Section 6.2.    
Notices of Material Events
. The Borrower will furnish the following to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
(a)    prompt written notice of the occurrence of any Default, specifying the nature thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto;
(b)    promptly upon becoming available, copies of all (i) regular, periodic or special reports, schedules and other material which the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries may be required to file with or deliver to any securities exchange or the SEC, or any other Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof, and (ii) upon the written request of the Administrative Agent, reports that the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries sends to or files with the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the WPS, the MPUC or any Governmental Authority succeeding to the functions thereof, or any similar state or local Governmental Authority;
(c)    prompt written notice of (i) any material citation, summons, subpoena, order, notice, claim or proceeding received by, or brought against, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, with respect to (x) any proceeding before any Governmental Authority (other than proceedings in the ordinary course of business before the WPS or the MPUC), or (y) any real property under any Environmental Law, and (ii) any lapse or other termination of, or refusal to renew or extend, any material franchise or other authorization issued to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries by any Governmental Authority (other than in the ordinary course of business),
provided
that any of the foregoing set forth in this paragraph would, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; and
(d)    prompt written notice of any change by any Rating Agency in a Senior Debt Rating.
Each notice delivered under
Section 6.2(a)
or
(c)
shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of the Borrower setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
Documents required to be delivered pursuant to
Section 6.1(a)
or
(b)
or
Section 6.2(b)
or
(c)
(to the extent any such documents are included in materials otherwise filed with the SEC) may be delivered electronically and if so delivered, shall be deemed to have been delivered on the date (a) on which the Borrower posts such documents, or provides a link thereto, on the Borrower's website on the Internet at the website address listed in
Section 10.1
; or (b) on which such documents are posted on the Borrower's behalf on an Internet or intranet website, if any, to which each Lender and the Administrative have access (whether a commercial, thirdparty website or whether sponsored by the Administrative Agent),
provided
that: (i) the Borrower shall deliver paper copies of such documents to the Administrative Agent or any Lender that requests the Borrower to deliver such paper copies until a written request to cease delivering paper copies is given by the Administrative Agent or such Lender and (ii) the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent and each Lender (by facsimile or electronic mail) of the posting of any such documents and provide to the Administrative Agent by
44
ALLETE Credit Agreement
electronic mail electronic versions (
i.e.
, soft copies) of such documents. Except for such Compliance Certificates, the Administrative Agent shall have no obligation to request the delivery or to maintain copies of the documents referred to above, and in any event shall have no responsibility to monitor compliance by the Borrower with any such request for delivery, and each Lender shall be solely responsible for requesting delivery to it or maintaining its copies of such documents.
Section 6.3.    
Legal Existence
. Except as permitted under
Section 7.2
, the Borrower shall maintain its legal existence in good standing in the jurisdiction of its organization or formation and in each other jurisdiction in which the failure so to do would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, and cause each of the Subsidiaries to maintain its qualification to do business and good standing in each jurisdiction in which the failure so to do would reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect (it being understood that the foregoing shall not prohibit the Borrower from dissolving or terminating the existence of any Subsidiary that is inactive or whose preservation otherwise is no longer desirable in the conduct of the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries considered as a whole).
Section 6.4.    
Taxes
. The Borrower shall pay and discharge when due, and cause each of the Subsidiaries so to do, all Taxes imposed upon it or upon its property, which if unpaid would, individually or collectively, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect or become a Lien on the property of the Borrower or such Subsidiary (other than a Lien described in
clause (a)
of the definition of Permitted Encumbrances), as the case may be, unless and to the extent only that such Taxes shall be contested in good faith and by appropriate proceedings diligently conducted by the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be.
Section 6.5.    
Insurance
. The Borrower shall maintain, and cause each of its Subsidiaries to maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies insurance on all its property in at least such amounts and against at least such risks as are usually insured against in the same general area by companies engaged in the same or a similar business,
provided
that the Borrower and its Subsidiaries may self-insure to the same extent as other companies engaged in similar businesses and owning similar properties in the same general areas in which the Borrower or such Subsidiary operates and to the extent consistent with prudent business practice. The Borrower shall furnish to the Administrative Agent, upon written request of the Administrative Agent or any Lender, full information as to the insurance carried.
Section 6.6.    
Condition of Property
. The Borrower shall at all times maintain, protect and keep in good repair, working order and condition in all material respects (ordinary wear and tear excepted), and cause each of its Subsidiaries so to do, all material property necessary to the operation of the Borrower's or such Subsidiary's, as the case may be, material businesses,
provided
that nothing shall prevent the Borrower or its Subsidiaries, as appropriate, from discontinuing the maintenance or operation of any property if such discontinuance is, in the judgment of the Borrower or such Subsidiary, desirable in the conduct of the business of the Borrower or such Subsidiary. It is understood that this covenant relates only to working order and condition of such property in accordance with prudent industry practices and shall not be construed as a covenant not to dispose of property.
Section 6.7.    
Observance of Legal Requirements
. The Borrower shall observe and comply in all material respects, and cause each of its Subsidiaries so to do, with all laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority which now or at any time hereafter may be applicable to it, including ERISA and all Environmental Laws, a violation of which would individually or collectively
45
ALLETE Credit Agreement
reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect, except such thereof as shall be contested in good faith and, if applicable, by appropriate proceedings diligently conducted by it.
Section 6.8.    
Inspection of Property; Books and Records; Discussions
. The Borrower shall keep proper books of record and account in conformity with GAAP and all requirements of law. The Borrower shall permit representatives of the Administrative Agent and any Lender to visit its offices, to inspect any of its property (subject to reasonable procedures relating to safety and security) and examine and make copies or abstracts from any of its books and records at any reasonable time and as often as may reasonably be desired, and to discuss the business, operations, prospects, property and financial condition of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries with the officers thereof and the Accountants;
provided
that none of the Administrative Agent, its agents, its representatives or the Lenders shall be entitled to examine or make copies or abstracts of, or otherwise obtain information with respect to, the Borrower's records relating to pending or threatened litigation if any such disclosure by the Borrower would reasonably be expected (i) to give rise to a waiver of any attorney/client privilege of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries relating to such information or (ii) to be otherwise materially disadvantageous to the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries in the defense of such litigation; and
provided further
that in the case of any discussion with the Accountants, the Borrower shall have been given the opportunity to participate in such discussion and, unless a Default exists, the Lender or Lenders requesting such discussion shall pay any fees and expenses of the Accountant in connection therewith.
ARTICLE 7.
NEGATIVE COVENANTS
Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees and other amounts payable under the Loan Documents shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired and all LC Disbursements have been reimbursed, the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Credit Parties that:
Section 7.1.    
Liens
. The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or suffer to exist any Lien upon any of its property, whether now owned or hereafter acquired by it, except:
(a)    Liens now existing or hereafter arising in favor of the Administrative Agent or the Lenders under the Loan Documents;
(b)    Permitted Encumbrances;
(c)    any Lien existing on any property prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or existing on any property of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary or that is merged with or into or consolidated with the Borrower or any Subsidiary prior to such merger or consolidation,
provided
that (i) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary or such merger or consolidation, as the case may be, (ii) such Lien shall not apply to any other property of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (iii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations and liabilities that it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary of the Borrower or such merger or consolidation, as the case may be;
46
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(d)    Liens (including precautionary Liens in connection with Capital Lease Obligations) on fixed or capital assets and other property (including any natural gas, oil or other mineral assets, pollution control facilities, electrical generating plants, equipment and machinery, and related accounts, financial assets, contracts and general intangibles) acquired, constructed, explored, drilled, developed, improved, repaired or serviced (including in connection with the financing of working capital and ongoing maintenance) by the Borrower or any Subsidiary,
provided
that (i) such security interests and the obligations and liabilities secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 270 days after the acquisition of the relevant asset or the completion of the relevant construction, exploration, drilling, development, improvement, repair or servicing (including the relevant financing of working capital and ongoing maintenance), as the case may be, (ii) the obligations and liabilities secured thereby do not exceed the cost of acquiring, constructing, exploring, drilling, developing, improving, repairing or servicing (including the financing of working capital and ongoing maintenance in respect of) the relevant assets, and (iii) such security interests shall not apply to any other property beyond the relevant property set forth in this
paragraph (d)
(and in the case of construction or improvement, any theretofore unimproved real property on which the property so constructed or the improvement is located) and
paragraph (f)
, as applicable, of the Borrower or any Subsidiary;
(e)    Liens created under or in connection with the Mortgage;
(f)    Liens on any Equity Interest owned or otherwise held by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in any Person created as a special purpose, bankruptcy-remote Person for the sole and exclusive purpose of engaging in activities in connection with the owning and operating of property in connection with any project financing permitted to be secured under
paragraph (d)
;
(g)    Liens created to secure Indebtedness of any Subsidiary to the Borrower or to any other Subsidiary;
(h)
rights reserved to or vested in others to take or receive any part of any coal, ore, gas, oil and other minerals, any timber and/or any electric capacity or energy, gas, water, steam and any other product developed, produced, manufactured, generated, purchased or otherwise acquired by the Borrower or by others on property of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries,
provided
that no Lien described in this paragraph shall secure Indebtedness;
(i)
Liens created for the sole purpose of extending, renewing or replacing in whole or in part Indebtedness secured by any lien, mortgage or security interest referred to in the foregoing
paragraphs (a)
through
(h)
,
provided
that the principal amount of Indebtedness secured thereby shall not exceed the principal amount of Indebtedness so secured at the time of such extension, renewal or replacement and that such extension, renewal or replacement, as the case may be, shall be limited to all or a part of the property or indebtedness that secured the lien or mortgage so extended, renewed or replaced (and any improvements on such property);
(j)
Liens on cash or invested funds used to make a defeasance, covenant defeasance or in substance defeasance of any Indebtedness pursuant to an express contractual provision in the agreement governing such Indebtedness,
provided
that immediately before and immediately after giving effect to the making of such defeasance, no Default shall exist; and
(k)
any Lien, in addition to those described in the foregoing
paragraphs (a)
through
(j)
, securing obligations that, together with all other obligations secured pursuant to this
paragraph (k)
, do not exceed 10% of Consolidated Assets at the time of the incurrence thereof.
47
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Section 7.2.    
Merger; Consolidation
. The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary to consolidate with or merge into any other Person (other than a merger of a Subsidiary into, or a consolidation of a Subsidiary with, the Borrower or another Subsidiary), unless:
(a)
    
immediately before and after giving effect thereto no Default shall exist;
(b)
    
immediately before and after giving effect thereto, all of the representations and warranties contained in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct except as the context thereof otherwise requires and except for those representations and warranties which by their terms or by necessary implication are expressly limited to a state of facts existing at a time prior to such merger, consolidation or acquisition, as the case may be, or such other matters relating thereto as are identified in a writing to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and are satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders; and
(c)
    
in the case of a transaction involving the Borrower, either (i) the Borrower shall be the surviving entity thereof, or in the event the Borrower shall not be the surviving entity thereof, each of the following conditions shall be satisfied: (A) such surviving entity shall have been incorporated or otherwise formed in a State of the United States with substantially all of its assets and business located and conducted in the United States, (B) such surviving entity shall, immediately after giving effect to such transaction, have an Investment Grade Rating and (C) such surviving entity shall have expressly assumed the obligations of the Borrower under the Loan Documents pursuant to a writing in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent; and (ii) the Administrative Agent and the Lenders shall have received a certificate signed by a duly authorized officer of the Borrower identifying the Person to be merged with or into, or consolidated with, or acquired by, the Borrower, and certifying as to each of the matters set forth in
clauses (a), (b) and
(c)(i)
of this
Section 7.2
.
For purposes of Clause (c) above, 
Investment Grade Rating
 means a Senior Debt Rating from at least two Rating Agencies equal to (1) for any transaction where the surviving entity has a Senior Debt Rating, a rating for such surviving entity of BBB- or higher from S&P or Fitch or Baa3 or higher from Moody's and (2) for any transaction where the surviving entity is an indirect or direct holding company for a public utility that does not have a Senior Debt Rating, a rating for such surviving entity's primary utility Subsidiary of BBB- or higher from S&P or Fitch or Baa3 or higher from Moody's.
Section 7.3.    
Transactions with Affiliates
. The Borrower shall not, and shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of (including pursuant to a merger) any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire (including pursuant to a merger) any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except in the ordinary course of business at prices and on terms and conditions not less materially favorable to the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, than could be obtained on an arms length basis from unrelated third parties,
provided
that this Section shall not apply to (i) any transaction that is in compliance with applicable laws and regulations of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the WPS or the MPUC pertaining to affiliate transactions or is authorized by a tariff or rate schedule which has been approved by a Governmental Authority or performed in accordance with its orders, (ii) any transaction that is otherwise permitted under
Section 7.2
and (iv)
48
ALLETE Credit Agreement
transactions pursuant to any contract in effect on the date hereof, as the same may be amended, extended or replaced from time to time so long as such contract as so amended, extended or replaced is, taken as a whole, not materially less favorable to the Borrower and its Subsidiaries than under those contracts in effect on the date hereof.
Section 7.4.    
Permitted Hedge Agreements
. The Borrower shall not enter into any Hedge Agreements other than (a) Permitted Hedge Agreements and (b) transactions in futures, floors, collars and similar Hedge Agreements involving the stock price of a Person involved in a merger transaction permitted by
Section 7.2
.
Section 7.5.    
Financial Covenant
. The Borrower will not permit Total Indebtedness to be greater than 65% of Total Capitalization as of the end of any fiscal quarter.
ARTICLE 8.
EVENTS OF DEFAULT
If any of the following events (each an 
Event of Default
) shall occur:
(a)    the Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
(b)    the Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or on any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement or any fee, commission or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in
paragraph (a)
of this Article) payable under any Loan Document, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of five Business Days;
(c)    any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of the Borrower or any Subsidiary in or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification hereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
(d)    the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in
Section 6.3
(with respect to the Borrower's existence),
7.2
,
7.4
or
7.5
;
(e)    the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in
Section 7.1
or
Section 7.3
and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of ten days after the Borrower shall have obtained knowledge thereof.
(f)    the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in any Loan Document to which it is a party (other than those specified in
paragraph (a)
,
(b)
,
(d)
or
(e)
of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after the Borrower shall have obtained knowledge thereof;
49
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(g)    the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect to any Material Obligations, when and as the same shall become due and payable and after the expiration of any applicable grace period;
(h)    any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Obligations becoming due prior to their scheduled maturity or payment date, or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Obligations or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Obligations to become due prior to their scheduled maturity or payment date or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof prior to their scheduled maturity or payment date (in each case after giving effect to any applicable cure period), provided that this
paragraph (h)
shall not apply to (i) Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of a notice of voluntary prepayment or redemption delivered by the Borrower or a Subsidiary, (ii) secured Indebtedness that becomes due solely as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness, (iii) intercompany indebtedness or (iv) the exercise of any contractual right to cause the prepayment of any Material Obligations (other than the exercise of a remedy for an event of default under the applicable contract or agreement);
(i)    except for Immaterial Transactions and transactions expressly permitted by
Section 6.3
with respect to Subsidiaries, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall (i) suspend or discontinue its business, (ii) make an assignment for the benefit of creditors, (iii) generally not pay its debts as such debts become due, (iv) admit in writing its inability to pay its debts as they become due, (v) file a voluntary petition in bankruptcy, (vi) become insolvent (however such insolvency shall be evidenced), (vii) file any petition or answer seeking for itself any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment of debt, liquidation or dissolution or similar relief under any present or future statute, law or regulation of any jurisdiction, (viii) petition or apply to any tribunal for any receiver, custodian or any trustee for any substantial part of its property, (ix) be the subject of any such proceeding filed against it which remains undismissed for a period of 45 days, (x) file any answer admitting or not contesting the material allegations of any such petition filed against it or any order, judgment or decree approving such petition in any such proceeding, (xi) seek, approve, consent to, or acquiesce in any such proceeding, or in the appointment of any trustee, receiver, sequestrator, custodian, liquidator, or fiscal agent for it, or any substantial part of its property, or an order is entered appointing any such trustee, receiver, custodian, liquidator or fiscal agent and such order remains in effect for 45 days, or (xii) take any formal action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing or looking to the liquidation or dissolution of the Borrower or any Subsidiary;
(j)    except to the extent arising solely out of an Immaterial Transaction, an order for relief is entered under the United States bankruptcy laws or any other decree or order is entered by a court having jurisdiction (i) adjudging the Borrower or any Subsidiary bankrupt or insolvent, (ii) approving as properly filed a petition seeking reorganization, liquidation, arrangement, adjustment or composition of or in respect of Borrower or any Subsidiary under the United States bankruptcy laws or any other applicable Federal or state law, (iii) appointing a receiver, liquidator, assignee, trustee, custodian, sequestrator (or other similar official) of the Borrower or any Subsidiary of any substantial part of the property thereof, or (iv) ordering the winding up or liquidation (other than, in the case of a Subsidiary, voluntary liquidation, not under any bankruptcy, insolvency or similar law) of the affairs of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, and any such decree or order continues unstayed and in effect for a period of 45 days;
(k)    one or more judgments or decrees against the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries or any combination thereof aggregating in excess of $35,000,000, which judgment or
50
ALLETE Credit Agreement
decree (i) shall not be fully covered by insurance after taking into account any applicable deductibles and (ii) shall remain unpaid, unstayed on appeal, undischarged, unbonded or undismissed for a period of at least 30 consecutive days;
(l)
any Loan Document shall cease, for any reason, to be in full force and effect or the Borrower shall so assert in writing or shall disavow any of its obligations thereunder;
(m)
an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
(n)
any authorization or approval or other action by any Governmental Authority required for the execution, delivery or performance of any Loan Document shall be terminated, revoked or rescinded or shall otherwise no longer be in full force and effect;
(o)
a Change in Control shall occur; or
(p)
the Borrower shall fail to own, directly or indirectly, substantially all of the assets of Minnesota Power;
then, and in every such event (other than an event described in
paragraph (i)
or
(j)
of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower, take either or both of the following actions (whether before or after the Effective Date), at the same or different times: (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued under the Loan Documents, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; and in case of any event described in
paragraph (i)
or
(j)
of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate (whether before or after the Effective Date) and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued under the Loan Documents, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
ARTICLE 9.
THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT
Each Credit Party hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms hereof, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
The Person serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such Person and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend
51
ALLETE Credit Agreement
money to and generally engage in any kind of business with the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth herein. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (i) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (ii) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Credit Parties as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in
Section 10.2
), and (iii) except as expressly set forth herein, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the Person serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Credit Parties as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in
Section 10.2
) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by the Borrower or a Credit Party (and, promptly after its receipt of any such notice, it shall give each Credit Party and the Borrower notice thereof), and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (a) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (b) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered thereunder or in connection therewith, (c) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth therein, (d) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness thereof or any other agreement, instrument or other document or (e) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in
Article 5
or elsewhere herein, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub agents appointed by the Administrative Agent, provided that no such delegation shall serve as a release of the Administrative Agent or waiver by the Borrower of any rights hereunder. The Administrative Agent and any such sub agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub agent and to the Related Parties of the Administrative Agent and any such sub agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Credit Parties and
52
ALLETE Credit Agreement
the Borrower. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, with the consent of the Borrower (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld and not to be required during the existence of an Event of Default), to appoint a successor, which successor Administrative Agent shall be a commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States or any State thereof and having a combined capital, surplus, and undivided profits of at least $100,000,000. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Credit Parties, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor. After the Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and
Section 10.3
shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
Each Credit Party acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Credit Party and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Credit Party also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Credit Party and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon any Loan Document, any related agreement or any document furnished thereunder.
Anything herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Book Runner shall have no powers, duties or responsibilities under this Agreement or any of the other Loan Documents.
ARTICLE 10.
MISCELLANEOUS
Section 10.1.    
Notices
.
(i)
Notices Generally
. Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and except as provided in
paragraph (b)
below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by facsimile (or e-mail in accordance with
Section 10.1(b)
below) as follows:
(ii)
if to the Borrower, to it at 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota, Attention of: Donald W. Stellmaker, Treasurer, Phone: 218-723-3942, Fax: 218-723-3912, Email: dstellmaker@allete.com.
(iii)
if to the Administrative Agent,
53
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(A)
    
for Loans or Borrowings, to it at its Loan and Agency Services Group, 10 S. Dearborn Street, Floor 07, Chicago, Illinois, Attention of: Teresita Siao, Phone: 312-385-7051, Fax: 888-292-9533, Email: jpm.agency.servicing.4@jpmchase.com;
(B)
    
for Letters of Credit, to it at its Letter of Credit Agency Servicing Group, 10 S. Dearborn Street, Floor 07, Chicago, Illinois, Attention of: Susan Moy, Phone: 312-732-9636, Fax: 312-385-7107, Email: susan.w.moy@jpmchase.com;       
(C)
    
for credit related matters including compliance requirements pursuant to
Article 6
, to it at its Corporate Client Banking, 10 S. Dearborn Street, Floor 09, Chicago, Illinois, Attention of: John Zur, Phone: 312-732-1754, Fax: 312-732-1762, Email: john.e.zur@jpmorgan.com; and           
(iv)
if to any other Credit Party, to it at its address (or facsimile number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
Notices sent by hand or overnight courier service, or mailed by certified or registered mail, shall be deemed to have been given when received; notices sent by facsimile shall be deemed to have been given when sent (except that, if not given during normal business hours for the recipient, shall be deemed to have been given at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient). Notices delivered through electronic communications to the extent provided in
paragraph (b)
below, shall be effective as provided in such
paragraph (b)
.
(b)    
Electronic Communications
. Notices and other communications to the Credit Parties hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communication (including email and Internet or intranet websites) pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent,
provided
that the foregoing shall not apply to notices to any Credit Party pursuant to
Article 2
if such Credit Party has notified the Administrative Agent that it is incapable of receiving notices under such Article by electronic communication. The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it,
provided
that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
Unless the Administrative Agent otherwise prescribes, (i) notices and other communications sent to an email address shall be deemed received upon the sender's receipt of an acknowledgement from the intended recipient (such as by the return receipt requested function, as available, return email or other written acknowledgement),
provided
that if such notice or other communication is not sent during the normal business hours of the recipient, such notice or communication shall be deemed to have been sent at the opening of business on the next business day for the recipient, and (ii) notices or communications posted to an Internet or intranet website shall be deemed received upon the deemed receipt by the intended recipient at its email address as described in the foregoing
clause (i)
of notification that such notice or communication is available and identifying the website address therefor.
For purposes of
Section 6.2
, the Borrower's website is www.allete.com.
54
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(c)    
Change of Address, Etc.
Any party hereto may change its address or facsimile number or e-mail address for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.
Section 10.2.    
Waivers; Amendments
.
(a)    No failure or delay by any Credit Party in exercising any right or power under any Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Credit Parties under the Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by the Borrower therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by
paragraph (b)
of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan and/or the issuance, amendment, extension or renewal of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether any Credit Party may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
(b)    Neither any Loan Document nor any provision thereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Borrower and the Required Lenders or by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent with the consent of the Required Lenders,
provided
that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender or increase the Letter of Credit Commitment of any Issuing Bank without the consent of such Issuing Bank, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation with respect to a LC Disbursement, or reduce the rate of any interest, or reduce any fees, payable under the Loan Documents, without the written consent of each Credit Party affected thereby, (iii) postpone the date of payment at stated maturity of any Loan or the date of payment of any reimbursement obligation with respect to an LC Disbursement, or the date of any interest or any fees payable under the Loan Documents, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the stated termination or expiration of the Commitments without the written consent of each Credit Party affected thereby, (iv) change any provision hereof in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required by
Section 2.10(b)
or
2.10(c)
or the pro rata reduction of Commitments required by
Section 2.5(c)
, without the written consent of each Credit Party affected thereby, and (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of the term Required Lenders or any other provision hereof specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights hereunder or make any determination or grant any consent hereunder, or change the currency in which Loans are to be made, Letters of Credit are to be issued or payment under the Loan Documents is to be made, or add additional borrowers, without the written consent of each Lender, and
provided
further
that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent or the Issuing Banks hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent or such Issuing Banks, as applicable.
Section 10.3.    
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver
.
(a)    
Cost and Expenses
. The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable outofpocket costs and expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of each Loan Document or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions thereof (whether or not the
55
ALLETE Credit Agreement
transactions contemplated thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable outofpocket costs and expenses incurred by an Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all reasonable outofpocket costs and expenses incurred by any Credit Party, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Credit Party and any consultant or expert witness fees and expenses, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such reasonable outofpocket costs and expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
(b)    
Indemnification by the Borrower
. The Borrower shall indemnify each Credit Party and each Related Party thereof (each such Person being called an 
Indemnitee
) against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of any Loan Document or any agreement or instrument contemplated thereby, the performance by the parties to the Loan Documents of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated thereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof including any refusal of an Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit, (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property owned or operated by the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto,
provided
that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee or a breach in bad faith by such Indemnitee or arising solely from claims between or among one or more Indemnitees.
(c)    
Reimbursement by Lenders
. To the extent that the Borrower fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent or an Issuing Bank under
paragraph (a)
or
(b)
of this Section (and without limiting the Borrower's obligation to do so), each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent or such Issuing Bank, as applicable, an amount equal to the product of such unpaid amount
multiplied by
a fraction, the numerator of which is the sum of such Lender's unused Commitment
plus
the outstanding principal balance of such Lender's Loans and such Lender's LC Exposure and the denominator of which is the sum of the unused Commitments
plus
the outstanding principal balance of all Lenders Loans and the LC Exposure of all Lenders (in each case determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought or, in the event that no Lender shall have any unused Commitments, outstanding Loans or LC Exposure at such time, as of the last time at which any Lender had any unused Commitments, outstanding Loans or LC Exposure),
provided
that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as applicable, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent or an Issuing Bank, as applicable, in its capacity as such.
(d)    
Waiver of Consequential Damages, etc.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, the Borrower shall not assert, and hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct and
56
ALLETE Credit Agreement
actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, any Loan Document or any agreement, instrument or other document contemplated thereby, the Transactions or any Loan or any Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
(e)    
Payments
. All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly but in no event later than ten days after written demand therefor.
Section 10.4.    
Successors and Assigns
.
(a)    
Successors and Assigns Generally
. The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, except that the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent and each Lender, and no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder except (i) to an Eligible Assignee in accordance with the provisions of
paragraph (b)
of this Section, (ii) by way of participation in accordance with the provisions of
paragraph (d)
of this Section or (iii) by way of pledge or assignment of a security interest subject to the restrictions of
paragraph (f)
of this Section (and any other attempted assignment or transfer by any party hereto shall be null and void). Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, Participants to the extent provided in
paragraph (d)
of this Section and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each Credit Party) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
(b)    
Assignments by Lenders
. Any Lender may (and if demanded by Borrower pursuant to
Section 3.8
shall to the extent required thereby) at any time assign to one or more Eligible Assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitments and the Loans and obligations in respect of its LC Exposure at the time owing to it);
provided
that any such assignment shall be subject to the following conditions:
(i)    
Minimum Amounts
.
(A)
In the case of an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitments and the Loans and obligations in respect of its LC Exposure at the time owing to it or in the case of an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund, no minimum amount need be assigned; and
(B)
In any case not described in
paragraph (b)(i)(A)
of this Section, the aggregate amount of the Commitment (which for this purpose includes Loans outstanding thereunder) or, if the Commitment is not then in effect, the principal outstanding balance of the Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent or, if trade date is specified in the Assignment and Assumption, as of the trade date) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Administrative Agent and, so long as no Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower otherwise consents (each such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed).
57
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(ii)    
Proportionate Amounts
. Each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement with respect to the Loan or the Commitment assigned.
(iii)    
Required Consents
. For each such assignment:
(A)    the consent of the Borrower (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) shall be required unless (x) an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of such assignment or (y) such assignment is to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender or an Approved Fund;
provided
that the Borrower shall be deemed to have consented to any such assignment unless it shall object thereto by written notice to the Administrative Agent within five Business Days after having received notice thereof;
(B)    the consent of the Administrative Agent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for assignments in respect of an unfunded or revolving facility if such assignment is to an Eligible Assignee that is not a Lender with a Commitment in respect of such facility, an Affiliate of such Lender or an Approved Fund with respect to such Lender; and
(C)
the consent of the applicable Issuing Banks (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed) shall be required for any assignment that increases the obligation of the assignee to participate in exposure under one or more Letters of Credit (whether or not then outstanding).
(iv)    
Assignment and Assumption
. The parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500, and the Eligible Assignee, if it is not a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire.
(v)
No Assignment to Borrower
. No such assignment shall be made to the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Affiliates or Subsidiaries.
(vi)
No Assignment to Natural Persons
. No such assignment shall be made to a natural person.
Subject to acceptance and recording thereof by the Administrative Agent pursuant to
paragraph (c)
of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption, the Eligible Assignee thereunder shall be a party to this Agreement and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto) but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of
Sections 3.5
,
3.6
,
3.7
and
10.3
with respect to facts and circumstances occurring prior to the effective date of such assignment. Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this paragraph shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with
paragraph (d)
of this Section.
58
ALLETE Credit Agreement
(c)    
Register
. The Administrative Agent, acting solely for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices in New York, New York a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitments of, and principal amounts of the Loans owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the 
Register
). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
(d)    
Participations
. Any Lender may at any time, without the consent of, but with notice to, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent (
provided
that any failure to give such notice shall not impair the effectiveness of such participation except as expressly provided in
paragraph (e)
of this Section), sell participations to any Person (other than a natural person or the Borrower or any of the Borrower's Affiliates or Subsidiaries) (each, a 
Participant
) in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and/or obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and/or the Loans owing to it);
provided
that (i) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (ii) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations, (iii) such Lender shall remain the holder of any Note for all purposes of this Agreement and (iv) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and each Credit Party shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event may a participation be granted to any entity which is not a commercial bank, finance company, insurance company or other financial institution or fund (whether a corporation, partnership or other entity) engaged generally in making, purchasing or otherwise investing in commercial loans in the ordinary course of its business without the express prior written consent of the Borrower.
Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement;
provided
that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver with respect to the following matters described in
clauses (ii)
and
(iii)
of the first proviso in
Section 10.2(b)
that directly affects such Participant. Subject to
paragraph (e)
of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of
Sections 3.5
,
3.6
and
3.7
to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to
paragraph (b)
of this Section but (x) shall not be entitled to recover greater amounts under any such Section than the selling Lender would be entitled to recover and (y) shall be subject to replacement by the Borrower under
Section 3.8
to the same extent as if it were a Lender;
provided
that such replacement Participant shall be a commercial bank, finance company, insurance company or other financial institution or fund (whether a corporation, partnership or other entity) engaged generally in making, purchasing or otherwise investing in commercial loans in the ordinary course of its business. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of
Section 10.8
as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to
Section 2.10(c)
as though it were a Lender.
Each Lender that sells a participating interest in any Loan or other interest to a Participant shall, as agent of the Borrower solely for the purpose of this
Section 10.4
,  record in book entries maintained by such Lender the name and the amount of the participating interest of each Participant entitled to receive payments in respect of such participating interests;
provided
that no
59
ALLETE Credit Agreement
Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of such participant register to the Borrower or any other Person (other than the identity of any Participant pursuant to the first paragraph of this
clause (d)
, but including any information relating to a Participant's interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement) except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that the Loans are in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations.
(e)    
Limitations upon Participant Rights
. A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under
Sections 3.5
or
3.7
than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower's prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of
Section 3.7
unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with
Section 3.7(c)
as though it were a Lender.
(f)    
Certain Pledges
. Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank;
provided
that no such pledge or assignment shall release such Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
(g)    Notwithstanding any provision in this
Section 10.4
to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the provisions of
Section 2.11
shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender.
Section 10.5.    
Survival
. All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Borrower herein and in the certificates or other instruments prepared or delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of any Loan Document and the making of any Loans and the issuance of any Letter of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that any Credit Party may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any LC Disbursement or any fee or any other amount payable under the Loan Documents is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of
Sections 3.5
,
3.6
,
3.7
,
10.3
,
10.9
,
10.10
and
Article 9
shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans and the LC Disbursements, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the termination of the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Section 10.6.    
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness
. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which, when taken together, shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to any Credit Party or the syndication of the credit facility established hereunder constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. Except as provided in
Section 5.1
, this Agreement shall become effective as of the date set forth in the preamble to this Agreement when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received
60
ALLETE Credit Agreement
counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. Delivery of an executed counterpart of this Agreement by facsimile transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Section 10.7.    
Severability
. In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Agreement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction). The parties shall endeavor in good faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
Section 10.8.    
Right of Set-off
. If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, and the acceleration of the obligations owing in connection with the Loan Documents, or at any time upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default under
paragraph (a)
of
Article 8
, each of the Lenders and their respective Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, to setoff and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by it to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against any of and all the obligations of the Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents held by it, irrespective of whether or not it shall have made any demand therefor and although such obligations may be unmatured. The rights of each of the Lenders and their respective Affiliates under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) that it may have. Each Lender agrees promptly to notify the Borrower and the Administrative Agent after any such set off and application made by such Lender,
provided
that the failure to give such notice shall not affect the validity of such set off and application.
Section 10.9.    
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process
.
(a)    This Agreement shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the laws of the State of New York.
(b)    The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York City, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State court or, to the extent permitted by applicable law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent or any other Credit Party may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents against the Borrower, or any of its property, in the courts of any jurisdiction.
(c)    The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the
61
ALLETE Credit Agreement
laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents in any court referred to in
paragraph (b)
of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
(d)    The Borrower irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in
Section 10.1
. Nothing in this Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
Section 10.10.    
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL
. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR RELATING TO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS CREDIT AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS TO WHICH IT IS A PARTY BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
Section 10.11.    
Headings
. Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Section 10.12.    
Interest Rate Limitation
. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan or LC Disbursement, together with all fees, charges and other amounts that are treated as interest thereon under applicable law, shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the 
Maximum Rate
) that may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding an interest in such Loan or LC Disbursement in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan or LC Disbursement hereunder, together with all of the charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and the charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan or LC Disbursement but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated, and the interest and the charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or LC Disbursements or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
Section 10.13.    
Advertisement
. The Borrower hereby authorizes JPMorgan Chase or any Affiliate thereof to publish the name of the Borrower and the amount of the financing evidenced hereby in any tombstone or comparable advertisement that JPMorgan Chase or such Affiliate elects to publish. In addition, the Borrower agrees that JPMorgan Chase or any Affiliates thereof may provide lending industry trade organizations with information necessary and customary for inclusion in league table measurements after the date hereof.
Section 10.14.    
USA Patriot Act Notice
. Each Lender that is subject to the Patriot Act (as hereinafter defined) and the Administrative Agent (for itself and not on behalf of any Lender) hereby
62
ALLETE Credit Agreement
notifies the Borrower that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 10756 (signed into law October 26, 2001)) (the 
Patriot Act
), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies the Borrower, which information includes the name and address of the Borrower and other information that will allow such Lender or the Administrative Agent, as applicable, to identify the Borrower in accordance with the Patriot Act.
Section 10.15.    
Treatment of Certain Information
. Each Credit Party agrees to use reasonable precautions to keep confidential, in accordance with its customary procedures for handling confidential information of the same nature, all confidential, proprietary or nonpublic information supplied by the Borrower or any Subsidiary pursuant to this Agreement relating to the Borrower, such Subsidiary or their respective businesses, including, without limitation, any financial statement, financial projections or forecasts, budget, Compliance Certificate, audit report, management letter or accountants' certification delivered hereunder (
Information
), provided that nothing herein shall limit the disclosure of any information (a) to any of its respective Related Parties that needs to know such information, (b) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, or requested by any bank regulatory authority, (c) on a confidential basis, to any bona fide or potential assignee or participant in connection with the contemplated assignment or participation of any Loans or any participations therein or by any direct or indirect contractual counterparties (or the professional advisors thereto) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations (provided such assignees, participants, counterparties and advisors are advised of and agree to be bound by either the provisions of this
Section 10.15
or other provisions at least as restrictive as this
Section 10.15
), (d) to auditors, accountants, consultants and advisors, and any analogous counterpart thereof, (e) to any other Credit Party, (f) in connection with any litigation to which any one or more of the Credit Parties is a party, (g) to the extent such information (A) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Agreement, (B) becomes available to any of the Credit Parties on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than the Borrower or any of its Affiliates or (C) was available to the Credit Parties on a nonconfidential basis prior to its disclosure to any of them by the Borrower or any of its Affiliates; and (h) to the extent the Borrower shall have consented to such disclosure in writing.
Section 10.16.    
No Fiduciary Duty
. The Administrative Agent, each Lender and their Affiliates (collectively, solely for purposes of this paragraph, the Lenders), may have economic interests that conflict with those of the Borrower, their stockholders and/or their affiliates.  The Borrower agrees that nothing in the Loan Documents or otherwise will be deemed to create an advisory, fiduciary or agency relationship or fiduciary or other implied duty between any Lender, on the one hand, and such Borrower, its stockholders or its affiliates, on the other. The Borrower acknowledges and agrees that (i) the transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents (including the exercise of rights and remedies hereunder and thereunder) are arm's-length commercial transactions between the Lenders, on the one hand, and the Borrower, on the other, and (ii) in connection therewith and with the process leading thereto, (x) no Lender has assumed an advisory or fiduciary responsibility in favor of the Borrower, its stockholders or its affiliates with respect to the transactions contemplated hereby (or the exercise of rights or remedies with respect thereto) or the process leading thereto (irrespective of whether any Lender has advised, is currently advising or will advise the Borrower, its stockholders or its Affiliates on other matters) or any other obligation to the Borrower except the obligations expressly set forth in the Loan Documents and (y) each Lender is acting solely as principal and not as the agent or fiduciary of the Borrower, its management, stockholders, creditors or any other Person. The Borrower acknowledges and agrees that it has consulted its own legal and financial advisors to the extent it deemed appropriate and that it is responsible for making its own independent judgment with respect to such transactions and the process leading thereto. The Borrower agrees that it will not claim that any Lender has rendered advisory services of any nature or respect, or owes a
63
ALLETE Credit Agreement
fiduciary or similar duty to the Borrower, in connection with such transaction or the process leading thereto.
[Signature pages follow]
    
64
ALLETE Credit Agreement
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Credit Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
ALLETE, INC., as Borrower
By:
    _
/s/ Mark A. Schober
_________________        
Name:
    
_Mark A. Schober
_____________    
Title:
    
_Sr. VP and Chief Financial Officer
_____    
S-1            ALLETE Credit Agreement
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as a Lender, as an Issuing Bank, and as Administrative Agent
By:
    _
/s/ John E. Zur
________________    
Name:
    
John E. Zur
Title:
    
Authorized Officer
S-2            ALLETE Credit Agreement
ROYAL BANK OF CANADA, as a Lender
By:
    _
/s/ Thomas Casey
______________    
Name:
    
Thomas Casey
Title:
    
_Authorized Signatory
____________    
S-3            ALLETE Credit Agreement
U.S. BANK NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as a Lender
By:
    __
/s/ Paul R. Morrison
_____________    
Name:
    _
Paul R. Morrison
________________    
Title:
    
_Senior Vice President
_____________    
S-4            ALLETE Credit Agreement
WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as a Lender
By:
    _
/s/ Keith Luettel
________________    
Name:
    _
Keith Luettel
__________________    
Title:
    
_Vice President
_________________    
S-5            ALLETE Credit Agreement
SCHEDULE 1
APPLICABLE MARGIN
The Applicable Margin for Eurodollar Borrowings, ABR Borrowings, Letter of Credit fees and facility fees shall be determined in accordance with the table below based on the then-current Senior Debt Ratings. The Senior Debt Ratings in effect on any date for the purposes of this Schedule are those in effect at the close of business on such date.
(a)
    
If each Rating Agency issues a Senior Debt Rating, the applicable Senior Debt Rating shall be (i) if two of such Senior Debt Ratings are the same, such Senior Debt Ratings; and (ii) if all such Senior Debt Ratings are different, the middle of such Senior Debt Ratings.
(b)
    
If only two Rating Agencies issue a Senior Debt Rating, the applicable Senior Debt Rating shall be the higher of such Senior Debt Ratings;
provided
that if a split of greater than one ratings category occurs between such Senior Debt Ratings, the applicable Senior Debt Rating shall be the ratings category that is one category below the higher of such Senior Debt Ratings.
(c)
    
If only one Rating Agency issues a Senior Debt Rating, the applicable Senior Debt Rating shall be such Senior Debt Rating.
(d)
    
If no Rating Agency issues a Senior Debt Rating, Pricing Level V shall apply.
SCHEDULE 2.1
LIST OF COMMITMENTS
Schedule 2.1        ALLETE Credit Agreement
SCHEDULE 4.5/4.6
DISCLOSED MATTERS
None.
Schedule 4.5/4.6        ALLETE Credit Agreement
SCHEDULE 4.10
LIST OF SUBSIDIARIES
ALLETE Automotive Services, LLC
ALLETE Capital II
ALLETE Capital III
ALLETE Properties, LLC
ALLETE Commercial, LLC
Cape Coral Holdings, Inc.
Lake Swamp, LLC
Lehigh Acquisition Corporation
Florida Landmark Communities, LLC
Lehigh Corporation
Mardem, LLC
Palm Coast Holdings, Inc.
Port Orange Holdings, LLC
Interlachen Lakes Estates, LLC
Palm Coast Land, LLC
Tomoka Holdings, LLC
ALLETE Water Services, Inc.
Florida Water Services Corporation
Energy Replacement Property, LLC
Energy Land, Incorporated
Lakeview Financial Corporation I
Lakeview Financial Corporation II
Logistics Coal, LLC
Minnesota Power Enterprises, Inc.
ALLETE Clean Energy, Inc.
ALLETE Renewable Resources, Inc.
BNI Coal, Ltd.
MP Affiliate Resources, Inc.
Rainy River Energy Corporation
Rainy River Energy Corporation - Wisconsin
Synertec, Incorporated
Upper Minnesota Properties, Inc.
Upper Minnesota Properties - Development, Inc.
Upper Minnesota Properties - Irving, Inc.
Upper Minnesota Properties - Meadowlands, Inc.
MP Investments, Inc.
RendField Land Company, Inc.
Superior Water, Light and Power Company
Schedule 4.10        ALLETE Credit Agreement
EXHIBIT A
FORM OF ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION
This Assignment and Assumption (the 
Assignment and Assumption
) is dated as of the Effective Date set forth below and is entered into by and between [the] [each]
1
Assignor identified in item 1 below ([the][each, an] 
Assignor
) and [the][each]
2
Assignee identified in item 2 below ([the][each, an] 
Assignee
). [It is understood and agreed that the rights and obligations of [the Assignors][the Assignees]
3
hereunder are several and not joint.]
4
Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Credit Agreement identified below (as amended, modified or otherwise supplemented from time to time, the 
Credit Agreement
), receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged by [the][each] Assignee. The standard Terms and Conditions set forth in
Annex 1
attached hereto are hereby agreed to and incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Assignment and Assumption as if set forth herein in full.
For an agreed consideration, the Assignor hereby irrevocably sells and assigns to the Assignee, and the Assignee hereby irrevocably purchases and assumes from the Assignor, subject to and in accordance with the Standard Terms and Conditions and the Credit Agreement, as of the Effective Date inserted by the Administrative Agent as contemplated below, all of the Assignor's rights and obligations in its capacity as a Lender under the Credit Agreement and any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto that represents the amount and percentage interest identified below of all of the Assignor's outstanding rights and obligations under the respective facilities identified below (including without limitation any letters of credit included in such facilities and, to the extent permitted to be assigned under applicable law, all claims (including without limitation contract claims, tort claims, malpractice claims, statutory claims and all other claims at law or in equity), suits, causes of action and any other right of the Assignor against any Person whether known or unknown arising under or in connection with the Credit Agreement, any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto or the loan transactions governed thereby) other than claims for indemnification or reimbursement with respect to any period prior to Effective Date (the 
Assigned Interest
). Such sale and assignment is without recourse to the Assignor and, except as expressly provided in this Assignment and Assumption, without representation or warranty by the Assignor.
________________________
1
For bracketed language here and elsewhere in this form relating to the Assignor(s), if the assignment is from a single Assignor, choose the first bracketed language. If the assignment is from multiple Assignors, choose the second bracketed language.
2
For bracketed language here and elsewhere in this form relating to the Assignee(s), if the assignment is to a single Assignee, choose the first bracketed language. If the assignment is to multiple Assignees, choose the second bracketed language.
3
Select as appropriate.
4
Include bracketed language if there are either multiple Assignors or multiple Assignees.
 
            
Exhibit A-
1
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
 
                        
6.
    
Assigned Interest:
Effective Date: ____________________, 20__ [TO BE INSERTED BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND WHICH SHALL BE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF RECORDATION OF TRANSFER BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT.
]
The terms set forth in this Assignment and Assumption are hereby agreed to:
ASSIGNOR
[
NAME OF ASSIGNOR
]
By:
Title:
ASSIGNEE
[
NAME OF ASSIGNEE
]
By:
Title:
__________________________
5
List each Assignor, as appropriate.
6
List each Assignee, as appropriate.
7
Amount to be adjusted by the counterparties to take into account any payments or prepayments made between the Trade Date and the Effective Date.
8
Set forth, to at least 9 decimals, as a percentage of the Commitment/Loans of all Lenders thereunder.
9
Insert if satisfaction of minimum amounts is to be determined as of the Trade Date.
Exhibit A-
2
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
[Consented to and] [a]
10
[A]ccepted:
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent
By:
Title:
[Consented to:]
 
11
[NAME OF RELEVANT PARTY]
By:
Title:
_______________________
10
To be added only if the consent of the Administrative Agent is required by the terms of the Credit Agreement.
11
To be added only if the consent of the Borrower and/or other parties (e.g. LC Issuer) is required by the terms of the Credit Agreement.
                        
Exhibit A-
3
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
ANNEX 1
TERMS AND CONDITIONS FOR
ASSIGNMENT AND ASSUMPTION
1.
Representations and Warranties
.
1.1
Assignor
. The Assignor (a) represents and warrants that (i) it is the legal and beneficial owner of the Assigned Interest, (ii) the Assigned Interest is free and clear of any lien, encumbrance or other adverse claim and (iii) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby; and (b) assumes no responsibility with respect to (i) any statements, warranties or representations made in or in connection with the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document, (ii) the execution, legality, validity, enforceability, genuineness, sufficiency or value of the Loan Documents or any collateral thereunder, (iii) the financial condition of the Borrower, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person obligated in respect of any Loan Document or (iv) the performance or observance by the Borrower, any of its Subsidiaries or Affiliates or any other Person of any of their respective obligations under any Loan Document.
1.2.
Assignee
. The Assignee (a) represents and warrants that (i) it has full power and authority, and has taken all action necessary, to execute and deliver this Assignment and Assumption and to consummate the transactions contemplated hereby and to become a Lender under the Credit Agreement, (ii) it satisfies the requirements specified in the Credit Agreement that are required to be satisfied by it in order to acquire the Assigned Interest and become a Lender, (iii) from and after the Effective Date, it shall be bound by the provisions of the Credit Agreement as a Lender thereunder and, to the extent of the Assigned Interest, shall have the obligations of a Lender thereunder, (iv) it is sophisticated with respect to decisions to acquire assets of the type represented by the Assigned Interest and either it, or the person exercising discretion in making its decision to acquire the Assigned Interest, is experienced in acquiring assets of such type, (v) it has received a copy of the Credit Agreement, together with copies of the most recent financial statements delivered pursuant to
Section 6.1
thereof, as applicable, and such other documents and information as it has deemed appropriate to make its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Assignment and Assumption and to purchase the Assigned Interest on the basis of which it has made such analysis and decision independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent or any other Lender, and (vi) if it is a Foreign Lender, attached to the Assignment and Assumption is any documentation required to be delivered by it pursuant to the terms of the Credit Agreement, duly completed and executed by the Assignee; and (b) agrees that (i) it will, independently and without reliance on the Administrative Agent, the Assignor or any other Lender, and based on such documents and information as it shall deem appropriate at the time, continue to make its own credit decisions in taking or not taking action under the Loan Documents, and (ii) it will perform in accordance with their terms all of the obligations which by the terms of the Loan Documents are required to be performed by it as a Lender.
2.
Payments
. From and after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall make all payments in respect of the Assigned Interest (including payments of principal, interest, fees and other amounts) to the Assignor for amounts which have accrued to but excluding the Effective Date and to the Assignee for amounts which have accrued from and after the Effective Date. The Assignor and Assignee shall make all appropriate adjustments in payments by the Administrative Agent for periods prior to the Effective Date or with respect to the making of this assignment directly between themselves.
3.
General Provisions
. This Assignment and Assumption shall be binding upon, and inure to the benefit of, the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. This Assignment and Assumption may be executed in any number of counterparts, which together shall constitute one
Exhibit A-
4
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
instrument. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Assignment and Assumption by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Assignment and Assumption. This Assignment and Assumption shall be governed by, and construed in accordance with, the law of the State of New York.
Exhibit A-
5
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
EXHIBIT B
FORM OF CREDIT REQUEST
[Date]
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent
10 S. Dearborn, Floor 07
Chicago, IL 60603
Attention: Teresita Siao
Ladies/Gentlemen:
Please refer to the Credit Agreement dated as of February 1, 2012 among ALLETE, Inc. (the 
Borrower
), the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (in such capacity, the 
Administrative Agent
) (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the 
Credit Agreement
). Capitalized terms used herein that are defined in the Credit Agreement shall have the meanings therein defined.
1.
    
Pursuant to Section 2.3(a) of the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby gives notice of its intention to borrow Borrowings in an aggregate principal amount of $ ________on ______ __, 20__ (the 
Borrowing Date
), which Borrowing(s) shall consist of the following Types:
2.
    
Pursuant to Sections 2.9 and 5.2 of the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby requests that [Insert name of Issuing Bank] [issue, amend, renew or extend] Letter(s) of Credit on ______ __, 20__, in accordance with the information annexed hereto (attach additional sheets if necessary).
3.
    
The Borrower hereby certifies that on the date hereof and on the Borrowing Date set forth above, and after giving effect to the Loans and Letters of Credit requested hereby, there exists and shall exist no Default and each of the representations and warranties contained in each Loan Document (other than the representations and warranties in Sections 4.4(b), 4.5 and 4.6 of the Credit Agreement) is and shall be true and correct in all material respects, except to the extent such representations and warranties specifically relate to an earlier date, in which case such representations and warranties were true and correct at such earlier date.
4.
    
The location and number of the Borrower's account to which funds are to be disbursed is as follows: [Insert Wire Instructions]
                    
Exhibit B-
1
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Borrower has caused this Credit Request to be executed by its authorized signatory as of the date and year first written above.
ALLETE, INC.
By:
Name:
Title:
Exhibit B-
2
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
EXHIBIT C
FORM OF NOTE
____________, 2012
FOR VALUE RECEIVED, the undersigned, ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the 
Borrower
), hereby promises to pay to the order of [INSERT LENDER NAME] (the 
Lender
) the unpaid principal amount of the Loans made by the Lender to the Borrower, in the amounts and at the times set forth in the Credit Agreement dated as of February 1, 2012 among the Borrower, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the 
Credit Agreement
), and to pay interest from the date hereof on the principal balance of such Loans from time to time outstanding at the rate or rates and at the times set forth in the Credit Agreement, in each case at the office of the Administrative Agent located at Ten South Dearborn Street, Chicago, Illinois, or at such other place as the Administrative Agent may specify from time to time, in lawful money of the United States in immediately available funds. Terms not otherwise defined herein but defined in the Credit Agreement are used herein with the same meanings.
The Loans evidenced by this Note are prepayable in the amounts, and under the circumstances, and their respective maturities are subject to acceleration upon the terms, set forth in the Credit Agreement. This Note is subject to, and shall be construed in accordance with, the provisions of the Credit Agreement and is entitled to the benefits and security set forth in the Loan Documents.
The Lender is hereby authorized to record on the Schedule annexed hereto, and any continuation sheets which the Lender may attach hereto, (i) the date of each Loan made by the Lender to the Borrower, (ii) the Type and amount thereof, (iii) the interest rate (without regard to the Applicable Margin) and Interest Period applicable to each Eurodollar Loan and (iv) the date and amount of each conversion of, and each payment or prepayment of the principal of, any such Loan. The entries made on such Schedule shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded thereon, provided that the failure to so record or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement.
Except as specifically otherwise provided in the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby waives presentment, demand, notice of dishonor, protest, notice of protest and all other demands, protests and notices in connection with the execution, delivery, performance, collection and enforcement of this Note.
Whenever in this Note either party hereto is referred to, such reference shall be deemed to include the successors and assigns of such party. The Borrower shall not have the right to assign its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein (and any such attempted assignment shall be void), except as expressly permitted by the Loan Documents. No failure or delay of the Lender in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. Neither this Note nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified, nor shall any departure therefrom be consented to, except pursuant to a written agreement entered into between the Borrower and the Lender with respect to which such waiver, amendment,
    
Exhibit C-
1
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
modification or consent is to apply, subject to any consent required in accordance with Section 10.2 of the Credit Agreement.
THIS NOTE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 10.1 of the Credit Agreement.
The Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York City, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Note or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State court or, to the extent permitted by applicable law, in such Federal court. The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Note shall affect any right that the Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Note or the other Loan Documents against the Borrower, or any of its property, in the courts of any jurisdiction.
The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Note or the other Loan Documents in any court referred to in the preceding paragraph hereof. The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
The Borrower, and by accepting this Note, the Lender, irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices herein. Nothing herein will affect the right of the Lender to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
THE BORROWER, AND BY ACCEPTING THIS NOTE, THE LENDER, EACH HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR RELATING TO THIS NOTE. THE BORROWER (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF THE LENDER HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH LENDER WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT SUCH LENDER HAS BEEN INDUCED TO ACCEPT THIS NOTE AND ENTER INTO THE LOAN DOCUMENTS TO WHICH IT IS A PARTY BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS PARAGRAPH.
Exhibit C-
2
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
                        
ALLETE, INC.
By:
    
Name:
    
Title:
    
Exhibit C-
3
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
                        
SCHEDULE TO NOTE
Exhibit C-
4
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
EXHIBIT D
FORM OF COMPLIANCE CERTIFICATE
I, ______________, do hereby certify that I am the ______________ of ALLETE, Inc. (the 
Borrower
), and that, as such, I am duly authorized to execute and deliver this Compliance Certificate on the Borrower's behalf pursuant to Section 6.1(c) of the Credit Agreement dated as of February 1, 2012 among the Borrower, the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the 
Credit Agreement
). Capitalized terms used herein which are not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement.
I hereby certify that:
1.
    
To the best of my knowledge, all financial statements delivered herewith have been prepared in accordance with GAAP. There have been no changes in GAAP pertinent to the Borrower or in the application thereof to Borrower and that affects the computation of any financial covenant set forth in Section 7.5 of the Credit Agreement, since the date of the audited financial statements referred to in Section 4.4(a) of the Credit Agreement,
[, except as follows:
12
]
2.
    
There existed no Default on the last day of the fiscal quarter ended _________, 20__, and there exists no Default as of the date hereof [, except as follows
13
]
3.
    
Attached are true and correct calculations demonstrating compliance with Section 7.5 of the Credit Agreement as of the fiscal quarter ended _________, 20__.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have executed this Compliance Certificate on this ___ day of ________________, 20__.
 
______________________________________________
12
Specify each such change and the effect thereof on the financial statements accompanying this Compliance Certificate as set forth in Section 1.4 of the Credit Agreement.
13
Specify all such violations, conditions and events, the nature and status thereof and any actions taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
Exhibit D-
1
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
Section 7.5
Ratio of Total Indebtedness to Total Capitalization
14
__________________________
14
Each of the computations is based on the Borrower and its Subsidiaries determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Exhibit D-
2
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
EXHIBIT E
FORM OF INCREASE SUPPLEMENT
INCREASE SUPPLEMENT, dated as of __________________, 20__ to the Credit Agreement, dated as February 1, 2012, among ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the 
Borrower
), the Lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent (the Administrative Agent) (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the 
Credit Agreement
). Capitalized terms used herein that are defined in the Credit Agreement shall have the meanings therein defined.
1.
    
Pursuant to Section 2.5(d) of the Credit Agreement, the Borrower hereby proposes to increase (the 
Increase
) the aggregate Commitments from $________________ to $________________.
2.
    
Each of the following Lenders (each an 
Increasing Lender
) has been invited by the Borrower, and has agreed, subject to the terms hereof, to increase its Commitment as follows:
3.
    
Each of the following Persons (each a 
Proposed Lender
) has been invited by the Borrower, and has agreed, subject to the terms hereof, to become a Lender under the Credit Agreement with a Commitment in the amount set forth below:
4.
    
The Borrower hereby represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent, each Lender and each such Person that immediately before and after giving effect to the Increase, (a) no Default exists or would exist under the Loan Documents and (b) the reps and warranties of the Borrower set forth in the Loan Documents are true and correct on the date hereof except to the extent such reps and warranties specifically relate to an earlier date.
5.
    
Pursuant to Section 2.5(d) of the Credit Agreement, by execution and delivery of this Increase Supplement, together with the satisfaction of all of the requirements set forth in clauses (i) through (v) of such Section 2.5(d) (the date of such satisfaction being the 
Increase Effective Date
), (i) each of the Increasing Lenders shall have, on and as of the Increase Effective Date of the Increase, a Commitment equal to the amount set forth above next to its name, and (ii) each such Proposed Lender as of the Increase Effective Date shall be deemed to be a Lender under, and as such term is defined in, the Credit Agreement, and shall have a Commitment equal to the amount set forth above next to its name.
Exhibit E-
1
    ALLETE Credit Agreement
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Increase Supplement to be duly executed and delivered by their proper and duly authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
ALLETE, INC.
By:
    
Name:
    
Title:
    
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent
By:
    
Name:
    
Title:
    
[INCREASING LENDER]
By:
    
Name:
    
Title:
    
[PROPOSED LENDER]
By:
    
Name:
    
Title:
    
Exhibit E-
2
    ALLETE Credit Agreement


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20120217131836.txt.gz
TIME:20120217131836
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
February 17, 2012 (February 17, 2012)
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 1 - OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
A copy of the legal opinion delivered with respect to the registration for re-sale of shares of common stock of ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) issued in connection with the Company's previously-disclosed contribution of such stock to its pension plan on December 15, 2011 is attached as Exhibit 5 to this Current Report on Form 8K.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETE's disclosures under the heading: Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
    
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 17, 2012
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 26 of our 2011 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 17, 2012
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated February 17, 2012

Exhibit 5
February 17, 2012
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to (1) Registration Statement No. 333-170289 on Form S-3 (the Registration Statement) as filed by ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) on November 2, 2010, with the Securities and Exchange Commission (Commission) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (Securities Act), for the registration of an unspecified amount of (a) shares of the Company's Common Stock, without par value (Common Stock) and (b) one or more new series of the Company's first mortgage bonds and (2) the Prospectus, dated November 2, 2010 (the Prospectus), as supplemented by the Prospectus Supplement, dated February 17, 2012 (the Prospectus Supplement), relating to the sale by the selling shareholder named therein of 507,614 shares (the Shares) of Common Stock delivered to the selling shareholder by the Company on December 15, 2011.
I (or attorneys in the Company's legal department with whom I have consulted) have participated in the preparation of (a) the Registration Statement, (b) the Prospectus, and (c) the Prospectus Supplement.
In furnishing this opinion, I have examined the Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation, as amended (the Charter), and the Bylaws, as amended (Bylaws), of the Company, and have made such further investigation and examined such further documents and records of the Company and certificates of public officials as I have deemed necessary or appropriate for purposes of this opinion. I have also reviewed all corporate proceedings taken by the Company in respect of the issuance of the Shares.
Based upon the foregoing, I am of the opinion that the Shares are validly issued, fully paid and non-assessable.
I am a member of the Minnesota Bar and this opinion is limited to the laws of the State of Minnesota and the federal laws of the United States.
I hereby consent to the reference to me in the Prospectus and Prospectus Supplement under the caption Legal Opinions and to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K to be filed by the Company on or about February 17, 2012, which will be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement. In giving the foregoing consents, I do not thereby admit that I come within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act or the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.
Sincerely,
/s/ Deborah A. Amberg
Deborah A. Amberg


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20120221172640.txt.gz
TIME:20120221172640
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K/A
(Amendment No. 1)
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
February 21, 2012
(February 1, 2012)
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K/A filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
EXPLANATORY NOTE
This Current Report on Form 8-K/A constitutes Amendment No. 1 (the "Amendment") to ALLETE, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K which was originally filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on February 6, 2012. This amendment is being filed to correct the date on the signature page.
SECTION 1 - REGISTRANT'S BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION
On February 1, 2012, ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) entered into a new $150 million credit agreement with JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as Administrative Agent, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC as Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Book Runner, and the several lenders party thereto (Credit Agreement). As of February 1, 2012, the Company had availability under this facility of $150 million.
The Credit Agreement is unsecured and has a maturity date of January 31, 2014, which may be extended for a one-year period. Advances may be used by ALLETE for general corporate purposes, to provide liquidity in support of ALLETE's commercial paper program and to issue up to $10 million in letters of credit.
ALLETE has the option to borrow funds under the Credit Agreement at an interest rate equal to the Eurodollar rate plus a margin of 0.90% to 1.475%, or an alternate base rate. In addition, ALLETE will pay annual facility fees ranging from 0.10% to 0.275%. Such interest rates and annual fees are based on ALLETE's then-current senior unsecured credit ratings.
The Credit Agreement contains customary conditions of borrowing, customary events of default and customary affirmative and negative covenants. The Credit Agreement includes only one financial covenant to maintain a ratio of Total Indebtedness to Total Capitalization (as defined in the Credit Agreement) equal to or less than 65%. Indebtedness under the Credit Agreement may be accelerated upon the occurrence of an event of default, including cross-default to other indebtedness in excess of $35 million.
A copy of the Credit Agreement was filed as Exhibit 10 to the Form 8-K filed on February 6, 2012 and is incorporated by reference herein. The description of the Credit Agreement above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the full text of the Credit Agreement.
SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETE's disclosures under the heading: Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K/A.
ALLETE Form 8-K/A Dated
February 21, 2012
1
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K/A, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 26 of our 2011 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K/A and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K/A Dated
February 21, 2012
2
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE Form 8-K/A Dated
February 21, 2012
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20120301113746.txt.gz
TIME:20120301113746
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
March 1, 2012
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS
Minnesota Power's taconite customers nominate minimum demand levels for their energy needs each December, March, and August for following four-month periods. Based on nominations received on March 1, 2012, Minnesota Power's taconite customers are expected to operate at
100 per
cent of their full demand levels for May through August, 2012, compared t
o 100 p
ercent during the same period a year ago, and
100 p
ercent for the January through April, 2012 period.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETE's disclosures under the heading: SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995 located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 1, 2012
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 26 of our 2011 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 1, 2012
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 1, 2012


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20120511080639.txt.gz
TIME:20120511080639
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
May 11, 2012 (May 8, 2012)
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 5 - CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) held its 2012 annual meeting of shareholders on May 8, 2012. Each matter voted upon at the meeting and the final results of the voting on each such matter are presented below. For a complete description of the matters voted upon at the annual meeting, see the Company's definitive proxy statement, dated March 20, 2012.
Item 1 - Election of eleven (11) Directors.
All nominees for director were elected by the following votes.
Item 2 - Approval of advisory resolution on executive compensation.
The advisory vote on executive compensation was approved.
Item 3 - Approval of an Amendment to the ALLETE and Affiliated Companies Employee Stock Purchase Plan to Increase the Number of Shares of Common Stock Authorized for Issuance Under the Plan.
The advisory vote on the amendment to increase the number of shares for issuance under the plan was approved.
Item 4 - Ratification of the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for 2012.
The selection of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for 2012 was ratified.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETE's disclosures under the heading: Forward-Looking Statements" located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 11, 2012
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 26 of our 2011 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 11, 2012
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated May 11, 2012


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20120702160258.txt.gz
TIME:20120702160258
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
July 2, 2012
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION
On July 2, 2012, ALLETE, Inc. (the "Company") issued and sold $160 million principal amount of the Company's First Mortgage Bonds (the "Bonds"). The Bonds were sold in reliance on an exemption from registration under Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, to certain institutional accredited investors in the private placement market. The Bonds were issued in two series as follows:
The terms of the Bonds were established in the Supplemental Indenture, dated as of July 1, 2012 (the "Supplemental Indenture"), between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon, as corporate trustee, and Ming Ryan, as co-trustee, to the Company's utility mortgage. Interest on the Bonds is payable semi-annually on January 15 and July 15 of each year, commencing on January 15, 2013. The Company has the option to prepay all or a portion of the 3.20 percent Bonds at its discretion at any time prior to January 15, 2026, subject to a make-whole provision, and at any time on or after January 15, 2026, at par, including, in each case, accrued and unpaid interest. The Company has the option to prepay all or a portion of the 4.08 percent Bonds at its discretion at any time prior to January 15, 2042, subject to a make-whole provision, and at any time on or after January 15, 2042, at par, including, in each case, accrued and unpaid interest. The Bonds are subject to additional terms and conditions of the Company's utility mortgage. The Company will apply the proceeds from the sale of the Bonds to finance utility capital expenditures, redeem outstanding indebtedness, and/or for general corporate purposes.
The description set forth above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Supplemental Indenture which is attached hereto as Exhibit 4 and is incorporated by reference herein.
SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
Exhibit Number
    
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with the Company's disclosures under the heading Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE Form 8-K date
d July 2, 2012
1
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 26 of our 2011 Form 10K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Current Report on Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K date
d July 2, 2012
2
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc.
ALLETE Form 8-K date
d July 2, 2012
3

Exhibit 4
ALLETE, Inc.
(formerly Minnesota Power & Light Company
and formerly Minnesota Power, Inc.)
TO
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON
(formerly The Bank of New York
(formerly Irving Trust Company))
AND
MING RYAN
(successor to Richard H. West, J. A. Austin, E. J. McCabe,
D. W. May, J. A. Vaughan, W. T. Cunningham and Douglas J. MacInnes)
Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture
Providing, among other things, for
First Mortgage Bonds, 3.20% Series due July 15, 2026
(Forty-third Series),
and
First Mortgage Bonds, 4.08% Series due July 15, 2042
(Forty-fourth Series)
Dated as of
July 1, 2012
1
THIRTY-THIRD SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE
THIS INDENTURE,
dated as of July 1, 2012, by and between ALLETE, Inc. (formerly Minnesota Power & Light Company and formerly Minnesota Power, Inc.), a corporation of the State of Minnesota, whose post office address is 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 (hereinafter sometimes called the Company), and The Bank of New York Mellon (formerly The Bank of New York (formerly Irving Trust Company)), a corporation of the State of New York, whose post office address is 101 Barclay Street, New York, New York 10286 (hereinafter sometimes called the Corporate Trustee), and Ming Ryan (successor to Richard H. West, J. A. Austin, E. J. McCabe, D. W. May, J. A. Vaughan, W. T. Cunningham and Douglas J. MacInnes), whose post office address is c/o The Bank of New York Mellon, 101 Barclay Street, New York, New York 10286 (said Ming Ryan being hereinafter sometimes called the Co-Trustee and the Corporate Trustee and the Co-Trustee being hereinafter together sometimes called the Trustees), as Trustees under the Mortgage and Deed of Trust, dated as of September 1, 1945, between the Company and Irving Trust Company and Richard H. West (Ming Ryan, successor Co-Trustee), as Trustees, securing bonds issued and to be issued as provided therein (hereinafter sometimes called the Mortgage), reference to which Mortgage is hereby made, this indenture (hereinafter sometimes called the Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture) being supplemental thereto:
WHEREAS, the Mortgage was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of October 16, 1957, was executed and delivered under which J. A. Austin succeeded Richard H. West as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of April 4, 1967, was executed and delivered under which E. J. McCabe in turn succeeded J. A. Austin as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, under the Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1, 1975, to which reference is hereinafter made, D. W. May in turn succeeded E. J. McCabe as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of June 25, 1984, was executed and delivered under which J. A. Vaughan in turn succeeded D. W. May as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of July 27, 1988, was executed and delivered under which W. T. Cunningham in turn succeeded J. A. Vaughan as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, on May 12, 1998, the Company filed Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation with the Secretary of State of the State of Minnesota changing its name from Minnesota Power & Light Company to Minnesota Power, Inc. effective May 27, 1998; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of April 15, 1999, was executed and delivered under which Douglas J. MacInnes in turn succeeded W. T. Cunningham as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
2
WHEREAS, on May 8, 2001, the Company filed Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation with the Secretary of State of the State of Minnesota changing its name from Minnesota Power, Inc. to ALLETE, Inc.; and
WHEREAS, under the Thirty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1, 2010, to which reference is hereinafter made, Ming Ryan in turn succeeded Douglas J. MacInnes as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage; and
WHEREAS, by the Mortgage the Company covenanted, among other things, that it would execute and deliver such supplemental indenture or indentures and such further instruments and do such further acts as might be necessary or proper to carry out more effectually the purposes of the Mortgage and to make subject to the lien of the Mortgage any property thereafter acquired and intended to be subject to the lien thereof; and
WHEREAS, for said purposes, among others, the Company executed and delivered the following indentures supplemental to the Mortgage:
3
which supplemental indentures were filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, the Company has heretofore issued, in accordance with the provisions of the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, the following series of First Mortgage Bonds:
4
which bonds are also hereinafter sometimes called bonds of the First through Forty-second Series, respectively; and
WHEREAS, Section 8 of the Mortgage provides that the form of each series of bonds (other than the First Series) issued thereunder and of coupons to be attached to coupon bonds of such series shall be established by Resolution of the Board of Directors of the Company and that the form of such series, as established by said Board of Directors, shall specify the descriptive title of the bonds and various other terms thereof, and may also contain such provisions not inconsistent with the provisions of the Mortgage as the Board of Directors may, in its discretion, cause to be inserted therein expressing or referring to the terms and conditions upon which such bonds are to be issued and/or secured under the Mortgage; and
WHEREAS, Section 120 of the Mortgage provides, among other things, that any power, privilege or right expressly or impliedly reserved to or in any way conferred upon the Company by any provision of the Mortgage, whether such power, privilege or right is in any way restricted or is unrestricted, may (to the extent permitted by law) be in whole or in part waived or surrendered or subjected to any restriction if at the time unrestricted or to additional restriction if already restricted, and the Company may enter into any further covenants, limitations or restrictions for the benefit of any one or more series of bonds issued thereunder, or the Company may cure any ambiguity contained therein, or in any supplemental indenture, or may establish the terms and provisions of any series of bonds (other than said First Series) by an instrument in writing executed and acknowledged by the Company in such manner as would be necessary to entitle a conveyance of real estate to record in all of the states in which any property at the time subject to the lien of the Mortgage shall be situated; and
WHEREAS, the Company now desires to create two new series of bonds and (pursuant to the provisions of Section 120 of the Mortgage) to add to its covenants and agreements contained in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, certain other covenants and agreements to be observed by it and to alter and amend in certain respects the covenants and provisions contained in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented; and
WHEREAS, pursuant to Section 103 of the Mortgage, the Co-Trustee has irrevocably constituted and appointed the Corporate Trustee her true and lawful attorney in fact with full power and authority, in so far as permitted by law, to exercise any and all rights or powers conferred upon the Co-Trustee alone, or upon the Trustees jointly, by any of the provisions of the Mortgage; and
WHEREAS, the execution and delivery by the Company of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture, and the terms of the bonds of the Forty-third Series and the Forty-fourth Series, hereinafter referred to, have been duly authorized by the Board of Directors of the Company by appropriate resolutions of said Board of Directors;
NOW, THEREFORE, THIS INDENTURE WITNESSETH:
That the Company, in consideration of the premises and of One Dollar to it duly paid by the Trustees at or before the ensealing and delivery of these presents, the receipt whereof is hereby acknowledged, and in further evidence of assurance of the estate, title and rights of the Trustees and in order further to secure the payment of both the principal of and interest and premium, if any, on the bonds from time to time issued under the Mortgage, as
5
heretofore supplemented, according to their tenor and effect and the performance of all the provisions of the Mortgage (including any instruments supplemental thereto and any modification made as in the Mortgage provided) and of said bonds, hereby grants, bargains, sells, releases, conveys, assigns, transfers, mortgages, pledges, sets over and confirms (subject, however, to Excepted Encumbrances) unto The BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON and MING RYAN, as Trustees under the Mortgage, and to their successor or successors in said trust, and to said Trustees and their successors and assigns forever, all property, real, personal and mixed, of the kind or nature specifically mentioned in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, or of any other kind or nature acquired by the Company after the date of the execution and delivery of the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented (except any herein or in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, expressly excepted), now owned or, subject to the provisions of subsection (I) of Section 87 of the Mortgage, hereafter acquired by the Company (by purchase, consolidation, merger, donation, construction, erection or in any other way) and wheresoever situated, including (without in anywise limiting or impairing by the enumeration of the same the scope and intent of the foregoing or of any general description contained in this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture) all lands, power sites, flowage rights, water rights, water locations, water appropriations, ditches, flumes, reservoirs, reservoir sites, canals, raceways, dams, dam sites, aqueducts, and all other rights or means for appropriating, conveying, storing and supplying water; all rights of way and roads; all plants for the generation of electricity by steam, water and/or other power; all power houses, gas plants, street lighting systems, standards and other equipment incidental thereto, telephone, radio and television systems, air-conditioning systems and equipment incidental thereto, water works, water systems, steam heat and hot water plants, substations, lines, service and supply systems, bridges, culverts, tracks, ice or refrigeration plants and equipment, offices, buildings and other structures and the equipment thereof; all machinery, engines, boilers, dynamos, electric, gas and other machines, regulators, meters, transformers, generators, motors, electrical, gas and mechanical appliances, conduits, cables, water, steam heat, gas or other pipes, gas mains and pipes, service pipes, fittings, valves and connections, pole and transmission lines, wires, cables, tools, implements, apparatus, furniture and chattels; all municipal and other franchises, consents or permits; all lines for the transmission and distribution of electric current, gas, steam heat or water for any purpose including towers, poles, wires, cables, pipes, conduits, ducts and all apparatus for use in connection therewith; all real estate, lands, easements, servitudes, licenses, permits, franchises, privileges, rights of way and other rights in or relating to real estate or the occupancy of the same and (except as herein or in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, expressly excepted) all the right, title and interest of the Company in and to all other property of any kind or nature appertaining to and/or used and/or occupied and/or enjoyed in connection with any property hereinbefore or in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, described.
TOGETHER WITH all and singular the tenements, hereditaments, prescriptions, servitudes and appurtenances belonging or in anywise appertaining to the aforesaid property or any part thereof, with the reversion and reversions, remainder and remainders and (subject to the provisions of Section 57 of the Mortgage) the tolls, rents, revenues, issues, earnings, income, product and profits thereof, and all the estate, right, title and interest and claim whatsoever, at law as well as in equity, which the Company now has or may hereafter acquire in and to the aforesaid property and franchises and every part and parcel thereof.
IT IS HEREBY AGREED by the Company that, subject to the provisions of subsection (I) of Section 87 of the Mortgage, all the property, rights, and franchises acquired by the Company (by purchase, consolidation, merger, donation, construction, erection or in any other way) after the date hereof, except any herein or in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, expressly excepted, shall be and are as fully granted and conveyed hereby and by the Mortgage and as fully embraced within the lien hereof and the lien of the Mortgage as if such property, rights and franchises were now owned by the Company and were specifically described herein or in the Mortgage and conveyed hereby or thereby.
6
PROVIDED that the following are not and are not intended to be now or hereafter granted, bargained, sold, released, conveyed, assigned, transferred, mortgaged, hypothecated, affected, pledged, set over or confirmed hereunder and are hereby expressly excepted from the lien and operation of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture and from the lien and operation of the Mortgage, namely: (1) cash, shares of stock, bonds, notes and other obligations and other securities not hereafter specifically pledged, paid, deposited, delivered or held under the Mortgage or covenanted so to be; (2) merchandise, equipment, apparatus, materials or supplies held for the purpose of sale or other disposition in the usual course of business; fuel, oil and similar materials and supplies consumable in the operation of any of the properties of the Company; all aircraft, rolling stock, trolley coaches, buses, motor coaches, automobiles and other vehicles and materials and supplies held for the purpose of repairing or replacing (in whole or part) any of the same; all timber, minerals, mineral rights and royalties; (3) bills, notes and accounts receivable, judgments, demands and choses in action, and all contracts, leases and operating agreements not specifically pledged under the Mortgage or covenanted so to be; the Company's contractual rights or other interest in or with respect to tires not owned by the Company; (4) the last day of the term of any lease or leasehold which may hereafter become subject to the lien of the Mortgage; (5) electric energy, gas, steam, ice, and other materials or products generated, manufactured, produced or purchased by the Company for sale, distribution or use in the ordinary course of its business; and (6) the Company's franchise to be a corporation; provided, however, that the property and rights expressly excepted from the lien and operation of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture and from the lien and operation of the Mortgage in the above subdivisions (2) and (3) shall (to the extent permitted by law) cease to be so excepted in the event and as of the date that either or both of the Trustees or a receiver or trustee shall enter upon and take possession of the Mortgaged and Pledged Property in the manner provided in Article XIII of the Mortgage by reason of the occurrence of a Default as defined in Section 65 thereof.
TO HAVE AND TO HOLD all such properties, real, personal and mixed, granted, bargained, sold, released, conveyed, assigned, transferred, mortgaged, pledged, set over or confirmed by the Company as aforesaid, or intended so to be, unto the Trustees and their successors and assigns forever.
IN TRUST NEVERTHELESS, for the same purposes and upon the same terms, trusts and conditions and subject to and with the same provisos and covenants as are set forth in the Mortgage, as supplemented, this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture being supplemental thereto.
AND IT IS HEREBY COVENANTED by the Company that all the terms, conditions, provisos, covenants and provisions contained in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, shall affect and apply to the property hereinbefore described and conveyed and to the estate, rights, obligations and duties of the Company and Trustees and the beneficiaries of the trust with respect to said property, and to the Trustees and their successors in the trust in the same manner and with the same effect as if said property had been owned by the Company at the time of the execution of the Mortgage, and had been specifically and at length described in and conveyed to said Trustees by the Mortgage as a part of the property therein stated to be conveyed.
The Company further covenants and agrees to and with the Trustees and their successors in said trust under the Mortgage as follows:
ARTICLE I
Forty-third Series of Bonds
SECTION 1. There shall be a series of bonds designated 3.20% Series due July 15, 2026 (herein sometimes referred to as the Forty-third Series), each of which shall also bear the descriptive title First Mortgage Bond,
7
and the form thereof, which shall be established by Resolution of the Board of Directors of the Company, shall contain suitable provisions with respect to the matters hereinafter in this Section specified. Bonds of the Forty-third Series shall be dated as in Section 10 of the Mortgage provided, mature on July 15, 2026 (the Stated Maturity), be issued as fully registered bonds in denominations of One Thousand Dollars and, at the option of the Company, in any multiple or multiples of One Thousand Dollars (the exercise of such option to be evidenced by the execution and delivery thereof) and bear interest from July 2, 2012 (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve thirty-day months) at the rate of 3.20% per annum, payable semi-annually on January 15 and July 15 of each year, commencing January 15, 2013, the principal of and interest on each said bond to be payable at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for public and private debts.
Any payment of principal of or interest on any bond of the Forty-third Series that is due on a date other than a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day without including the additional days elapsed in the computation of the interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day; provided that if the maturity date of any such bond of the Forty-third Series is a date other than a Business Day, the payment otherwise due on such maturity date shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day and shall include the additional days elapsed in the computation of interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day.
(I)    
Optional Prepayment.
At any time prior to January 15, 2026 (six months prior to the Stated Maturity), the Company may, at its option, upon notice as provided below, prepay at any time all, or from time to time any part of, the bonds of the Forty-third Series at 100% of the principal amount so prepaid, and the Make-Whole Amount determined for the Settlement Date specified by the Company in such notice with respect to such principal amount. The Company will give each registered owner of bonds of the Forty-third Series written notice (by first class mail or such other method as may be agreed upon by the Company and such registered owner) of each optional prepayment under this subsection (I) mailed or otherwise given not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for such prepayment, to each such registered owner at his, her or its last address appearing on the registry books. Each such notice shall specify the Settlement Date (which shall be a Business Day), the aggregate principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-third Series to be prepaid on such date, the principal amount of each bond held by such registered owner to be prepaid (determined in accordance with subsection (II) of this section), and the interest to be paid on the Settlement Date with respect to such principal amount being prepaid, and shall be accompanied by a certificate signed by a Senior Financial Officer as to the estimated Make-Whole Amount due in connection with such prepayment (calculated as if the date of such notice were the date of the prepayment), setting forth the details of such computation. Two Business Days prior to such Settlement Date, the Company shall send to each registered owner of bonds of the Forty-third Series (by first class mail or by such other method as may be agreed upon by the Company and such registered owner) a certificate signed by a Senior Financial Officer specifying the calculation of such Make-Whole Amount as of the specified Settlement Date. As promptly as practicable after the giving of the notice and the sending of the certificates provided in this subsection, the Company shall provide a copy of each to the Corporate Trustee. The Trustees shall be under no duty to inquire into, may conclusively presume the correctness of, and shall be fully protected in relying upon the information set forth in any such notice or certificate.
At any time on or after January 15, 2026, the bonds of the Forty-third series will be redeemable at the option of the Company, in whole or in part, on not less than 30 nor more than 60 days' notice prior to the Settlement Date, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-third Series to be redeemed, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon to the Settlement Date. The bonds of the Forty-third Series are not otherwise subject to voluntary or optional prepayment.
8
(II)    
Allocation of Partial Prepayments.
In the case of each partial prepayment of the bonds of the Forty-third Series, the principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-third Series to be prepaid shall be allocated by the Company among all of the bonds of the Forty-third Series at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof not theretofore called for prepayment.
(III)     
Maturity; Surrender, Etc.
    In the case of each notice of prepayment of bonds of the Forty-third Series pursuant to this section, if cash sufficient to pay the principal amount to be prepaid on the Settlement Date (which shall be a Business Day), together with interest on such principal amount accrued to such date and the applicable Make-Whole Amount, if any, is not paid as agreed upon by the Company and each registered owner of the affected bonds, or, to the extent that there is no such agreement entered into with one or more such owners, deposited with the Corporate Trustee on or before the Settlement Date, then such notice of prepayment shall be of no effect. If such cash is so paid or deposited, such principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-third Series shall be deemed paid for all purposes and interest on such principal amount shall cease to accrue. In case the Company pays any registered owner pursuant to an agreement with that registered owner, the Company shall notify the Corporate Trustee as promptly as practicable of such agreement and payment, and shall furnish the Corporate Trustee with a copy of such agreement; in case the Company deposits any cash with the Corporate Trustee, the Company shall provide therewith a list of the registered owners and the amount of such cash each registered owner is to receive. The Trustees shall be under no duty to inquire into, may conclusively presume the correctness of, and shall be fully protected in relying upon the information set forth in any such notice, list or agreement, and shall not be chargeable with knowledge of any of the contents of any such agreement. Any bond prepaid in full shall be surrendered to the Company or the Corporate Trustee for cancellation on or before the Settlement Date or, with respect to cash deposited with the Corporate Trustee, before payment of such cash by the Corporate Trustee; any bond prepaid in part shall be surrendered to the Company or the Corporate Trustee on or before the Settlement Date (unless otherwise agreed between the Company and the registered owner) or, with respect to cash deposited with the Corporate Trustee before payment of such cash by the Corporate Trustee, for a substitute bond in the principal amount remaining unpaid.
(IV)    
Make-Whole Amount.
Make-Whole Amount means, with respect to any bond of the Forty-third Series, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the Discounted Value of the Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to the Called Principal of such bond of the Forty-third Series over the amount of such Called Principal, provided that the Make-Whole Amount may in no event be less than zero. For the purposes of determining the Make-Whole Amount, the following terms have the following meanings:
Business Day means any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in New York City are required or authorized to be closed.
Called Principal means, with respect to any bond of the Forty-third Series, the principal of such bond that is to be prepaid pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Discounted Value means, with respect to the Called Principal of any bond of the Forty-third Series, the amount obtained by discounting all Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to such Called Principal from their respective scheduled due dates to the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in accordance with accepted financial practice and at a discount factor (applied on the same periodic basis as that on which interest on the bonds of the Forty-third Series is payable) equal to the Reinvestment Yield with respect to such Called Principal.
9
Reinvestment Yield means, with respect to the Called Principal of any bond of the Forty-third Series, 0.5% over the yield to maturity implied by (i) the yields reported as of 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, on the display designated as Page PX1 on the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service (or such other display on the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service having the same information as PX1 if PX1 is replaced by the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service) for the most recently issued actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury securities having a maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date, or (ii) if such yields are not reported as of such time or the yields reported as of such time are not ascertainable (including by way of interpolation), the Treasury Constant Maturity Series Yields reported, for the latest day for which such yields have been so reported as of the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (519) (or any comparable successor publication) for actively traded U.S. Treasury securities having a constant maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date. Such implied yield will be determined, if necessary, by (a) converting U.S. Treasury bill quotations to bond equivalent yields in accordance with accepted financial practice and (b) interpolating linearly between (1) the most recently issued, actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and greater than such Remaining Average Life and (2) the most recently issued, actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and less than such Remaining Average Life. The Reinvestment Yield shall be rounded to the number of decimal places as appears in the interest rate of the applicable bond of the Forty-third Series.
Remaining Average Life means, with respect to any Called Principal, the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) obtained by dividing (i) such Called Principal into (ii) the sum of the products obtained by multiplying (a) the principal component of each Remaining Scheduled Payment with respect to such Called Principal by (b) the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) that will elapse between the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal and the scheduled due date of such Remaining Scheduled Payment.
Remaining Scheduled Payments means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Bond of the Forty-third Series, all payments of such Called Principal and interest thereon that would be due after the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal if no payment of such Called Principal were made prior to its scheduled due date, provided that if such Settlement Date is not a date on which interest payments are due to be made under the terms of the bonds of the Forty-third Series, then the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment will be reduced by the amount of interest accrued to such Settlement Date and required to be paid on such Settlement Date pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Settlement Date means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Bond of the Forty-third Series, the date on which such Called Principal is to be prepaid pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Senior Financial Officer means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or comptroller of the Company.
(V)    At the option of the registered owner, any bonds of the Forty-third Series, upon surrender thereof for cancellation at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, together with a written instrument of transfer wherever required by the Company duly executed by the registered owner or by his duly authorized attorney, shall (subject to the provisions of Section 12 of the Mortgage) be exchangeable for a like aggregate unpaid principal amount of bonds of the same series of other authorized denominations.
10
Bonds of the Forty-third Series shall be transferable (subject to the provisions of Section 12 of the Mortgage) at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York. The Company shall not be required to make transfers or exchanges of bonds of the Forty-third Series for a period of ten (10) days next preceding any designation of bonds of said series to be prepaid, and the Company shall not be required to make transfers or exchanges of any bonds of said series designated in whole or in part for prepayment.
Upon any exchange or transfer of bonds of the Forty-third Series, the Company may make a charge therefor sufficient to reimburse it for any tax or taxes or other governmental charge, as provided in Section 12 of the Mortgage, but the Company hereby waives any right to make a charge in addition thereto for any exchange or transfer of bonds of the Forty-third Series.
After the delivery of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture and upon compliance with the applicable provisions of the Mortgage and receipt of consideration therefor by the Company, there shall be an initial issue of bonds of the Forty-third Series for the aggregate principal amount of $75,000,000.
ARTICLE II
Forty-fourth Series of Bonds
SECTION 1. There shall be a series of bonds designated 4.08% Series due July 15, 2042 (herein sometimes referred to as the Forty-fourth Series), each of which shall also bear the descriptive title First Mortgage Bond, and the form thereof, which shall be established by Resolution of the Board of Directors of the Company, shall contain suitable provisions with respect to the matters hereinafter in this Section specified. Bonds of the Forty-fourth Series shall be dated as in Section 10 of the Mortgage provided, mature on July 15, 2042 (the Stated Maturity), be issued as fully registered bonds in denominations of One Thousand Dollars and, at the option of the Company, in any multiple or multiples of One Thousand Dollars (the exercise of such option to be evidenced by the execution and delivery thereof) and bear interest from July 2, 2012 (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve thirty-day months) at the rate of 4.08% per annum, payable semi-annually on January 15 and July 15 of each year, commencing January 15, 2013, the principal of and interest on each said bond to be payable at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for public and private debts.
Any payment of principal of or interest on any bond of the Forty-fourth Series that is due on a date other than a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day without including the additional days elapsed in the computation of the interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day; provided that if the maturity date of any such bond of the Forty-fourth Series is a date other than a Business Day, the payment otherwise due on such maturity date shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day and shall include the additional days elapsed in the computation of interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day.
(I)    
Optional Prepayment.
At any time prior to January 15, 2042 (six months prior to the Stated Maturity), the Company may, at its option, upon notice as provided below, prepay at any time all, or from time to time any part of, the bonds of the Forty-fourth Series at 100% of the principal amount so prepaid, and the Make-Whole Amount determined for the Settlement Date specified by the Company in such notice with respect to such principal amount. The Company will give each registered owner of bonds of the Forty-fourth Series written notice (by first class mail or such other method as may be agreed upon by the Company and such registered owner) of each optional prepayment under this subsection (I) mailed or otherwise given not less than 30 days and not more than 60
11
days prior to the date fixed for such prepayment, to each such registered owner at his, her or its last address appearing on the registry books. Each such notice shall specify the Settlement Date (which shall be a Business Day), the aggregate principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-fourth Series to be prepaid on such date, the principal amount of each bond held by such registered owner to be prepaid (determined in accordance with subsection (II) of this section), and the interest to be paid on the Settlement Date with respect to such principal amount being prepaid, and shall be accompanied by a certificate signed by a Senior Financial Officer as to the estimated Make-Whole Amount due in connection with such prepayment (calculated as if the date of such notice were the date of the prepayment), setting forth the details of such computation. Two Business Days prior to such Settlement Date, the Company shall send to each registered owner of bonds of the Forty-fourth Series (by first class mail or by such other method as may be agreed upon by the Company and such registered owner) a certificate signed by a Senior Financial Officer specifying the calculation of such Make-Whole Amount as of the specified Settlement Date. As promptly as practicable after the giving of the notice and the sending of the certificates provided in this subsection, the Company shall provide a copy of each to the Corporate Trustee. The Trustees shall be under no duty to inquire into, may conclusively presume the correctness of, and shall be fully protected in relying upon the information set forth in any such notice or certificate.
At any time on or after January 15, 2042, the bonds of the Forty-fourth Series will be redeemable at the option of the Company, in whole or in part, on not less than 30 nor more than 60 days' notice prior to the Settlement Date, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-fourth series to be redeemed, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon to the Settlement Date. The bonds of the Forty-fourth Series are not otherwise subject to voluntary or optional prepayment.
(II)    
Allocation of Partial Prepayments.
In the case of each partial prepayment of the bonds of the Forty-fourth Series, the principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-fourth Series to be prepaid shall be allocated by the Company among all of the bonds of the Forty-fourth Series at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof not theretofore called for prepayment.
(III)     
Maturity; Surrender, Etc.
    In the case of each notice of prepayment of bonds of the Forty-fourth Series pursuant to this section, if cash sufficient to pay the principal amount to be prepaid on the Settlement Date (which shall be a Business Day), together with interest on such principal amount accrued to such date and the applicable Make-Whole Amount, if any, is not paid as agreed upon by the Company and each registered owner of the affected bonds, or, to the extent that there is no such agreement entered into with one or more such owners, deposited with the Corporate Trustee on or before the Settlement Date, then such notice of prepayment shall be of no effect. If such cash is so paid or deposited, such principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-fourth Series shall be deemed paid for all purposes and interest on such principal amount shall cease to accrue. In case the Company pays any registered owner pursuant to an agreement with that registered owner, the Company shall notify the Corporate Trustee as promptly as practicable of such agreement and payment, and shall furnish the Corporate Trustee with a copy of such agreement; in case the Company deposits any cash with the Corporate Trustee, the Company shall provide therewith a list of the registered owners and the amount of such cash each registered owner is to receive. The Trustees shall be under no duty to inquire into, may conclusively presume the correctness of, and shall be fully protected in relying upon the information set forth in any such notice, list or agreement, and shall not be chargeable with knowledge of any of the contents of any such agreement. Any bond prepaid in full shall be surrendered to the Company or the Corporate Trustee for cancellation on or before the Settlement Date or, with respect to cash deposited with the Corporate Trustee, before payment of such cash by the Corporate Trustee; any bond prepaid in part shall be surrendered to the Company or the Corporate Trustee on or before the Settlement Date (unless otherwise agreed
12
between the Company and the registered owner) or, with respect to cash deposited with the Corporate Trustee before payment of such cash by the Corporate Trustee, for a substitute bond in the principal amount remaining unpaid.
(IV)    
Make-Whole Amount.
Make-Whole Amount means, with respect to any bond of the Forty-fourth Series, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the Discounted Value of the Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to the Called Principal of such bond of the Forty-fourth Series over the amount of such Called Principal, provided that the Make-Whole Amount may in no event be less than zero. For the purposes of determining the Make-Whole Amount, the following terms have the following meanings:
Business Day means any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in New York City are required or authorized to be closed.
Called Principal means, with respect to any bond of the Forty-fourth Series, the principal of such bond that is to be prepaid pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Discounted Value means, with respect to the Called Principal of any bond of the Forty-fourth Series, the amount obtained by discounting all Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to such Called Principal from their respective scheduled due dates to the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in accordance with accepted financial practice and at a discount factor (applied on the same periodic basis as that on which interest on the bonds of the Forty-fourth Series is payable) equal to the Reinvestment Yield with respect to such Called Principal.
Reinvestment Yield means, with respect to the Called Principal of any bond of the Forty-fourth Series, 0.5% over the yield to maturity implied by (i) the yields reported as of 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, on the display designated as Page PX1 on the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service (or such other display on the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service having the same information as PX1 if PX1 is replaced by the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service) for the most recently issued actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury securities having a maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date, or (ii) if such yields are not reported as of such time or the yields reported as of such time are not ascertainable (including by way of interpolation), the Treasury Constant Maturity Series Yields reported, for the latest day for which such yields have been so reported as of the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (519) (or any comparable successor publication) for actively traded U.S. Treasury securities having a constant maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date. Such implied yield will be determined, if necessary, by (a) converting U.S. Treasury bill quotations to bond equivalent yields in accordance with accepted financial practice and (b) interpolating linearly between (1) the most recently issued, actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and greater than such Remaining Average Life and (2) the most recently issued, actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and less than such Remaining Average Life. The Reinvestment Yield shall be rounded to the number of decimal places as appears in the interest rate of the applicable bond of the Forty-fourth Series.
Remaining Average Life means, with respect to any Called Principal, the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) obtained by dividing (i) such Called Principal into (ii) the sum of the products obtained by multiplying (a) the principal component of each Remaining Scheduled Payment with respect to such Called Principal by (b) the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) that will elapse between the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal and the scheduled due date of such Remaining Scheduled Payment.
13
Remaining Scheduled Payments means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Bond of the Forty-fourth Series, all payments of such Called Principal and interest thereon that would be due after the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal if no payment of such Called Principal were made prior to its scheduled due date, provided that if such Settlement Date is not a date on which interest payments are due to be made under the terms of the bonds of the Forty-fourth Series, then the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment will be reduced by the amount of interest accrued to such Settlement Date and required to be paid on such Settlement Date pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Settlement Date means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Bond of the Forty-fourth Series, the date on which such Called Principal is to be prepaid pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Senior Financial Officer means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or comptroller of the Company.
(V)    At the option of the registered owner, any bonds of the Forty-fourth Series, upon surrender thereof for cancellation at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, together with a written instrument of transfer wherever required by the Company duly executed by the registered owner or by his duly authorized attorney, shall (subject to the provisions of Section 12 of the Mortgage) be exchangeable for a like aggregate unpaid principal amount of bonds of the same series of other authorized denominations.
Bonds of the Forty-fourth Series shall be transferable (subject to the provisions of Section 12 of the Mortgage) at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York. The Company shall not be required to make transfers or exchanges of bonds of the Forty-fourth Series for a period of ten (10) days next preceding any designation of bonds of said series to be prepaid, and the Company shall not be required to make transfers or exchanges of any bonds of said series designated in whole or in part for prepayment.
Upon any exchange or transfer of bonds of the Forty-fourth Series, the Company may make a charge therefor sufficient to reimburse it for any tax or taxes or other governmental charge, as provided in Section 12 of the Mortgage, but the Company hereby waives any right to make a charge in addition thereto for any exchange or transfer of bonds of the Forty-fourth Series.
After the delivery of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture and upon compliance with the applicable provisions of the Mortgage and receipt of consideration therefor by the Company, there shall be an initial issue of bonds of the Forty-fourth Series for the aggregate principal amount of $85,000,000.
ARTICLE III
Consent to Amendments
SECTION 1.  
Consent to Amendments
  Each initial and future holder of bonds of the Forty-third Series and the Forty-fourth Series, by its acquisition of an interest in such bonds, irrevocably (a) consents to the amendments set forth in Article IV of the Thirty-first Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 1, 2010, without any other or further action by any holder of such bonds, and (b) designates the Corporate Trustee, and its successors, as its proxy with irrevocable instructions to vote and deliver written consents on behalf of such holder in favor of such amendments at any bondholder meeting, in lieu of any bondholder meeting, in any consent solicitation or otherwise.
14
ARTICLE IV
Reservation of Right to Amend Sections 35(a) and 101 of the Mortgage
SECTION 1. The Company reserves the right, without any vote, consent or other action by the holders of bonds of the Forty-third Series, the Forty-fourth Series or any subsequent series, to amend the Mortgage, as herein or heretofore supplemented as follows:
(A) By deleting from Section 35(a) the phrase having its principal office and place of business in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York and the word such at the location in said Section 35(a) at which such word first appears.
(B) By adding the following at the end of the first sentence of Section 101:
; provided however, that if all of the bonds at that time Outstanding are registered as to principal and interest or as to principal only, such notice shall be sufficiently given if mailed, postage prepaid to each such registered owner of bonds at his/her last address appearing on the registry books, on or before the date of on which the first publication of such notice would otherwise have been required.
ARTICLE V
Miscellaneous Provisions
SECTION 1. Section 126 of the Mortgage, as heretofore amended, is hereby further amended by adding the words and July 15, 2026 and July 15, 2042 after the words and April 15, 2040.
SECTION 2. Subject to the amendments provided for in this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture, the terms defined in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, shall, for all purposes of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture, have the meanings specified in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented.
SECTION 3. The holders of bonds of the Forty-third Series and the Forty-fourth Series consent that the Company may, but shall not be obligated to, fix a record date for the purpose of determining the holders of bonds of the Forty-third Series and the Forty-fourth Series entitled to consent to any amendment, supplement or waiver. If a record date is fixed, those persons who were holders at such record date (or their duly designated proxies), and only those persons, shall be entitled to consent to such amendment, supplement or waiver or to revoke any consent previously given, whether or not such persons continue to be holders after such record date. No such consent shall be valid or effective for more than 90 days after such record date.
SECTION 4. The Trustees hereby accept the trusts herein declared, provided, created or supplemented and agree to perform the same upon the terms and conditions herein and in the Mortgage set forth and upon the following terms and conditions:
15
The Trustees shall not be responsible in any manner whatsoever for or in respect of the validity or sufficiency of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture or for or in respect of the recitals contained herein, all of which recitals are made by the Company solely. In general, each and every term and condition contained in Article XVII of the Mortgage shall apply to and form part of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture with the same force and effect as if the same were herein set forth in full with such omissions, variations and insertions, if any, as may be appropriate to make the same conform to the provisions of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 5. Whenever in this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture any party hereto is named or referred to, this shall, subject to the provisions of Articles XVI and XVII of the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, be deemed to include the successors or assigns of such party, and all the covenants and agreements in this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture contained by or on behalf of the Company, or by or on behalf of the Trustees shall, subject as aforesaid, bind and inure to the benefit of the respective successors and assigns of such party whether so expressed or not.
SECTION 6. Nothing in this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture, expressed or implied, is intended, or shall be construed, to confer upon, or give to, any person, firm or corporation, other than the parties hereto and the holders of the bonds and coupons Outstanding under the Mortgage, any right, remedy, or claim under or by reason of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture or any covenant, condition, stipulation, promise or agreement hereof, and all the covenants, conditions, stipulations, promises and agreements in this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture contained by and on behalf of the Company shall be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the parties hereto, and of the holders of the bonds and of the coupons Outstanding under the Mortgage.
SECTION 7. This Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture shall be executed in several counterparts, each of which shall be an original and all of which shall constitute but one and the same instrument.
SECTION 8. The Company, the mortgagor named herein, by its execution hereof acknowledges receipt of a full, true and complete copy of this Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture.
16
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, ALLETE, Inc. has caused its corporate name to be hereunto affixed, and this instrument to be signed and sealed by its President, one of its Vice Presidents, or its Treasurer, and its corporate seal to be attested by its Secretary or one of its Assistant Secretaries for and in its behalf, all in the City of Duluth, Minnesota, and The Bank of New York Mellon,
for itself and as attorney in fact for Ming Ryan, as Co-Trustee, has caused its corporate name to be hereunto affixed, and this instrument to be signed and sealed by one of its Vice Presidents or one of its Assistant Vice Presidents and its corporate seal to be attested by one of its Assistant Treasurers, one of its Vice Presidents or one of its Assistant Vice Presidents, all in The City of New York, as of the day and year first above written.
ALLETE, Inc.
Mark A. Schober
Senior Vice President and
Chief Financial Officer
Attest:
    
Deborah A. Amberg
Senior Vice President, General Counsel
and Secretary
Trustees' Signature Page Follows
17
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON,
as Corporate Trustee and as attorney
in fact for the Co-Trustee
Laurence O'Brien
Vice President
Attest:
Francine Kincaid
Vice President
Thirty-third Supplemental Indenture dated as of July 1, 2012
To Mortgage and Deed of Trust dated as of September 1, 1945
Trustees' Signature Page
18
    
          
On this 27th day of June, 2012, the foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me by Mark A. Schober, Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation, on behalf of the Company.
NOTARIAL STAMP OR SEAL
                                                
On this 27th day of June, 2012, the foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me by Deborah A. Amberg, Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation, on behalf of the Company.
NOTARIAL STAMP OR SEAL
19
On this 27th day of June, 2012, the foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me by Laurence O'Brien and Francine Kincaid, each a Vice President of THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON, the corporation named in the foregoing instrument.
Given under my hand and notarial seal this 27th day of June, 2012.
Notary Public, State of New York
20


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20120801080350.txt.gz
TIME:20120801080350
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reporte
d)
-
August 1,
2012
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS
Minnesota Powers taconite customers nominate minimum demand levels for their energy needs each December, March, and August for the following four-month periods. Based on nominations received on August 1, 2012, Minnesota Powers taconite customers are expected to operate at full demand levels for September through December, 2012.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 1, 2012
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 26 of our 2011 Form 10K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Current Report on Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 1, 2012
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated August 1, 2012


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20120803080512.txt.gz
TIME:20120803080512
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
August 3, 2012
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 8  OTHER EVENTS
Item 8.01 Other Events
On August 3, 2012, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) entered into the third amended and restated distribution agreement (the Agreement) with KCCI, Ltd. ("KCCI") with respect to the issuance and sale of shares of the Companys common stock (the Common Stock) which may be issued from time to time through KCCI, as the Companys agent. The amendment and restatement increases by 3,000,000 the number of shares of Common Stock available to be offered for sale by KCCI under the Agreement. After giving effect to the 3,000,000 increase in the number of shares of Common Stock, 5,285,535 shares of Common Stock are available for issuance.
The offering of the Common Stock will be made pursuant to Registration Statement No. 333-170289, which became effective on November 2, 2010, a base Prospectus, dated November 2, 2010, and a Prospectus Supplement, dated August 3, 2012.
The Agreement is attached as Exhibit 1 hereto and a copy of the legal opinion delivered with respect to the registration of the shares of Common Stock issuable pursuant to the Agreement is attached as Exhibit 5 hereto.
SECTION 9  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits
Exhibit Number
    
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with the Companys disclosures under the heading Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated
August 3, 2012
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 26 of our 2011 Form 10K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Current Report on Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated
August 3, 2012
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated
August 3, 2012

Exhibit 1
        
THIRD AMENDED AND RESTATED
DISTRIBUTION AGREEMENT
August 3, 2012
KCCI, Ltd.
66 York Street
Jersey City, NJ 07302
Attention: Mark Nauman
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is hereby made to that certain Distribution Agreement, dated February 19, 2008, as amended and restated by that certain First Amended and Restated Distribution Agreement, dated February 17, 2009, as further amended by that certain Amendment No. 1 to the First Amended and Restated Distribution Agreement, dated February 27, 2009, and as amended and restated by that certain Second Amended and Restated Distribution Agreement, dated February 17, 2011, between the parties hereto and thereto (collectively, the 
Prior Distribution Agreement
). Such parties desire that the Prior Distribution Agreement be amended and restated in its entirety, all on the terms and conditions contained herein. Accordingly, in consideration of the premises and the agreements, provisions and covenants contained herein, the Prior Distribution Agreement is hereby amended and restated in its entirety to be and to read as follows:
ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the 
Company
), confirms its agreement with KCCI Ltd., as agent (
you
 or 
KCCI
), with respect to the issuance and sale from time to time by the Company, in the manner and subject to the terms and conditions described below, of up to an aggregate of 9,556,200 shares (the 
Maximum Number of Shares
) of common stock, without par value, of the Company (the 
Common Stock
 or the 
Shares
). The Company and KCCI agree that as of the date of this Third Amended and Restated Distribution Agreement (this 
Agreement
), the Company has issued and sold 4,270,665 Shares pursuant to the Prior Distribution Agreement, and the Company's Board of Directors has authorized the issuance of up to an additional 3,000,000 Shares, therefore 5,285,535 Shares are available for issuance and sale from time to time by the Company (the 
Remaining Shares
) pursuant to this Agreement.
The Company has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the 
Commission
) a registration statement on Form S3 (No. 333170289) (the 
registration statement
) for the registration of an unspecified amount of securities, including Common Stock, under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the 
Act
). Except where the context otherwise requires, 
Registration Statement
, as used herein, means the registration statement, as amended at the time of such registration statement's effectiveness for purposes of Section 11 of the Act, as such section applies to KCCI, including (i) all documents incorporated or deemed to be incorporated by reference therein and (ii) any information contained or incorporated by reference in a prospectus filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act, to the extent such information is deemed, pursuant to Rule 430B under the Act, to be part of the registration
statement at the effective time. Except where the context otherwise requires, 
Basic Prospectus
, as used herein, means the prospectus filed as part of the Registration Statement, together with any amendments or supplements thereto as of the date of this Agreement. Except where the context otherwise requires, 
Prospectus Supplement
, as used herein, means the prospectus supplement, dated August 3, 2012, relating to the Remaining Shares, filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act on or before the second business day after the date hereof (or such earlier time as may be required under the Act), in the form furnished by the Company to KCCI in connection with the offering of the Remaining Shares. Except where the context otherwise requires, 
Prospectus
, as used herein, means the Prospectus Supplement together with the Basic Prospectus attached to or used with the Prospectus Supplement. 
Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses
, as used herein, means any other documents that the parties hereto shall hereafter expressly agree in writing to distribute in connection with the offering of the Remaining Shares. Any reference herein to the registration statement, the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents, if any, incorporated by reference, or deemed to be incorporated by reference, therein (the 
Incorporated Documents
). Any reference herein to the terms 
amend
, 
amendment
 or 
supplement
 with respect to the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any document filed with the Commission under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder (collectively, the 
Exchange Act
) on or after the initial effective date of the Registration Statement, or the date of such Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus Supplement, the Prospectus or such Permitted Free Writing Prospectus, as the case may be, and deemed to be incorporated therein by reference.
The Company and KCCI agree as follows:
2
Transaction entered into hereunder. KCCI will use its commercially reasonable efforts to sell such Shares in accordance with the terms and conditions hereof and of the applicable Transaction Notice (as defined in Section 2(a) below). Neither the Company nor KCCI shall have any obligation to enter into a Transaction. The Company shall be obligated to issue and sell through KCCI, and KCCI shall be obligated to use its commercially reasonable efforts, as provided herein and in the applicable Transaction Notice, to place Remaining Shares issued by the Company only if and when a Transaction Notice related to such Transaction has been delivered by the Company and accepted by KCCI as provided in Section 2 below.
3
proposed Transaction to become a binding agreement between it and the Company, KCCI shall promptly indicate its acceptance thereof by countersigning and returning such Transaction Notice to the Company or sending a written notice to the Company (by any means permissible under Section 11 hereof) indicating its acceptance. The terms reflected in a Transaction Notice shall become binding on KCCI and the Company only if accepted by KCCI no later than the times specified in Section 2(b) below. Each Transaction Notice shall specify, among other things:
(i)
the Exchange Business Day on which the Remaining Shares subject to such Transaction are to be sold (the 
Purchase Date
);
(ii)
the number of Remaining Shares that the Company agrees to sell (the 
Specified Number of Shares
) on such Purchase Date, which shall not exceed the greater of (i) twenty percent (20%) of the trading volume in the Common Stock on the Exchange on the Purchase Date, or (ii) twenty percent (20%) of the average daily trading volume in the Common Stock on the Exchange for the ninety (90) Exchange Business Days preceding the Purchase Date; and
(iii)
the lowest price (if any) at which the Company shall be obligated to sell Remaining Shares in such Transaction (a 
Floor Price
).
A Transaction Notice shall not set forth a Specified Number of Shares that, when added to the aggregate number of Shares previously purchased and to be purchased pursuant to pending Transaction Notices (if any) hereunder and under the Prior Distribution Agreement, results in a total that exceeds the Maximum Number of Shares. The Company shall have responsibility for maintaining records with respect to the aggregate number of Shares sold, or for otherwise monitoring the availability of Remaining Shares for sale under the Registration Statement. A Transaction Notice conforming to the foregoing requirements, once accepted by KCCI, shall be irrevocable, and the Company shall be obligated to sell the Specified Number of Shares and KCCI shall be obligated, subject to the terms of, and satisfaction of, the conditions set forth in this Agreement and such Transaction Notice, including, but not limited to, Section 1(e) above and Section 2(e) below, to use its commercially reasonable efforts to obtain performance from each Purchaser providing offers for the Remaining Shares. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the terms of any Transaction contemplate that Remaining Shares shall be sold on more than one Purchase Date, then the Company and KCCI shall mutually agree to such additional terms and conditions as they deem necessary in respect of such multiple Purchase Dates, and such additional terms and conditions shall be set forth in the relevant Transaction Notice and be binding to the same extent as any other terms contained therein.
4
Transaction Notice is accepted prior to 8:30 A.M. (New York time) on an Exchange Business Day (or by such later time as the Company may agree in its sole discretion), the Purchase Date in respect of such Remaining Shares shall be on such date of acceptance. For Transactions, KCCI's commission shall be $0.03 per Share sold and the 
Net Sales Price
 shall be the Gross Sale Price less KCCI's commission.
The Company represents and warrants to KCCI, on and as of (i) the date hereof, (ii) each Notice Time, and (iii) each Closing Date that:
5
amendment thereto became effective, the Registration Statement and any posteffective amendment thereto complied, in all material respects, with the requirements of the Act; and the Basic Prospectus and the Prospectus Supplement, and any supplement or amendment thereto, each when filed with the Commission and on each Closing Date, complied or will comply in all material respects with the provisions of the Act; each Incorporated Document, when filed with the Commission, fully complied or will fully comply, in all material respects, with the requirements of the Exchange Act; the Registration Statement meets, and the offering and sale of the Shares as contemplated hereby complies with, the requirements of Rule 415 under the Act; the Registration Statement did not, as of the time of its effectiveness, contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein not misleading; as of each Notice Time and each Closing Date, the Prospectus, as then amended or supplemented, together with all of the then issued Permitted Free Writing Prospectuses, if any, will not contain an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided, however, that the Company makes no representation or warranty with respect to any statement in or omission from the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus made in reliance upon and in conformity with information relating to KCCI or furnished in writing by or on behalf of KCCI expressly for use in the Registration Statement, such Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus or such Permitted Free Writing Prospectus.
6
qualification is required by law, other than those jurisdictions as to which the failure to be so qualified or in good standing could not, individually or in the aggregate, reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect. 
Material Adverse Effect
, as used herein, means a material adverse effect on (i) the business, operations, affairs, financial condition, assets or properties of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, or (ii) the ability of the Company to perform its obligations under this Agreement, or (iii) the validity or enforceability of this Agreement. 
Subsidiary
,
as used herein, means, as to any Person, any other Person in which such first Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries owns sufficient equity or voting interests to enable it or them (as a group) ordinarily, in the absence of contingencies, to elect a majority of the directors (or Persons performing similar functions) of such second Person, and any partnership or joint venture if more than a 50% interest in the profits or capital thereof is owned by such first Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries or such first Person and one or more of its Subsidiaries (unless such partnership or joint venture can and does ordinarily take major business actions without the prior approval of such Person or one or more of its Subsidiaries). 
Person
,
as used herein, means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, trust, unincorporated organization, or business entity. The Company has the corporate power and authority to own or hold under lease the properties it purports to own or hold under lease, to transact the business it transacts and proposes to transact, to execute and deliver this Agreement and to perform the provisions hereof.
7
materially affect the value thereof (collectively, 
Encumbrance
). 
Significant Subsidiary
, as used herein, has the meaning set forth in Rule 102(w) of Regulation SX under the Act.
8
effect of which would have, or would reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect.
9
report or a portion of a report, that report or portion of a report has actually been filed within the time period prescribed by Rule 12b25(b).
  
The Company hereby agrees with KCCI:
10
11
sky laws of such states as KCCI may reasonably designate and to maintain such qualifications in effect so long as required for the distribution of the Remaining Shares; provided that the Company shall not be required to qualify as a foreign corporation, become a dealer of securities, or become subject to taxation in, or to consent to the service of process under the laws of, any such state (except service of process with respect to the offering and sale of the Remaining Shares); and to promptly advise KCCI of the receipt by the Company of any notification with respect to the suspension of the qualification of the Remaining Shares for sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation of any proceeding for such purpose.
12
and confirmed in writing, to KCCI to cease the sale of the Remaining Shares, and the Company will promptly prepare and file with the Commission such amendment or supplement, whether by filing documents pursuant to the Act, the Exchange Act or otherwise, as may be necessary to correct such untrue statement or omission or to make the Registration Statement, Prospectus or any such Permitted Free Writing Prospectus comply with such requirements.
13
14
 
KCCI's obligation to execute this Agreement shall be subject to the delivery by the Company of the following documents in connection with and on the intended date of the execution of this Agreement:
 
The Company further covenants and agrees with KCCI as follows:
15
Exhibit B
hereto at the time of the filing or effectiveness of such amendment or supplement, as applicable, as though made at and as of such time (except that such statements shall be deemed to relate to the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as amended and supplemented to such time) or, in lieu of such certificate, a certificate of the same tenor as the certificate referred to in Section 5(a) hereof, modified as necessary to relate to the Registration Statement, any Basic Prospectus, the Prospectus or any Permitted Free Writing Prospectus as amended and supplemented to the time of delivery of such certificate; provided that, the Company will not be required to furnish such a certificate to KCCI in connection with the filing of a Current Report on Form 8K unless (i) such Current Report on Form 8K is filed at any time during which either a Transaction Notice is in effect or a Prospectus relating to the Remaining Shares is required to be delivered under the Act and (ii) KCCI has reasonably requested such a certificate based upon the event or events reported in such Current Report on Form 8K.
16
sell shares of Common Stock. Following the issuance of such authorization, the legal opinions of counsel attached hereto as Exhibits C and D shall be respectively modified to reflect such authorization.
KCCI's obligation to execute any sale of Remaining Shares pursuant to a Transaction Notice that has been accepted by KCCI shall be subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions at the time of acceptance of the Transaction Notice, the time of the commencement of trading of such Remaining Shares on the Exchange on the Purchase Date and at the Closing Date:
17
statement of material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading at the time the Company issues a Transaction Notice.
This Agreement and the obligations of KCCI hereunder may be terminated, in the sole and absolute discretion of KCCI, if at any time (i) any of the covenants or conditions specified in Section 6 shall not have been performed or satisfied when and as required by this Agreement to be fulfilled, (ii) there has been since the respective dates as of which information is given in the Registration Statement, any change in the business, properties or assets or the results of operations, condition (financial or otherwise), business or operations of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, that would have, or would reasonably be expected to have, a Material Adverse Effect, (iii) there has occurred since the date hereof an outbreak or escalation of hostilities, any material adverse change in the financial markets or any other national or international calamity or crisis the effect of which on the financial markets of the United States is such as to make it, in the reasonable judgment of KCCI, impracticable or inadvisable to market or deliver the Remaining Shares on the terms and in the manner contemplated in the Prospectus or enforce contracts for the sale of the Remaining Shares, (iv) trading in any securities of the Company has been suspended by the Commission or by the Exchange or if trading generally on the Exchange has been suspended, or limitations on prices for trading have been fixed, or maximum ranges for prices for securities have been required, by such Exchange or the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. or by order of the Commission or any other governmental authority, or (v) a banking moratorium has been declared by federal or New York authorities.
If KCCI elects to terminate this Agreement as provided in this Section 8, KCCI shall promptly notify the Company of such termination by telephone, promptly confirmed by facsimile stating in reasonable detail the basis therefore. If a Transaction Notice is pending at
18
the time of termination, KCCI may declare such Transaction Notice void or may require the Company to complete the sale of Remaining Shares as specified in the Transaction Notice, at KCCI's sole discretion (to the extent doing so is permitted under applicable law and regulation).
If the sale of Remaining Shares, as contemplated by this Agreement, is not carried out by KCCI for any reason permitted under this Agreement or if such sale is not carried out because the Company shall be unable to comply in all material respects with any of the terms of this Agreement, the Company shall not be under any obligation or liability under this Agreement (except to the extent provided in Sections 4(n) and 10 hereof) and KCCI shall be under no obligation or liability to the Company under this Agreement (except to the extent provided in Section 10 hereof).
KCCI may terminate this Agreement for any reason upon giving ten (10) Exchange Business Days prior written notice to the Company. Any such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of Sections 4(n) and 10 hereof shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding such termination.
The Company may terminate this Agreement in its sole discretion upon ten (10) Exchange Business Days prior written notice to KCCI. Any such termination shall be without liability of any party to any other party except that the provisions of Sections 4(n) and 10 hereof shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding such termination.
19
20
of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any Indemnified Person is or could have been a party and indemnification could have been sought hereunder by such Indemnified Person, unless such settlement (x) includes an unconditional release of such Indemnified Person, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Indemnified Person, from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such proceeding and (y) does not include any statement as to or any admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any Indemnified Person.
All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted and confirmed by any standard form of communication, and if to KCCI, shall be sufficient in all respects if delivered to KCCI Ltd.,
21
80 Maiden Lane, Suite 2201, New York, New York 10038, and if to the Company, shall be sufficient in all respects if delivered or sent to the Company at the offices of the Company at ALLETE, Inc., 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802, Attn: Treasurer. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Transaction Notices shall be delivered to KCCI, and acceptance of Transaction Notices by KCCI shall be delivered to the Company, by facsimile and receipt confirmed by telephone at such numbers as shall be agreed upon by KCCI and the Company in writing from time to time.
The Company acknowledges and agrees that KCCI is acting solely in the capacity of an arm's length contractual counterparty to the Company with respect to the offering of Shares contemplated hereby (including in connection with determining the terms of the offering) and not as a financial advisor or a fiduciary to the Company or any other person. Additionally, KCCI is not advising the Company or any other person as to any legal, tax, investment, accounting or regulatory matters in any jurisdiction. The Company shall consult with its own advisors concerning such matters and shall be responsible for making its own independent investigation and appraisal of the transactions contemplated hereby, and KCCI shall have no responsibility or liability to the Company with respect thereto except as set forth herein. Any review by KCCI of the Company, the transactions contemplated hereby or other matters relating to such transactions will be performed solely for the benefit of KCCI and shall not be on behalf of the Company.
The parties acknowledge and agree that all sharerelated numbers related to the Shares contained in this Agreement and any Transaction Notice shall be adjusted to take into account any stock split effected with respect to the Common Stock.
THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, INTERPRETED UNDER AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERNAL LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK APPLICABLE TO AGREEMENTS MADE AND TO BE PERFORMED WITHIN THE STATE OF NEW YORK WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAWS THEREOF.
The Section headings in this Agreement have been inserted as a matter of convenience of reference and are not a part of this Agreement.
The agreement herein set forth has been and is made solely for the benefit of KCCI and the Company and to the extent provided in Section 10 hereof the controlling persons, directors and officers referred to in such section, and their respective successors, assigns, heirs, personal representatives and executors and administrators. No other person, partnership, association or corporation (including a purchaser, as such purchaser, from KCCI) shall acquire or have any right under or by virtue of this Agreement.
22
This Agreement may be signed in counterparts (which may include counterparts delivered by any standard form of telecommunication), each of which shall be an original and all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
This Agreement shall be binding upon KCCI and the Company and their successors and assigns and any successor or assign of any substantial portion of the Company's and KCCI's respective businesses and/or assets.
The respective indemnities, rights of contribution, representations, warranties and agreements of the Company and KCCI contained in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of the Company or KCCI pursuant to this Agreement or any certificate delivered pursuant hereto shall survive the delivery of and payment for the Shares and shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any termination of this Agreement or any investigation made by or on behalf of the Company or KCCI.
No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement, nor any consent or approval to any departure therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
    
23
If the foregoing correctly sets forth the understanding among the Company and KCCI, please so indicate in the space provided below for the purpose, whereupon this letter and your acceptance shall constitute a binding agreement between the Company and KCCI.
Accepted and agreed to as of the
date first above written:
24

Exhibit 5
[Letterhead of Deborah A. Amberg]
August 3, 2012
ALLETE, Inc.
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Reference is made to the sale by ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation (the Company), of up to 5,285,535 shares of its common stock, without par value (the Shares), pursuant to the Company's Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the Commission) on November 2, 2010 (File No. 333-170289) (the Registration Statement), the Prospectus dated November 2, 2010 (the Prospectus) as supplemented by the Prospectus Supplement dated August 3, 2012 (the Prospectus Supplement and, together with the Base Prospectus, the Prospectus), and the Third Amended and Restated Distribution Agreement, dated August 3, 2012 (the Agreement), between the Company and KCCI, Ltd.
I (or attorneys in the Company's legal department with whom I have consulted) have participated in the preparation of (a) the Registration Statement, (b) the Prospectus and (c) the Agreement.
In furnishing this opinion, I have examined the Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation, as amended (the Charter), and the Bylaws, as amended (Bylaws), of the Company, and have made such further investigation and examined such further documents and records of the Company and certificates of public officials as I have deemed necessary or appropriate for purposes of this opinion. I have also reviewed all corporate proceedings taken by the Company in respect of the issuance of the Shares.
Based upon the foregoing, I am of the opinion that the Shares have been duly authorized for issuance and sale and, upon issuance and payment therefor in accordance with the terms of the Agreement and the Prospectus, will be validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.
I am a member of the Minnesota Bar and this opinion is limited to the laws of the State of Minnesota and the federal laws of the United States insofar as they bear on the matters covered hereby.
I hereby consent to the reference to me in the Prospectus under the caption Legal Opinions and to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to a Current Report on Form 8-K to be filed by the Company on or about August 3, 2012, which will be incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement. In giving the foregoing consents, I do not thereby admit that I come within the category of persons whose consent is required under Section 7 of the Securities Act or the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20121203080320.txt.gz
TIME:20121203080320
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
Decemb
er 3
, 2012
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrant's telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS
Minnesota Powers Large Power taconite customers, subject to demand nomination requirements, nominate minimum demand levels for their energy needs each December, March, and August for the following four-month periods. Based on nominations received on December 1, 2012, Minnesota Powers Large Power taconite customers are expected to operate at full demand levels for January through April, 2013.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
3,
2012
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 26 of our 2011 Form 10K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Current Report on Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
3,
2012
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
3,
2012


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20121211080227.txt.gz
TIME:20121211080227
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
December 11, 2012 (December 10, 2012)
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
On October 26, 2012, the ALLETE Board of Directors (the "Board") elected George Goldfarb to serve on the Board and on December 10, 2012, Mr. Goldfarb was appointed to the Audit Committee of the Board, effective immediately. Mr. Goldfarb will receive compensation for his Board service consistent with the compensation received by ALLETEs other non-employee directors, as disclosed in Exhibit 10(n)(10) to ALLETEs Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011. Mr. Goldfarb, 53, is the President of Maurices, Inc. (Maurices), a wholly-owned subsidiary of Ascena Retail Group, Inc. Mr. Goldfarb has been with Maurices since 1985 and also serves on the University of Minnesota-Duluths Labovitz School of Business and Economics Board, the US Bank Advisory Board, the Duluth Legacy Endowment Fund Board, and the Woodland Hills Board.
SECTION 7  REGULATION FD
ALLETE, Inc. (ALLETE) expects to earn between $2.58 and $2.78 per share on net income of $100 million to $110 million in 2013.
Significant assumptions impacting ALLETEs 2013 earnings guidance include:
ALLETE has long-term objectives of achieving minimum average earnings per share growth of five percent per year (using 2010 as a base year) and maintaining a competitive dividend payout.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with the Companys disclosures under the heading Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
11
, 2012
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 26 of our 2011 Form 10K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Current Report on Form 8K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
11
, 2012
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated December
11
, 2012


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20130125080431.txt.gz
TIME:20130125080431
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
January 25, 2013 (January 21, 2013)
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 5  CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with the Companys disclosures under the heading Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K Dated January 25, 2013
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results and performance to differ from results or performance anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 26 of our 2011 Form 10K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Current Report on Form 8K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to advise interested parties of the factors that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K Dated January 25, 2013
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K Dated January 25, 2013


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20130301080650.txt.gz
TIME:20130301080650
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
March 1, 2013
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 8 - OTHER EVENTS
Minnesota Powers Large Power taconite customers, subject to demand nomination requirements, nominate demand levels for their energy needs each December, March, and August for the following four-month periods. Based on nominations received on March 1, 2013, Minnesota Powers Large Power taconite customers are expected to operate at full demand levels for May through August, 2013.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 1, 2013
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there is no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K, in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results or performance to differ from those anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 27 of our 201
2 Form 10K. Any f
orward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can it assess the impact of each of these factors on the businesses of ALLETE or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Current Report on Form 8K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to identify the risks and uncertainties that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 1, 2013
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated March 1, 2013


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20130402160459.txt.gz
TIME:20130402160459
EVENTS:	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
April 2, 2013
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 2 - FINANCIAL INFORMATION
On April 2, 2013, ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) issued and sold $150 million principal amount of the Companys First Mortgage Bonds (the Bonds). The Bonds were sold in reliance on an exemption from registration under Section 4(a)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, to certain institutional accredited investors in the private placement market. The Bonds were issued in three series as follows:
The terms of the Bonds were established in the Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 1, 2013 (the Supplemental Indenture), between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon, as corporate trustee, and Philip L. Watson, as co-trustee, to the Companys utility mortgage. Interest on the Bonds is payable semi-annually on April 15 and October 15 of each year, commencing on October 15, 2013. The Company has the option to prepay all or a portion of the 1.83 percent Bonds at its discretion at any time, subject to a make-whole provision. The Company has the option to prepay all or a portion of the 3.30 percent Bonds at its discretion at any time prior to April 15, 2028, subject to a make-whole provision, and at any time on or after April 15, 2028, at par, including, in each case, accrued and unpaid interest. The Company also has the option to prepay all or a portion of the 4.21 percent Bonds at its discretion at any time prior to April 15, 2043, subject to a make-whole provision, and at any time on or after April 15, 2043, at par, including, in each case, accrued and unpaid interest. The Bonds are subject to additional terms and conditions of the Companys utility mortgage. Proceeds from the sale of the Bonds will be used to fund utility capital investments, repay debt, and/or for general corporate purposes.
The description set forth above is qualified in its entirety by reference to the Supplemental Indenture which is attached hereto as Exhibit 4 and is incorporated by reference herein.
SECTION 9 - FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS
(d) Exhibits
Exhibit Number
    
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with the Companys disclosures under the heading Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
ALLETE Form 8-K Dated April 2, 2013
1
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there can be no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K , in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results or performance to differ from those anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 27 of our
2012
Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can we assess the impact of each of these factors on our businesses or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Current Report on Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to identify the risks and uncertainties that may affect our business.
ALLETE Form 8-K Dated April 2, 2013
2
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
ALLETE, Inc.
ALLETE Form 8-K Dated April 2, 2013
3

Exhibit 4
ALLETE, Inc.
(formerly Minnesota Power & Light Company
and formerly Minnesota Power, Inc.)
TO
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON
(formerly The Bank of New York
(formerly Irving Trust Company))
AND
PHILIP L. WATSON
(successor to Richard H. West, J. A. Austin, E. J. McCabe,
D. W. May, J. A. Vaughan, W. T. Cunningham and Douglas J. MacInnes and Ming Ryan)
Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture
Providing, among other things, for
First Mortgage Bonds, 1.83% Series due April 15, 2018
(Forty-fifth Series),
First Mortgage Bonds, 3.30% Series due October 15, 2028
(Forty-sixth Series)
and
First Mortgage Bonds, 4.21% Series due October 15, 2043
(Forty-seventh Series)
Dated as of
April 1, 2013
1
THIRTY-FOURTH SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE
THIS INDENTURE,
dated as of April 1, 2013, by and between ALLETE, Inc. (formerly Minnesota Power & Light Company and formerly Minnesota Power, Inc.), a corporation of the State of Minnesota, whose post office address is 30 West Superior Street, Duluth, Minnesota 55802 (hereinafter sometimes called the Company), and The Bank of New York Mellon (formerly The Bank of New York (formerly Irving Trust Company)), a corporation of the State of New York, whose post office address is 101 Barclay Street, New York, New York 10286 (hereinafter sometimes called the Corporate Trustee), and PHILIP L. WATSON (successor to Richard H. West, J. A. Austin, E. J. McCabe, D. W. May, J. A. Vaughan, W. T. Cunningham, Douglas J. MacInnes and Ming Ryan), whose post office address is c/o The Bank of New York Mellon, 101 Barclay Street, New York, New York 10286 (said Philip L. Watson being hereinafter sometimes called the Co-Trustee and the Corporate Trustee and the Co-Trustee being hereinafter together sometimes called the Trustees), as Trustees under the Mortgage and Deed of Trust, dated as of September 1, 1945, between the Company and Irving Trust Company and Richard H. West, as Trustees, securing bonds issued and to be issued as provided therein (hereinafter sometimes called the Mortgage), reference to which Mortgage is hereby made, this indenture (hereinafter sometimes called the Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture) being supplemental thereto:
WHEREAS, the Mortgage was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of October 16, 1957, was executed and delivered under which J. A. Austin succeeded Richard H. West as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of April 4, 1967, was executed and delivered under which E. J. McCabe in turn succeeded J. A. Austin as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, under the Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1, 1975, to which reference is hereinafter made, D. W. May in turn succeeded E. J. McCabe as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of June 25, 1984, was executed and delivered under which J. A. Vaughan in turn succeeded D. W. May as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of July 27, 1988, was executed and delivered under which W. T. Cunningham in turn succeeded J. A. Vaughan as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, on May 12, 1998, the Company filed Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation with the Secretary of State of the State of Minnesota changing its name from Minnesota Power & Light Company to Minnesota Power, Inc. effective May 27, 1998; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of April 15, 1999, was executed and delivered under which Douglas J. MacInnes in turn succeeded W. T. Cunningham as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, on May 8, 2001, the Company filed Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation with the Secretary of State of the State of Minnesota changing its name from Minnesota Power, Inc. to ALLETE, Inc.; and
2
WHEREAS, under the Thirty-second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 1, 2010, to which reference is hereinafter made, Ming Ryan in turn succeeded Douglas J. MacInnes as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage; and
WHEREAS, an instrument, dated as of August 1, 2012, was executed and delivered under which Philip L. Watson in turn succeeded Ming Ryan as Co-Trustee under the Mortgage effective at the close of business on August 6, 2012, and such instrument was filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, by the Mortgage the Company covenanted, among other things, that it would execute and deliver such supplemental indenture or indentures and such further instruments and do such further acts as might be necessary or proper to carry out more effectually the purposes of the Mortgage and to make subject to the lien of the Mortgage any property thereafter acquired and intended to be subject to the lien thereof; and
WHEREAS, for said purposes, among others, the Company executed and delivered the following indentures supplemental to the Mortgage:
3
which supplemental indentures were filed and recorded in various official records in the State of Minnesota; and
WHEREAS, the Company has heretofore issued, in accordance with the provisions of the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, the following series of First Mortgage Bonds:
4
which bonds are also hereinafter sometimes called bonds of the First through Forty-fourth Series, respectively; and
WHEREAS, Section 8 of the Mortgage provides that the form of each series of bonds (other than the First Series) issued thereunder and of coupons to be attached to coupon bonds of such series shall be established by Resolution of the Board of Directors of the Company and that the form of such series, as established by said Board of Directors, shall specify the descriptive title of the bonds and various other terms thereof, and may also contain such provisions not inconsistent with the provisions of the Mortgage as the Board of Directors may, in its discretion, cause to be inserted therein expressing or referring to the terms and conditions upon which such bonds are to be issued and/or secured under the Mortgage; and
WHEREAS, Section 120 of the Mortgage provides, among other things, that any power, privilege or right expressly or impliedly reserved to or in any way conferred upon the Company by any provision of the Mortgage, whether such power, privilege or right is in any way restricted or is unrestricted, may (to the extent permitted by law) be in whole or in part waived or surrendered or subjected to any restriction if at the time unrestricted or to additional restriction if already restricted, and the Company may enter into any further covenants, limitations or restrictions for the benefit of any one or more series of bonds issued thereunder, or the Company may cure any ambiguity contained therein, or in any supplemental indenture, or may establish the terms and provisions of any series of bonds (other than said First Series) by an instrument in writing executed and acknowledged by the Company in such manner as would be necessary to entitle a conveyance of real estate to record in all of the states in which any property at the time subject to the lien of the Mortgage shall be situated; and
WHEREAS, the Company now desires to create three new series of bonds and (pursuant to the provisions of Section 120 of the Mortgage) to add to its covenants and agreements contained in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, certain other covenants and agreements to be observed by it and to alter and amend in certain respects the covenants and provisions contained in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented; and
WHEREAS, the execution and delivery by the Company of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, and the terms of the bonds of the Forty-fifth Series, the Forty-sixth Series and the Forty-seventh Series, hereinafter referred to, have been duly authorized by the Board of Directors of the Company by appropriate resolutions of said Board of Directors;
NOW, THEREFORE, THIS INDENTURE WITNESSETH:
That the Company, in consideration of the premises and of One Dollar to it duly paid by the Trustees at or before the ensealing and delivery of these presents, the receipt whereof is hereby acknowledged, and in further evidence of assurance of the estate, title and rights of the Trustees and in order further to secure the payment of both the principal of and interest and premium, if any, on the bonds
5
from time to time issued under the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, according to their tenor and effect and the performance of all the provisions of the Mortgage (including any instruments supplemental thereto and any modification made as in the Mortgage provided) and of said bonds, hereby grants, bargains, sells, releases, conveys, assigns, transfers, mortgages, pledges, sets over and confirms (subject, however, to Excepted Encumbrances) unto The Bank of New York Mellon and Philip L. Watson, as Trustees under the Mortgage, and to their successor or successors in said trust, and to said Trustees and their successors and assigns forever, all property, real, personal and mixed, of the kind or nature specifically mentioned in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, or of any other kind or nature acquired by the Company after the date of the execution and delivery of the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented (except any herein or in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, expressly excepted), now owned or, subject to the provisions of subsection (I) of Section 87 of the Mortgage, hereafter acquired by the Company (by purchase, consolidation, merger, donation, construction, erection or in any other way) and wheresoever situated, including (without in anywise limiting or impairing by the enumeration of the same the scope and intent of the foregoing or of any general description contained in this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture) all lands, power sites, flowage rights, water rights, water locations, water appropriations, ditches, flumes, reservoirs, reservoir sites, canals, raceways, dams, dam sites, aqueducts, and all other rights or means for appropriating, conveying, storing and supplying water; all rights of way and roads; all plants for the generation of electricity by steam, water and/or other power; all power houses, gas plants, street lighting systems, standards and other equipment incidental thereto, telephone, radio and television systems, air-conditioning systems and equipment incidental thereto, water works, water systems, steam heat and hot water plants, substations, lines, service and supply systems, bridges, culverts, tracks, ice or refrigeration plants and equipment, offices, buildings and other structures and the equipment thereof; all machinery, engines, boilers, dynamos, electric, gas and other machines, regulators, meters, transformers, generators, motors, electrical, gas and mechanical appliances, conduits, cables, water, steam heat, gas or other pipes, gas mains and pipes, service pipes, fittings, valves and connections, pole and transmission lines, wires, cables, tools, implements, apparatus, furniture and chattels; all municipal and other franchises, consents or permits; all lines for the transmission and distribution of electric current, gas, steam heat or water for any purpose including towers, poles, wires, cables, pipes, conduits, ducts and all apparatus for use in connection therewith; all real estate, lands, easements, servitudes, licenses, permits, franchises, privileges, rights of way and other rights in or relating to real estate or the occupancy of the same and (except as herein or in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, expressly excepted) all the right, title and interest of the Company in and to all other property of any kind or nature appertaining to and/or used and/or occupied and/or enjoyed in connection with any property hereinbefore or in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, described.
TOGETHER WITH all and singular the tenements, hereditaments, prescriptions, servitudes and appurtenances belonging or in anywise appertaining to the aforesaid property or any part thereof, with the reversion and reversions, remainder and remainders and (subject to the provisions of Section 57 of the Mortgage) the tolls, rents, revenues, issues, earnings, income, product and profits thereof, and all the estate, right, title and interest and claim whatsoever, at law as well as in equity, which the Company now has or may hereafter acquire in and to the aforesaid property and franchises and every part and parcel thereof.
IT IS HEREBY AGREED by the Company that, subject to the provisions of subsection (I) of Section 87 of the Mortgage, all the property, rights, and franchises acquired by the Company (by purchase, consolidation, merger, donation, construction, erection or in any other way) after the date hereof, except any herein or in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, expressly excepted, shall be and are as fully granted and conveyed hereby and by the Mortgage and as fully embraced within the lien hereof and the lien of the Mortgage as if such property, rights and franchises were now owned by the Company and were specifically described herein or in the Mortgage and conveyed hereby or thereby.
6
PROVIDED that the following are not and are not intended to be now or hereafter granted, bargained, sold, released, conveyed, assigned, transferred, mortgaged, hypothecated, affected, pledged, set over or confirmed hereunder and are hereby expressly excepted from the lien and operation of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture and from the lien and operation of the Mortgage, namely: (1) cash, shares of stock, bonds, notes and other obligations and other securities not hereafter specifically pledged, paid, deposited, delivered or held under the Mortgage or covenanted so to be; (2) merchandise, equipment, apparatus, materials or supplies held for the purpose of sale or other disposition in the usual course of business; fuel, oil and similar materials and supplies consumable in the operation of any of the properties of the Company; all aircraft, rolling stock, trolley coaches, buses, motor coaches, automobiles and other vehicles and materials and supplies held for the purpose of repairing or replacing (in whole or part) any of the same; all timber, minerals, mineral rights and royalties; (3) bills, notes and accounts receivable, judgments, demands and choses in action, and all contracts, leases and operating agreements not specifically pledged under the Mortgage or covenanted so to be; the Companys contractual rights or other interest in or with respect to tires not owned by the Company; (4) the last day of the term of any lease or leasehold which may hereafter become subject to the lien of the Mortgage; (5) electric energy, gas, steam, ice, and other materials or products generated, manufactured, produced or purchased by the Company for sale, distribution or use in the ordinary course of its business; and (6) the Companys franchise to be a corporation; provided, however, that the property and rights expressly excepted from the lien and operation of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture and from the lien and operation of the Mortgage in the above subdivisions (2) and (3) shall (to the extent permitted by law) cease to be so excepted in the event and as of the date that either or both of the Trustees or a receiver or trustee shall enter upon and take possession of the Mortgaged and Pledged Property in the manner provided in Article XIII of the Mortgage by reason of the occurrence of a Default as defined in Section 65 thereof.
TO HAVE AND TO HOLD all such properties, real, personal and mixed, granted, bargained, sold, released, conveyed, assigned, transferred, mortgaged, pledged, set over or confirmed by the Company as aforesaid, or intended so to be, unto the Trustees and their successors and assigns forever.
IN TRUST NEVERTHELESS, for the same purposes and upon the same terms, trusts and conditions and subject to and with the same provisos and covenants as are set forth in the Mortgage, as supplemented, this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture being supplemental thereto.
AND IT IS HEREBY COVENANTED by the Company that all the terms, conditions, provisos, covenants and provisions contained in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, shall affect and apply to the property hereinbefore described and conveyed and to the estate, rights, obligations and duties of the Company and Trustees and the beneficiaries of the trust with respect to said property, and to the Trustees and their successors in the trust in the same manner and with the same effect as if said property had been owned by the Company at the time of the execution of the Mortgage, and had been specifically and at length described in and conveyed to said Trustees by the Mortgage as a part of the property therein stated to be conveyed.
The Company further covenants and agrees to and with the Trustees and their successors in said trust under the Mortgage as follows:
ARTICLE I
Forty-fifth Series of Bonds
SECTION 1. There shall be a series of bonds designated 1.83% Series due April 15, 2018 (herein sometimes referred to as the Forty-fifth Series), each of which shall also bear the descriptive
7
title First Mortgage Bond, and the form thereof, which shall be established by Resolution of the Board of Directors of the Company, shall contain suitable provisions with respect to the matters hereinafter in this Section specified. Bonds of the Forty-fifth Series shall be dated as in Section 10 of the Mortgage provided, mature on April 15, 2018 (the Stated Maturity), be issued as fully registered bonds in denominations of One Thousand Dollars and, at the option of the Company, in any multiple or multiples of One Thousand Dollars (the exercise of such option to be evidenced by the execution and delivery thereof) and bear interest from April 2, 2013 (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve thirty-day months) at the rate of 1.83% per annum, payable semi-annually on April 15 and October 15 of each year, commencing October 15, 2013, the principal of and interest on each said bond to be payable at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for public and private debts.
Any payment of principal of or interest on any bond of the Forty-fifth Series that is due on a date other than a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day without including the additional days elapsed in the computation of the interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day; provided that if the maturity date of any such bond of the Forty-fifth Series is a date other than a Business Day, the payment otherwise due on such maturity date shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day and shall include the additional days elapsed in the computation of interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day.
(I)    
Optional Prepayment.
The Company may, at its option, upon notice as provided below, prepay at any time all, or from time to time any part of, the bonds of the Forty-fifth Series at 100% of the principal amount so prepaid, and the Make-Whole Amount determined for the Settlement Date specified by the Company in such notice with respect to such principal amount. The Company will give each registered owner of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series written notice (by first class mail or such other method as may be agreed upon by the Company and such registered owner) of each optional prepayment under this subsection (I) mailed or otherwise given not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for such prepayment, to each such registered owner at his, her or its last address appearing on the registry books. Each such notice shall specify the Settlement Date (which shall be a Business Day), the aggregate principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-fifth Series to be prepaid on such date, the principal amount of each bond held by such registered owner to be prepaid (determined in accordance with subsection (II) of this section), and the interest to be paid on the Settlement Date with respect to such principal amount being prepaid, and shall be accompanied by a certificate signed by a Senior Financial Officer as to the estimated Make-Whole Amount due in connection with such prepayment (calculated as if the date of such notice were the date of the prepayment), setting forth the details of such computation. Two Business Days prior to such Settlement Date, the Company shall send to each registered owner of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series (by first class mail or by such other method as may be agreed upon by the Company and such registered owner) a certificate signed by a Senior Financial Officer specifying the calculation of such Make-Whole Amount as of the specified Settlement Date. As promptly as practicable after the giving of the notice and the sending of the certificates provided in this subsection, the Company shall provide a copy of each to the Corporate Trustee. The Trustees shall be under no duty to inquire into, may conclusively presume the correctness of, and shall be fully protected in relying upon the information set forth in any such notice or certificate.
(II)    
Allocation of Partial Prepayments.
In the case of each partial prepayment of the bonds of the Forty-fifth Series, the principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-fifth Series to be prepaid shall be allocated by the Company among all of the bonds of the Forty-fifth Series at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof not theretofore called for prepayment.
8
(III)     
Maturity; Surrender, Etc.
In the case of each notice of prepayment of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series pursuant to this section, if cash sufficient to pay the principal amount to be prepaid on the Settlement Date (which shall be a Business Day), together with interest on such principal amount accrued to such date and the applicable Make-Whole Amount, if any, is not paid as agreed upon by the Company and each registered owner of the affected bonds, or, to the extent that there is no such agreement entered into with one or more such owners, deposited with the Corporate Trustee on or before the Settlement Date, then such notice of prepayment shall be of no effect. If such cash is so paid or deposited, such principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-fifth Series shall be deemed paid for all purposes and interest on such principal amount shall cease to accrue. In case the Company pays any registered owner pursuant to an agreement with that registered owner, the Company shall notify the Corporate Trustee as promptly as practicable of such agreement and payment, and shall furnish the Corporate Trustee with a copy of such agreement; in case the Company deposits any cash with the Corporate Trustee, the Company shall provide therewith a list of the registered owners and the amount of such cash each registered owner is to receive. The Trustees shall be under no duty to inquire into, may conclusively presume the correctness of, and shall be fully protected in relying upon the information set forth in any such notice, list or agreement, and shall not be chargeable with knowledge of any of the contents of any such agreement. Any bond prepaid in full shall be surrendered to the Company or the Corporate Trustee for cancellation on or before the Settlement Date or, with respect to cash deposited with the Corporate Trustee, before payment of such cash by the Corporate Trustee; any bond prepaid in part shall be surrendered to the Company or the Corporate Trustee on or before the Settlement Date (unless otherwise agreed between the Company and the registered owner) or, with respect to cash deposited with the Corporate Trustee before payment of such cash by the Corporate Trustee, for a substitute bond in the principal amount remaining unpaid.
(IV)    
Make-Whole Amount.
Make-Whole Amount means, with respect to any bond of the Forty-fifth Series, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the Discounted Value of the Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to the Called Principal of such bond of the Forty-fifth Series over the amount of such Called Principal, provided that the Make-Whole Amount may in no event be less than zero. For the purposes of determining the Make-Whole Amount, the following terms have the following meanings:
Business Day means any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in New York City are required or authorized to be closed.
Called Principal means, with respect to any bond of the Forty-fifth Series, the principal of such bond that is to be prepaid pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Discounted Value means, with respect to the Called Principal of any bond of the Forty-fifth Series, the amount obtained by discounting all Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to such Called Principal from their respective scheduled due dates to the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in accordance with accepted financial practice and at a discount factor (applied on the same periodic basis as that on which interest on the bonds of the Forty-fifth Series is payable) equal to the Reinvestment Yield with respect to such Called Principal.
Reinvestment Yield means, with respect to the Called Principal of any bond of the Forty-fifth Series, 0.5% over the yield to maturity implied by (i) the yields reported as of 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, on the display designated as Page PX1 on the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service (or such other display on the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service having the same information as PX1 if PX1 is replaced by the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service) for the most recently issued actively traded on-the-run
9
benchmark U.S. Treasury securities having a maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date, or (ii) if such yields are not reported as of such time or the yields reported as of such time are not ascertainable (including by way of interpolation), the Treasury Constant Maturity Series Yields reported, for the latest day for which such yields have been so reported as of the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (519) (or any comparable successor publication) for actively traded U.S. Treasury securities having a constant maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date. Such implied yield will be determined, if necessary, by (a) converting U.S. Treasury bill quotations to bond equivalent yields in accordance with accepted financial practice and (b) interpolating linearly between (1) the most recently issued, actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and greater than such Remaining Average Life and (2) the most recently issued, actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and less than such Remaining Average Life. The Reinvestment Yield shall be rounded to the number of decimal places as appears in the interest rate of the applicable bond of the Forty-fifth Series.
Remaining Average Life means, with respect to any Called Principal, the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) obtained by dividing (i) such Called Principal into (ii) the sum of the products obtained by multiplying (a) the principal component of each Remaining Scheduled Payment with respect to such Called Principal by (b) the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) that will elapse between the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal and the scheduled due date of such Remaining Scheduled Payment.
Remaining Scheduled Payments means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Bond of the Forty-fifth Series, all payments of such Called Principal and interest thereon that would be due after the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal if no payment of such Called Principal were made prior to its scheduled due date, provided that if such Settlement Date is not a date on which interest payments are due to be made under the terms of the bonds of the Forty-fifth Series, then the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment will be reduced by the amount of interest accrued to such Settlement Date and required to be paid on such Settlement Date pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Settlement Date means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Bond of the Forty-fifth Series, the date on which such Called Principal is to be prepaid pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Senior Financial Officer means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or comptroller of the Company.
(V)    At the option of the registered owner, any bonds of the Forty-fifth Series, upon surrender thereof for cancellation at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, together with a written instrument of transfer wherever required by the Company duly executed by the registered owner or by his duly authorized attorney, shall (subject to the provisions of Section 12 of the Mortgage) be exchangeable for a like aggregate unpaid principal amount of bonds of the same series of other authorized denominations.
Bonds of the Forty-fifth Series shall be transferable (subject to the provisions of Section 12 of the Mortgage) at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York. The Company shall not be required to make transfers or exchanges of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series for a period of ten (10) days next preceding any designation of bonds of said series to be prepaid, and the Company shall not be required to make transfers or exchanges of any bonds of said series designated in whole or in part for prepayment.
10
Upon any exchange or transfer of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series, the Company may make a charge therefor sufficient to reimburse it for any tax or taxes or other governmental charge, as provided in Section 12 of the Mortgage, but the Company hereby waives any right to make a charge in addition thereto for any exchange or transfer of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series.
After the delivery of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture and upon compliance with the applicable provisions of the Mortgage and receipt of consideration therefor by the Company, there shall be an initial issue of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series for the aggregate principal amount of $50,000,000.
ARTICLE II
Forty-sixth Series of Bonds
SECTION 1. There shall be a series of bonds designated 3.30% Series due October 15, 2028 (herein sometimes referred to as the Forty-sixth Series), each of which shall also bear the descriptive title First Mortgage Bond, and the form thereof, which shall be established by Resolution of the Board of Directors of the Company, shall contain suitable provisions with respect to the matters hereinafter in this Section specified. Bonds of the Forty-sixth Series shall be dated as in Section 10 of the Mortgage provided, mature on October 15, 2028 (the Stated Maturity), be issued as fully registered bonds in denominations of One Thousand Dollars and, at the option of the Company, in any multiple or multiples of One Thousand Dollars (the exercise of such option to be evidenced by the execution and delivery thereof) and bear interest from April 2, 2013 (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve thirty-day months) at the rate of 3.30% per annum, payable semi-annually on April 15 and October 15 of each year, commencing October 15, 2013, the principal of and interest on each said bond to be payable at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for public and private debts.
Any payment of principal of or interest on any bond of the Forty-sixth Series that is due on a date other than a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day without including the additional days elapsed in the computation of the interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day; provided that if the maturity date of any such bond of the Forty-sixth Series is a date other than a Business Day, the payment otherwise due on such maturity date shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day and shall include the additional days elapsed in the computation of interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day.
(I)    
Optional Prepayment.
At any time prior to April 15, 2028 (six months prior to the Stated Maturity), the Company may, at its option, upon notice as provided below, prepay at any time all, or from time to time any part of, the bonds of the Forty-sixth Series at 100% of the principal amount so prepaid, and the Make-Whole Amount determined for the Settlement Date specified by the Company in such notice with respect to such principal amount. The Company will give each registered owner of bonds of the Forty-sixth Series written notice (by first class mail or such other method as may be agreed upon by the Company and such registered owner) of each optional prepayment under this subsection (I) mailed or otherwise given not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for such prepayment, to each such registered owner at his, her or its last address appearing on the registry books. Each such notice shall specify the Settlement Date (which shall be a Business Day), the aggregate principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-sixth Series to be prepaid on such date, the principal amount of each bond held by such registered owner to be prepaid (determined in accordance with subsection (II) of this section), and the interest to be paid on the Settlement Date with respect to such principal amount being prepaid, and shall be accompanied by a certificate signed by a Senior Financial Officer as to the
11
estimated Make-Whole Amount due in connection with such prepayment (calculated as if the date of such notice were the date of the prepayment), setting forth the details of such computation. Two Business Days prior to such Settlement Date, the Company shall send to each registered owner of bonds of the Forty-sixth Series (by first class mail or by such other method as may be agreed upon by the Company and such registered owner) a certificate signed by a Senior Financial Officer specifying the calculation of such Make-Whole Amount as of the specified Settlement Date. As promptly as practicable after the giving of the notice and the sending of the certificates provided in this subsection, the Company shall provide a copy of each to the Corporate Trustee. The Trustees shall be under no duty to inquire into, may conclusively presume the correctness of, and shall be fully protected in relying upon the information set forth in any such notice or certificate.
At any time on or after April 15, 2028 , the bonds of the Forty-sixth series will be redeemable at the option of the Company, in whole or in part, on not less than 30 nor more than 60 days notice prior to the Settlement Date, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-sixth Series to be redeemed, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon to the Settlement Date. The bonds of the Forty-sixth Series are not otherwise subject to voluntary or optional prepayment.
(II)    
Allocation of Partial Prepayments.
In the case of each partial prepayment of the bonds of the Forty-sixth Series, the principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-sixth Series to be prepaid shall be allocated by the Company among all of the bonds of the Forty-sixth Series at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof not theretofore called for prepayment.
(III)     
Maturity; Surrender, Etc.
In the case of each notice of prepayment of bonds of the Forty-sixth Series pursuant to this section, if cash sufficient to pay the principal amount to be prepaid on the Settlement Date (which shall be a Business Day), together with interest on such principal amount accrued to such date and the applicable Make-Whole Amount, if any, is not paid as agreed upon by the Company and each registered owner of the affected bonds, or, to the extent that there is no such agreement entered into with one or more such owners, deposited with the Corporate Trustee on or before the Settlement Date, then such notice of prepayment shall be of no effect. If such cash is so paid or deposited, such principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-sixth Series shall be deemed paid for all purposes and interest on such principal amount shall cease to accrue. In case the Company pays any registered owner pursuant to an agreement with that registered owner, the Company shall notify the Corporate Trustee as promptly as practicable of such agreement and payment, and shall furnish the Corporate Trustee with a copy of such agreement; in case the Company deposits any cash with the Corporate Trustee, the Company shall provide therewith a list of the registered owners and the amount of such cash each registered owner is to receive. The Trustees shall be under no duty to inquire into, may conclusively presume the correctness of, and shall be fully protected in relying upon the information set forth in any such notice, list or agreement, and shall not be chargeable with knowledge of any of the contents of any such agreement. Any bond prepaid in full shall be surrendered to the Company or the Corporate Trustee for cancellation on or before the Settlement Date or, with respect to cash deposited with the Corporate Trustee, before payment of such cash by the Corporate Trustee; any bond prepaid in part shall be surrendered to the Company or the Corporate Trustee on or before the Settlement Date (unless otherwise agreed between the Company and the registered owner) or, with respect to cash deposited with the Corporate Trustee before payment of such cash by the Corporate Trustee, for a substitute bond in the principal amount remaining unpaid.
(IV)    
Make-Whole Amount.
Make-Whole Amount means, with respect to any bond of the Forty-sixth Series, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the Discounted Value of the Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to
12
the Called Principal of such bond of the Forty-sixth Series over the amount of such Called Principal, provided that the Make-Whole Amount may in no event be less than zero. For the purposes of determining the Make-Whole Amount, the following terms have the following meanings:
Business Day means any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in New York City are required or authorized to be closed.
Called Principal means, with respect to any bond of the Forty-sixth Series, the principal of such bond that is to be prepaid pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Discounted Value means, with respect to the Called Principal of any bond of the Forty-sixth Series, the amount obtained by discounting all Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to such Called Principal from their respective scheduled due dates to the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in accordance with accepted financial practice and at a discount factor (applied on the same periodic basis as that on which interest on the bonds of the Forty-sixth Series is payable) equal to the Reinvestment Yield with respect to such Called Principal.
Reinvestment Yield means, with respect to the Called Principal of any bond of the Forty-sixth Series, 0.5% over the yield to maturity implied by (i) the yields reported as of 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, on the display designated as Page PX1 on the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service (or such other display on the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service having the same information as PX1 if PX1 is replaced by the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service) for the most recently issued actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury securities having a maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date, or (ii) if such yields are not reported as of such time or the yields reported as of such time are not ascertainable (including by way of interpolation), the Treasury Constant Maturity Series Yields reported, for the latest day for which such yields have been so reported as of the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (519) (or any comparable successor publication) for actively traded U.S. Treasury securities having a constant maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date. Such implied yield will be determined, if necessary, by (a) converting U.S. Treasury bill quotations to bond equivalent yields in accordance with accepted financial practice and (b) interpolating linearly between (1) the most recently issued, actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and greater than such Remaining Average Life and (2) the most recently issued, actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and less than such Remaining Average Life. The Reinvestment Yield shall be rounded to the number of decimal places as appears in the interest rate of the applicable bond of the Forty-sixth Series.
Remaining Average Life means, with respect to any Called Principal, the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) obtained by dividing (i) such Called Principal into (ii) the sum of the products obtained by multiplying (a) the principal component of each Remaining Scheduled Payment with respect to such Called Principal by (b) the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) that will elapse between the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal and the scheduled due date of such Remaining Scheduled Payment.
Remaining Scheduled Payments means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Bond of the Forty-sixth Series, all payments of such Called Principal and interest thereon that would be due after the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal if no payment of such Called Principal were made prior to its scheduled due date, provided that if such Settlement Date is not a date on which interest payments are due to be made under the terms of the bonds of the Forty-sixth Series, then the amount of
13
the next succeeding scheduled interest payment will be reduced by the amount of interest accrued to such Settlement Date and required to be paid on such Settlement Date pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Settlement Date means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Bond of the Forty-sixth Series, the date on which such Called Principal is to be prepaid pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Senior Financial Officer means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or comptroller of the Company.
(V)    At the option of the registered owner, any bonds of the Forty-sixth Series, upon surrender thereof for cancellation at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, together with a written instrument of transfer wherever required by the Company duly executed by the registered owner or by his duly authorized attorney, shall (subject to the provisions of Section 12 of the Mortgage) be exchangeable for a like aggregate unpaid principal amount of bonds of the same series of other authorized denominations.
Bonds of the Forty-sixth Series shall be transferable (subject to the provisions of Section 12 of the Mortgage) at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York. The Company shall not be required to make transfers or exchanges of bonds of the Forty-sixth Series for a period of ten (10) days next preceding any designation of bonds of said series to be prepaid, and the Company shall not be required to make transfers or exchanges of any bonds of said series designated in whole or in part for prepayment.
Upon any exchange or transfer of bonds of the Forty-sixth Series, the Company may make a charge therefor sufficient to reimburse it for any tax or taxes or other governmental charge, as provided in Section 12 of the Mortgage, but the Company hereby waives any right to make a charge in addition thereto for any exchange or transfer of bonds of the Forty-sixth Series.
After the delivery of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture and upon compliance with the applicable provisions of the Mortgage and receipt of consideration therefor by the Company, there shall be an initial issue of bonds of the Forty-sixth Series for the aggregate principal amount of $40,000,000.
ARTICLE III
Forty-seventh Series of Bonds
SECTION 1. There shall be a series of bonds designated 4.21% Series due October 15, 2043 (herein sometimes referred to as the Forty-seventh Series), each of which shall also bear the descriptive title First Mortgage Bond, and the form thereof, which shall be established by Resolution of the Board of Directors of the Company, shall contain suitable provisions with respect to the matters hereinafter in this Section specified. Bonds of the Forty-seventh Series shall be dated as in Section 10 of the Mortgage provided, mature on October 15, 2043 (the Stated Maturity), be issued as fully registered bonds in denominations of One Thousand Dollars and, at the option of the Company, in any multiple or multiples of One Thousand Dollars (the exercise of such option to be evidenced by the execution and delivery thereof) and bear interest from April 2, 2013 (computed on the basis of a 360-day year of twelve thirty-day months) at the rate of 4.21% per annum, payable semi-annually on April 15 and October 15 of each year, commencing October 15, 2013, the principal of and interest on each said bond to be payable at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, in such coin or currency of the United States of America as at the time of payment is legal tender for public and private debts.
14
Any payment of principal of or interest on any bond of the Forty-seventh Series that is due on a date other than a Business Day shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day without including the additional days elapsed in the computation of the interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day; provided that if the maturity date of any such bond of the Forty-seventh Series is a date other than a Business Day, the payment otherwise due on such maturity date shall be made on the next succeeding Business Day and shall include the additional days elapsed in the computation of interest payable on such next succeeding Business Day.
(I)    
Optional Prepayment.
At any time prior to April 15, 2043 (six months prior to the Stated Maturity), the Company may, at its option, upon notice as provided below, prepay at any time all, or from time to time any part of, the bonds of the Forty-seventh Series at 100% of the principal amount so prepaid, and the Make-Whole Amount determined for the Settlement Date specified by the Company in such notice with respect to such principal amount. The Company will give each registered owner of bonds of the Forty-seventh Series written notice (by first class mail or such other method as may be agreed upon by the Company and such registered owner) of each optional prepayment under this subsection (I) mailed or otherwise given not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days prior to the date fixed for such prepayment, to each such registered owner at his, her or its last address appearing on the registry books. Each such notice shall specify the Settlement Date (which shall be a Business Day), the aggregate principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-seventh Series to be prepaid on such date, the principal amount of each bond held by such registered owner to be prepaid (determined in accordance with subsection (II) of this section), and the interest to be paid on the Settlement Date with respect to such principal amount being prepaid, and shall be accompanied by a certificate signed by a Senior Financial Officer as to the estimated Make-Whole Amount due in connection with such prepayment (calculated as if the date of such notice were the date of the prepayment), setting forth the details of such computation. Two Business Days prior to such Settlement Date, the Company shall send to each registered owner of bonds of the Forty-seventh Series (by first class mail or by such other method as may be agreed upon by the Company and such registered owner) a certificate signed by a Senior Financial Officer specifying the calculation of such Make-Whole Amount as of the specified Settlement Date. As promptly as practicable after the giving of the notice and the sending of the certificates provided in this subsection, the Company shall provide a copy of each to the Corporate Trustee. The Trustees shall be under no duty to inquire into, may conclusively presume the correctness of, and shall be fully protected in relying upon the information set forth in any such notice or certificate.
At any time on or after April 15, 2043, the bonds of the Forty-seventh Series will be redeemable at the option of the Company, in whole or in part, on not less than 30 nor more than 60 days notice prior to the Settlement Date, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-seventh series to be redeemed, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon to the Settlement Date. The bonds of the Forty-seventh Series are not otherwise subject to voluntary or optional prepayment.
(II)    
Allocation of Partial Prepayments.
In the case of each partial prepayment of the bonds of the Forty-seventh Series, the principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-seventh Series to be prepaid shall be allocated by the Company among all of the bonds of the Forty-seventh Series at the time outstanding in proportion, as nearly as practicable, to the respective unpaid principal amounts thereof not theretofore called for prepayment.
(III)     
Maturity; Surrender, Etc.
In the case of each notice of prepayment of bonds of the Forty-seventh Series pursuant to this section, if cash sufficient to pay the principal amount to be prepaid on the Settlement Date (which shall be a Business Day), together with interest on such principal amount accrued to such date and the applicable Make-Whole Amount, if any, is not paid as agreed upon by the Company and each registered owner of the affected bonds, or, to the extent that there is no such agreement entered into with one or more such owners, deposited with the Corporate Trustee on or before
15
the Settlement Date, then such notice of prepayment shall be of no effect. If such cash is so paid or deposited, such principal amount of the bonds of the Forty-seventh Series shall be deemed paid for all purposes and interest on such principal amount shall cease to accrue. In case the Company pays any registered owner pursuant to an agreement with that registered owner, the Company shall notify the Corporate Trustee as promptly as practicable of such agreement and payment, and shall furnish the Corporate Trustee with a copy of such agreement; in case the Company deposits any cash with the Corporate Trustee, the Company shall provide therewith a list of the registered owners and the amount of such cash each registered owner is to receive. The Trustees shall be under no duty to inquire into, may conclusively presume the correctness of, and shall be fully protected in relying upon the information set forth in any such notice, list or agreement, and shall not be chargeable with knowledge of any of the contents of any such agreement. Any bond prepaid in full shall be surrendered to the Company or the Corporate Trustee for cancellation on or before the Settlement Date or, with respect to cash deposited with the Corporate Trustee, before payment of such cash by the Corporate Trustee; any bond prepaid in part shall be surrendered to the Company or the Corporate Trustee on or before the Settlement Date (unless otherwise agreed between the Company and the registered owner) or, with respect to cash deposited with the Corporate Trustee before payment of such cash by the Corporate Trustee, for a substitute bond in the principal amount remaining unpaid.
(IV)    
Make-Whole Amount.
Make-Whole Amount means, with respect to any bond of the Forty-seventh Series, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the Discounted Value of the Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to the Called Principal of such bond of the Forty-seventh Series over the amount of such Called Principal, provided that the Make-Whole Amount may in no event be less than zero. For the purposes of determining the Make-Whole Amount, the following terms have the following meanings:
Business Day means any day other than a Saturday, a Sunday or a day on which commercial banks in New York City are required or authorized to be closed.
Called Principal means, with respect to any bond of the Forty-seventh Series, the principal of such bond that is to be prepaid pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Discounted Value means, with respect to the Called Principal of any bond of the Forty-seventh Series, the amount obtained by discounting all Remaining Scheduled Payments with respect to such Called Principal from their respective scheduled due dates to the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in accordance with accepted financial practice and at a discount factor (applied on the same periodic basis as that on which interest on the bonds of the Forty-seventh Series is payable) equal to the Reinvestment Yield with respect to such Called Principal.
Reinvestment Yield means, with respect to the Called Principal of any bond of the Forty-seventh Series, 0.5% over the yield to maturity implied by (i) the yields reported as of 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, on the display designated as Page PX1 on the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service (or such other display on the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service having the same information as PX1 if PX1 is replaced by the Bloomberg Financial Markets Service) for the most recently issued actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury securities having a maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date, or (ii) if such yields are not reported as of such time or the yields reported as of such time are not ascertainable (including by way of interpolation), the Treasury Constant Maturity Series Yields reported, for the latest day for which such yields have been so reported as of the second Business Day preceding the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal, in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15 (519) (or any comparable successor publication) for actively
16
traded U.S. Treasury securities having a constant maturity equal to the Remaining Average Life of such Called Principal as of such Settlement Date. Such implied yield will be determined, if necessary, by (a) converting U.S. Treasury bill quotations to bond equivalent yields in accordance with accepted financial practice and (b) interpolating linearly between (1) the most recently issued, actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and greater than such Remaining Average Life and (2) the most recently issued, actively traded on-the-run benchmark U.S. Treasury security with the maturity closest to and less than such Remaining Average Life. The Reinvestment Yield shall be rounded to the number of decimal places as appears in the interest rate of the applicable bond of the Forty-seventh Series.
Remaining Average Life means, with respect to any Called Principal, the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) obtained by dividing (i) such Called Principal into (ii) the sum of the products obtained by multiplying (a) the principal component of each Remaining Scheduled Payment with respect to such Called Principal by (b) the number of years (calculated to the nearest one-twelfth year) that will elapse between the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal and the scheduled due date of such Remaining Scheduled Payment.
Remaining Scheduled Payments means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Bond of the Forty-seventh Series, all payments of such Called Principal and interest thereon that would be due after the Settlement Date with respect to such Called Principal if no payment of such Called Principal were made prior to its scheduled due date, provided that if such Settlement Date is not a date on which interest payments are due to be made under the terms of the bonds of the Forty-seventh Series, then the amount of the next succeeding scheduled interest payment will be reduced by the amount of interest accrued to such Settlement Date and required to be paid on such Settlement Date pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Settlement Date means, with respect to the Called Principal of any Bond of the Forty-seventh Series, the date on which such Called Principal is to be prepaid pursuant to subsection (I) of this section.
Senior Financial Officer means the chief financial officer, principal accounting officer, treasurer or comptroller of the Company.
(V)    At the option of the registered owner, any bonds of the Forty-seventh Series, upon surrender thereof for cancellation at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, together with a written instrument of transfer wherever required by the Company duly executed by the registered owner or by his duly authorized attorney, shall (subject to the provisions of Section 12 of the Mortgage) be exchangeable for a like aggregate unpaid principal amount of bonds of the same series of other authorized denominations.
Bonds of the Forty-seventh Series shall be transferable (subject to the provisions of Section 12 of the Mortgage) at the office or agency of the Company in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York. The Company shall not be required to make transfers or exchanges of bonds of the Forty-seventh Series for a period of ten (10) days next preceding any designation of bonds of said series to be prepaid, and the Company shall not be required to make transfers or exchanges of any bonds of said series designated in whole or in part for prepayment.
Upon any exchange or transfer of bonds of the Forty-seventh Series, the Company may make a charge therefor sufficient to reimburse it for any tax or taxes or other governmental charge, as provided in Section 12 of the Mortgage, but the Company hereby waives any right to make a charge in addition thereto for any exchange or transfer of bonds of the Forty-seventh Series.
After the delivery of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture and upon compliance with the
17
applicable provisions of the Mortgage and receipt of consideration therefor by the Company, there shall be an initial issue of bonds of the Forty-seventh Series for the aggregate principal amount of $60,000,000.
ARTICLE III
Consent to Amendments
SECTION 1.  
Consent to Amendments
  Each initial and future holder of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series, the Forty-sixth Series and the Forty-seventh Series, by its acquisition of an interest in such bonds, irrevocably (a) consents to the amendments set forth in Article IV of the Thirty-first Supplemental Indenture, dated as of February 1, 2010, without any other or further action by any holder of such bonds, and (b) designates the Corporate Trustee, and its successors, as its proxy with irrevocable instructions to vote and deliver written consents on behalf of such holder in favor of such amendments at any bondholder meeting, in lieu of any bondholder meeting, in any consent solicitation or otherwise.
ARTICLE IV
Reservation of Right to Amend Sections 35(a) and 101 of the Mortgage
SECTION 1. The Company reserves the right, without any vote, consent or other action by the holders of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series, the Forty-sixth Series, the Forty-seventh Series or any subsequent series, to amend the Mortgage, as herein or heretofore supplemented as follows:
(A) By deleting from Section 35(a) the phrase having its principal office and place of business in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York and the word such at the location in said Section 35(a) at which such word first appears.
(B) By adding the following at the end of the first sentence of Section 101:
; provided however, that if all of the bonds at that time Outstanding are registered as to principal and interest or as to principal only, such notice shall be sufficiently given if mailed, postage prepaid to each such registered owner of bonds at his/her last address appearing on the registry books, on or before the date of on which the first publication of such notice would otherwise have been required.
ARTICLE V
Miscellaneous Provisions
SECTION 1. Section 126 of the Mortgage, as heretofore amended, is hereby further amended by adding the words and April 15, 2018, October 15, 2028 and October 15, 2043 after the words and July 15, 2042.
SECTION 2. Subject to the amendments provided for in this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, the terms defined in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, shall, for all purposes of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, have the meanings specified in the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented.
18
SECTION 3. The holders of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series, the Forty-sixth Series and the Forty-seventh Series consent that the Company may, but shall not be obligated to, fix a record date for the purpose of determining the holders of bonds of the Forty-fifth Series, the Forty-sixth Series and the Forty-seventh Series entitled to consent to any amendment, supplement or waiver. If a record date is fixed, those persons who were holders at such record date (or their duly designated proxies), and only those persons, shall be entitled to consent to such amendment, supplement or waiver or to revoke any consent previously given, whether or not such persons continue to be holders after such record date. No such consent shall be valid or effective for more than 90 days after such record date.
SECTION 4. The Trustees hereby accept the trusts herein declared, provided, created or supplemented and agree to perform the same upon the terms and conditions herein and in the Mortgage set forth and upon the following terms and conditions:
The Trustees shall not be responsible in any manner whatsoever for or in respect of the validity or sufficiency of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture or for or in respect of the recitals contained herein, all of which recitals are made by the Company solely. In general, each and every term and condition contained in Article XVII of the Mortgage shall apply to and form part of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture with the same force and effect as if the same were herein set forth in full with such omissions, variations and insertions, if any, as may be appropriate to make the same conform to the provisions of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 5. Whenever in this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture any party hereto is named or referred to, this shall, subject to the provisions of Articles XVI and XVII of the Mortgage, as heretofore supplemented, be deemed to include the successors or assigns of such party, and all the covenants and agreements in this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture contained by or on behalf of the Company, or by or on behalf of the Trustees shall, subject as aforesaid, bind and inure to the benefit of the respective successors and assigns of such party whether so expressed or not.
SECTION 6. Nothing in this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture, expressed or implied, is intended, or shall be construed, to confer upon, or give to, any person, firm or corporation, other than the parties hereto and the holders of the bonds and coupons Outstanding under the Mortgage, any right, remedy, or claim under or by reason of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture or any covenant, condition, stipulation, promise or agreement hereof, and all the covenants, conditions, stipulations, promises and agreements in this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture contained by and on behalf of the Company shall be for the sole and exclusive benefit of the parties hereto, and of the holders of the bonds and of the coupons Outstanding under the Mortgage.
SECTION 7. This Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture shall be executed in several counterparts, each of which shall be an original and all of which shall constitute but one and the same instrument.
SECTION 8. The Company, the mortgagor named herein, by its execution hereof acknowledges receipt of a full, true and complete copy of this Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture.
19
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, ALLETE, Inc. has caused its corporate name to be hereunto affixed, and this instrument to be signed and sealed by its President, one of its Vice Presidents, or its Treasurer, and its corporate seal to be attested by its Secretary or one of its Assistant Secretaries for and in its behalf, all in the City of Duluth, Minnesota, and The Bank of New York Mellon has caused its corporate name to be hereunto affixed, and this instrument to be signed and sealed by one of its Vice Presidents or one of its Assistant Vice Presidents and its corporate seal to be attested by one of its Assistant Treasurers, one of its Vice Presidents or one of its Assistant Vice Presidents, and Philip L. Watson has hereunto set his hand and affixed his seal, all in The City of New York, as of the day and year first above written.
ALLETE, Inc.
Mark A. Schober
Senior Vice President and
Chief Financial Officer
Attest:
Deborah A. Amberg
Senior Vice President, General Counsel
and Secretary
Trustees Signature Page Follows
20
THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON,
as Trustee
Laurence OBrien
Vice President
Attest:
Francine Kincaid
Vice President
PHILIP L. WATSON
Executed, sealed and delivered by THE BANK OF NEW
YORK MELLON and PHILIP L. WATSON in the presence of:
Christopher Ryan
Glenn G. McKeever
Thirty-fourth Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 1, 2013
To Mortgage and Deed of Trust dated as of September 1, 1945
Trustees Signature Page
21
On this 19th day of March, 2013, the foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me by Mark A. Schober, Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation, on behalf of the Company.
NOTARIAL STAMP OR SEAL
[NOTARY STAMP]
JODI M. NASH
NOTARY PUBLIC  MINNESOTA
My Commission Expires Jan. 31, 2015
On this 21st day of March, 2013, the foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me by Deborah A. Amberg, Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of ALLETE, Inc., a Minnesota corporation, on behalf of the Company.
NOTARIAL STAMP OR SEAL
[NOTARY STAMP]
JODI M. NASH
NOTARY PUBLIC  MINNESOTA
My Commission Expires Jan. 31, 2015
22
On this 26th day of March, 2013, the foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me by Laurence OBrien and Francine Kincaid, each a Vice President of The Bank of New York Mellon, the corporation named in the foregoing instrument.
GIVEN under my hand and notarial seal this 26th day of March, 2013.
Notary Public, State of New York
DANNY LEE, NOTARY PUBLIC
State of New York, NO. 01LE6161129
Qualified in New York County
Commission Expires February 20, 2015
[NOTARY SEAL]
On this 26th day of March, 2013, the foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me by Philip L. Watson, the person described in and who executed the foregoing instrument.
GIVEN under my hand and notarial seal this 26th day of March, 2013.
Notary Public, State of New York
DANNY LEE, NOTARY PUBLIC
State of New York, NO. 01LE6161129
Qualified in New York County
Commission Expires February 20, 2015
[NOTARY SEAL]
23


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:ALE/ALE-8K-20130516080438.txt.gz
TIME:20130516080438
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 8-K
CURRENT REPORT
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934
Date of Report (Date of Earliest Event Reported)
-
May 16, 2013 (May 14, 2013)
ALLETE, Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
30 West Superior Street
Duluth, Minnesota 55802-2093
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(218) 279-5000
(Registrants telephone number, including area code)
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions:
SECTION 5 - CORPORATE GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT
ALLETE, Inc. (the Company) held its 2013 annual meeting of shareholders on May 14, 2013. Each matter voted upon at the meeting and the final results of the voting on each such matter are presented below. For a complete description of the matters voted upon at the annual meeting, see the Companys definitive proxy statement, dated March 26, 2013.
Item 1 - Election of eleven (11) Directors.
All nominees for director were elected by the following votes.
Item 2 - Approval of advisory resolution on executive compensation.
The advisory resolution on executive compensation was approved.
Item 3 - Approval of an amendment to the ALLETE Non-Employee Director Stock Plan to increase the number of shares of common stock authorized for issuance under the plan.
The amendment to increase the number of shares for issuance under the plan was approved.
Item 4 - Ratification of the appointment of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP as the Companys independent registered public accounting firm for 2013.
The selection of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP as the Companys independent registered public accounting firm for 2013 was ratified.
Readers are cautioned that forward-looking statements should be read in conjunction with ALLETEs disclosures under the heading: Forward-Looking Statements located on page 2 of this Form 8-K.
1
ALLETE Form 8-K dated
May 16, 2013
Forward-Looking Statements
Statements in this report that are not statements of historical facts are considered forward-looking and, accordingly, involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from those discussed. Although such forward-looking statements have been made in good faith and are based on reasonable assumptions, there can be no assurance that the expected results will be achieved. Any statements that express, or involve discussions as to, future expectations, risks, beliefs, plans, objectives, assumptions, events, uncertainties, financial performance, or growth strategies (often, but not always, through the use of words or phrases such as anticipates, believes, estimates, expects, intends, plans, projects, likely, will continue, could, may, potential, target, outlook or words of similar meaning) are not statements of historical facts and may be forward-looking.
In connection with the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, we are providing this cautionary statement to identify important factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in forward-looking statements made by or on behalf of ALLETE in this Current Report on Form 8-K in presentations, on our website, in response to questions or otherwise. These statements are qualified in their entirety by reference to, and are accompanied by, the following important factors, in addition to any assumptions and other factors referred to specifically in connection with such forward-looking statements that could cause our actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements:
Additional disclosures regarding factors that could cause our results or performance to differ from those anticipated by this report are discussed in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors beginning on page 27 of our 2012 Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statement speaks only as of the date on which such statement is made, and we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which that statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. New factors emerge from time to time, and it is not possible for management to predict all of these factors, nor can we assess the impact of each of these factors on our businesses or the extent to which any factor, or combination of factors, may cause actual results to differ materially from those contained in any forward-looking statement. Readers are urged to carefully review and consider the various disclosures made by us in this Current Report on Form 8-K and in our other reports filed with the SEC that attempt to identify the risks and uncertainties that may affect our business.
2
ALLETE Form 8-K dated
May 16, 2013
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
3
ALLETE Form 8-K dated
May 16, 2013


</DOCUMENT>
